{u'tt0401792': [u'With Hellboy, Guillermo Del Toro lovingly recreated panels from artist/creator Mike Mignola\'s comic book stories and brought them to vibrant life, setting a new benchmark for adaptations that respect their source material. With Sin City, however, co-directors Robert Rodriguez and Frank Miller have done more than just recreate the brutal chiaroscuro of Miller\'s stark post-modern noir artwork, they\'ve captured the essence and the aesthetic of Basin City (as much a character as Marv or Hartigan) and brought its universe and characters to a stunning three-dimensional life. And unlike Hellboy, which suffered from a weak, confusing script, Sin City weaves a Pulp Fiction-esque narrative which snakes through the dark streets and crooked alleyways of this hellish metropolis like a fever dream.\n\nIn short, Sin City delivers a blistering ballet of bullets and blood, dames and danger at every turn. It\'s a kinetic masterpiece of pop culture for the new millennium (and a case could be made that this was the movie that CGI was invented for).\n\nAs a Frank Miller fan for over 25 years, I know his work and I know Sin City \x96 and this Sin City will knock your socks off whether you are a fan or a newcomer to the dark delights of his devilish imagination and brutal style. Exceeding my expectations on all levels, this movie ranks as one of the most enjoyable cinema-going experiences I\'ve had in years.\n\nEverything works here. From Rodriguez\'s cinematography and editing, to the seamless direction (no mean feat when you consider Robert co-directed with Miller and Quentin Tarantino joined the mix as "Special Guest Director"), to the spot-on casting. The script gives Bruce Willis, Mickey Rourke, Clive Owen and Benicio Del Toro plenty of opportunity to chew the scenery \x96 and they do, especially Rourke, who, despite having his mug buried under a thick layer of gruesome latex, delivers one of the best performances of his career and steals the show as Marv, the giant thug with a broken heart. The ladies hold their own, too. Jessica Alba, Rosario Dawson, Brittany Murphy and Jaime King are all great in their roles, particularly Dawson as machine gun-wielding Dominatrix/Hooker-Godmother Gail. And kudos to Elijah Wood (proving there is life after Hobbits) and Nick Stahl who deliver contrasting performances as vile villains, the ultra-creepy Kevin and the disgusting Yellow bastard, respectively.\n\nSin City is smart, stylish, sexy and sick. It\'s also violent and funny. Certainly not a film for the whole family, but for those of us who enjoy our movies rated R, this flick kicks the head and the gut like a mule.\n\nHere\'s hoping Sin City makes a mint, for there are 10,000 stories in the naked (sinful) city, and this is but a handful of them. I\'m already praying for a sequel.\n\nA picture perfect "ten" for this cineast.', u'0.307503', u'I caught the Philly sneak preview of "Sin City" yesterday, and I have to say my hat is off. Few comic book movies have ever looked good on screen. The X-Men and Spider Man movies have done a good job breaking that stigma. In my opinion the aforementioned flicks have been a perfect melding of Hollywood and the Comic book universe, but "Sin City" elevates it to an art form, literally. It is hands down, the best representation of a comic book turned film ever. After catching the trailer on a TV commercial, I was intrigued, to say the least. So I went to my local comic book store and bought the Frank Miller books the movie is based on, and enjoyed them for their off beat humor, incredible violence, and stories of love, lust, friendship, honor and seedily-earned redemption in the underworld of fictional Basin City. Upon further contact with the Comic Book store owner, he clued me in to the sneak preview on the 16th of March (yesterday as I post this), so like a kid on his way to pick up the latest issues of whatever comics are popular these days, I took the day off and went to the showing. Having recently read the stories that are included in the film ("Sin City," later renamed to "The Hard Goodbye"; "The Big Fat Kill;" and "That Yellow Bastard"), I was amazed at how much of the dialogue and narration of the books actually made it to the big screen translation. This coming from a guy whose heart was ripped out by the bastardization of "The Sum of All Fears," bear in mind - I know what it\'s like to have a book you love not be given the loving attention we feel it deserves when it hits the big screen. The dialogue isn\'t always the best (it\'s a comic book, not Shakespeare, people) and even the best acting in the world won\'t change that. But seriously, if you\'re paying attention to that minor blemish, you\'re missing the point of the movie to begin with. Aside from the dialogue, the imagery in the film is something to be appreciated, whether you like the stories or not. Equally beautiful and gritty black and white, with occasional brushes of color that all but explode off the screen- the comic books (graphic novels to you purists) act like storyboards for this movie- as life is breathed into the still images on the pages. The "From Book to Screen" section that is no doubt going to be a feature on the future DVD release of this movie will no doubt drop a few jaws for those that haven\'t bothered to check out the source material. Cold, cruel humor and over-the-top, audience-wince-inducing violence are blended in the style of "Pulp Fiction" and "From Dusk \'Till Dawn" for obvious reasons, but as I stated before, it\'s all direct from the books. Kudos to Robert Rodriguez for not compromising in the making of this film and for his commitment to the original source material; and also to his co-director Frank Miller for his obvious contributions. And to the actors in it- the cavalcade of them. My favorite performance was turned in by Mickey Rourke for playing Marv absolutely letter perfect from the book (and he demonstrates one of the best narrative voices I\'ve heard in a movie since Morgan Freeman in "The Shawshank Redemption"). Elijah Wood has a non-speaking role, but his Kevin will follow you home as much as Nick Stahl\'s Junior does. Clive Owen is solid as Dwight (and I know a lot of geek fan-boys out there were upset that he was picked for the character) and Bruce Willis does what he does best as a cop that won\'t quit, Hartigan. The standout female performance is a toss up between either Rosario Dawson for her valkyrie, warrior, hooker Gail, or (it kills me to say it) Brittany Murphy as a "His Girl Friday" cocktail waitress. The movie is definitely not for all tastes, and kids shouldn\'t be allowed in buildings even next to theaters showing this movie- but it will no doubt be a hotly discussed film as we creep through Hollywood\'s typically "phoned-in, pre-Summer" Feb/March/April offerings.', u'0.139144', u"Sin City in its original serialized comic form was everything that one would expect from the then well known artist/writer/creator Frank Miller and more. Many would come to say that it is his best work.\n\nFor years it was a world that only existed on paper in black and white with splashes of color, but it was enough to make Sin City live and breath in ways that few others in the medium have ever been able to come close to. Because Miller's dark, noir overtones painted a very clear, and fully realized picture of every seedy back alley and strip club, and cheap motel room in the fictional Basin City it became painfully obvious that it was just too visceral a place to ever be real in a way that could be encapsulated on film, or at least we, including Miller himself, thought. We were wrong.\n\nThis is THE comic movie we have been waiting for and it does not disappoint from the first overly dramatic voice-over to the last frame of the credit scroll. Telling three tales from Miller's world (The Hard Goodbye, The Big Fat Kill, and That Yellow Bastard) the comic transitions from paper to cellulose flawlessly and believably with a grace seldom seen. This ease is especially incredible for something so over the top and stylized like this that it's almost hard to imagine that these are the actors you've grown to know and love for years. But they are and it all comes together beautifully.\n\nThe cast, crew, and artists involved in making this adaptation a reality should be commended for their service to the idea that a true comic book movie can, in fact, be made without making concessions to the masses, without altering the plot or changing the characters, and still manage to retain the feel that the ink on paper had while creating a truly entertaining film. Much of this film's success can be directly contributed to the fantastic casting job which encompasses an incredibly long list of a-list and up and coming celebs plus a few obscure but cult favorites (yes, I'm talking to you Rutger) and the tag team direction of Frank Miller and Robert Rodriguez. Rodriguez should be particularly touted for pushing Miller to finally do this project, and for leading the way to make this the film that Miller always wanted it to be and that Rodriguez knew he could make.\n\nWhile I do have a few nit-picky points of contention with cut dialog or certain actors/actresses that refused to bare it all for the sake of keeping intact every last detail from the books it doesn't change the fact that what was laid out on the polyester film stock before me was every bit as entertaining as the original works, and it made a pretty darn good flick to boot. If it's not already self-evident, the bar has been raised for the comic movie. The next brave soul willing to venture in had better be prepared to take on Sin City.", u'0.454098', u'Just watched the Advance Screening last night and I must say that this movie pulls all the punches in violence. It deserves its hard R rating in the first five minutes and doesn\'t let up until the end credits roll. It has it all - bullets, boobs and be-headings - beautifully set in a grim atmosphere that really keeps you on the edge of your seat. All cast performances were excellent - especially Mickey Rourke\'s "Marv" character. Fans of the comic will not be disappointed in this film adaption. This movie is definitely not for the squeamish or faint-of-heart.\n\nSin City grabs you by the nuts and doesn\'t let go! A must see!', u'0.054041', u'I must admit that I know, or knew rather, very little about the story or history of Frank Miller and his series of comic book novels - and maybe that is why I enjoyed this movie so much. Although, this is still a different type of situation where one who was a big fan of the stories might be seriously critical of every little detail of the comic book turned movie. I don\'t believe anyone who considers themselves truly knowledgeable about Miller\'s work can say that this was not represented well on the big screen. I\'m now intrigued to go back and check out some of his work.\n\nThat aside, as far as it being a movie and a work of art, I would give this movie high marks in both categories. For it being a movie, it was nice to see something so different as far as the approach to making it go. Also, having such an incredible cast makes it all the more intriguing. I don\'t see anyone else having portrayed any of these characters any better than the cast that was hired to do so.\n\nOn an artistic level, it is extremely hard to think of any other movie that comes close to being in the same league. I did not see Sky Captain, but I would say that anyone who liked Pleasantville for its cinematography and graphic elements, would love Sin City. The use of black and white photography with only specific colors added later make for a far more dramatic effect. And so much of the cinematography being so close to a "moving picture" version of comic book art simply makes this movie worth seeing.\n\nTake the artistic elements of this movie, and put it together with the amazing cast (both looks and talent) and throw it together with a very different but coherent plot, and you\'ve got yourself an extremely enjoyable movie that is definitely worth seeing. And seeing at the theater no less!\n\nMy hats off to Robert Rodriguez, Frank Miller, and the rest of the cast and crew for putting together something different for a change. \n\nMy only complaint about the whole movie - the use of labeling Quentin Tarantino as a "Special Guest Director" is almost too lame to deal with.', u'0.143718', u"Went to a sneak preview of this movie today, and I was blown away. Over the years people have tried to emulate the feel of comics on the screen, and met with mild success(Dick Tracy), minor failure(Hulk), and solid success(Sky Captain and the World of Tomorrow). This is hard to do, but Sin City hits this dead on. The film is entirely in black and white(Except for about 20 seconds that I noticed in one scene.), except for highlights of color(Gorgeous eyes, splattered blood, and red Converse All-Stars to name a few.). This gives the film a feel that immerses you into the storyline. Add to this the overly corny duologue and scenes where scantily(And I DO mean scantily) clad women pull Uzi's out of literally nowhere, and you have all the right makings for a transfer of a comic book to the screen. The duologue had me laughing almost constantly, but it's easy to tell that they wanted you to laugh, even when they lines were incredibly corny and melodramatic...\n\nThe performances in the movie were great as well. I believe my favorite male character was Marv, played by Micky Rourke, and my favorite female character was definitely Miho, played by Devon Aoki. It seems that everyone and their dog was either in this movie, or lent some of their talents to it, and it shows.\n\nI would definitely suggest that you see this in the theatre the very first time, because it will NEVER have the same impact on your TV at home as it does on a 30-foot screen in a dark theatre. I was actually able to note a few times where the digital cameras were able to outperform anything film could do.\n\nA lot of violence in this movie, although most of it is either totally cartoon-style, or off camera, and some gore as well... A good amount of nudity in the film, ALL of it on camera, so you'll probably want to leave the kiddies at home.\n\nAll in all, one of the best movies I have seen in a long time, and I'll probably go see it again while it's in the theatres, so that my fianc\xe9 can enjoy it as well...", u'0.258655', u"I'm only a marginal comics fan - I read a bunch of stuff over the course of a year or two in college and haven't read much at all since. Frank Miller was my favorite writer then and the I always loved the Sin City series. I didn't realize the movie was even being made until I saw the notice for the preview screening (if that's an indication of how much I follow comics these days).\n\nThis movie was as perfect an adaptation of those books as I could imagine. The look, cast, atmosphere, everything was just spot on. The stories were all gripping and intertwined with each other nicely and I thought the brief Josh Hartnett spots were great bookends to the movie. I was amazed the entire length of the screening.\n\nIf you're into comics at all you'll love this movie. You won't be disappointed. I'm not sure how to recommend it to others but you certainly don't need to be a comics fan to enjoy it. I loved it without reservation.", u'0.296959', u"If I was to use one word to describe this film it would \r have to be....Violent! if i was allowed two words I would add \r 'Visceral'.\r \r\nThe movie is two hours long and is structured in a similar way to Pulp \r Fiction. A bunch of stories set in a consistent world, with characters \r falling in and out of each others plot lines. On the whole it works \r brilliantly, and for the duration there isn't a boring moment. It is \r High octane, million miles and hour storytelling, and it EASILY Robert \r Rodriguez's best film.\r \r\nAllowing Frank Miller to write the script was a fantastic move, as the \r dialogue is edgy, witty and VERY faithful to the original material. In \r fact, many many lines are just taken straight from the pages. likewise, \r the camera behaves like a moving cartoon box out. The framing of all \r the key scenes is SO faithful to the printed page that it produces a \r truly original look that is fairly incomparable. Visually its a true \r original. Sometimes these visuals fall down, there are some very very \r obvious digital shots that don't quite gel, but on the whole the \r cinematography is jaw dropping. You could literally pause the movie at \r almost any point and just hang that frame on a wall, its that \r beautiful.\r \r\nPerformances are good all round. Mickey Rourke absolutely nails Marv, \r and the girls of Old Town are all as beautiful as they are deadly. The \r other standout for me was Elijah Wood, who was truly chilling. Bruce \r Willis puts in a solid, if unspectacular turn as Hartigan.\r \r\nThe film isn't entirely void of criticism. there's some fudging of time \r lines with Hartigans character (do we really buy Bruce Willis as a \r nearly 70 year old man?) and the jumps from story to story are jarring \r initially, but once it settles into itself the ride is fantastic.\r \r\nMy other main criticism is the same I have with Quentin Tarantinos \r work. That every character and every voice in the movie is the same. \r This is more a fault of the source material, but when every single \r person is a wise cracking, hard boiled tough guy (even the women) then \r it kind of distills the effect of their toughness. In a film that is \r predominantly voice over driven, it is hard to differentiate characters \r when they all sound exactly the same, both tonally, and in the language \r they use. Even Marv, who's supposed to be a meat head, talks in \r gravelly prose that would make Bukowski feel like a Nancy.\r \r\nOther Minor niggles are hardly worth mentioning. From a technical \r standpoint the sound effects are WAY to loud. All of the punches, \r gunshots etc are given such ridiculous prominence on the track that \r they threaten to make mockery of the violence. I actually found that i \r didn't want any more guns fired cos it was hurting my ears! all in all \r though, its one hell of a ride, and only a couple of notches below Pulp \r Fiction on the 'Oh my god that film was cool-o-meter'.", u'0.222691', u"Channel surfing late one night I stumbled across this film and stopped to look because of the unusual cinematography. It's visually stunning, mostly in b&w and that evokes a film noir atmosphere punctuated with those brilliant flashes of color. Two minutes later I couldn't take my eyes away. This unique film is superbly executed, the casting, the screenplay, the special effects, everything about it. As we all know, there is an expansive library of film work out there for a wide range of tastes and sensibilities. If yours are delicate, if you are offended by gore and violence, then this film will NOT be your cup of tea. Stay away from it. But if both the horror and film noir genres appeal to you, you'll probably find this movie as captivating as I did.", u'0.292554', u"I just came back from an advance screening of Sin City, and I can tell you this is one salient reel of pitch of a film. Think of it as film noir amped up for a post modern century. It comes across like most of Frank Miller's writing, modestly fantastic for the comic environment, but steeped long and hard in the tradition of the underground crime writers of the '40's. Visually, the juxtaposition of the rich B&W with digitally-hued Technicolor makes it hard to take your eyes off the screen. This film was tailor made for most of the people who have been following Miller's writing for the past twenty odd years, brimming with many of his trademark elements and visual style that he, along with Messrs. Rodriguez and Tarantino, capture brilliantly. Not for more sensitive or under aged souls, Sin City will burn like a fire that you have to watch for everyone else.", u'0.54321', u'This is a perfect adaptation of several of Frank Miller\'s Sin City stories. Filmed to look exactly precisely like the panels of the comic book where everything is BLACK or WHITE except for the occasional red, blue, or yellow, exactly like in the comic. The dialog is lifted word for word from the comic and sold in noir-ish tones we associate with the genre.\n\nAfter five minutes you quickly realize that its all visual form over substance, and that there is little behind the trick of exact duplication. \n\nThe narration, like much of the narration in the pulp novels its paying homage to, is purple and laughable when spoken out loud. The dialog is equally ludicrous. None of it even remotely real. I was in fits of uncontrolled laughter as the "serious" lines of prose were spewed out over mostly unremarkable images.I know there is a tinge of humor to the source but on screen it comes off as something to laugh AT not with. \n\nYes, it all matches the comic exactly, but to what end? What is the purpose of this exactitude? Wouldn\'t it have been better to simply film the panels and have the actors speak the lines? Its all little more than a live action Clutch Cargo since there is no life on screen in what is little more than posed actors recreating the static shots of the comic. This is a ground breaking visual style? \n\nMany people in discussing the film have mentioned the violence and how "if it had been in color" it would have been unbearable. I think it would have looked equally silly. Actually most of this movie would have looked very silly and dumb in color.\n\nThe performances, especially Mickey Rourke as Marv (Oscar nom?)are excellent, but they are saddled with such unreal material that their earnestness comes off making it all look even more ridiculous.\n\nThis is simply one of the most over-hyped films in many years. Its a live action comic book for people who\'ve forgotten how to read.', u'-0.335783', u"I'll put my bottom line at the top so you can decide whether to read on. I can't recommend this film to the average cinema-goer. Instead, I will recommend it to those who are fans of Frank Miller, film noir, Robert Rodrigues, and to a lesser extent Quentin Tarantino. This is also not a film for feminists. Others should read on and decide if this is something they want to see. \n\nThe fact that Frank Miller was listed with Robert Rodriquez as co-director of this film, and the cleverly ambiguous film noir trailer hooked me. So, the spouse and I went to see it shortly after release, expecting exactly what we got - a very cleverly and interestingly shot film noir version of several Frank Miller stories taking place in Basin City, the locus of Miller's graphic novels of the same name as the film. \n\nQuentin Tarantino guest directs one of the segments. I'm not sure which - Rodrigues' style is as often violent, but a bit more comic. Based on some of the ridiculous violence of the film, I think it likely that QT had some influence on the other segments as well. My only objection to this film is really the quantity of absurd and frankly grotesque violence scenes. Though the violence is true to Miller's work, seeing it as a process creates a very different effect than Miller's art. Fortunately, Rodrigues' sense of humor also prevails in most of the most violent scenes. The use of colorization emphasizes the film's bloodiness through the only colors used in the film - red, ultra-white and yellow - comic exaggeration and a wonderfully eerie noir feel. \n\nPredictably, this is a very dark film, and quite a bit more disturbing than the average commercial stuff. \n\nWhat the spouse and I didn't expect was pleasantly surprising - one of the most artistically well done interpretations of the comic medium I have yet seen (and I have seen them all) and stand-out performances by Del Toro, Mickey Rourke and Willis. I expect nothing less from Del Toro, but I have to admit Rourke just blew me away as Miller's phenomenally ugly and invincible tough guy - Marv - who decides, for once, to do something good with his life. Rourke's character is played with such empathy that you won't want his segments to end - you will want him to become the final hero of the film. I was less enchanted with Clive Owen's portrayal of Dwight. Though this segment was good entertainment, I thought Owen could have given a more emotive performance. Elijah Wood was exceptionally creepy and well cast in his very brief role.\n\nAll of the heroic male characters (and this film is VERY much filmed from a stereotype film noir male point of view) have one common characteristic - they are all very tough critters fighting against all odds against endemic corruption, murder and injustice, but not at all afraid to indulge in it to further their own ends. The vignettes are loosely but satisfactorily connected. But the plots are less important than the way the film FEELS. The film mixes hopelessness with fearlessness and fatalism to the extent that you'll feel like an honorable death ending a brief life is far more appealing than a lengthy life devoid of self-respect. It's a really well done homage to Comic Book as an art form, and the film noir motif. Whoever thought of putting Rodriguez and Miller together on this one deserves a nod from fans of both genres.", u'0.220868', u"Sin City is a film geek's dream, all style and violence, an homage not only to the comics that spawned them but to Tarantino-esque gore and violence; it's even shot in black and white, features 'edgy' story material, anti-heroes, and gratuitous amounts of attractive female flesh. I'm sure the internet film geeks have already erected a shrine to this film. But unlike them, I have not come to praise Miller (or really Rodriguez), but to bury him.\n\nRodriguez does, in fact, manage the near impossible feat of capturing Miller's noir style in an interesting way. I was worried that what worked for the comics wouldn't work for the movies, but Rodriguez pulls it off. Sin City looks like its graphic antecedents, and the sparse use of spot color echoes Miller's style and carries much of the same impact. While Miller's people rarely resemble real humans any more (except the always curvaceous women), I felt most of the casting was good too. Mickey Rourke is hidden behind a thick layer of prosthetics as one of the main characters, Marv, but it somehow actually works in the film. I think probably I liked Bruce Willis' Hartigan the best, but then I liked his story arc the most as well.\n\nThe problem, sadly, is not with the visuals, where I thought it would be. The problem isn't even with the storytelling \x96 although the narrative voices of the characters are so monotonous and so similar that you more or less lose track of who's doing what to who because they all speak with the same burned-out hard-ass gravelly self-deprecating voice. The problem is simply that the shorthand Miller used in the comics does not translate well to the screen, at all. Sin City on the page is a violent, dirty place, and it is so in the movie; but the insanely high level of sadism is far less shocking on the page than it is on the screen. Sin City plays like a two hour seminar in violence desensitization; every single imaginable physical cruelty \x96 from eye-gouging to castration, from severed limbs to bullwhipping, to a lot, lot more \x96 is played out in stark black and white. As if that weren't bad enough \x96 and if you think it's not, you have bigger issues than I do, friend \x96 what makes it even worse is that the film revels in the violence. In the comics, when these lunks go off to commit their mayhem, while they throw themselves into it, there's always an undertow of regret to it, of resignation, of knowing what they do damns them. But here, the committing of acts of unspeakable violence somehow seem to justify and redeem the characters; the more disgusting things you do in the name of revenge, the greater a hero you are. I cannot think of a single message more repugnant or reprehensible to send.\n\nTo me Sin City, while perhaps an interesting visual exercise (though honestly I wasn't that captivated), is little more than an excuse to show blood and boobs for two hours. I could get the same thing with a little less style (and maybe Joan Severance instead of Jessica Alba) from a direct-to-video shlocker that at least knew it was a borderline snuff film and didn't have the pretensions to art. Sin City is two hours of repetitive, relentless sadism, wrapped up in an artsy package. With all that talent, with all the effort and work (and it's there), it's a shame they managed to miss the underlying message in all of Miller's comics \x96 that the descent into this lifestyle can only end one way, and it's not good. The very heart, as it were, of Miller's message in the books, completely missing from the film. Rodriguez got all the trappings right, he just sort of missed the point. But so, then, did most of the fans.", u'-0.337766', u"If you're interested in how comics are translated to film in an innovative way, check out 'American Splendor' and 'The Hulk'. If you're interested in film noir, check out 'Blade Runner' and 'Angel Heart'. If you're interested in black-and-white movies with some color here and there, check out 'Rumble Fish'. If you're interested in time-warped storytelling, check out 'Pulp Fiction'. If you're interested in blood and gore, check out 'Braindead'.\n\nAll of the movies mentioned above are more original than Sin City. Moreover, Sin City is just an accumulation of all the clich\xe9s invented in the films above, and by extension all Hollywood films since 'A Wonderful Life'.\n\nI saw this film and I couldn't help but wonder about the American people. One comment on this board read 'the violence is cartoony so it's not too disturbing, but there is some nudity so leave the kids at home'. In other words, it's okay to watch heads get mutilated, decapitated, and blown up - but it's not okay to watch a naked human being. I'm seriously wondering why people feel killing - termination of life - is OK to show to kids but sex, the creation of life, is not.\n\nWhen I saw 'Kill Bill' I was already quite intrigued that the director could shoot such beautiful images and yet only uses them for showing violence and murder. I saw the same film again with 'Sin City' - only this time it wasn't a pastiche of martial arts clich\xe9s, it was a pastiche of martial arts, film noir, and comic clich\xe9s. This left me highly unimpressed with beautiful imagery or supposedly surprising plot details. Actually, I've noticed that when the audience cracks up over inventive killing or mutilation, it's often a nervous reaction which people confuse for humor. \n\nOh man, I've seen to many of these vengeance films. Why does the bad guy always need to die? Why does the hero always need to place himself above the law? Why does anybody feel the need these days to make yet another movie about a guy killing all the baddies for a girl? The latter actually happens three times in this movie. This is all getting so old. I literally yawned when 'the mob' was introduced, and when we got a scene closer comprising of a zoom on a tough guy with his voice-over saying 'the big fat killing', I decided I'd look up my old IMDb user name. \n\nAvoid this one. See original films, instead. Life is short.", u'-0.21531', u'I walked out at the one hour and forty-minute mark, so I can\'t speak for the whole movie, but what I saw was just garbage wrapped up as eye candy. I felt dirty for having stayed as long as I did; dirty and used. Then it hit me, like a hard-boiled bullet right in the middle of my clubfoot chin: I\'d been taken; and not just the six lousy bucks for the matin\xe9e; $3.25 for a medium coke with too much syrup and not enough carbonation. On the way out of the lobby I punched the usher and shot the Manager, right between his fat sweaty eyebrows. He never even saw it comin\'. The rain was coming down in sheets across the half-empty parking lot. Out in my sweet Fairlane convertible, I lit a filterless Lucky Strike and remembered that I don\'t smoke because you look like an idiot and it\'s bad for you. I wanted to kill someone else, and I remember how Quentin Tarentino was listed as a "guest" director...', u'-0.69434'], u'tt0246578': [u"\nDonnie Darko is a type of movie that provides any viewer a type of material that promotes hard thinking and even harder re-thinking.  After the film ends, it's almost impossible to keep yourself from thinking of all the possible way to interpret such a film.  It's not quite surreal or full of quirky nonsense, it's more like a set of events, which seem to make sense on one level, no sense on another level, and finally perfect sense on another level.  The movie acts as an illusion to what's really going on, its almost pleasantly distracting.\n\nOur main character, Donnie Darko, is a boy suffering from sleep walking, and now what appears to be delusions.  He manages to avoid a certain death with the aid of a man in a bunny suit.  This twisted bunny also informs Donnie that the world will come to an end within the month.  This sparked curiosity and dread in Donnie, who also has every other aspect of a teenager's life to worry about.  The film proceeds with the feel of a teen flick, the style of a horror, and a plot suited for a fantasy.\n\n\nThe end of the movie is the part which will make you want to watch it again.  You'll think you've discovered what's really going on after the first time, prove yourself wrong on the second time, and will sit and watch every possible detail the third time.  Richard Kelly has created an instant cult classic, and perhaps something more than that.  Extremely well written with believable characters speaking believable dialogue.\n\nI'll be the first to admit, this film is not for everyone.  People will either love it, or despise it with all their heart.  I thoroughly enjoyed this film and would recommend it to anyone who has a taste for dark humor and a desire to put the pieces of the puzzle together over and over, long after the film has ended. 10/10", u'0.196851', u'\nI think the main theme of this film was summed up somewhere in the middle, where Donnie is speaking to  a not-so-helpful self-help guru and says something to the following effect:\n\n"Yes, I am scared and I am confused.  But I think you are the f**king antichrist!!!"\n\nIn the end, _Donnie Darko_ is a film about people who feel life and all the emotions within it very deeply.  Donnie himself is a basically sweet-tempered (often courageous) young man who is pathologically terrified of loneliness and the thought of spiritual isolation.  His quest for meaning and self-discovery drives him to the fringes of our reality, which only serves to isolate him more from the world he loves.  The few who understand what Donnie is going through go largely unnoticed (such as his girlfriend Gretchen or a tragically overweight yet remarkable sensitive little girl) or unappreciated (such as Karen, the English teacher whose only sin is trying to show her students that there is no such thing as a true end.)\n\nOf course, this movie far from polarizes its characters (indeed, polarization is the last thing this film wants to accomplish) and the majority are just a mishmash of the beautiful and the grotesque: Donnie\'s parents, who are at the same time loving and perpetually confused; the aforementioned self-helper Jim Cunningham, who is desperate to spread the lie that keeps him sane to everybody else; and Donnie\'s sister, struggling between her identity as an adult and her identity as a child.  And then there\'s Frank.  All I can say here is that nothing can prepare you for or adequately describe Frank.\n\nProbably the best thing about this movie, though, is its incredible emotional range.  It manages to inspire hope, love, dread, laughter, and tears at different points throughout the movie without making you feel least bit like there is a contradiction between those states.  The scenes with Frank (especially the one that takes place in the therapist\'s office against the backdrop of a conversation about the end of the world) are quite frankly some of the scariest things I\'ve ever seen in a movie, as they literally made my skin crawl.\n\nFinally, the performances in this film are exquisite.  The talent in this film is top notch and even Gyllenhall is just amazing.  That said, though, this film has a dismal future.  Combine the fact that the large majority of the moviegoing public is just going to find it unbearably weird with the fact that the movie begins with part of an airplane  crashing into a building (this has got to be the very definition of bad timing) and it\'s pretty clear that this film is going to stay underground.  However, if you are looking for a beautiful experience with a unique film, _Donnie Darko_ is just about as good as it gets.', u'0.311146', u"\nI first saw this on cable tv. Thumbing through the channels I stopped just as Donnie Darko was beginning. I thought the title was weird, and readied my thumb on the remote channel selector...pointed it at the TV...and it stayed there for the rest of the movie! I couldn't stop watching! I've never seen a movie like this. The movie has a beautiful aspect (especially the end). And there are a few chuckles as well. Contrary to the more critical commentary, there is depth and complexity to the story that kind of requires you to see it more than once. I'm no genius, but what I gathered the basis of Donnie Darko to be is about our part in the deliberate DESIGN of our destiny, and I catch more each time I watch it. \n\nRegardless of anything, sincere thought and expression went in to the making of Donnie Darko. Mixed with skill and technical ability = Art.\n\nA WORK OF ART!  In the top 100 movies of all time in my opinion.", u'-0.00396714', u"\nThe fact that this is the Directors first film is amazing to me. The scenes dripped with style, yet that style never seemed distracting. None of it was self congratulatory or gluttonous. The visuals were supported by a truly emotional score and its hard to find fault in the 80's pop tunes that found their way into some of the more impressive scenes.\n\nThe story is very much thought provoking. Its the type that leaves you pondering the possibilities voiced by the characters. There is nothing condescending about this film. Answers arent simply handed out, rather the viewer is left to draw many conclusions instead. The acting is also top notch. If i hadnt known beforehand that Patrick Swayze was in this film I would have been shocked. His character is amusing and interesting all at the same time. A great cameo for him. Drew Barrymore is forgetable, though that in no way detracts from the film. Of course the star is Jake Gyllenhaal. There is nothing that can be said to properly praise his performance. The rest of the cast chosen fit their roles perfectly. All of these things combine to create a stunning film. One can only hope that filmgoers will give this little gem a shot and support a true wonder. This is the only film I have awarded a 10/10 on the IMDB.", u'0.0536699', u"\nIn recent years, Hollywood has specialised in churning out mainstream trash; generic trash not even fit for the cutting room floor. Yet despite these movies' shortcomings, they continue to enjoy success at the box office. Sequel upon sequel, photo fit remake upon photo fit remake, frequently taking the box office by storm whilst simultaneously relegating smaller independent projects to the now relatively unheard-of arthouse cinemas. The tragedy is that the independent filmmakers are often those with the most talent; the most creativity; the most flair. One such filmmaker is director Richard Kelly, who saw the release of his scifi-drama-horror-tragedy-comedy-romance-thriller Donnie Darko last year. After reading a few rave reviews for the movie, I decided to check it out to find out what all the fuss was about.\n\n\nDonnie is a seventeen year-old boy with major emotional problems. He suffers from a psychological condition not dissimilar to schizophrenia, and lives most of his life in a medication-induced daze. We watch as Donnie meets Frank, a six foot tall rabbit which predicts the end of the world. Returning to his house, Donnie finds a jet engine jutting out from the side of his bedroom. The remainder of the movie follows Donnie's coming to terms with the ghostly presence of Frank in his life, the purpose of his existence, and the fact that the world will end unless he intervenes.\n\n\nWithout giving too much away, I can safely say that Donnie Darko is a mind-blowing experience. And I use the word `experience' in its truest sense. From the opening shots of Donnie's suburban hometown, through to the satirical take on Middle American high schools, the movie is incredibly involving on many levels. In fact, each frame speaks to us on more profound terms than the majority of arthouse films would claim to do. This is, in part, due to the impeccable performances by each and every member of the cast. Jake Gyllenhaal, a relative unknown, delivers a subtle yet emotionally charged performance as Donnie himself - the scene in which he tells his psychologist of his various childhood traumas is made both funny and moving by the haunting way in which Jake delivers each line, contrasted with the almost childish qualities of his movements on the couch. Most incredible of all, however, is his terrifying screen presence as he trudges slowly through a deserted corridor or along a dark street, head tilted slightly forward, face fixed in a confused, bewildered expression. Drew Barrymore is also superb as the liberal high school teacher rejected and scorned in a Conservative education system, while Patrick Swayze is excellent in his extended cameo, a smartly observed satire of a self-help guru with a few skeletons in the closet.\n\nWhere the movie comes into its own, however, is in its ability to incorporate and deal with a variety of genres. Every movie genre seems to make an appearance, so much so that to categorise the movie as simply a `psychological horror' or a `supernatural thriller' would be an unforgivable insult. Even the movie's portrayal of a high school, whilst unique and original, even bears a slight resemblance to the teen movies of yesteryear, what with school bullies, the new kid in town and an annoying gym teacher. Yet, Kelly never lets his movie sink to the depths of clich\xe9d teen drama. Instead, he paints a startlingly realistic portrait of suburban America, interspersed with flashes of sci-fi surreality. The movie never descends into total Lynchian weirdness, yet nothing ever seems quite real.\n\n\nDonnie Darko may conjure up images of oversized bunnies and watery projections protruding from people's midriffs, yet on an emotional level it is very much human. Donnie Darko is as much a drama as it is a thriller, and a superb character study at that. We are often led to question whether Donnie's visions and actions are the consequence of a paranoid, twisted, drug-polluted mind, or whether he really is experiencing such things. His gradual disillusionment as he realises that there is no hope and that he may have to go through eternity alone is beautifully portrayed, while the sense of peace and inner fulfilment he ultimately achieves is a truly inspirational message.\n\nWithout meaning to sound overtly soppy and without meaning to spoil the ending for anyone unfortunate enough not to have seen the movie, Donnie Darko concludes in one of the most mind bending, emotionally affecting ways possible. On a scientific level it will fuel debates for years to come (I have already read numerous different interpretations of the ending on the internet) but emotionally it transcends the conventions of modern movie making. In fact, it soars. The last few minutes, where Tears For Fears' Mad World is played over shots of various characters breaking into fits of hyper-emotion or contemplating their actions, are tremendously moving, while the lyrics (`I find it kinda funny/I find it kinda sad/the dreams in which I'm dying are the best I've ever had') perfectly summarise Donnie's state of mind. Furthermore, the last few lines of the movie, without telling you what they are, are meaningful on so many levels, and mark the end to a film steeped in emotion, surrealism and subtle beauty.\n\nI implore you to watch this movie. It most certainly is not for everyone, and will probably be cast off by a lot of the movie going public as pretentious, artsy nonsense. Donnie Darko only saw a very short, unsuccessful US run and was accompanied with very little hype. Hilarious, heart-rendingly sad, terrifying, profound, intellectually stimulating, emotionally absorbing and thematically relevant, this is by far the best movie of 2002. And for all those wishing to know if there's any American Pie-style crudity, sadly not - although at one point we are treated to a rather interesting discussion regarding the sex lives of smurfs.\n\n", u'0.209424', u"Being an angst-ridden teenager has never been easy, especially when you can see what's down the road, and it looks a lot like the end of your world.\n\nWriter and Director Richard Kelly is an artist whose films I will anticipate and Jake Gyllenhaal is truly remarkable among a very rich cast. He plays a troubled young man with a brilliant intellect and a vast imagination, struggling with the boredom of standard education, and a society afraid of its own shadow (e.g. contemporary America). An imaginary friend, Frank - a seven foot tall metal-headed skull-faced demon-rabbit saves his life by removing him from the the scene of a catastrophe just before it occurs, only to lead him down an alternative path to an even more terrible oblivion complete with forecasts of doom, psychiatrists, and self-help charlatans.\n\nThis film feels as creepy as any well-made ghost story I have ever seen, yet redefines the genre of supernatural storytelling in a very unique and original way.\n\nDonnie Darko is a film about heroism and sacrifice, decorated with disturbing imagery, the horror of everyday life, and a soundtrack reminiscent of Lynch's best. It is also a film worthy of several viewings and at least as many varied interpretations. \n\nI can not honestly recommend this to anybody who attends films for the pure sake of entertainment. Nor can I recommend it to people who need straight answers or have limited attention spans. It's art, and does not need to provide pat explanations for itself. As entertaining as this film may be, it has an unrelenting and merciless dark side, and might disturb even the most veteran indy film carmudgeon.\n\nThis is a great film. See it.", u'0.49408', u'\n   "Harvey" meets "The Mothman Prophecies," as a troubled teen starts hallucinating a horrific 6-foot-tall bunny rabbit that brings him dark forebodings about death and disaster in the very near future.  A streak of "Heathers" is mixed in as well, with trenchant satirical observations of high-school life in the late \'80s (story set in Oct. 1988), involving a priggish teacher, a self-help guru (Patrick Swayze!), and a put-upon fat girl at the fringes of the herd.  Finally, a whiff of "Back to the Future," in the form of a local eccentric who just may have discovered the secret of time travel, but a secret that has more to do with spirituality than technology.\n\n   A lot goes on here.  There\'s a meditation on the possible overlap between madness and the ability to perceive the divine.  There\'s a demonstration of why, in the Bible, angelic messengers (if that\'s what "Frank" can be taken to be) are often so terrifying that they have to start by saying "Fear not."  There\'s an enlistment of what martial artists refer to as the "ki" (or personal energy, emanating from a person\'s midsection) in the type of time travel depicted here (the term "ki" is never used in the flick, but the term "path," another word for Tao or "Way," is).  Quantum physics theory about wormholes is tied to the Fortean phenomenon of things falling unexplained from the sky, in a way that\'s more pivotal, and therefore more interesting, than the gratuitous rain of frogs in "Magnolia."  \n\n   Time travel paradoxes and ironies enter the picture as well.  One character (no spoiler!), whose life is saved by Donnie\'s ultimate trip back in time, wouldn\'t have died in the first place if he hadn\'t dragged her along to the opening of the wormhole.  Another character (again, no spoiler!), whose truly terrible secret comes to light in the wake of an arson investigation, must go unexposed as a result of that same time reversal, since the arson now won\'t happen.  Surely that\'s no oversight on the part of the screenwriter; it must be an acknowledgment of the choices and trade-offs in life, as well as of a confidence that no such terrible secret can remain hidden forever.  \n\n   Somehow this pastiche works, largely on the strength of good performances.  Jake Gyllenhaal is appropriately moody and, also appropriately, not always likeable in the title role.  Drew Barrymore, who executive produced, appears as a frustrated first-year teacher.  The movie\'s often dreamlike atmosphere is enhanced by the cinematography, the subdued but effective special effects, and the choice of the music on the soundtrack, which includes \'80\'s pop tunes, of course, and a haunting original song (over the end credits) titled "Mad World."\n\n   Not for all tastes, but better, stranger, and more complex than I expected.', u'0.0698234', u"Donnie Darko was a great and thought provoking movie. Most people will probably not understand the movie the first time they watch it, because they don't know what to watch for, but the 2nd time you watch the movie most will consider it a great and profound movie. Another way to understand Donnie Darko is to have someone that has already seen the movie to watch it with you and tell you which parts of the movie to remember towards the end of the movie. This is not a movie to watch if one does not like to think during movies. Donnie Darko is also not a movie for the lazy movie watcher to watch. I normally like the easy brained movies that require no thought-process but this is one thought provoking movie that I give a 10 out of 10.", u'0.0666578', u"\n*This is a review of the Directors Cut*\n\nI've already reviewed the originally released cut of 'Donnie Darko' so I am not going to review the film again. Instead, I'll comment on the differences between the two versions; unfortunately most of the differences took away from the original film, which I think is truly excellent. \n\nI traveled two hours round-trip with several friends to see the Directors Cut since it was not playing in Milwaukee at the time, and while I am glad that I saw it, I feel that the original is the superior version. There were many superfluous scenes in the new cut which did not add to the film; rather I almost felt that they made the pacing falter a bit. For example, the new scene between Donnie's parents in the caf\xe9 \x96 a completely unnecessary scene which did not add anything relevant to the story. There were a handful of scenes like this, as well as some added dialogue that indeed added to the development of some characters, (Drew Barrymore's character, the teacher 'Karen' was enhanced a bit) for some it just seemed silly (One of Donnie's bus stop friends telling Cherita that he 'hopes she gets molested' turned him from just being an incidental character into being an incidental character who is a jackass.) \n\nAnother major difference between the two films was the addition of several special effects to the new cut. There were a lot of dream-like sequences (the file cabinets floating among the clouds ala Rene Magritte) and all of the stuff focusing on Donnie's eyeball, computer-ish codes, etc, that just did not work in my opinion. Also, some of the most subtle changes, soundtrack for example, were disarming. The opening song was 'The Killing Moon' by Echo and the Bunnymen in the original, which provided a great backdrop in the introduction to Donnie, his environment and his family. Kelly used 'Never Tear Us Apart' by INXS in his directors cut. Certainly, a good song, but after using a perfect song originally, it is hard to get used to an inferior replacement.\n\nWhich is how I sum up my feelings about Kelly's directors cut in general? Why mess with (near) perfection? 'Donnie Darko' is a fantastic film that was so thought-provoking it made some people run the other way. Only those who were interested in something beyond the ordinary stayed to ponder and theorize its meaning, and still are to this day. Kelly's new cut does not enhance the film, rather, it made it plodding and a little dumbed-down \x96 two adjectives I never thought I would ascribe to this film. See the directors cut to play 'spot the new stuff', but stick with the original.\n\n--Shel\n", u'-0.0181664', u"Above all, this film has a kind of flow to it like nothing I've ever experienced in any other film before. The magic sets in from the very first moment, when we see Donnie waking up (and the song 'The Demon Moon' starts), and you just go with that flow and let yourself be drawn into that world. The story unfolds like a dream and the ambiguity (at least in the theatrical cut) as well as the fantastic songs help create an absolutely unique and strangely compelling atmosphere.\n\nFantastic script and fantastic performances: this film has a richness in its characters that amazes me every time I watch it. Forget the director's cut - here for once the theatrical version is the masterpiece. Probably the best social commentary on American society I've ever seen but beautifully woven into an ambiguous, slightly surreal fantasy tale with a haunting soundtrack.\n\nMy vote: 10 out of 10\n\nFavorite films: http://www.IMDb.com/list/mkjOKvqlSBs/\n\nLesser-known Masterpieces: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls070242495/\n\nFavorite Low-Budget and B-Movies: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls054808375/\n\nFavorite TV-Shows reviewed: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls075552387/", u'0.873786', u'Donnie Darko. My Theory.\n\nAt the beginning of the film, there is a dinner table scene in which Donnie\'s sister mentions Donnie\'s medication. This scene lets us know that he is mentally unstable in some way. This is later described as paranoid schizophrenia.\n\nThe night the plane crashes into Donnie\'s house is the 2nd Oct 1988.\n\nThat night, Donnie gets out of bed and takes a walk. This is where he meets Frank, the giant bunny rabbit.\n\nThis Frank, the one we see in this scene is in fact a ghost of the Frank we later see shot by Donnie. This ghost has come back through time to give Donnie a choice. He shows Donnie the future, right up until the moment he is sitting at the top of the cliff, watching the tornado (or portal).\n\nEverything you see, from the point of Donnie meeting Frank on October 2nd, to the day after halloween (the cliff scene) is in fact a vision that the ghost of Frank is showing him.\n\nAt one point in the future (in this vision) Donnie is speaking to his science teacher about \'God\'s channel\' and how you can not change the future events, no matter what you do. Donnie realises on the night of 2nd October, whilst Frank is showing him this vision, that what he is seeing (and what we assumed actually happens during the rest of the movie) is \'God\'s channel\'. The ghost of Frank shows him the plane crashing into his house, which in fact happens roughly 6 hours after Donnie has taken his stroll to meet Frank; Donnie meeting Gretchin, the school flooding, Donnie burning Jim Cunnigham\'s house down, the halloween party, Gretchin being run over and Donnie killing Frank in revenge. Donnie knows that he has 2 choices. He can go back to bed and prevent all the above from happening (as he knows that there is no way to change what the future holds, as it is a pre-decided event), or he can take the path shown to him by Frank (the ghostly apparition).\n\nFrank is the only character in this film who engages in any type of \'time travel\'. What is shown in the movie, from the moment Donnie first meets Frank, to the cliff scene is something that actually happened in reality, however what we are seeing as the viewers is in fact the vision Donnie is seeing that night (2nd October).\n\nFrank has gone back in time to prevent his own death. He knows, that by going back in time (as a ghost) he can let Donnie know what will happen had he gone \'sleep golfing\' that night (thus preventing him from being in the house the night of the crash - thus taking the path Frank is showing him).\n\nThe scene at the end of the film, where Donnie is lying in bed is a replacement to where he goes \'sleep golfing\', like an alternate ending.\n\nThe night he dies in the film (at the end), the 2nd October, is in fact the very same night you see him meet Frank(at the beginning) There is no time travel involved to take Donnie back to that night. The film leads us to believe that Donnie in fact followed \'God\'s channel\' and flooded the school, burnt the house down, etc etc.\n\nLet\'s say that this is what happened before the film we saw started, a kind of prologue.\n\n* Donnie meets Frank (the "person", as the film leads you to believe) *Donnie floods school, burns house down, has a halloween party, Gretchin gets killed and Donnie shoots Frank. *Frank as a ghost goes back in time Lets say that all the above happened in a part of the movie we did not see.(the prologue - not included in the film) This is where we see the film starting: *Frank (the "ghost") lures Donnie to the place they first "meet". He tells Donnie all about the things that have happened(as above). Donnie see\'s it as the future. These were the scenes we saw as actually happening. Donnie in fact, does not go sleep-golfing that night. He goes back to bed.\n\nThe scene we see at the end of the film, with Donnie in bed, laughing and being killed by the plane is in fact, only 6 hours after we first see him meet Frank.\n\nThis is what I think actually happened: *Donnie goes sleep walking and meets Frank. Frank shows him the future (the flooding of the school, etc etc) *Donnie prevents this all from happening by going back to bed, thus preventing all the following events.\n\n(The following events being the \'vision that Frank\'s ghost showed him that night, right up until he\'s back in bed laughing) The whole movie was set in one day. The dates flashing up on the screen, lead us to believe that the movie was progressing in time.\n\nHowever, these dates were just a reference point given to Donnie by Frank, on the 2nd October.\n\nIf any of this is unclear, please let me know and I will do my best to clarify. Sorry for how long winded this theory is, but it\'s a pretty hard movie to make sense of.\n\nDiscuss.', u'0.112937', u"\nDonnie Darko (2001) - 9.5 / 10\n\nThere are very few movies that hit at such a level 'Donnie Darko' does. It weaves in everything about a movie you've come to love; and it has something different to offer everyone.\n\n'Donnie Darko' tells the story of a young Middlesex guy, Donnie Darko. He's a fairly troubled teenager, who awakes one night to confront the shocking news that the world will end in 28 days time. Over the course of these 28 days we watch as Donnie turns everyone's lives upside down, and witness things only possible in your darkest dreams. \n\nJake Gyllenhaal (The Day After Tomorrow, October Sky) plays a brilliant troubled teenager. Giving us the best performance of his career. Mary McDonnell (Independence Day) plays Donnie's mother with the same dedication and brilliance any mother would.\n\nIf you haven't yet seen 'Donnie Darko', place it at the top of your to see list! If you've seen it, place it at the top of your to buy list! Easily one of the top ten movies of all time.\n", u'0.492916', u'This movie is painful to watch, the directing is bad, the cinematography is bad, the plot is full of holes. Some people suggest that you need to read a book to understand it, some can even write an essay to explain the theory behind, however the movie itself is so lame that it does not show you any of that unless you deliberately do so. Don\'t get me wrong, I like movies of similar genre like "Mulholland Drive", but Richard Kelly is light-year away from David Lynch in terms of talent, vision and capability in making a thought-provoking movie. Well, there is a bunch of bad movies out there but they get what they deserve: bad rating. However, this movie is ridiculously overrated and it is absolutely nonsense that it makes the top 500 of Moviemeter\'s table.', u'-0.221475', u'\nI rented this movie on the strength of the ratings and glowing reviews at this site. "Brilliant", they said. "Dark and beautiful", they wrote. 8.4 stars. Well, all I can say is, these people must have been on some serious drugs when saw this totally inane movie. The cinematography has the look of a student film. The plot (and I use the term for lack of a better word) is disjointed and meandering, not really sure where it wants to go, and that leaves the viewer not really caring. The ending, I suppose, is meant to be a twist, but ends up making little sense and falling flat. Donnie Darko, by the way, is actually his real name (ie, the Darko family), not an intriguing nickname. I give this movie 1 black hole.', u'-0.302378', u'I was instantly put off by the tired and worn clich\xe9s - the neurotic teacher, the nasty school bully, the fat Chinese chick who says "Shut up!", the sleazy mr. motivator, the "Mr & Mrs Average" parents, the eccentric old lady - all done to death by countless teenage flicks. And then the time travel and the convoluted, confused plot - laughable that the director is trying to (mis)use Stephen Hawking\'s "Brief History of Time" to lend some scientific credibility to this sorry concoction. It feels as if the film can\'t decide if it has anything to say but insists on plodding on regardless - with a vengeance... Redeeming quality for me was perhaps the soundtrack and some of the special effects. I wish it hadn\'t been so widely hyped - I would have spared myself the time.\n\nI too am surprised at the many positive reviews but the most telling was one along the lines of "I don\'t usually like deep movies but this one is different" - made me laugh!', u'-0.475521'], u'tt0028950': [u'\nGrand Illusion is a movie about class that doesn\'t hate anyone. How often does that happen? Yes, there are namby-pamby movies that "show all sides" and bore everyone with their non-existent point-of-view, but that\'s not what I mean. And, of course, there are plenty of movies about class that reveal their biases from the start; I\'m rather fond of Eat the Rich movies, myself. But Grand Illusion is about class without dismissing any of its characters. The aristocrats whose world is disappearing are presented as tragic figures, stuck in a code of life that is rapidly becoming meaningless. Both aristocrats know their time is past; the French one accepts this as probably a good thing, the German one doesn\'t (and blames the French one\'s sentiments on the French Revolution), but they both know their way of life is soon to be forgotten. And it would be easy for Renoir, when he made the film in the mid-30s a French communist with proletarian sympathies, to demonize these two. But he doesn\'t; he allows them their humanity, which is the most characteristic feature of Renoir movies in any event (he is the great humanist of movie history).\n\nNor does he show the collapse of the old way as an unfortunate preface to chaos. The bourgeois characters are good people. The world might be safe in their hands, as safe as in any other hands at least (except for the propensity among nations for war). All of the middle and lower-class characters in the movie are presented as people, not stereotypes. But Renoir doesn\'t accomplish this by collapsing all class boundaries into some homogenous universalism. These characters remain trapped within their class, and their class is clear to the viewer. The movie is not about the absence of class but about the crushing ironies of the very real existence of class in the lives of the characters. To show all classes without condescension, while retaining a particular point of view (that while people are good, it\'s best that the aristocratic world is in decline), is pretty amazing.\n\n\nIn Grand Illusion, the nominal hero is working/middle-class, but the upper class isn\'t evil and the lower class isn\'t romanticized or dismissed. And it\'s all accomplished in such a seamless way that many, if not most, first-time viewers might easily think it was a fine movie but something less than great. It sneaks up on you, and more than just about any film you can name, rewards multiple viewings.', u'-0.14585', u'What makes Grand Illusion a great movie, and the reason that some of us keep returning to it, is that it can\'t be reduced to a single simple proposition, the way that recent war movies like Platoon ("war bad," to quote Tarantino\'s synopsis) or Saving Private Ryan ("war senseless") can. It\'s easy to be sentimental about war, even while deploring it, by focusing on the horror of it or by making heroes out of those who are forced to fight. Renoir deals instead with the far more complex mesh of differences and alliances that separate and divide our characters. And while his main characters all have a clear class/national/religious identity, he makes much more out of them than just sociological categories.\n\nBut trying to explain why Grand Illusion is such a great movie by charting all the conflicting bonds of nationality, class, religion, etc. doesn\'t explain why the movie is so powerful. To me it is in those scenes in which language either separates our characters (as when Marechal tries and fails to tell the British prisoners about the tunnel or asks why de Boeldieu uses "vous") or unites them (as when von Rauffenstein and de Boeldieu speak in English or the English officer (in drag) sings the Marseillaise or when Marechal finally learns a little German). In these cases, Renoir uses language-without hitting us over the head to make the point-to illustrate the conflict between his ideal of sympathy between humans and the differences of class, nationality and religion.\n\nNow I know that this sounds just as dry and academic as other attempts to explain Grand Illusion. Maybe it is; the movie really does not need to be explained to be enjoyed. But these are the scenes that, for whatever reason, have always made the greatest impression on me.', u'0.0119198', u'\nIn the old European order, pre-WWI, one nation\'s aristocracy made war on another\'s not out of love for king and country or hatred for the enemy, but out of a sense of honor and duty. War was what they did, these aristocrats of l\'ancien regime. Their castles in the air, their noble worldview, their time-honored way--all would crumble, as they very well knew, if the line between the rabble and themselves were allowed to continue to blur. The masses had new and different loyalties.\n\n"La Grande Illusion" in 1914 was the hope that that old order could be preserved in the face of surging democracy and noveau-riche power. Jean Renoir\'s film presents us with an irony: the martial elites of France and Germany needed the war to vouchsafe their very identities, and yet that conflict would prove their undoing. Whatever side won, the hoi polloi would gain the upper hand.\n\nRestored from its original camera negative, the 1937 French film now on DVD sparkles like new. The restoration lets us see that nothing is dated about this work of genius, even if its POW-camp situations today seem stock and its characters stereotypes of nationality and class. The fine acting, the deft pacing, and the fluid camerawork make for a film that could have been produced last year. The whispered subtext, the nuanced conflicts, and the ironic complexity make for a film that is timeless.\n\nThe subtext is the eternal tension between "in the air" and "on the ground," "on high" and "here below," "from a distance" and "up close and personal." From a distance, war is no more rancorous than a chess game, with national boundaries as artificial as the squares on a chessboard. Up close and personal, war separates humans from their lives and aspirations, lovers from their beloveds.\n\nThe old elites loved nothing but their class and its accoutrements. It was peasant stock and noveau riche who belted out national anthems and honored the borders which in wartime could sever lover from lover but, paradoxically, also shield prison-camp escapees who made it across them to sanctuary. Renoir\'s genius was that he could show that an emergent new order, manifestly better on the ground, comes at a steep price, tragically, in the air.\n', u'0.0267585', u'\nFrom Jean Renoir\'s autobiography, My Life and My Films (1974):\n\n"If a French farmer should find himself dining at the same table as a French financier, those two Frenchmen would have nothing to say to each other, each being unconcerned with the other\'s interests. But if a French farmer meets a Chinese farmer they will find any amount to talk about. This theme of the bringing together of men through their callings and common interests has haunted me all my life and does so still. It is the theme of \'La Grande Illusion\' and it is present, more or less, in all my works."\n\nIn a sense, \'La Grande Illusion\' is a counterpoint in an argument of stories: in one corner, Jean Renoir & friends singing about humor and good cheer; in the other, a handful of Germans demanding bigotry and murderous pride.\n\nMy opinion of the movie is quite high, but I think, from having read that book and a few others, that the real accomplishments in \'Illusion,\' artistic and thematic, come directly from Renoir\'s deep affection of people and our loves.\n\nTo live your life with love and humor takes thoughtful delicacy. It\'s much easier to close your heart, fence yourself in, and never have a true friend in your life: and such closed-hearted people are inevitably the ones who coolly turn the political screws until the world bursts into famine and war.\n\nIt was too much to think that \'La Grande Illusion\' would prevent the then coming war, as Renoir hoped. But to look at the story again, as a lyrical anti-fascist statement and a call to weigh friendship and good company over nationalism (of any sort), that I think is where the story gets really good.\n\nThe modern era continues to give us a real choice. We can kill, without effort, to subdue the stranger. Or we can join the stranger for a meal and a conversation, and become friends. Which of these is the true vision of the world\'s "leaders"? Cold hearts, cold future.\n\nSomething to think about as you watch the movie.', u'0.352952', u'Every time I watch this I find something else I hadn\'t thought of before, every viewing is an augmented experience. Things I hadn\'t spotted at 11, 19, 22 etc I spotted last night, mostly inconsequential but still adding to the picture 36 years after my first time. That to me is the difference between great films and Great films, one of the reasons why this ostensibly simple movie is one of the all time Greats.\n\nAnd it is simple (the simplest things are usually the best) - boring to some people who sadly will never understand its logic and magic - an absorbing prisoner of war tale that is also a prisoner of class tale. It defines that class loyalties are more meaningful than patriotism even if not always practical, and that to those who consider themselves to have breeding it\'s far more important to have "blood" than capital. Boldieu and Rauffenstein embody this, they both knew their chivalric world order was being gradually diminished - the next war will and was led by people without breeding, types like Marechal and Rosenthal who fought on. The most significant borders are not between countries, races, religions, sexes or ages but those between the classes. Renoir was at his most inspired with Illusion, with so many memorable images and set-pieces, an engrossing storyline even when down to trying to say blue eyes in German or being posh by gossipping in English, and fantastic acting by all concerned. Everything has already been covered and better in previous posts, but I would add I don\'t understand why Regle du jeu is the Renoir film that gets the kudos today - unless by being deliberately more obscure it appeals to influential Artheads.\n\nThe French film I love the most.', u'0.475231', u'\nJean Renoir\'s classic "La Grande Illusion" has something to recommend it to anyone - there is fine acting, directing, writing, and photography, and a story filled with memorable characters who are involved in action, suspense, and drama, with some comic parts and even, later in the film, some romance.  All of it fits together perfectly to create a timeless and very satisfying experience.\n\nThe movie takes place during World War I, and is often considered an anti-war film, but the themes about humanity, relationships, loyalties, and identities are all timeless and go beyond any mere political statement.  The interplay between persons of different nationalities and classes, thrown together by the war, leads to good drama and makes some profound points about human nature.  The story primarily follows three Frenchmen who are taken prisoner by the Germans, showing us how they manage to deal with their confinement, and allowing us to watch their disappointments and their attempts to escape.  The other main character is a German prison camp commander with whom they become friendly, raising complicated questions of loyalty and duty.\n\nThe character studies are excellent, and all the fine acting and directing get the most of out the possibilities.  The settings are convincing and help the viewer feel what it was like to be in camp with the prisoners, sharing their boredom and their longing for freedom.  The plot itself is interesting, and has some exciting moments, but the main emphasis is on what the characters learn about themselves and about humanity in general.  There are many thoughtful scenes and some nicely defined secondary characters that round out the picture.\n\nThis is a fine movie, deserving of its reputation, and one that should appeal highly to anyone who enjoys classic cinema.\n', u'0.604376', u'\nIt is a wonder to see a film from the 1930\'s so definite in its view and opinions, yet so touching and revelatory.  Jean Renoir\'s GRAND ILLUSION is a\nfilm of great importance, one that improves with each viewing.  Having just finished the picture again for the first time in some 7 years, I was struck by its freshness.  It is an Anti-War film set during World War I that is something to watch.  It demands intense viewing.\n\nThis is a French work of art by the great Renoir, who would make his most acclaimed film, RULES OF THE GAME, two years later.  If you ask me, GRAND ILLUSION is the superior pic and holds up immeasurably better.  The small doses of humor and original characters in this film foresee the classic "shooting party" of RULES OF THE GAME.  With this movie, Renoir uses prisoners-of-war and the ludicrous element of war so prevalent in early 20th Century Europe and merges them into a film not unlike a play (an extremely well-written play).  The viewer has no illusions as to whether or not a war is happening.  We happen not to see any battles or gunplay, rather, the human element between men and women who are not so different no matter their ethnicity.\n\nRenoir\'s camera is an incredible tool used throughout.  He probes the characters at the various prison camps with some smooth dolly shots and brilliant use of focus and pull-backs.  It seems like an extension of his hand, much like his father\'s paintings.  One striking scene has some weary soldiers singing the French "Las Marseilles" after getting third hand knowledge of a French victory over their German captors.  Any scene with Erich von Stroheim is interesting because he is human and not some mindless German dictator so many people would come to know at the time of the film\'s release.  He is a broken man, scarred by war and looking to gain a friend in the enemy.  This is rare.\n\nAs far as prison camp films go, these guys seem to have it easy, however the fact that they are officers gives us some explanation.  The story-line effectively moves from escape attempts to human realization of the situation they are in.  Parts of it reminded me of STALAG 17, Billy Wilder\'s 1953 classic no doubt inspired by GRAND ILLUSION.  This is Wilder\'s film without the Hollywood touch, realist and sometimes drab.  Abel Gance\'s J\'ACCUSE would follow a year later.  If you want to see some anti-WWI films with two completely opposite methods of warning beneath the surface, see these two flicks back to back.\n\nThe illusion of reality is shattered by war, Renoir is telling us.  If only it could be as simple as those amazing shots of the countryside from inside the German woman\'s house: a breathtaking, simple look at a peaceful scene the way it should be.\n\nRATING: ***1/2\n', u'0.284582', u'Franklin Roosevelt said of it: "Everyone who believes in democracy should see this film". Mussolini banned it in Italy, and Hitler\'s Ministry of Propaganda banned it in Nazi Germany. The film vanished during WWII, and was thought to have been destroyed. Then it was recovered in 1946, but in an altered state. Decades would then pass before the original negative could be confirmed.\n\nThe Nazis hated the film because of its pacifist, anti-war, theme. The setting for the film is Germany in 1914, during WWI. Germans capture several French officers and take them to a POW camp, specifically for officers. After several escape attempts, the French officers get shuffled off to a presumably escape proof castle, run by Rauffenstein (Erich von Stroheim), a flamboyant German officer with a forbidding persona.\n\nUnlike other war movies, "La Grande Illusion" shows no actual combat, and the number of deaths is minimal. The film\'s tone is surprisingly lighthearted. Writer/Director Renoir conveys a sense of community among the French prisoners, despite their differences in social class. We see them several times sitting around a table eating, and chatting amiably. The cordiality between prisoners and their jailers is also surprising. It\'s not exactly a hug fest, but the predominant feeling among the men is respect for fellow officers, even if those officers are your enemy. None of the French or German officers want war; it\'s just their "duty", when called on.\n\nIn most of the film, scenes take place in small rooms or in that castle. Toward the film\'s end, outdoor vistas provide a visual contrast. Except at the film\'s end, I was amazed at how drab the surroundings are. Room furnishings are unadorned and contain the barest of essentials. Tables and floors are made of simple wood. The clothes are dreary and depressing. The stone castle is dank and forbidding. Music is made with simple instruments, like a harmonica or a flute. Of course, given the time period and considering the setting, such drabness and simplicity are not surprising. But the contrast with today\'s complex world of modern luxuries, that we take for granted, is striking. The film\'s B&W cinematography accentuates the drab environment.\n\nThe story can be a bit confusing in the first half, because the relationship between the jailers and the prisoners is so unusual. Viewers need to give the film wide latitude on this. Watching the film a second time helps clarify who is doing what to whom. The plot is easier to follow in the second half.\n\nThe film\'s acting is credible. I especially liked the performance of von Stroheim, all decked out in that imposing uniform, that monocle, and with that stiff bearing.\n\n"La Grande Illusion" is an unusual "war" film, one that had real significance during WWII. For this reason alone, it deserves to be seen.', u'0.0395601', u'\nI have tried to get this film for months on the criterion collection but it seems impossible here in Sweden(Maybe not impossible,you can order it on Amazon but that\xb4s to expensive).So when I finally found it on video this is what I say about it:\n\nThis anti-war masterpiece film is really ONE OF THE GREATEST FILMS EVER.I almost liked it as much as seven samurai.It\xb4s a about a group of French prisoners during the world war one.\n\nThe performances is simply some of the best I have seen(Jean Gabin Erich von Stroheim...).The cinematography is beautiful,great script but I guess i was most impressed by the direction by Jean Renoir.\n\nI don\xb4t think that I have been more touched by a film then this.It has such a deep humanity.A poetic film that should be seen by every one.Also remember that I have only seen this film once and it could be in my top 20 over the best films ever and when I watch it again it could be in top 3.\n\nRATING: 5/5  ', u'0.768178', u"I've just finished watching this film twice. Initially as my first ever viewing of it, and then again with the commentary track on. So it's quite fresh in my mind. And, with the benefit of the commentary, I don't think there's a lot that I missed.\n\nI'm still wrestling with my reaction to the film. There was much in the film that was skillfully done and rewarding. Some moving and thought-provoking themes. Some superb camera work. Some fine performances. Some memorable sequences. A lot of good movie making.\n\nAnd yet, on the whole, I find myself dissatisfied. Because as expertly done as many aspects of the film are, there are others where it is simply dismal. Its structure is a fiasco. Its plot a jumbled mess. Events which are played very significantly turn out to have no significance at all, and merely peter out. Key events are simply left out of the story, leaving us to wonder what happened. The movie breaks up essentially into three sections which have little to do with each other.\n\nThe problem is, the movie lacks a tight, coherent plot, and is more a sequence of somewhat related events. It's sloppy and all over the map. And it's easy to see why: Renoir's inspiration for the film was a collection of war stories recollected to him by an officer he met after the war. And that's exactly how the movie comes off, as a hodge-podge of ideas and stories thrown together, without enough effort made to sculpt the thing into a cohesive whole. Heck, Renoir didn't even know how to end it or what to name it until the very end, underscoring the fact that even *he* wasn't quite sure what he was making. What ended up on the screen is apparently vastly different than the first draft of the screenplay, which didn't even have some of the key characters, and was supposed to be about the various escape exploits of the protagonist. By the time we're done, we get only one actual escape for our hero, plus minor participation in a stillborn attempt.\n\nSo you can wax on all you want about the great care and detail that went into every scene and camera shot, about the messages and the themes, about the acting, the sets, whatever you want. And I agree that, in looking at the details, at looking at the movie in a reductionistic way, it's a beautiful work of art. But a movie is about more than its parts. It's also about how those parts fit together to make a whole. And looked at holistically, I'm sorry, La Grande Illusion is a disappointment. The story rambles and just does not hold together.\n\nAnd I'm still *bugged* that we have no idea why Our Hero ends up in solitary confinement.", u'-0.126386', u"During WWI two officers are imprisoned , lieutenant Marichal (Jean Gavin), and cultured captain named De Boeldueu (Pierre Fresnay). Later on, they meet other inmates as a rich Jew banker named Roshental(Marcel Dalio). Some time later, they meet again in a prison-castle commanded by aristocrat official Van Rauffenstein(Erich Von Stroheim in spinal collar).\n\nThis is an excellent classic anti-war and deals about friendship, comradeship, and human relations. A heart-breaker and elegiac movie in the way it shows war undercutting and qualities of prison life. Interesting performances enhance an eloquent screenplay by Charles Spaak . It's a moving reflexion on high and low class , about war and death. Time has not diminished its qualities nor its charming to the emotions. Exceptional Erich Von Stroheim , remarkable in a self-effecting performance and perfect Jean Gavin as good official and mechanic in civilian life ; furthermore the comic relief by Carette. Fine musical score by Joseph Kosma , including emotive \xa8Marseillaise \xa8during theatrical acting. The movie was deservedly nominated best foreign film and won special prize of festival of Venice.\n\nThe film is excellently screen-written and directed by Jean Renoir who approach the intensity and feel of his best works. Son of painter impressionist Auguste Renoir , was perhaps the best of French directors . At its initial French period he directed classics as \xa8Boudu saved drowning, Rules of the game, Marseillaise, Day in the country\xa8 and of course \xa8Grand Illusion\xa8 in which his optimism remains relentless . Renoir was in Hollywood for seven years, where he made \xa8Swamp water, Southerner, Diary of chambermaid, This land is mine,and Woman on the beach\xa8. He returned France where directed other classic films as \xa8Carrozza d\xf3ro, Testament Dr Cordelier, Picnic on the grass, Vanishing corporal\xa8 and several others. His films have influenced on Francois Truffaut, Luchino Visconti, Satyajit Ray , among them. Rating : above average, an extraordinary and sensational film.", u'0.650995', u'\nI had to watch this movie as part of my graduate film class, and I didn\'t have terribly high hopes. I took French classes for five years, and my experience with French movies mostly involved Gerard Depardieu in some state of undress and many cameo appearances by disrobed ladies.\n\nBut this wasn\'t bad...perhaps partly because it was made in 1937, before taking your clothes off onscreen was such a common occurence.\n\nThis is, ultimately, a class picture. If you know anything about World War I, you know that a lot of the class ideals about upper class gentility and the way an aristocrat behaves died in the trenches. The war was a great leveller, and that leveling is what is showcased here.\n\nYou never see the actual war. This isn\'t All Quiet on the Western Front. You only see some of the French officer POWs, and their treatment at the hands of their German captors. If you\'re familiar with war movies, you might be surprised at how cushy these prisoners have it--World War II certainly did not exhibit this kind of easy-going "don\'t escape now, you said you wouldn\'t" kind of attitude. But this was a different time, remember, when gentlemen still behaved as such, and those of your social standing were your equals, regardless of nationality.\n\nThe unlikely friendship that develops between the Frenchman de Boeldieu and the German von Rauffenstein comes out of this class mentality. They are the upper class that is slowly dying out, due to the large number of lower and working class men that are entering the army and gaining some amount of money and respectability. It is the true emergence of the middle class, and the end of the "grand illusion" that was the importance of "old money". Fellow Frenchmen Marechal and de Boeldieu can never truly be friends, even though their nationality would lead you to accept their friendship over one between supposed enemies--Marechal is working-class, a mechanic. "Your gloves, your tobacco, everything seems to come between us," he tells de Boeldieu. \n\nDe Boeldieu does, in the end, sacrifice himself for his countryman, but not simply because it is the patriotic and French thing to do. "For a man of the people, it is terrible to die in war. For you, for me, it\'s a good solution," he says to von Rauffenstien. For the upper classes, this was truly the way they, and their way of life, died. The men that emerged, like Marechal, were the ones who would go on to shape the world we inhabit today.\n\nWonderful performances all around, especially from von Stroheim. Truly overall a fairly great movie, and much preferable to seeing Gerard with no clothes.', u'-0.00378643', u'Re-reading my review of \'Stalag 17 (1951),\' I see that I referred to it as the template for every prisoner-of-war film that followed, including \'The Bridge on the River Kwai (1957)\' and \'The Great Escape (1963).\' Once again, my relative inexperience with cinema seems to have caught me out; this film from Jean Renoir uses a similar formula, and predates it by almost fifteen years. Billy Wilder must certainly have seen \'The Grand Illusion (1937)\' \x96 since it features Erich von Stroheim, whom he himself used in \'Five Graves to Cairo (1943)\' and \'Sunset Blvd. (1950)\' \x96 and so Renoir\'s influence is present throughout. It\'s a WWI film, but we see no combat. Whereas most anti-war films illustrate their stance by pounding the all-too-familiar adage "war is hell" through images of death and destruction, Renoir\'s approach is considerably more understated. He highlight the futility of war through human interaction, both between the captured French prisoners and between the Germans who watch over them.\n\nJust what is "the grand illusion?" Renoir derived his film title from "The Great Illusion," a 1909 non-fiction book by Norman Angell, in which the author argued for the impossibility of a large-scale European war for economic reasons. That WWI broke out five years later obviously proved detrimental to Angell\'s arguments, and Renoir deliberately plays on the irony of this knowledge. More significant, however, is that the book was released in a revised edition in 1933, the general argument modified to assert the utter utility of waging war, a theme that supports Renoir\'s stance: this would not be the "war that ends all wars." With WWII just around the corner, there\'s an bitter urgency to what the film has to say; just three years later, the director would be fleeing France. The topicality of the film\'s message proved especially successful overseas, and \'The Grand Illusion\' was unusually nominated for the Best Picture Oscar in 1939.\n\nOf course, no Jean Renoir film is complete without some class-related social critique. Most striking in this regard is the relationship between Capt. de Boeldieu (Pierre Fresnay) and Capt. von Rauffenstein (Erich von Stroheim), from which, scandalously, it is implied that one\'s class forms a more binding camaraderie than that of nationality. Boeldieu and Rauffenstein, both multilingual upper-class aristocrats who sense their social dominance is drawing to an end, seek solace in each other\'s company, and feel closer to one another than to the lower-class men of their own armies. However, there is hope in Renoir\'s vision of society. The age of aristocracy is coming to a close, and a new social order \x96 in which all men are accepted as comrades \x96 is at the cusp of existence. Boeldieu accepts this inevitability, and, despite the initial suspicion of his fellow Frenchmen, ultimately offers his life to allow two "lower-class" companions to escape. He betrays von Rauffenstein in favour of duty to his country, even if his death provides only temporary relief from the inescapable futility of war.', u'-0.00899457', u'As I approach my 100th review I\'ve decided to dedicate the remaining ones until then to some alleged masterpieces. It\'s not that I have started only now watching them, mind you. I\'ve seeing quite a lot during the last year, even if I\'ve only reviewed a few, and\x97-my, oh my--there should be somewhere a textile plant working 24/7 just to weave enough fabric to cover the naked butts of so many emperors out there. Now to my review: \n\nThe first flaw I see in LGI is the acting, the mood: it is too casual. See, these men come from war--from the worst form of war, trench war, which horrified even Hitler to the point of making him force his generals to develop a new form of it (Blitzkrieg). Yet they look sharp, mentally well, even with a gift for comedy, vaudeville, when their true life counterparts where mental & psychological wrecks after 18 months of carnage. I can believe that in TGE, where the POWs were airmen; or in Stalag 17 where they had seen little action before falling prisoners, but not in a WWI German POW camp. If you\'ve seen films that accurately portrait the horrors of WWI--All Quiet in the Western Front, Paths of Glory--you\'ll agree that these men can\'t have come from the same place. It is only in the last half hour that LGI gives us a taste of what that war was really about, after the death of Boeldieu and the escape of Marechal & Rosenthal.\n\nThen there is the plot. It\'s not solidly built; it lacks deep. It meanders from subplot to subplot without being quite sure where it wants to go. The tunnel? Gone, forgotten. The vaudevillian which seemed destined to greater things? The same. And what about the Pindar reading guy, why is he just left behind? And what\'s the point of the Russian subplot? (In Stalag 17 there is also a Russian subplot, but to show that Sefton could get even women in that camp). LGI seems to find its calling only in its last 30 min., when Boeldieu dies and the escapees find the farm. Marechal troubled relationship with Else is the closest thing to a strong, deep, story line you\'ll find here, specially when his departure makes even sharper her loneliness and hardship, the same millions of women must have endured during that and any other war. But that\'s almost ruined by an unbelievable ending. An imaginary line on the snow makes the German guards let them go, instead of shooting them. As for the Rauffenstein--Boldieu relationship, I found the first just too eager to express his empathy for Boldieu and his reasons-\x97their common upbringing--a bit shaky. Their final scene evokes more a farewell of two lovers than anything else, which is emphasized even more by his symbolic cutting of his lone geranium.\n\nThe direction is tight, but the editing from Hell. Many times, when something crucial happens, there is a sudden jump to a new scene without us having the chance of experiencing the resulting change of mood. For ex., when they are ready to escape and are told they\'ll be transferred to another camp, the action moves quickly to the transfer itself, without giving us the occasion of seeing them work out their disappointment. Then, after what it seems a trip with so many stops we see Rauffenstein reading that Marechal & Boldieu have attempted several escapes, which can only mean they were sent to other camps during that time, but no info at all is given to us about that. Or we see Marechal interrupting the drag show and right after that he\'s in solitary. We have no idea either of the passing of the (story) time--except when Marechal tells Boldieu they have been pals for 18 months\x97neither of the dates when this happens, except for some news bulletin which is dated 20 of Feb. 1916.\n\nDespite all that, not a bad movie, it has some interesting bits--like a flute playing Boldieu asking for some hot lead and the whole Elsa, Lotte episode--and there is good use of the settings, especially in the night scenes, with expert use of lightning and camera angles and movement. A quite decent movie but not a great one by any means. I suspect it\'s so highly regarded only because of conscience pangs, as everybody has ripped off something from it. 6.0/10.\n\nBTW\' I don\'t agree with all that "humanity of men in war and we are all equals" crap critics talk so much about. Come on, these are the same Frenchmen who had an empire they were ready to keep at the cost of millions of lives, as they did in Indochina and Algeria. As for "the commoners taking over", just ask William & Kate.', u'-0.402454', u'\nThe Grand Illusion, a forerunner of escape movies as well as a social satire where the three French prisoners represent each own class, consists of roughly three parts which are slow and incoherent with each other. The desire for escape is not compelling while the prison room is huge and luxuriously furnished. The intense screen presence of Austrian director/actor Erich von Stroheim as an evil German soldier may be the best part of the film.', u'0.040563'], u'tt0381681': [u'...is that it ends. This is a fantastic film. It joins the handful of movies where I think I liked the sequel even more than the original, although I liked \'Before Sunrise\' as well. Where Sunrise captured the immediacy and urgency of perfect youthful love, Sunset reflects beautifully on the aftermath of that perfection. I remember a line that says "nothing that is complete breathes", and I think that is what we see in this film. A perfect connection with another human is a blessing and a curse; having experienced perfection a part of us stops breathing, unable or unwilling to mar the perfection of that memory.\n\nThe dialogue is amazing, the acting is spot-on; this is a great film. In some ways it felt more like reading a great novel than watching a movie, in that I really felt like I knew the characters and was sad the movie had to end. Kind of like saying goodbye to an old friend. If you are an action movie kind of person, skip this flick because it will bore you to tears. If, on the other hand, you like good dialogue, well formed characters, and aren\'t quite jaded enough to have given up completely on the idea of true love, don\'t miss this film.', u'0.293276', u'There are four scenes that I will treasure forever:\n\n1) The ferry ride, and the subtle ways you can tell they\'re both heartbroken, lonely, frustrated and angry. The way she discusses the "little details" that compose a person, and what she missed most in him. "Like I remember the way your beard has a bit of red it in, and how the sun was making it glow that...that morning right before you left."\n\n2) The scene in the van, where they finally unburden themselves. One of the most emotionally raw and honest interplays I\'ve seen on celluloid. The way she reaches out to touch him, but holds back at the last second. Much different in tone from the way Hawke reached out to brush her hair aside in the first film.\n\n3) Celine\'s song. So simple yet so endearing. The way her voice fades to a whisper as she sings, "My heart will be yours until I die."\n\n4) The ending, which is in all ways **PERFECT**. The slow fade, the utter charm of her Nina Simone impression, the ambiguity, and the wonderful look in his eyes as his youth, hope and happiness come rushing back to him while watching Celine dancing and singing (foreshadowed in the opening scene). This is, perhaps, one of the ten best endings in the cinema.\n\nHawke and Delpy are sublime, of course. This film requires incredibly subtle acting, and these are Oscar worthy performances that will not be recognized because they are not showy. Much of this film, like life, is acted with the eyes. Witness how Hawke stares at Delpy as she discusses her failed relationships on the ferry, or the sadness and longing in Delpy\'s eyes as she sings her love song. \n\nAs in the first film, the chemistry between them is indelible. My candidate for best on-screen couple ever.\n\nThis film is better than the first, because it provides a more unique perspective. In Sunset, we see the sobering effects of age and disappointment etched in their faces and clouding their lives. There is more at stake here, for they are nine years older, have made their share of mistakes, feel imprisoned by responsibilities, and must confront their shortcomings and problems. It\'s comforting to believe that hope and love will prevail in their case.', u'0.220058', u'Before Sunset is one of those movies, you either love, or you hate.\n\nPersonally, I loved it.\n\nNow, I recommend watching "Before Sunrise" first, however it isn\'t necessary. Before Sunset does a good job of reviewing what had happened, therefore if you decide to watch it Before watching "Sunrise" you have nothing to worry about.\n\nSome scenes are extremely well done. The characters are picture perfect, and the movie itself, is breathtaking. The aura of the movie is so spectacular, that it will inspire young directors out there, to pick up their video cameras are start filming.\n\nAn 80 minute movie, about two lovable characters and what they have to say, may sound boring. But the way it\'s done in Before Sunset, will sweep this impression right off your feet. \n\nJulie and Ethan play two of the most honest and true characters I have ever seen, they are known as Jesse and Celine. And while much of the credit must go to the characters themselves, you musn\'t forget the actor and actress who played them.\n\nJulie is perfect as Celine. The young french actress is so natural in front of the camera. Definitely, has potential. \n\nEthan is also very very honest, he seems so comfortable character that that you forget your watching a movie, and not a home-made video.\n\nBoth play with such honest expression, and such trueness, that they are so natural, Before Sunset becomes no longer a movie. It feels as if you are eavesdropping on two extremely developed people. It\'s such an intimate environment, that you never want to leave.\n\nBefore Sunset... 9.901/10*****', u'0.418155', u"I will be the first to announce that I was not a huge fan of the original film. While I thought that it was interesting to see as well as an untapped concept in Hollywood, I felt that the characters were too forced coupled with a very amateurish and repetitive moments. It was an average film that seemed to be lacking bits of the human element. It needed something more. At the time I couldn't put my finger on it, but after seeing Before Sunset, I could see what it was. Maturity. This may sound strange, but I felt that Jesse and Celine were too perfect in the first film. They lacked connectiveness to the average person. I couldn't see myself in this situation. Perhaps if I would have seen the original film in 1995 instead of a couple of years ago, it would have been closer, but I just couldn't capture the moment. In Before Sunset, I feel head over feet for both Jesse and Celine.\n\nThey seemed to have grown and experienced a life that was all their own. They seemed more passionate, more powerful, and especially more human. From their first meeting in the bookstore until the finale in Celine's apartment, I was fully immersed in their conversation. I wanted to know everything I could about both of them, and I did. I loved hearing about Celine's passion for the environment, and Jesse's distraught marriage. It brought these two characters out of the screen and into our lives. Whether it was a scripted story or if Hawke and Delpy were playing off each other, it worked. I witnessed in this film two people who were made for each other. It was more obvious in this film than in the prior outing. \n\nWhat made this film work on such a higher level than the first were the actors. They have grown and emerged as two important commodities in the Hollywood community. This is probably Hawke's greatest performance in years. His relaxed actions made us feel relaxed around him, yet quietly pushing for him to be closer to Celine. His pushy sexual advances seemed less forced and instead more like honest love. He looked and felt like a man that has been dreaming of this encounter all his life, and it finally happened. You could see the excitement in his eyes to see Delpy again. It was more than just acting, he put so much heart into this performance that it was clearly displayed for all to see. The same goes for Delpy. At the beginning of this film, I didn't like her character. She seemed rough and rigid around the edges, constantly giving off that feeling that she was harboring a secret that she didn't want Hawke to know. As her character grew in this film, I understood why. She had a different life after the encounter than Hawke did. While he still longed for Celine in his heart, he did move on. She longed for Jesse in her heart, and to this day could not find anyone to replace his purity. I loved Celine much more in the sequel because she kept us guessing. Did she remember their night together? Did she really loose her grandmother, or did she just not show up that day in Vienna? Was the song just for Jesse? So many questions left me wanting more and more and more. \n\nFinally, I would like to say that Linklater is growing with his films, and this was a crowning achievement for him. He powerfully and delicately built a sequel that was for superior than the original. He continued with a similar format as the first, but gave us stronger characters and another beautiful city. The language in this film is intense. Listen to the words that come from Ethan and Julie, they embody so much of our culture and our lives. There were moments when I felt they were speaking thoughts directly from my mind. Everything in this film was connected and worked to the fullest extent of cinematic possibility. \n\nOverall, this was a brilliant film. Linklater captured the essence of these two heart-struck people and proved that it could be filmed. This is one of the ultimate love stories that will remain on your minds far after the film is over. The intimate final lines will continually reverberate as the best ever in a movie. This was a huge step up from the original, and is one of the best films of the year. If you were not a fan of the Before Sunset, I suggest that you check this out. It is a mature film that explores the power of love in a way that no other Hollywood film could. I would not be surprised if we saw the title of this film in the Oscar celebration this year. Check out this film to hear social commentary of our lives, fall in love, and especially to see the beauty of Paris. \n\nGrade: ***** out of *****", u'0.238844', u"I'd been longing to see this one as I'd always thought 'Before Sunrise' was one of the most honest, most real films I'd ever seen, but at the same time I held off seeing the sequel from fear of disappointment. For all of you in the same position, fear not ; Linklater, Hawke and Delphy (for it has surely been a joint effort and labour of love for all three) have done us and themselves proud. I've just seen the film and despite being male and 38 I feel like Roberta Flack must have felt when she penned 'Killing me Softly' after hearing Don McLean sing 'Vincent' in concert; this is - once again - just so close to what it's all about. You want technicalities? The acting, superb; Hawke and Delphy slip right back into their characters, their mannerisms, their sometimes gauche repartee, the way they seem to fence around each other, seeming to go in for the kill then feigning, drawing back\x85Exquisite. And then the details, the echoes of the first film in the settings but now with a world-weariness, an autumnal note and yet with still that fundamental freshness and optimism that revives the memories of Sunrise's youthfulness and reminds us, as our heroes discuss, that though time changes people, there remains an unchanging core. Just see it; this is about as good as it gets, folks.", u'0.107851', u'"Before Sunrise" was one of the most beautiful independent love stories of the 90\'s. Part of its appeal came from the open ending. We didn\'t know how the lives of these two young people would continue and what would become of them. The whole movie was like a snapshot that left the rest to our imagination. A sequel to such a story seemed to be unnecessary, but apparently director Richard Linklater himself couldn\'t stop thinking about these two intriguing characters and had to envision their lives after this one fateful day in Vienna.\n\nHere it is now, the most unlikely sequel I have ever seen, "Before Sunset" - made not for money but for pure artistic purpose only. Much of the magic of part one could have been destroyed, but somehow Linklater and his two main actors managed to pull it off. "Before Sunset" takes place nine years after Jesse and Celine first met and as soon as the movie starts you feel like you meet old friends you haven\'t seen in a long time. You know these people and immediately feel at home with them. I was afraid that "Before Sunset" might give answers to questions that shouldn\'t be answered in the first place. If "Before Sunrise" was a dream that two young people had, then this movie could only be the rude awakening, the confrontation with reality. And somehow it is just that. It\'s a bit disillusioning to hear that all did not turn out as well as one might have imagined. We learn that Jesse and Celine are not particularly happy in their lives and that they are not really the romantic persons they used to be nine years ago. The soothing thing to see, however, is that they are still here. They both have passed their 30th birthday, they have jobs and their future is more or less decided, but they\'re still longing for passion in their lives and as soon as they meet each other, it\'s there again. They might have given up a lot of their dreams and beliefs but one thing remains true: their feelings for each other. While they\'re talking it\'s like they turn back time and become the young, hopeful people they once were again. I\'m getting a bit carried away, but that\'s the beauty of these two movies, "Sunrise" and "Sunset". The story sucks you in and you\'re not able to stop thinking about it for a long while.\n\nAnother thing "Before Sunset" did, it made me reflect on my own life. How have I changed in the past nine years? What has become of my dreams? Obviously, I have gotten more cynical, because at times I was irritated by Celine\'s talk about environmental problems and her emotional outbursts. It took me way longer than last time to "bond" with her character this time around.\n\nAnyway, the performances by Hawke and Delpy are wonderful once again. Their acting is as natural as can be, and thinking of Hawke\'s recent divorce in real life you wonder how much of his character in the movie is based on his own personal experiences.\n\nUnfortunately, the movie is over way too soon. After about an hour you have already arrived at the final scene - a scene that is just amazing. It makes you hope that somehow everything will work out for Jesse and Celine and that maybe they will stay together this time. As part one, "Before Sunset" doesn\'t have a definite ending, though.\n\nIt\'s sure nice to see that apparently Linklater cares about Jesse and Celine as much as I do and made such a good sequel. He could probably even make a third part. "Before Sunset" has convinced me that it could work.', u'0.0138511', u'I had not seen the prequel to this although my date had and she filled me in on many details. While the experience of this film would be enriched by having seen the preceding film first, it certainly stands satisfactorily alone.\n\nIn many ways, this reminded me very much of one of my most favorite movies of all time, "My Dinner with Andr\xe9," in which just 2 characters talking comprised the whole movie. In that movie, the friends had been close, drifted apart, and then had a brief reunion at a dinner at which they caught up with what the other had been doing. The two principals, Andr\xe9 Gregory and Wallace Shawn, played themselves and each represented one side of a dialectic, say the side of romanticism vs. a conventional reality. "Before Sunset" is parallel in many ways.\n\nAt one level we have a romantic story -- two people who\'d briefly been lovers nine years before and lost touch meet again. They spend an afternoon together. Will they try to fulfill what they\'d started? \n\nAt another level, we have the charm of conversation and exploration, of reminiscing, of gradually feeling out and discovery of how much do I have in common with this person now? -- where has this person been? -- what are they capable of now? -- how much freedom of choice do I have, does this other person have -- to make decisions? Etc.\n\nWhile Celine and Jesse have a capacity for relating and talking, they also have somewhat opposite ways of viewing the world and relationships -- Celine is more cynical and reserved; Jesse is more open to settling for the "not-perfect-but-good-enough."\n\nThere are possibly a few people who have not had the personal experiences that at least somewhat relate to the premise in this film -- a relationship in which one wonders, "what would have happened if I\'d pursued that relation?" but probably most people have. And the other dilemma, of meeting again that someone but by now being involved in relationships of responsibility -- my family, my children, my present life. What would it do to them if I were to pursue my own happiness at the expense of them? Can I do that? Can I value the chance of my own happiness above theirs? Etc.\n\nThe film, fortunately, gives us no answers to these essential questions but it does pose them in a way that makes us consider them.\n\nDelpy and Hawke are given screenwriter credits and I feel sure that they must\'ve contributed a great deal to the feeling of seamless, natural dialogue.\n\nGREAT movie. No movie satisfies everyone, of course, but at the time I wrote this, slightly over 50% of the voters gave it a 10/10. For those of us in that group, it\'s a great film.', u'0.402424', u'A sequel to the 1995 film "Before Sunrise". Jesse (Ethan Hawke) and \r Celine (Julie Delpy) meet 9 years after their initial meeting. They\'ve \r changed--originally they were in their 20s and full of idealism. Now \r they\'re in their 30s--and their lives have changed in ways they didn\'t \r predict. Like the first movie they walk around Paris this time and talk about love, life, reality, what \r might have been--and it\'s all fascinating. Like the first film this is \r basically a character study and (like the first) just incredible. It\'s \r like catching up with old friends after 9 years apart! They\'ve aged a \r lot--Hawke looks TERRIBLE but Delpy looks OK--and life has thrown both \r a few hard knocks but hearing how they survived and what they went \r through is just incredible. \r \r\nThis is NOT for everybody (four people walked out when I went to see \r it) but, for people who can deal with nonstop talk for 80 minutes it is \r just great. Every single line rings true and is delivered full force by \r Hawke and Delpy. The acting varies--Hawke is good (but he smiles WAY \r too much)--Delpy is just superb all the way through.\r \r\nThis is easily one of the best films of 2004. Highly recommended.', u'0.706946', u"Nine years on Celine and Jessie meet in Paris not entirely by destiny or sheer force of circumstance... Nine years ago I loved Before Sunrise so much! And identified with it even though I was far from home not out of choice - and a war of the kind that bothered Celine in Bosnia was going on in my own country... But I was young. I was 24, actually, very romantic and innocent. Now I Know how things work a little better. The world, relationships. But I'm still plunging into causes for their own sake. And I'm still a reasonably normal person. Just like the characters in this film. Paris has never looked simpler in its casual elegance. Dialogue has never seemed more natural. A script never touched real life like this one so effortlessly. I'm in love with these characters - and with the ending... This is how European Cinema used to be - and Hollywood, too for that matter. Naturally real and magical in the details.", u'0.172941', u'\n"Before Sunset" is one of those movies that look superficial, romantic, weepy, crowd-pleasing, but really is original, smart, analytical, and challenging. It stands by itself but is richer seen in relation to "Before Sunrise," made nine years earlier, of which it is the sequel, and besides that it\'s richer and subtler than the original. The characters and the actors are older, more experienced and more sophisticated. It\'s got a documentary element, reminiscent of Michael Apted\'s wonderful "7 Up," "14 Up," series. Julie Delpy and Ethan Hawke, who also stared in "Before Sunrise," don\'t have to pretend to be nine years older in this sequel; they are. They\'re only thirty-three now, but Hawke has the ravaged gauntness his breakup with Uma Thurman seems to have imposed on him. Delpy is more mature, less angelic, more businesslike, but still beautiful. \n\n"Before Sunset" is a leaner film than "Before Sunrise." It\'s real-time, and without frills. Venues or backgrounds are simpler. Jesse and C\xe9line largely just walk and talk. \n\nHawke and Delpy are more accomplished actors; less self-conscious people. The talk flows more effortlessly. The continuity of the scenes is a seamless tour de fource almost as if this were all a single take like Sokorov\'s "Russian Ark." \n\nThere isn\'t flirting or a developing attraction, a growing physical intimacy, as in "Before Sunset," because Jesse and C\xe9line spend most of the film talking about that earlier meeting and how it has haunted them and dominated their lives. Gradually it comes out (particularly during the car ride that leads to where C\xe9line lives) that her current relationship is limited and his marriage is largely sexless, redeemed only by his adoration of his four-year-old son. \n\nShe pretends not to remember that they made love that night in Vienna nine years before. Maybe that means their sudden passion never really was consummated, because their affinity wasn\'t something one night\'s sex could fulfill. \n\nThe premise is this: Jesse has published a novel that\'s a bestseller in the US and he\'s doing a signing in Paris. (Hawke\'s real life identity fits here, since he\'s published several books.) Suddenly as he\'s coming to the end of his talk, C\xe9line appears outside the window of the bookstore (which is one every American in Paris knows: Shakespeare & Company). He\'s supposed to go to the airport in a couple of hours, but his bags are packed and a car is ready, and he and C\xe9line agree to go and talk. She leads him to a caf\xe9 called Le Pure. (This is real time, but not real space: the places where they go are far apart.) Then they take a boat ride on the Seine; finally they get in the car and wind up at C\xe9line\'s apartment which turns out to be a lovely enclave where her neighbors are together outside having a party.\n\nA movie in real time consisting mostly of conversation is impossible to summarize: it would take twenty pages. But it does emerge that both still think about each other a lot; that meeting nine years before has remained important. The flame still burns bright. Jesse did go back to Vienna six months later in the station to meet C\xe9line as they\'d promised, but her grandmother was buried on that day and she couldn\'t be there. Later he says that perhaps his dream of romantic love was shattered forever by her failure to appear. They rue the fact that they didn\'t exchange addresses or phone numbers. \n\nThere\'s little touching or kissing but there doesn\'t have to be. It\'s obvious that this is a climactic reunion for both of them and the attraction is as strong as ever, probably stronger \x96 except that there are obstacles. They\'re not young and free any more. They have lives, commitments, involvements. . . \n\nWhat will happen? As the film ends, its obvious Jessie is quite happily going to miss his plane. But while Linklater & Company keep us guessing, the partial answer that comes is quite charming. \n\n"Before Sunset" is a superb sequel. It\'s touching but surprisingly unsentimental. And it\'s as graceful a piece of film-making as you could ever see, with the gracefulness of art that conceals artifice. Richard Linklater is one of the most interesting younger American directors. His work is authentic and personal, but has real range, from the slacker movies through the romantic encounters of Delpy and Hawke and the tight theatrical drama "Tape" to the inspired philosophical musings and fresh use of animation of "Waking Life," and Hawke has been involved in four of Linklater\'s movies. Linklater and Hawke are soulmates and brothers, and Delpy is the other essential collaborator in the "Sunset"/"Sunrise" sequence, because she too is a writer and wrote her own dialogue and the chemistry between Hawke and Delpy is too obvious to mention. It\'s obvious also the audience would like another sequel, and so would the actors. It\'s only a question of when. The inventive Richard Linklater has created a new genre: the real time sequel.\n', u'0.278222', u"I suspect that Before Sunset is getting such mixed reviews because it will mean very little to viewers who have not reached the stage of life portrayed in it. To my mind, this is not a romance. Rather, it's a very frank look at how we end up with life partners.\n\nFor that reason, it is an important film for twentysomethings to see and is a gift to them from Linklater, Hawke, and Delpy. \n\nSPOILERS FOLLOW: \n\nThe death of Celine's grandmother brings up two issues: the role of chance and that of our responsibilities to ourselves. Jesse knows Celine missed their planned meeting in Vienna because her grandmother died. But this does not prevent his pained question on the boat, something to the effect of 'Why weren't you there?' He is referring to rotten luck, the dark side of fate that is capable of robbing us of what we most desire. What were the odds that her grandmother would have died within those few days? Tiny. But it led to them not meeting again.\n\nHowever, Celine still chose to not meet Jesse. Yes, her family may not have understood had she skipped the funeral. But life is for the living, and her grandmother wouldn't have known if she hadn't been there. So Celine must take responsibility for the fact that their lives didn't include each other.\n\nAnother precious dialog occurs when they discuss why they didn't exchange addresses or phone numbers nine years ago. Celine says it was because they were young and overly optimistic and assumed they'd meet plenty of people with whom they would connect equally well. Are the twentysomethings listening?\n\nCeline expresses a problem many face when she explains why she prefers to have a boyfriend who is away much of the time: she feels suffocated when he is around too long. But she has been depressed since reading Jesse's book because she misses the kind of total intimacy they briefly shared and realizes there is no easy solution to this dilemma. One cannot simultaneously be intimate and distant, and all relationships involve finding a compromise.\n\nJesse's marriage is an ordinary one. He married his wife because she was smart, pretty, and pregnant, and marriage is about commitment. But even on his way to the church he was thinking of Celine. Are we being warned of the danger of staying in a mediocre relationship? \n\nHe says his wife and he are now like coworkers in a preschool, a description that will ring true with many viewers. \n\nSo is the lesson that you should throw caution to the wind and sacrifice all for someone who thrills your heart for a day? Before Sunset offers no such easy solution, as Jesse and Celine admit they may have discovered they didn't like each other after all. \n\nAs I see it, the primary role of film is to give voice to emotions and aspects of life we all know to be true but are not acceptable to discuss in polite society. In this regard Before Sunset excels. I can't help but think that when Linklater, Hawke, and Delpy decided to do this brief film it was not about profit at all-they simply had some things they thought people should hear, and this was their gift to the public.", u'-0.0912384', u'\nI saw this movie with my husband. He is usually a die-hard fan of action thrillers, special effects and horror movies but he allows me to coax him into seeing a really thoughtful movie every once in a while. So this was my choice for the evening. Neither one of us had seen the first movie, "Before Sunrise", although I knew of it by reputation. Well, my husband absolutely loved the movie! He sat up and became totally engrossed in the story, frequently patting my hand at intervals as he identified with the the characters in the story. He forgot about the dreadful uncomfortable movie seat. He let up a big sigh of disappointment when the credits came up... Personally, I grew up in Paris, France, I came to the US for graduate studies and I had an environmental protection career for 20 years. So I could strongly identify with Celine, a young woman of French origin with a patina of US graduate schooling and a career in environmental protection work. Her vulnerability shines through her modern chatterbox exterior. The acting is absolutely superb, with the intimate extended conversations drawing us into the characters\' lives. Certainly, this movie can stand on its own. For Jesse and Celine, the opportunity to pick up once more their romantic relationship is here! A smart couple would not let the moment pass. I doubt that they would just have a quick passionate affair... I think that the characters already know how lonely their souls can be without true love and commitment and they are emotionally ready to grasp this chance of a lifetime. They have been around long enough to know how rare their type of romantic feeling and connection can be. They will cherish their unique relationship and nurture it forever. My husband and I agreed that the movie could only be watched by couples of "a certain age", rather than young couples still searching for life\'s meaning. Only people who have lived through the throes of searching for a lifelong mate, then living through the disappointments and joys of struggling relationships, can recognize and appreciate what true love is and how important it is to go with one\'s heart and seize the moment. \n\nI am 48 years old and have a wonderful romantic relationship with my husband. We are each other\'s first and only love. Even so, we have worked very hard to keep our marriage alive and mutually passionate. Over the past 25-30 years, both of us have noticed that satisfying relationships are very difficult once people hit their thirties and forties. We have noticed that many older couples never work out their differences and end up bitter and disappointed with life. Many acquaintances of our generation are divorced or still single, never having experienced the sweetness and stability of a true romantic and committed relationship. Romance can be found all the time, from fleeting moments to short-term relationships. One sees it all over the place nowadays, in TV shows and movies, as well as in most modern relationships. However, I would like to emphasize the lasting contentment that a loving commitment brings to one\'s soul. This is a rare and unique blessing that is missing from too many relationships nowadays, and I find this immeasurably sad. This is a classic movie (excellent story line and top of the line acting) which goes into my list of top romantic movies of all times.\n', u'0.316589', u'This film is one of my favorites from last year, along with "Sideways" and "Eternal Sunshine of the Spotless Mind". Is it just a coincidence that three best films of the year all deal with ability to connect with other people, with meeting one\'s true love and losing it, with memories that will not go away, and with possibilities of second chances?\n\n"Before Sunset" is one of the best sequels ever made but it stays on its own. It is so perfect, so simple, so sublime, so clever, so romantic, and so moving that it makes me happy to know that the films like that exist and there is hope that as characters get older we may witness their next meeting and conversations.\n\nWho would think that watching two people talking may be that fascinating? That\'s what the power of great dialog does. As much as I loved dialogs in "Before Sunrise", in this film they are even better - the characters are older, wiser, more interesting, I\'d say. Ten years is a long period in a human life - our characters are still young and attractive but they\'ve gone through losses and changes, disappointments and some sad realizations about life. It is privilege of the young age to hope that "there\'ll be many people with whom you\'ll connect with. Later in life, you realize it only happens a few times." If we only knew how to cherish and keep these unique and unforgettable connections. If we only knew that they were unique...\n\nJulie Delpy along with Ethan Hawke, contributed to the screenplay; and there is no doubt that their contributions made the characters interacting on the screen absolutely honest and believable.\n\nJulie Delpy gives one of the best performances of the year as Celine. She is amazing in showing mystery, charm, disappointments, dreams, and the dark sides of this woman. Her singing and Nina Simone\'s impersonation in the last scenes of "Before Sunset" are among the most charming and seductive ever - oh yes, baby you will miss that plane. 9.5/10', u'0.589559', u'The first question I had before seeing Sunset (in fact ever since I heard that Sunset was coming) was: "Why?"... Why mess with Sunrise given that it was such a great stand alone film... Would they live up to answering the "what ifs?" would the chemistry still be there? etc. etc. ... needless to say, I think the answer is a resounding "yes".\n\nThe film picks up nine years after Jesse (Ethan Hawke) and Celine\'s (Julie Delpy) magical chance encounter in Vienna. This time around we find them in Paris where Jesse is wrapping up a European roadshow to promote his newly published bestseller about (what else?) that one special night. We find them now older (and Ethan looks a bit more worse for wear than Julie), more experienced, more cynical with hearts that have hardened a bit over time in spite of -- or perhaps due to -- the whimsical possibilities of that fateful night nine years prior.\n\nFrom the outset of the film, the director does a sublime job of drawing the viewer in with long easy takes as Jesse and Celine embark on a stroll from the bookstore to the caf\xe9 - almost seems as if the first exchange is captured by one long uninterrupted take with no cuts (though there are a couple). They ease into their exchange very comfortably. The questions and dialogue have the same, familiar natural feel and tone, and Hawke and Delpy both do an incredible job slipping into their earlier roles - the chemistry has not been lost. The playful sarcasm, the sexual tension, the flirting, the wit, the insecurities. All there.\n\nYou can sense the longing that Jesse has (has always had) for Celine from the get-go. In fact, my take even from Sunrise was that Jesse\'s attraction to Celine was always more stronger - almost as if he "needed" her. His vulnerability and ability to "put it all out there" - things that guys, in general, have such a hard time doing.\n\nThe film moves on to the boat which echoes the scene from Sunrise where Jesse convinces her to take a ride with him. The journey symbolizes a trip to the past where Celine realizes that Jesse\'s life isn\'t the picture perfect life that she imagined (i.e. the successful author, the wife and the kid). She almost seems to want to know \x96 needs to have - the affirmation that Jesse still carries a torch for her, even though she (and the viewer) already should KNOW this - because WE know Jesse and his book about "that one night" is a tangible testament to that (this is the one plot element which I found a bit annoying).\n\nThe car scene is symbolic as well as they are in an enclosed space and need to deal with the things that are bottled up inside - claustrophobic yet no escaping it. They both reveal what they have both always wanted to hear from one another (albeit in different ways and different circumstances), that they have both been truly alone since they last left each other that fateful night in Vienna. The raw emotion, the honesty - incredible moments.\n\nThe culmination is the walk up the staircase to Celine\'s apartment, in relative silence, some things are better left unsaid \x96 the choices, the reasoning, left unsaid. And then Celine\'s song which symbolizes a lot of things and demonstrates how much Jesse has meant to her even though she has a difficult time saying it in words.\n\nNine years later, they have of course grown into full adults with all the superficial trappings that come with that \x96 a career, relationships, etc. But, still, they are both drawn to "that one fateful night", and the redemption for both people is that it was just as meaningful to each person as it was for the other, for different reasons and for similar ones. The bittersweet anguish of having those memories and carrying that emotional baggage over that time echoes even deeper in the respective voids in their lives; as Celine puts it: "memories are a wonderful thing if you don\'t have to deal with the past" \x96 almost sums up that anguish. When people are young they worry about not becoming "someone" - but as they get older - everyone worries about not being WITH "someone".\n\nIn Sunset, they are both vindicated in realizing that they did not "waste" the last nine years living as damaged emotionless zombies - that their chance encounter was a truly magical moment changing both of their lives, that they were both "incomplete" without each other (ok, cue the corny music), that they really do "complete each other". \n\nThe true beauty of Sunset is that it allows them to indulge in the luxury of what many people do not get: the opportunity for a second chance, at best, and, at worst, an opportunity for some measure of closure.\n\nAnd so it fittingly ends with the viewer pondering yet again "what happens now?" which, in retrospect, is a much more hopeful and infinitely more enviable question to answer than: "what if?" \n\nIn sum, a wonderful film - bravo.\n\n***1/2 out of ****', u'0.260356', u'This is simply one of the best movies I\'ve seen, with very few qualifications. Maybe I should say that this is one of the best "simple" movies I\'ve seen. Perhaps it is a bit like cooking, use fresh and quality ingredients and you can make something great without a lot of unnecessary stuff. Unfortunately, Hollywood just doesn\'t seem to have the ambition to make these type of movies anymore.\n\nIn any event, this is one of the few sequels that matches the intensity and integrity of the original. First, it has many simple, yet stylish and honest shots. Perhaps the Scorcese shot is used too much (i.e. following the actors on a long walk without cutting a la Goodfellas kitchen scene), but I don\'t think so because it makes sense in the context of the movie. Second, many of the shots have interesting emotive effect. For instance, towards the end of the movie, after these "lovers" are fighting the clock (because Ethan Hawke\'s character needs to catch a flight) and are cruising down the river, they are so engrossed in their conversation and the fact that they are trying to get so much out of the last few minutes they don\'t notice their ride is coming to an end. However, we the viewer can see what the characters either don\'t see or don\'t want to see, that the boat is crossing over the river to its destination and the departure no one wants to deal with. The viewer is given a wonderful sense of dread as the bank approaches in the background, because we know what is going to happen when the ride ends, and like the characters, we don\'t want it to end either. Even if the film borrows heavily from other great movies (e.g. My Dinner with Andre) it is independent of those influences.\n\nJulie Delpy and Ethan Hawke were great per usual. Making the dialogue ring true is difficult, but they pull it off. As before, they completely capture the nature of the intimate and friendly conversational style of friends or lovers that is normally edited out of most movies. When people talk, things are not always sequential or rationale, and unlike most movies this movie doesn\'t try and correct that. Not for a moment does the audience find themselves thinking that this is some sort of charade and no one would ever talk like that. The dialogue is intelligent and insightful, but that is because the characters are intelligent and have a knack for being brutally honest with their thoughts and feelings.\n\nThis is movie excellence, and I\'m glad some film makers are still trying to make art. Despite the romantic themes this isn\'t a date flick, so be prepare to deal with the difficult and often unresolved issues of love and relationships that arise.', u'0.23935'], u'tt0056801': [u"Frederico Fellini's masterwork 8 \xbd is difficult to approach largely because of its reputation. Many critics also state that the film is so complex that it requires multiple viewings to understand, and this is likely to intimidate many viewers. But in truth, and in spite of its surrealistic flourishes, 8 \xbd is more straight-forward than its reputation might lead you to believe.\n\nThe storyline itself is very simple. A famous director is preparing a new film, but finds himself suffering from creative block: he is obsessed by, loves, and feels unending frustration with both art and women, and his attention and ambition flies in so many different directions that he is suddenly incapable of focusing on one possibility lest he negate all others. With deadlines approaching the cast and crew descend upon him demanding information about the film--information that the director does not have because he finds himself incapable of making an artistic choice.\n\nWhat makes the film interesting is the way in which Fellini ultimately transforms the film as a whole into a commentary on the nature of creativity, art, mid-life crisis, and the battle of the sexes. Throughout the film, the director dreams dreams, has fantasies, and recalls his childhood--and this internal life is presented on the screen with the same sense of reality as reality itself. The staging of the various shots is unique; one is seldom aware that the characters have slipped into a dream, fantasy, or memory until one is well into the scene, and as the film progresses the lines between external life and internal thought become increasingly blurred, with Fellini giving as much (if not more) importance to fantasy as to fact.\n\nThe performances and the cinematography are key to the film's success. Even when the film becomes surrealistic, fantastic, the actors perform very realistically and the cinematography presents the scene in keeping with what we understand to be the reality of the characters lives and relationships. At the same time, however, the film has a remarkably poetic quality, a visual fluidity and beauty that transforms even the most ordinary events into something slightly tinged by a dream-like quality. Marcello Mastroianni offers a his greatest performance here, a delicate mixture of desperation and ennui, and he is exceptionally well supported by a cast that includes Claudia Cardinale, Anouk Aimee, and a host of other notables.\n\nI would encourage people not to be intimidated by the film's reputation, for its content can be quickly grasped. When critics state the film requires repeated viewing what they actually seem to mean is that the film holds up extremely well to repeated viewing; each time it is seen, one finds more and more to enjoy and to contemplate. Even so, I would be amiss if I did not point out that people who prefer a cinema of tidy plot lines and who dislike ambiguity or the necessity of interpreting content will probably dislike 8 \xbd a great deal. For all others: strongly, strongly recommended.\n\nGary F. Taylor, aka GFT, Amazon Reviewer", u'0.355538', u"\nFellini's 8 1/2 opens with a stunning dream sequence in which a man is trapped in his car in the middle of a traffic jam. The doors and windows are locked and there is no escape. Other drivers simply sit and stare at him passively. The driver starts to panic as smoke begins to build up within the car. Propelling himself outside a window, he floats over the other cars and soars above the world until he is pulled down a rope attached to a tether on his ankle. The driver is Guido Anselmi (Marcello Mastroianni), a film director at odds with himself. Shot in black and white, 8 1/2 is an exhilarating, confusing, irritating, and inspired journey into a man's consciousness. It is not just a look at the inner turmoil of one person, but also a commentary on each person's struggle to make sense of their life. The film's combination of kaleidoscopic images, evocative score by Nino Rota, and amazing performances ensure its place as one of the greatest films of the century.\n\nGuido is preparing to shoot a new film with an expensive budget. He constructs a huge spaceship launch pad that costs $80 million but he is unsure of what he wants to say. Guido's dishonesty in dealing with his marriage, his career, and the fact that he really does not want to make the film forces him to falsely mislead people as to his true intentions. He feels like a failure and is physically spent. He checks into a spa to restore his health and well being but the contingent of producers, actors, writers, and hangers on undermine his strength. His feeling of being overwhelmed by personal and professional obligations provides the catalyst for dreams and fantasies that take him back to his childhood.\n\n\nFellini shows his encounter with the prostitute Saraghina (Eddra Gale) and the guilt he has to deal with in a confrontation with the Catholic Church. Guido invites his intellectual wife Luisa (Anouk Aim\xe9e) to the set but their relationship has turned cold and passionless, and sparks fly when she has to confront Carla (Sandra Milo), his buxom mistress. Guido is misguided but he has an innocence and charm that allows us to overlook his indulgences. He enjoys his pleasures but has a conscience and feels guilty about cheating on Luisa whom he loves and is afraid of losing. He fantasizes that all of the women in his life are together in a harem where they all dote on his every whim. When they finally recognize how little he cares about them, he is forced to suppress their revolt. \n\nAs image piles on image and the fantasy becomes indistinguishable from the reality, the viewer may get lost in a maze of dazzling incoherence. Fellini, however, always returns to solid ground and the film offers not only a satire on the frenzy, the uncertainty, and the clash of egos involved with making a film but also a serious commentary on the importance of honesty in a relationship. If 8 1/2 is occasionally exhausting, the ending is invigorating, letting us know that life is a game in which each of us is on the stage performing our roles and the only sane response to its turmoil is to join hands in love and celebrate the moment. ", u'-0.17493', u'(excuse me for my bad English)\n\nThoughts on Fellini\'s carrier can be divided on people who think his peak was early neorealist phase (Vitelloni, La Strada, Nights of Cabiria) (do you remember the guy in the line from Woody Allen\'s Annie Hall?) and on the ones that praised his fantasy phase starting with La Dolce Vita and followed by 8 1/2, Roma etc.\n\nThey are both wrong. Both periods and its films are very important, cinematically rich and skillful in directing. The fact that there are many followers of both periods and equal artistic success shows that the only real difference is among their aesthetics. And isn\'t that what makes a great director?\n\nThis film is considered one of the best movies of all time among critics and directors. Many people have complaints of how this movie is difficult to understand. It is. When I first saw it, it was a rather very frustrating experience. But once you capture it fully its amazing. In fact, I fully captured it after the third viewing (and after that, every time I see it I can find something new or different). That\'s because this movie works differently. It works out of standard movie patterns and conventions we use to see in everyday cinema. Above, and most important of all, it speaks with the different movie language. And that is a real cinematic language, because 8 1/2 uses specific movie instruments to transmit it\'s content. It cannot be transferred in any other form, including literal. That\'s why it is so hard to put the plot into the words and that\'s the major merit of this film.\n\nAfter the tremendous commercial and artistic success in 1960. with his previous film La Dolce Vita, Fellini decided to make a film (8 1/2) about the movie director (played by Marcello Mastroianni as Guido) fresh from recent success who is not sure what to film next! And this egocentric director, under the pressure of his producer, actors, friends, fans and journalists, is escaping into the memories of his childhood, wishful fantasies and dreams. \n\nAt the beginning of the film, there\'s a stunning famous dream sequence. Guido is trapped in a traffic jam. He loses his breath while unsuccessfully trying to escape from his car. People around (in their vehicles) are starring at him. The whole scene is mute (except the constant monotonous sound) and, from time to time, it freezes. Suddenly, he is free, and flying towards sky. Then, one of his assistants pulls him down to earth. And, he is awake. I think it\'s unnecessary to explain the meaning of this brilliant scene.\n\nThere is also a scene where he is persuaded to ask a catholic priest for an advice about the content of his next film (since his films are widely released there is a moral issue). But he apparently has an aversion towards Church. And then, during a conversation with this priest, Guido suddenly associates his early childhood event (watching a dance of a prostitute Saraghina, and the subsequent punishment by one priest). So, the current event forces its cause to come out of his subconsciousness.\n\nThen, there is a scene \x96 quarrel between Guido and his wife (played by Anuk Aimee) while sitting outdoors. She is complaining about his mistress(es) and he is denying everything. Then, his mistress (Sandra Milo) suddenly arrives and, after she saw Guido with his wife, sits to one table not so close. Guido\'s wife noticed that and realized that woman is his mistress. So, she is continuing her quarrel with him. And then comes one of the most visceral and fascinating scenes in the Movie History. Suddenly, wishful fantasy starts\x85 Guido\'s wife stands up, coming towards mistress. They are kissing each other like longtime friends and making a nice conversation. Then, Guido enters his house from the childhood (which is shown before) with some presents in his hands. And, there are like 20 women around him fighting for his attention. He is whipping them (dominate them). And there is his wife \x96 peaceful, calm, conservative, loving\x85 So, under the pressure of all-around-him messes he is fantasying. This is psychologically known as the regression to the pleasure principle and is very common. This scene is known as "The Harem Scene" and like others is followed by brilliant, very suitable music score.\n\nFrom time to time, Guido is fantasying a beautiful young woman (Claudia Cardinale). She is another projection of his narcissism \x96 an ideal woman to please all of his wishes not making a single complaint.\n\nRosella represents (symbolizes) his super-ego. Pay attention to their phone conversation. Also in Harem scene (harem is actually his Id, fulfilling all his infantile fantasies) she is ABOVE him making complaints.\n\nHis producer is "paternal figure". All his father\'s wishes, demands to Guido are now "reactivated" with producer. Pay attention to very interesting first "fantasy" scene in the movie (on the grave). Father asks a man something like:" How is my boy doing"? and the man makes face like: "Well...". Later we discover that the man is his producer.\n\nGuido\'s wife and his mother, the same thing. And we discover this in the same scene when his mother turns into his wife.\n\nCritical writer may represent his raw intellect but also artistic vanity while Conocchia is his neglected emotional aspect.\n\nAt the end of the movie, he eventually becomes aware of the causes of his confusion and self-deceptions (this sudden awareness is symbolized by "shooting himself", shooting his confusion that is) and having a final monologue: "...Accept me as I am. Only then can we discover each other..."', u'-0.0162273', u'It\'s been said before: Marcello Mastroianni plays Guido Anselmi, a fictitious, 43-year-old film director with a personal crisis that stunts his creative flow and his inability to get on with his new film after the enormous success of his previous one. The character is iconically brought to life by the immortal Mastroianni with artificially greyed hair and is universally identified as an alter ego of Fellini himself.\n\nThe first time I saw 8\xbd I was in my teens and hated it. I then rewatched it only a few years later, in my early 20s, and something miraculous happened. It was probably a pivotal moment in my film-viewing experience: it suddenly gave me new parametres by which to judge movies and even art in general. I suddenly learnt this new language, so much more beautiful and sophisticated than anything I had heard before. What was most amazing was that after the first negative experience, I had somehow tapped into this language\'s secret, and it wasn\'t in the least bit hermetic or difficult, though more complex and sophisticated than other languages I already knew. Many of the movies I\'d considered greats became amateurish or dwarfish in comparison.\n\nTo me, this was no longer simply a movie, but Art in a more universal sense of the word, Art that just IS and has nothing to strive for or prove. Which is why I find it so nonsensical and contradictory to call something like 8\xbd "pretentious" - to me, pretentious is when an insecure auteur is trying consciously and hard to be profound, difficult, original, ground-breaking, and you can see their intent clearly, and detect the effort behind the artifice. Nothing of any of this is anywhere to be perceived in 8\xbd, which makes creating masterpieces look easy. \n\nI admit that 8\xbd is not an easy movie, nor one for everyone. Visually, fewer movies are as iconic, memorable, original, poetic, funny, inventive, allegorical, exhilarating. \n\nThe scenes I love are too many to mention, but here are just a few: The steam bath scene when in an odd procession/ritual, the patients are being led into what must be a Turkish bath. All the steam surrounding them, the men wearing sheets that look like shrouds or togas, all looking like mock-ancient Roman dignitaries... Then, through a loud-speaker Mastroianni-Anselmi is told the dried-up, turkey-like Cardinal, will now condescend to meeting him. Before Guido rushes off to meet the Cardinal, all his friends and colleagues beg him to put in a good word for them. This is such a gleeful stab at Italy\'s grovelling, nepotistic culture of ingratiating oneself to the powers-that-be by paying them lip-service even for the most petty personal advantages. Then Guido stands before the embodiment of Catholic paternalism and his obsequious minions. And everything is at its most pompous and lifeless - this dusty, mummified institution is less in touch with the humanity it\'s supposed to comfort and advise than it is possible to believe.\n\nI also love the character of Guido\'s mistress, Carla, played by Sandra Milo at her gaudiest and most voluptuous. Though initially it\'s difficult to understand what Guido would have seen in her, eventually it become more apparent. Meeting his wife Luisa, you see how well the two women\'s ways of being complement one another. See for example how she reacts in a simple, good-humoured, self-deprecating way when in the caf\xe9 scene, Guido\'s elegant, neurotic wife played by Anouk Aim\xe9e at her most androgynously attractive - mockingly compliments Carla\'s tacky outfit for its "elegance". In such instances one gets a sense that though Fellini is parodying his subjects, he also has a fundamental love and human compassion for them.\n\nThe prostitute La Saraghina is probably one of the most memorable female characters put to film ever. She is probably somewhere in her 50s and rougher than sandpaper, overweight yet strangely fit and voluptuous, with lots of scary, wild dark hair, overdone raccoon eye make-up caked onto her aggressive, striking, sardonic face as she sits and dances on the lonely beach in Rimini next to her war bunker-home. Guido is fascinated by what is "young and yet ancient", eternal, meaning what is muse-like, archetypically, like the divinely beautiful Claudia character, perfectly embodied by Claudia Cardinale (the ultimate director\'s muse rather than a real woman or mistress). La Saraghina may not be a young woman like Claudia, she may not represent spontaneity and fresh, uncluttered artistic inspiration like she does, but she is also a muse of sorts - the muse of guilt-free pleasure and non-self-conscious, free, unidealised, earthy femininity. All this is La Saraghina - the town\'s young boys respond to this in her (including Guido as a child) and are bewitched by her and pay to her to see her demonic yet liberating, visceral dance.\n\nI have so much more to say about this movie, for instance about Nino Rota\'s memorable score, or how the movie\'s non-linear structure and juxtaposition of seemingly unrelated scenes emulates the rhythm and mood of dreams to perfection. Also, the scenes featuring Guido\'s parents and their embodiment of the emotional blackmail, that eternal sense of guilt and the stunting of individuality that the paternalistic institution of family at its most traditional represents in Italy. Or of Guido\'s touching childhood memories, of the wonderful way in which the movie ends, in a merry-go-round of what really matters in life, when all else has been swiped aside and all that remains is the desire to cherish (with all their imperfections) all those who have really mattered most in our lives...', u'0.142077', u"\nSwirling, kaleidoscopic rumination from Fellini.  The other user comments here (as well as many professional reviews) show how difficult it is to discuss this film briefly, so I don't think I'm going to try.  I would only say that, like other films that push at the boundaries of cinematic greatness--`Citizen Kane,' `Nashville,' and `Brazil' are three others that come to mind--it isn't really possible to place `8 \xbd' in any simple category.  It is a comedy and a tragedy, a satire and a celebration, a movie about love and about the lack of it, a movie about making art and a movie about living, an autobiography and the most challenging kind of fiction, a masterpiece of style and a movie that's really about something.  It's not for everyone, but it should be, and it's quite possibly the single greatest movie I have ever seen.  11 out of 10.", u'0.503769', u'\nI certainly wouldn\'t be saying anything new if I said that "8 1/2" is one of the most unique, fascinating, and personal pieces ever committed to film.  It has consistently hailed as such, and its influence on film is far reaching and undeniable.  It is certainly not one of the most entertaining movies of all time, and is actually quite long and difficult.  But it is an incredible piece of filmmaking, and a gripping look at the difficulties of creating not just a movie, but art in general.\n\nGuido (Marcello Mastroianni) is a popular movie director who is working on his new film.  Along the way, he struggles with his screenwriter, producer, wife, and mistress.  Each presents a different problem and obstacle.  More and more difficulties arise, not just in his attempts to complete the movie, but in his own mind.\n\nGuido, although flawed, is completely fleshed out, and draws sympathy from the audience.  Yes, he is an adulterer, but he loves his wife.  We see all of his personal desires and agony.  We see how he suffers when he struggles with his desire to create the ultimate piece of art, one that offers something to everybody.\n\nThe movie is technically wonderful.  The movement of the camera, the lighting, and the direction in general is top notch.  The movie mixes in dreams with reality to create a dreamlike world, and put us closer into Guido\'s own mind.\n\nSomebody who is looking for a movie as a two hour piece of entertainment will not enjoy this.  But if you enjoy a movie that truly satisfies when it is finished, this is for you.  It is quite long, and somewhat loose, but that is part of the interest.  Moviemakers, or artists in general, will find that this film has a great deal to offer.', u'0.31999', u'First time I saw 8 1/2 over twenty years ago; I did not like it then and I did not care much for a confused director who did not know how to make his next movie or how to deal with all women in his life. This time it was different. I knew it from the opening scene, from the first sounds of Nino Rota\'s music. I wanted to know how Guido would balance the demands of his producers and the insecurities of his love life. I sometimes barely could tell the difference between the reality and Guido\'s surfing the waves of his memory or building the Utopias in his mind where things were exactly the way he wanted them to be \x96 and I really did not want to tell the difference. I just was there, following Guido on his journey where Fellini sent us. Then, that scene came, "La Saraghina\'s" lurid dance on the beach. There was something in that scene that made me return to it over and over again. What was it? The dancing woman was not young, pretty or graceful. On the contrary, she was fat and ugly but there was something about her \x96 that smile, resilience, the promise of joy that attracted eager schoolboys. It was a last time the young Guido felt happy without guilt and shame that inevitably came after the encounter and stayed with him forever; he learned that joy and punishment are inseparable\x85 \n\nThere have been fewer than a handful of films that affected me as profoundly as 8 \xbd did:\n\nTarkovsky\'s "Zerkalo" \x96 when the master holds the mirror in front of you that reflects his soul and mind, open you eyes and heart, don\'t say a word, just watch closely.\n\nTarkovsky\'s "Andrey Rublev" \x96 What is talent? Is it a God\'s gift or Devil\'s curse? Is an Artist free in choosing what to do with that gift?\n\nBergman\'s "Persona" \x96 How far can one individual go in opening his soul to the other without losing identity and sanity?\n\nFellini\'s \x96"Nights of Cabiria" \x96 "Dum Spiro \x96 Spero" - While there\'s life there\'s hope.\n\nIn 8 \xbd, Fellini explored all these subjects and in the final he took the idea of life and hope ever further: after all the characters in his film disappear from the screen, all what left behind is "a little orchestra of Hope with Love as its conductor". The last that we hear is the magic music of Rota, bringing affirmation, hope and love.\n\nSimply wonderful. Perhaps, one of five greatest films ever made.', u'0.273392', u'Intellectuals have written volumes on this strange film by Italian New Wave director, Federico Fellini. I am not an intellectual, so my review will be brief. At its most basic, "8 1/2" (a.k.a. "Otto e mezzo") concerns Guido, a film director (supposedly a surrogate for Fellini himself), who is having what amounts to a midlife crisis. Guido is frustrated in his film-making, and by his relations with other people in his life. But the film\'s story does not proceed in a traditional, linear fashion. Fellini more or less abandons logical narration, in favor of "open form" narration, wherein the story\'s causal chain of events is broken.\n\nThus, trying to figure out what is going on in this film can be hard. Guido\'s fantasies, memories, dreams, and reality co-mingle in a kind of cinematic stew. Fellini presents viewers with a kaleidoscope of surreal B&W images of ordinary objects and eccentric, chattering characters which interact with Guido and with each other, in ways that defy logic, and give breathtaking meaning to the term symbolism. Followers of psychologist Carl Jung would have a field day. In style, the film is flamboyant. In substance, the film is maddeningly subliminal. And yet, even the most metallic cynic, Pauline Kael notwithstanding, must surely appreciate the rareness of Fellini\'s probing introspection.\n\nGiven the bizarre, unstructured content of "8 1/2", I wonder about the issue of necessity. Suppose Fellini had added an extra ten minutes to the screenplay, or deleted ten minutes. Would that have made any difference? Apart from Guido, if this or that character had been deleted, how would that have changed the story\'s significance? And if, as some have suggested, the film is a mirror image of Fellini\'s own confused psyche, can the story be construed as an intuition of his future film-making?\n\n"Otto e mezzo" is not for everyone. Like a Zen koan, "8 1/2" invites frustration. It is above all else a celebration of ambiguity and abstraction, a cinematic experience to ponder, especially on the heels of four or five martinis ... or 8 1/2, if you really want to induce immense intellectual insight. Cheers.', u'-0.186803', u"8 1/2 remains one of the most original and spellbinding films I know of. One of the beauties of cinema is to merge the artist's memory and fantasy; Fellini certainly utilized this magic to present his story and characters that embody both humanity and mystery. This film is an autobiographical piece (of Fellini himself) about a movie director named Guido, how his life is consumed by his increasing obsession with work. He avoids questions and problems as if they will go away somehow, only to experience more questions and problems. Ultimately, Guido realizes the only way to solve his problems is to face them rather than escaping, accepting himself instead of wishing he was someone else.\n\nThe opening sequence--one of the most deftly crafted--is taken from Guido's movie (or his dream - can't remember for sure). The sequence brilliantly captures Guido's problems (which are dealt with in the rest of the picture) and exposes them metaphorically: him STUCK in traffic, TRAPPED in smoke, SUFFOCATING, wanting to escape, and pulled back down by his peers. Guido wants to make a movie about his (and Fellini's) MEMORIES: how once upon a time he learned about a chant that moves pictures, and the time he danced with the fat feminine prostitute figure. The other main component of his movie involves launching into space, a FANTASY that reflects Guido's (and Fellini's) desire to escape from worldly matters. In real life, Guido is having problems with everything from his wife to his movie. So he thinks a beautiful actress, whom he fantasizes but knows little to nothing about, will be the solution to all his problems. When Guido meets the actress, he realizes she can't solve his problems, only he himself has the choice. This realization leads to the film's closure, with Guido having learned what's important to him and the inevitability of taking responsibility.\n\nOne of the film's powerful features is ambiguously blending Guido's world with his imaginations. Thus the audience is constantly deciphering the context of what's on the screen. This invitation to participate in the film is welcome, and if we think about it, a person like Guido who lives in his office might not be able to tell at times whether an event happened in his life or inside his mind.", u'-0.00996084', u"Our tale begins on a congested road. Our Protagonist's car fills with gas. He desperately tries to escape. The camera gives us a claustrophobic sense and within the first few minutes I am on the edge of my seat. Needless to say our protagonist survives but the outcome of this scene reveals so much. Fellini's 8 1/2 is a brilliantly executed tale of a mans life crashing down around him. It is a semi autobiographical tale, Guido is a director who is in a bit of a creative slump. He is giving both the press and executives the run around in order to buy time--hoping to find inspiration. His marriage is shaky and his relationship with his mistress is complicated. Guido tries to escape by going to a spa but his escape is not so easy... This film portrays inner conflict through dream sequences and fantasies as opposed to Expressionism. It is these sequences that enlighten the viewer and add dimension to the tale. To me 8 1/2 is the greatest film in ever, eclipsing Citizen Kane (of course AFI's top 100 list is limited to American movies...) and proving to be enjoyable and insightful.", u'0.096785', u'There are films that the viewer can assimilate and enjoy in one viewing. There are others that demand a second view, just to catch the missing clues or to re-live the story for the first time. Still, there are others, much better, who despite the plot revelations, despite knowing what will happen, produce the feeling of giddy anticipation taken to soaring heights.\n\nAnd then there are films by Directors -- monsters of film-making who even at their worst create compelling works of art that are the stuff of film theory. To see Federico Fellini\'s film 8 1/2 is to see such a creation. It is the gates of a Dalinian fun house where the past and the present and even the future converge into one intricate, tangled mess of a story -- but one that is beyond analysis, beyond interpretation, and exists in its own universe.\n\n8 1/2 is the story of a film director, Guido Anselmi (Marcello Mastroianni doubling for Fellini), who is unable to continue with the production of a science-fiction movie due to his lack of interest in it. A tightening noose of people who demand of him is beginning to take shape and suffocate him. There is his mistress Carla (Sandra Milo) who throws her earthy neediness on him. A barrage of producers, film critics, and his insecure French actress (Madeleine LeBeau) increase the pressure. His wife Luisa (a severe Anouk Aimee) is estranged from him. Gloria Morin (Barbara Steele) is Gothic-chic incarnate and only succeeds to annoy to hell out of her surroundings. The appearance of two nebulous women: the muse Claudia (Claudia Cardinale, luminous and ethereal) and the mysterious actress (Caterina Boratto) spark some mystery, but neither manage to do more than that -- throw a net of feminine mystique.\n\nGuido tries to throw himself into his own memories and see if he can come up with something: his sexual awakening as a boy to the songs and the overpowering carnality of La Saraghina (opera singer Eddra Gale), a Rabelasian woman who lived by the sea, the sanction of the priests, and a fantasy in which he lives in a household of all of the women in his life who are at his feet ready to serve him with abandon. Despite all this it becomes clear that the film in itself will not be made -- more so when his muse appears in the flesh and tells him he "does not know how to love." Her statement becomes evident when he is given the chance to reconcile with Luisa but remains the Director -- a control freak -- even when he himself has lost all control.\n\n8 1/2 is one of those films that can be seen in multiple ways. An extended conscious dream fusing itself with reality, Fellini plunges everything he can into a sensory overload where one event which happens in reality becomes framed with another which is a part of a memory or a fantasy. Many characters from his own reality are mirrored in other minor ones. Carla and la Saraghina both reflect themselves in the flesh-and-blood Claudia who tells Guido he does not know how to love, Luisa sees herself in an actress on-stage and recoils but she also shares a lot with Rossella (Rossella Falk), Guido\'s conscience, Claudia the muse and the Mysterious Lady are two and one, and on and on. They themselves are harbingers of a vicious relationship cycle where Guido finds himself at Stage One and unable to act or give in. This is a film that is not easy to review because it would require an in-depth analysis which would take pages upon pages to write, but in short, it\'s the slow evolution of a film creating itself when its own director/creator is on autopilot and a whirlwind of activity follows him like a swarm of bees. A masterpiece of film-making, a study of obsessions and unexpurgated demons, a collage of memories past and present, and a wicked roller-coaster ride: this is what 8 1/2 stands for and is, alongside CITIZEN KANE, a flawless black and white film and the womb for all other "Proustian" films which have come out, most notable being Woody Allen\'s STARDUST MEMORIES. From its standout opening sequence in which suffocating traffic is the catalyst for Guido\'s escape into the skies (only to be pulled back down by himself), to the glorious moment when Jacqueline the showgirl and Saraghina initiate a revolt against his misogynistic behavior to the moving final sequence where Guido as a boy orchestrates the descent of every person in his adult life and reveals them dancing, together, in harmony, in a conga-line, 8 1/2 is an unforgettable experience of iconoclastic cinema.', u'-0.0294466', u'Federico Fellini continued to create bizarre, highly personal films that were lavishly produced and immensely entertaining\x85 \n\n"8 \xbd," so named because he had previously made six films and parts of three others, is regarded as one of Fellini\'s best\x85 \n\nThe description of 8 \xbd\'s plot is a flagrant exaggeration, but no summary could precisely reflect the complexity of the film\x85 Obviously autobiographical, the 1963 film stars Marcello Mastroianni as a major movie director unable to complete his new film due to creative confusion and personal crisis... It is a voyage into an explicitly autobiographical world... Among the most vivid scenes are an orgy in a wine vat, an interview with a cardinal in subterranean steam bath, and a sequence in which the director pictures himself as the master of a harem, cracking a whip over all the various women who have been important in his life\x85 \n\nThe film is like a carousel in a circus, bringing scenes, dialog, and characters in and out of focus\x85 The best way to appreciate this dazzling epic is to see it more than once\x85 On the first viewing, simply leave with your impressions about plot and people\x85 There is enough richness to suffice, yet future screenings will simply add to the joy through understanding\x85', u'0.0270808', u"\nFederico Fellini's 8 1/2 is revolutionary.\n\nMarcello Mastroianni brilliantly plays the troubled film director Guido which gets mixed up in his own dreams and memories as he tries to find ideas for his next film, while getting constantly annoyed with his producers, crew, friends and his wife. This is told with stunning visuals and great narrative.\n\n8 1/2 can be seen as Fellini's own autobiographical story and is definitely one of the best films I have ever seen.\n\nMy rating: 10/10", u'0.472563', u'I\'ve never been in love with this from when I first saw it twenty years ago. It\'s not observant about life like Amarcord, which works with the same motifs (a hotel, a harem, a cinema, a beach, a whore). It\'s abstract and amorphous, and functions as an accumulation of moments that speak mostly about being a callous, privileged film-maker & sex-hound who instantly converts life into his next movie. It\'s not to be viewed casually or consumed meaninglessly like movies today. It\'s conspicuously non-linear "art." But one doesn\'t generally look at a piece of art for two hours straight. \n\nThere isn\'t a frame of this that isn\'t beautiful. Whether it\'s a near-Islamic view of Guido\'s childhood home, a fantasy traffic jam, or finding sublime beauty in something as trivial and provisional as scaffolding. After watching it again, there are definitely aspects I find to be unqualified successes (cinematography, production method) but I admire it, more than I actually enjoy it, or get into it. Liking it seems to be beside the point. You\'re supposed to declare Fellini a genius and be done with it. But it sits very outside myself. I doubt I\'ll ever watch it in one sitting again, since it\'s merits seem entirely about gorgeous and fleeting moments. I can imagine a use for it as Rorshach content for your screen that can be popped into a DVD player for viewing bits of pure detached sensation now and then. But because nearly every scene functions as a short essay about maximalization and lost momentum, I find it exhausting.', u'-0.185487', u'Fellini\'s films is one of the main reasons I came to love movies in the first place. I first saw 8 1/2 several years ago. I remember it quite clearly: I went to see it with a small group of fellow students at a friend\'s house. It was at the beginning of a now already long-since destroyed relationship. It was a cold day in early January. As the film started, a girl who was there, who happened to be a make-up artist and hairdresser by profession, remarked on the odd juxtaposition in the opening scenes of hair-styles and dresses from different eras, the 30\'s and the 60\'s. Surely, this was a strange anachrony?\n\nMy friend calmly remarked: "Time doesn\'t exist."\n\nHeck, I won\'t pretend to know just what he meant by that, perhaps it wasn\'t as profound as it sounded. In any case, after that, no one spoke. For the next couple of hours, I certainly lost track of place and time, as I was hypnotized, mesmerized and amazed by the images on the screen. Since then, I\'ve always kept a copy of it within reach (even though I am one of those people who can usually never hang on to my possessions for any length of time), and it has lost none of its power to continually amaze me. I\'ve seen it more times than I can count, and yet, it must always be seen again. It\'s a movie about which everything seems to have been said, and yet, everything still remains to be said. Thanks to the wonders of DVDs and MPEG encoding, I can keep it one mouse-click away whenever I\'m working on my computer. I must admit that by now, its already from the outset discontinuous and jumbled content has been spread all over the place for me. Unlike Woody Allen, I\'m not anal. I\'ve never had a compulsion to have to watch movies straight from beginning to end, without interruptions. Of course, that\'s how I watched 8 1/2 the first few times, but now it seems that I\'m always chopping it up, skipping at will between my favorite sections, always moving around it and rearranging it in new and unexpected ways. I hope Fellini, in his Heaven, forgives me for it, because it seems to me that I\'m in a way just continuing what he began. 8 1/2, even in its purest state, does of course blow the traditional temporal narrative, with a defined beginning, middle and end and a causal relationship between its parts, to complete smithereens, and in the jumbled landscape that is left behind, nothing can ever be as it was before, as what we are left with is a completely new world, of new possibilities and new kinds of beauty. It\'s a story of dream-logic, held together by different kinds of connections that transcend temporal sequence and causal relationships. It\'s a film that never begins, and still has always been there.\n\nIt\'s a movie about the most glorious success that can only be brought around through complete failure. It\'s about how we can only find ourselves when we let go of ourselves - and discover that the only place we can fall is into ourselves, our true selves. It\'s the ultimate self-referential masterpiece, and the ultimate piece of self-reference, as it is, of course, about nothing except itself.\n\nIt really is, in my opinion, the best movie in the world, and by now I can\'t even imagine a world without it. That\'s really all I want to say.', u'0.0402956'], u'tt0083922': [u'\nMost of the ideas revealed through mystery by Bergman in Fanny och Alexander have already been addressed by others. The first time I saw this film was in 1984, on tv and with a much shorter version than the one released in England in 2002, which is the full 300-plus minute original.\n\nThat day I was scared -really scared- watching the scene where Alexander is been helped to let out his most evil thoughts by Ishmael, a completely mysterious character with supernatural insight. And then, a blackout. You can imagine: if I was truly scared this left me breathless.\n\nThen, almost twenty years passed until I found this remarkable jewel, in its full version, perfectly digitised and audio-enhanced in dvd. I bought a dlp projector and used a previewing room to show it to my students. I didn\'t know what was going to happen. But that doubt was worth the waiting.\n\nI think it\'s very difficult to say any other thing than breathtaking to underline what this film accomplishes. It\'s the reflected work of years of understanding and hard work between Bergman and Nyvqvist. One of the most powerful, beautiful, fearful and perfect films of all times. An exaggeration, like. Yes, but I think that there are no words to explain how plainly perfect this work is. The way it was written. The way it was directed. The way it was lighted. The way it was designed. The way each and every character plays his or her role. The details -not a Bergman\'s new- to which they paid the most dedicated attention to. The luxurious use of available light. The setting of the story. The amazing locations. Everything in this film was perfectly studied, down to the colour shifts that would take place in every shot!, forget about whole scenes!\n\nThe troubling minds of all those characters whose lives are at crossroads. The powerful and eventful lives of just one familiy. The small and big affairs that affect them. Gratitude and hate. Honour and shame. Guilt and love. Fear and joy. Selfishness and generosity. Every long scene exudes with tension, pure fun or pleasure; with increasing uneasiness and abrupt changes of demeanor. With a richness that could only be found where a very skillful eye -trained to see what most disregard as common- finds beauty and harmony. And a sound that is as exhilarating as the narrative depiction.\n\nWhen the maxim of making "every frame a Rembrandt" comes to my mind, this film makes me think Bergman pushed the envelope a little further: he gives (or I\'d rather say, Nyvqyst) the tratment of Van Der Meer or Bosch or Cezanne or Michelangelo to some scenes. (Think the kids playing at the nursery, the housemaidens sewing socks, the meadow and the boat, the transfixing scene of Alexander in the attic with his mother).\n\nAnd a story told from the eyes of two kids worth a ton of gold. Alexander\'s (Bertil Guve, when he was twelve-thirteen) enormously powerful and convincing role can certainly be compared to any big-theatre-role actor.\n\nSuperb. Don\'t think you\'ve seen the whole thing until you get the 5  hour full-story.', u'0.234886', u'As Ingmar Bergman\'s "swan song" (which wasn\'t necessarily the case once After the Rehearsal and the recent Saraband were released), Fanny and Alexander was a film I saw many months ago, in its truncated, 3-hour version. I knew I had witnessed something special, something life-affirming, and above all a work that contained enough poetry, passion, and humanity for two movies. But I also felt as if there was something missing here and there. So, once the complete TV version was released, as with Scenes from a Marriage, I jumped at the opportunity to view it in its entirety. Broken up here into 5 Acts, Bergman takes another semi-autobiographical approach to his storytelling, and it\'s a sumptuous tale of a turn of the 20th Century family (the Ekdahls, comprising of Oscar and Emilie, the parents, Fanny and Alexander, the kids- Alexander being mostly the driving force behind the story- and also the other relatives Carl and Gustov Adolf, brothers of Oscar, Helena, Alma, Lydia, and also the housemaid Maj) who own a theater company.\n\nWhat makes Fanny and Alexander work as a major achievement, if anything else for my money is that all the elements seem balanced out over the acts, with story and characters, each sharply defined. The first act unfolds with attention to the little details and the more prevalent ones in a family gathering. A key speech made by Oscar is a haunting bit of foreshadowing before they set off for the family dinner. This scene, involving more or less two dozen people, is sometimes very funny, sometimes a little unnerving, and towards the end depressing. But scenes such as these reveal how wonderful and exciting Bergman can be with his material and actors- despite it taking place in 1907, you can see these people in modern settings just as easily. There\'s also the scene involving Oscar with his children before they go to sleep, in which he tells them a story, which ranks as one of the more memorable, touching scenes of the film - from here, we can understand how this brings to Alexander (Bertil Guve, in a performance that is touching by being so straightforward with the innocence of child-hood) to the state he\'s in for much of the rest of the picture.\n\nThen the second and third acts come around, and the tragedy unfolds as penetrating as I\'ve seen in any film, much less from Bergman. It wouldn\'t spoil it to say that Oscar succumbs to an illness, and passes away. From here, Emilie (Ewa Fr\xf6ling, a performance meant for Liv Ullman, which she fits just as well) tries to go on as usual, and it just doesn\'t feel the same. She seeks counsel from the village bishop, Edvard Vergerus (Jan Malmsjo, previously in Bergman\'s Scenes from a Marriage), and subsequently falls in love with him, or at least thinks she does. They get married, and the children are forced into leaving (almost) everything behind to live at his dreary, caged residence, a far cry from where they once lived, a place lush with colors and life in the rooms. Both of these assets are provided by an Oscar winning production design team, and the foundations of how these two, including as well the theater, display how period-perfect some of this can be.\n\nThe last two acts are when things get rough, which is a standard Bergman is known for. This kind of standard, if I could call it such, includes his personal connection to the Christian church, in particular with his father being a Lutheran priest. I\'m not guessing on how fact based Bishop Vergerus is to Bergman\'s life, and I really don\'t want to either. One of the things I loved about the film (than some likely hated on it\'s original release- I know, for example, that my father was devastated after watching this film) is how the good and the bad, or what could be seen as good and bad, are paired off, and how the middle-ground is just as clear or un-clear. Emilie is a good person, wanting the best for her children and for herself, but she doesn\'t know how to do that without someone to bring guidance when she cannot after grieving for her dead husband (who appears sometimes to Alexander, which is another matter). Alexander, who is a child raised with all the enthusiasm to express himself as such by his uncles and particularly his theatrical father Oscar, is good but lending himself to not being too firm on what\'s real and what is not. \n\nThe Bishop, on the other hand, is one who, as he says at one point "has only one mask". His is a puritanical approach, who sees imagination in only one strict aspect, and has terms of love that are by his code of living and understanding of people. Veregus, along with his family that live in fear and suffering (Harriet Andersson\'s character, and with the character of the heavy, ill aunt), know little is anything about how the Ekdahls have lived. What ends up happening, even from the get-go of the third act, in the fourth and fifth acts Bergman reveals Bishop Veregus to be an immense antagonist, one that allows just enough sympathy in one or two spots to not throw something at the TV, but with the kind of language that only the most terrifying of movie characters possess. Bottom line, this character, whether you like the film or not, is one of Bergman\'s greatest creations, and is pulled off by Malmjso with icy, disturbing perfection; it\'s one of the most memorable of the kind in film I can think of, right up there with Nurse Ratched, HAL 9000, and Darth Vader.\n\nBut what torment and anguish the characters, as well as much of the audience, seem to endure in the fourth/fifth acts; there also comes revelatory moments of sheer beauty and enchantment. A couple of scenes involving Alexander in the puppet shop, for example, display a level of artistry that goes between Bunuel and Disney. And a particular, long soliloquy by Isak (Erland Josephsson, not under-used at all) to the children is a poem unto itself that gives me an idea that Bergman had he not gone into theater and film, would\'ve been one of the great poets of the 20th century. As the catharsis comes, it comes with a kind of justice that works in the only way it satisfyingly could have. With the fates of the Bishop, Emilie, and Alexander and Fanny brought to a close, as with the Grandmother, the uncles and aunts, and so on, it\'s all very symbolic, metaphorical, and real, and it gels together.\n\nOne last note- Sven Nykvist, who one his second Oscar with Bergman for this film, creates the kinds of shots that some could only have in their dreams. When he visualizes something for Bergman with the forces of light and dark, with the subtlety and nuance, it\'s all the better. To put this all in another way, I could go on and on about this huge, heart-rendering work, but it all comes down to this- as an emotional, intellectual, and spiritual (surprisingly for me, who sees religion as a kind of fantasy) sort of film-viewing experience, Fanny and Alexander is one of the most profound I\'ve ever had. Some may feel the same; some may want to forget they ever experienced it. But one thing the film does is stick with you, if only for a little while, and that\'s really what a film can and should do....by the way, the 5-hour version, at least in America, is only available on a high-priced special edition DVD pack from Criterion, but for the viewer who\'s already a fan of the film, it makes for a great holiday gift. A++', u'0.341143', u'Swedish director Ingmar Bergman has a reputation for dark, intellectual and introspective dramas, which is only partly justified because many of his early movies were rather light-hearted. Here is the longest movie he did (three hours), and the theatrical version is only half of the original which was twice as long. But length should not stop you from watching this jewel of a film, which is both complex and accessible. After all, "Gone with the Wind" is just as long.\n\n"Fanny and Alexander "isn\'t exactly a family movie, but it is a movie about family. Family seen in all its different facets through the eyes of two children. The film is divided into three very different parts, each of them showing a different aspect of family life. It is set in Uppsala, Sweden (Bergman\'s native city), at the turn of the twentieth century. The story begins on Christmas Eve, and we are plunged right away into a fairytale atmosphere.\n\nFanny and Alexander"s family seems a happy one, actually a family of theatre actors. During the Christmas Eve party held at the grandmother\'s heavily-furnished house, the atmosphere is joyful at first glance, especially for the children who obviously feel very much at home. But reality is not just what it seems. The children\'s father is seriously ill. One of the uncles is manic-depressive, and the other is a skirt-chaser who has an affair with the young maid while his wife shows a lot of comprehension. Even the grandmother keeps a secret affair with a Jewish banker (played by Erland Josephson, a Bergman regular) that has lasted for many years.\n\nThe children\'s world collapse as their father dies. Soon after, their still young and beautiful mother marries the bishop, whose name is Vergerus (that\'s the name of the villain in all Bergman\'s movies, don\'t ask me why). The atmosphere in the bishop\'s house could not be more different from the children\'s first home. It is bare, silent, freezing. Alexander and the bishop hate each other from the start. This hate culminates when the bishop flogs Alexander to punish him, during a suffocating scene. War is declared from then on. Although the children\'s mother is pregnant, she already regrets her second marriage and seeks help from her former family.\n\nThe grandma\'s Jewish friend, who is also sort of a magician, manages to kidnap the children by a clever stratagem. They are sheltered in his house, which is full of puppets and mysterious objects. There, a strange nephew of his lives in seclusion (the role is played by a woman). From then on, reality and fantasy get blurred, but what is certain is that the evil bishop meets a cruel fate, and the children\'s mother finally makes it back to her former home. \n\nThe film ends as it began, with a party. Two new babies are just born : the mother\'s baby she had from the wicked bishop, and the maid\'s baby with the luscious uncle. The two of them are accepted immediately as part of the family, which is a rather precocious sign of Scandinavian open-mindedness (in 1900, illegitimate children were generally rejected as bastards).\n\nDespite the title, attention is focused much more on Alexander than on Fanny. She is there all the time but speaks little, while showing unconditional solidarity with her brother. A possible reason is that the movie seems to have strong autobiographical elements, more than any other Bergman, and if so, Alexander seems to incarnate Bergman himself as a child. Bergman\'s father happened to be a minister, and the director confessed that he was raised in a very oppressive manner. Thus, it is quite possible that Alexander\'s step family is a representation of Bergman\'s real family, while Alexander\'s real family is the family Bergman had dreamed of, unsurprisingly a family of actors.\n\nThis film also displays the most accomplished use that Bergman\'s renowned photographer Sven Nykvist ever made of color. He was a long time reluctant to color and kept shooting in black and white well into the sixties. Bergman\'s first color movies had nothing special, until "Cries and whispers" where an obsessive use of red started to appear. The color contrasts are very strong in "Fanny and Alexander", and are especially used to underline the difference between the grandmother\'s colorful home and the bishop\'s house which is mostly all black and white. \n\nThere are many characters in this story, and all the major adult roles are played by actors who are all very famous in Sweden. There is a special appearance by Harriet Andersson, who played the female lead in many Bergmans of the fifties, especially well remembered as the whimsical "Monika". Here, she is ungratefully cast as the bishop\'s elderly tormented servant who likes scaring the children with horror stories. As for the young maid, she is played Pernilla Wallgren, who married Danish director Bille August and became later famous as Pernilla August. She played the lead in "The best intentions" directed by Bille August but based on a script by Bergman, and also taking place in Uppsala at the turn of the twentieth century...', u'0.0526762', u'\nI have wanted to see this film for years but I have missed it several times they were showing it on television.And also because of my father does not like Bergman(why??) but still think that this film is fantastic.I saw it yesterday just after having read Bergman\xb4s  autobiography and this film is much a autobiographical film.\n\nI would like to say something about the cinematography and acting.But what is there more to say about Sven Nykvist\xb4s cinematography then MASTERFUL.Before I saw the film I read in a newspaper that this is the best Swedish acting film ever made and it was actually picked as number two as the best Swedish film ever made for a couple of years ago(film fans voted).The WHOLE cast acts SUPERB,I am not sure if I have ever seen anything more perfect.\n\nThis is a chronicle over a family.It has a a great poetic script that combines just as it sad in a other comment:striking visuals.Bergman has really done this to a masterpiece.Now I want to see the five-hour version(i saw the 3 hour version).Colorful,perfect,frightening and sometimes even funny.What I guess I liked most was that they showed everything from the children\xb4s eyes.One of Bergman\xb4s best.5/5', u'0.075916', u'"Fanny and Alexander" (1982) was announced at the time of its release as Ingmar Bergman\'s swan song, his last film for the big screen. It is his most optimistic and enchanting blend of romance, tragedy, comedy, fantasy, and mysticism. Set in Sweden in the beginning of the 20th century, the film follows the lives and adventures of two children, brother and sister Fanny and Alexander Edkahl.\n\nI love Bergman in every mood and in every genre - I love him dark, bleak, harrowing ("Shame"), mysterious ("Persona"), merciless and devastating ("Scenes from a Marriage, "Face to Face", "Autumn Sonata). I love his lighter, smiling side ("Wild Strawberries", "Smiles of a Summer Night). Even for a master of Bergman\'s powerful talent, "Fanny and Alexander" is extraordinary - a profound film which is also one of his most accessible works.\n\nPablo Picasso said once, "When I was 9 years old, I could paint like Rafael; as an adult, all my life I tried to learn how to paint like a child". In his final film, one of the greatest masters of dark and sometimes morose psychological studies looks at the world with a child\'s eye. The words he chose to finish his film with reflect the hope, the happiness and the magic that can be fully felt only in one\'s childhood: "...Anything can happen, anything is possible. Time and space do not exist. ..On a flimsy ground of reality, imagination spins out and waves new patterns." --- August Strindberg\'s introductory notes for A Dream Play.', u'0.339235', u"\nI am not one for putting up idols on pedestals; mostly Bergman's films leave me tepid or even cold. But Fanny och Alexander is a splendid production, beautifully made, so superb it even evokes feelings of having come from a novel. Excellent characterization throughout, all the way down the cast, lending that magic touch to the costuming of the early 1900s. Mesmerising throughout, the film is not a single minute too long. The development of the story-line is superbly handled in an absorbing and coherent manner, manifesting the great empathy between director and actors. If the cinematography is visual poetry, the script is philosophical and full of awareness or consciousness of things in life, but not at a pretentious, abstract and theoretical level, but at a real human dimension.\n\nIf you only have 10 videos in your collection, Fanny och Alexander should be one of them. My vote is a bit higher than the IMDb average.\n\n\nThese comments refer to the 3-hour version.\n", u'0.462269', u"\nThis film could never have been made in the United States. I realize when it was made Bergman had been around for a long time and had his own clout but it still has too much of a philosophical slant to be mainstream here. This film is amazing. The first hour moves at a slow pace but it really sets up the rest of the movie well and then it really picks up. The cinematography is breathtaking and while this story makes you think a lot you don't feel ambivalent towards the characters through the rest of the first film after having been slowly introduced to all the characters you have a certain identifcation that is purely emotional and blends wonderfully with the other aspects of the film. It's truly great and should be considered one of Bergman's best works.", u'0.76489', u"\nAlthough I have disliked Bergman's earlier films and thought they were by far too overrated, that did not apply to this film. I saw the director's-cut version, over five hours. A little long, yes, and there is not much music, but it's not slow, like Tarkovsky's films can be. \n\nThe opening is great, and the first act, the first one and a half hour, was the part I liked the very most. The realism is utter, so is the casting; the best acting I have seen in a Swedish film, it's amazing. I can't complain about any actor, they were all extremely good. So is the dialog. Alexander had a typical upper class look, so did his grandmother, who looked extremely fresh and healthy and beautiful, for her age. All together, the language and milieus are very credible. No over-colorful costumes and silly dialogs, that is such a frequent element nowadays in historical plays, especially from America. \n\nBergman succeeds to capture the customs and behavior that were used (and to some extent still is used) within the Swedish upper class, as well as general Swedish customs and behavior. I know this, because I am familiar with it and have partly experienced it myself. The result is sometimes amazing. Bergman succeeds to capture the atmosphere of the old times, through language and decoration. The photo is at time dazzling; some scenes are identical to 19th century Swedish painting, and I get the thought that Bergman turned to these in search for the right setting of the film.\n\n\nUnlike early works by Bergman, which tend to be somewhat theatrical, the keyword here is realism, which I appreciate greatly. The actors manage, like I said, to speak and play in a way that I feel was customary at that period of time. It might be too much to claim this work to be a Swedish Tarkovsky film, but I sensed it had some philosophical material, and it is definitely thoughtful. Otherwise, I think it is worth watching for the acting and dialog alone.\n\nOne of the best Swedish films ever made, and Bergman's best, in my opinion. (9/10)", u'0.420282', u"\nPerhaps the most impressive feature of this wonderful film is the humility with which its creator presents it to the world, as if it were no grander than the old-fashioned Nativity-play shown in the early scenes at the Theatre.\n\n     At the end of this experience - to term it with any mere technical tag, like 'movie', would be inadequate - Bergman's profoundly grown-up disillusionment has transformed into the pure spirituality of abnegation and acceptance. His intellectual pilgrimage, through possibly the greatest career in films, finds the director arriving back where he began, with the great simplicities of life. But there is a difference with his return, which is that his prodigality over the years has burnt the rage out of him, and finally allowed him to 'enjoy what may be enjoyed' (as one of the Ekdahls says), without further fretting over the puzzle of human existence. From all this human folly (he clearly feels) comes the only wisdom, which is - simply - to be human.\n\n     It is, indeed, a film like no other for allowing the pieces of experience to settle into their appointed places. There is a beautiful quality of selfless resignation, in this last of his works for cinema, which finally and forever excels the sadistic disciplines of The Bishop.\n\n\n     This perverted creature confesses, to the new wife whom he has lost, how it is impossible to 'tear off the mask' as it is 'burned into my face': He is become an authoritarian '... a rite, a law, a custom - not a man'. [Shelley] Having put the notional love of God before that of humankind, there is nowhere for his personality to be re-enacted in the bosom of any kindly recollections that will survive him. Except in that of Alexander/Bergman, where his two, each-in-their-own-way terrifying, fathers, both the White and the Black opposites of an imagination flickering with the director's haunted vision, will project forever onto his Cinematic arena of stark absolutes the inner strife where each of us is locked away, struggling to endure the turmoil of these eternally irreconcilable truths.\n\n\n     The White Knight and The Black Bishop: These are phantom moves in our great game with Death, and pieces that will be returned into play for as long as humanity continues. How like Chess Life is: Just a game we play, with arbitrary rules, and yet whose progress is of supreme and abiding concern to each and every one of us.\n\n     This great work is a monument to play, in all its senses, not least  the play of light and the play of ideas, both equally insubstantial and yet the essence of reality, eloquent as the silence of a great, roofless Cathedral. Out of the Ruin of Faith, Bergman has wrought a Peace that passeth understanding. And it is in this ultimate by-passing of the relentless structures of intellect that Bergman finally achieves the resolution of his productive neuroses, in a truly magical film whose every phase is as inevitable as breathing, or the changeable and unimpeded weather.\n\n     As the grandmother reflects. at last, 'I don't want to put Life together anymore. I just leave it broken. Strangely, it seems better that way.'\n\n     Death, in the end, is not a calamity, but the choice of all who have truly known Life. In other words, to choose Life is to accept its Dark partner, Death. And to accept each as part of the family group, even though they seem complete misfits there.\n\n     The old lady, with Strindberg's Dream-play in her lap, knows at last that the whole history of her family is only a personal reverie. And yet how much more real it seems than her son Carl's immature and somewhat absurd, angst-ridden railings against 'cruel Fate'!\n\n     Had he only accepted his patient wife's gently sympathetic injunction to 'Never mind' the Professor would have been both wiser and happier, enduring with patient fortitude the oceanic inconsequentialities of life's real Mystery, and attending far less to the trivial pseudo-mysteries of his solipsistic men's club. All his morbid rationalising is precisely as much use in real life as the usual state of alcoholic befuddlement which is the only serious pursuit of this club. \n\n     Reason as befuddlement; The sleep of reason as deliverance. With saint-like humility, Bergman gives us back our ordinary human life, as he surrenders his exceptional life in films. But he knows that the ghost of this life will always be with us. His anguished worldliness will haunt us - as the Ghost of Hamlet's father must haunt Alexander - forever.", u'0.0766814', u"Fanny and Alexander isn't utterly terrible. I enjoined parts of the film very much and thought I'd gotten the hang of it on several occasions. However, the film has several peculiarities that make me question Bergmans talent for composing a unity. \n\nThe whole film seems to be merely a series of loosely connected scenes. Is Bergmans ambition to make a realistic portrayal of the times (the beginning), a lascivious farce (the erotic adventures of Gustav Adolf), an artistic endeavour to portray children's odd fantasies and views of the illogical adult world (the end)? For me, Bergman seems to fail completely in composing a cohesive film.\n\nThe big interest in the film lies on the personalities of the characters, and Bergman does succeed in portraying the bigger part of them credibly (Alexander, Carl, Oscar, the bishop). However, illogical characteristics of other characters make me doubt Bergmans understanding of the human nature. For example: Gustavs wife lets Gustav play around with other women without feeling jealousy. This could work if only the film in the whole would aim on being a farce or allegory of sexual oppression of women. In the context of the rest of the film, however, these details spoil the credibility of the film as a character study.\n\nIn the case of the bishop Bergman seems to rely on insufficient reasons for making him appear as such a beast of a man. Why does Emelie suddenly start hating her husband so passionately? He is slimy and idealistic but nonetheless the same man with whom she originally fell in love. Bergman doesn't motivate these feelings, and for me, paradoxically, the bishop appears to be the true victim - haunted by an ignorant director. As far as the bishop's injustice is concerned I take it that spanking wasn't uncommon in those days. Nevertheless, Emilies hate becomes known already before the punishing.\n\nAlso, I couldn't really comprehend the poetic and incredible ending. Later, I read on the internet how to interpret the scene where Isak comes to save the children. Putting this scene in the context of the rather realistic earlier parts of the film, it seems to me far-fetched that Isak should have conjured the children in the chest invisible and at the same time made their bodies show up in their room to convince the bishop he wasn't taking them anywhere.\n\nConsidering these confusing aspects of the film I wonder how much was cut from the original five-hour film. On the other hand, it is self-evident that skillful cutting and planning plays an important part when rating a film. Fanny and Alexander should be understandable without having to see any edited scenes. \n\nRegardless of what is said above, I refuse to believe that the whole film-loving world could have been fooled to like Fanny and Alexander. I must have missed the point somewhere on the way. Maybe the film needs a second chance.", u'-0.323267', u'You could call this my opinion of Bergman\'s Fanny and Alexander...as opposed to a review. I really don\'t feel the need in describing or summarizing this film. Any review, as I see it, would be pointless. Words just can\'t convey what makes a truly great movie as good as it is. The best "review" I could give Fanny and Alexander is to just see the damned thing. If you can\'t sit through it, so be it. But, those who are willing to give it their attention, I promise, will be rewarded continuously through the film\'s duration. Anyone who sits through the entire film, especially the full-length version, I think, will find it difficult to say that they were bored. More than likely, they will find it easy to say, "That was a damned good movie." I, myself, was surprised. Previous to seeing F&A, I had never seen a film quite this long. I\'m glad I did. I\'ll also throw this in: most film buffs, I think it\'s safe to say, will always consider Bergman to be the master of gloom. This may be true, but I think Fanny and Alexander proves beyond any doubt that his ability to express the joy that exists in life is every bit as great, and truly refreshing.', u'0.213271', u"The problem with any great artist is that it becomes easy to rest on one's laurels, become self-indulgent, or settle for mediocrity. After all, the fans will always stick by you.\n\nFanny and Alexander, Bergman's farewell to the cinema (in more ways than one since it was made for television) is a problematic film - it is a well crafted work, but undistinguished, not nearly as great as some of his past achievements. Can one blame him? Not really - nobody hits a home run every time at bat.\n\nFanny and Alexander is a long (over 3 hours) Dickensian period piece that lacks much of the trademark Bergman touches. It's well made, but not significantly different from many historical melodramas and made-for-TV mini-series' that were the hallmark of U.S. broadcast television in the 1980s. The story primarily deals with two young siblings and their trials and tribulations following the death of their father. Really it's mostly about the boy, Alexander, as his sister, Fanny is pretty much an ominpresent non-entity in the proceedings. There are also a lot of dead-end subplots featuring the children's aunts, uncles, and other relatives. And, save for a few detours into the metaphysical (mostly in the last 10 minutes), there is little to distinguish it from a run-of-the-mill Victorian soap opera.\n\nThe cast - all of them - turn in fine performances, and while I can't really recommend this film whole-heartedly, I really can't knock it either. Perhaps a good time-passer if you are bedridden and need a 3 hour diversion.", u'-0.607796', u'There are so many things I want to say about this film that I don\'t even know where to begin. I guess I\'ll start by saying that this has been the shortest 5 hours I\'ve spent watching a film. At first I had planned to watch it in parts as the film is divided in acts, but I was so instantly taken, engrossed and fascinated, that I just felt like watching the whole thing in one sitting. I know that a 5-hour long film can sound very intimidating and exhausting, but the film is specifically divided in 5 distinguishable acts that make it more digestible, and believe me, it\'s so absorbing that you will barely notice you spent all that time watching it; it\'s that good. I\'ve skimmed through the 3-hour theatrical version, and while it is a great film, some of my favorite parts are either shortened or completely cut from the film, which for me, lessens the impact the whole 5-hour extended TV version has. Both versions work, of course, but if you want to get a greater understanding of Bergman\'s vision, I totally recommend the extended version.\n\nNow onto the film itself. What can I say? It\'s magnificent. A grand, rich and glorious tapestry of life, family, love, hate, imagination, art, fantasy, reality, religion, magic, death, faith, spirituality, God, despair, redemption, youth, innocence, maturity, old age and the supernatural. Fanny and Alexander is all of these things and even more. I don\'t want to go into much plot detail, but point out what I liked so much about the film by mentioning some of my favorite scenes and commenting on them. And in this film there are plenty. Rarely I\'ve felt the sense of familial warmth and love in a film or elsewhere as I have with Fanny and Alexander. The first act shows us a Christmas dinner family celebration, and it is instantly intoxicating and beguiling, and you\'re instantly drawn to these flawed-yet-loving and caring characters that constitute this large, happy family and Bergman\'s direction is so vivid that you totally feel the joy in sharing and the affection and love. One of my favorite scenes in this part is Oscar\'s (the family patriarch and owner of the family theater) heartfelt and candid speech about the importance of the theater, this "little world" as it is referred to, and how art can reflect the "big world" and help us have a greater endurance during bad times. This theme is more thoroughly explored in an enchanting and beautiful scene in which Oscar explains to Fanny and Alexander through the simple story of a chair how art is connected to life, how important and essential art is in enriching our lives, helping us have a deeper awareness and appreciation of the world at large, and how there is more to what meets the eye, an inner life lying underneath the surface of things. Bergman was raised within a very strict and oppressive family, and I\'m pretty sure that the Ekdahls is the kind of family (Loving, supportive, encouraging, freethinkers) he would\'ve liked to be raised in. I echo his (likely) sentiment. Likewise, if I got a profound sense of love and family in the first act, when tragedy strikes in the second act, I got a great sense of suffering and despair. One of the most strikingly moving scenes in the film involves Oscar\'s wife, Emilie, giving these primal, animal cries of grief over her dead husband; the scene is simply heart-wrenching. Similarly engrossing, is the open and penetrating conversation between Emilie and the bishop about her faith and her spiritual confusion and longing. But in the third and fourth acts is when the characters\' resilience are really put to the test. None of the pain, humiliation and the frailty of the human heart throughout the film is better illustrated in a scene of tremendous impact in which Alexander is severely punished by the bishop and Fanny has no other option but to stand and watch as her brother is being physically abused, only moments later to see her defiantly turn down the bishop\'s affections. Another favorite scene during this act is Helena\'s - the family matriarch - beautiful and eloquent soliloquy to her son Oscar about the joys and pains in life, the futility of fighting against its forces and just living it as it comes. It is what it is. Another standout is Isak Jacobi\'s (a family friend and magician) metaphorical story that encapsulates the importance and at the same time the futility of searching for meaning in life. Some of the film\'s most intriguing, revealing and fantastical moments are in this act. In what\'s probably the greatest moment in a film full of great moments, is Alexander\'s encounter with a mysterious character named Ismael. I think this scene is the climax of the film as it brings closure to Alexander\'s arch. There\'s also a deep sense of the supernatural as it is suggested that everything, fantasy and reality, the logical and unexplainable, the material and the ethereal, the good and even the bad, is a manifestation of God. I feel that with those statements, Bergman is telling us that he probably managed to finally exorcise the demons that had been haunting him throughout his life, or at least come to terms with them, as his on screen alter ego Alexander has as well. All of this told, detailed and presented with the skill of a master storyteller.\n\nI was fully enraptured by this film. I love the way it beautifully conveyed the relevance of art and imagination and how they\'re actually essential for humanity. I loved how it showed life in all its joyful, fantastical, realistic, tragic, resigned and ultimately hopeful glory. I loved its sense of completeness yet also leaving the viewer with an air of mystery that implies the endless possibilities of life. A masterpiece and easily one of my favorite films ever.', u'0.575748', u'I absolutely detest making distinctions like this, but I would rate this the best movie of all time purely on the way it affected me. Viewing this film for the first time left me with the feeling that I would never again experience the world in quite the same way. The second time only deepened my appreciation for the simplicity of the story and the depth and precision of every detail. The third time I viewed the five hour Swedish Television version and realized that I was watching the equivalent of a Tolstoy novel on film. \n\nThe highest compliment I can pay to this movie is that in being a child of the eighties, an adolescent and young adult in the 90\'s, and well, now venturing towards middle age in this young century, few works of media or "art" escape my mind\'s deconstruction of them, or my generation\'s greatest blessing (or greatest curse:) a very well developed sense of irony. \n\nFanny and Alexander (along with a few of Bergman\'s other films including \'The Virgin Spring" and "Wild Strawberries") is the exception to this rule. There is no way to simply break down how Bergman casts the spell he does. His work gathers you in, completely envelopes you, and at the same time is utterly impenetrable to any form of rational criticism. In the end you are left with a pure emotional response to what you just experienced with little idea of how Bergman took you to that place. You believe television, media, advertising, the constant bombardment of images into your brain has desensitized you to pain, agony, regret, violence, disappointment, dreams, longings and questions of God and death, and then Bergman gets a hold of you. I can only say this work is what one would call truly "spiritual" art, and Bergman\'s films are the only place I have ever experienced this phenomena.\n\nIf cinema is the closest we have to a truly "magical" experience, then Bergman is and perhaps forever will be the greatest magician of them all. Fanny and Alexander should be preserved along with the works of the greatest masters of art in any medium. Every time I see this film, no matter what state of mind I\'m in, it somehow makes me fall in love with movies and life all over again.\n\nThank you, Mr. Bergman, for spending your life sharing your dreams, visions and nightmares with us. You have made this world an infinitely richer place for your efforts.', u'0.350314', u"This is Ingmar Bergman's semi-autobiographical Life and Times of wealthy theater family Ekdahl in 1907 Uppsala, mainly told from the eyes of young Alexander as his mother is widowed, remarries a harsh bishop, and moves into his church estate with both the children. A fairly gripping saga, gorgeously photographed and sumptuously produced, with marvelous performances from Malmsj\xf6 and W\xe5llgren... but mostly a more artistic gem to admirably behold rather than be moved by and involved in. Considered a masterpiece by many, not by me. Why?\n\nWell, I caught the 188 min' version, and many bits - although enjoyable on their own, such as Kulle's monologues and erotic shenanigans - seem to be from completely different films altogether in tone, patched up to a big quilt with unfitting seams, in contrasting the children's ghastly torment of their stepfather (Alexander's head-to-head battles of will with him IS a highlight), with the unrelated, more easy-going content from the family's head estate. The relatives fates from the first act are unresolved and completely detached from the remaining main story: Emilie, her failed re-marriage and the children's struggle. They all honestly don't evoke terribly much emotional sympathy because we don't really get to know them; for example, Alexander misses his dead father and hates his stepfather... and that's basically all. And we also really have no other sign of the family's togetherness than their spoken confirmations, which contribute to this film's most disjointed, highly inconsistent feel with quite a few leaps in the storyline. Perhaps the TV-series version is more cohesive?\n\nBergman's love for the theater is of course ubiquitous, both in establishing the family's relation to it, as well as much of the overly theatrical acting/line delivery, heavily metaphysical & religious symbolism and solemn theme presentation (with a nod to August Strindberg at the end). That style blend is of course a matter of preference, and I'm not a huge fan of it, presented this way (NOTE: this is my third Bergman altogether). And one major question truly arises: where the hell is Fanny in this movie? A character with her name in the title, has no impact on anything whatsoever in a story spanning 3 hours... how can that be? \n\n6 out of 10 from Ozjeppe", u'-0.17942'], u'tt0353969': [u"\nI read a review about this movie and am aware what business it made in Korea, but nothing (I mean NOTHING) prepares me for this great work. With the exception of, perhaps, SE7EN, serial-killer movie has never been this good. The story (about real-life killings of 10 women in Korea during the 1986-1991) is compelling enough, but the actors (Song Kang-ho cuts you deep even when he's silent, and his big-city partner offers emotional jolts at the end), the director (effectively plays some scenes in docu-style approach), the cinematography (a shadow creeps out in the paddy field will give you, well, creeps. big one.), and the music (haunting) are welcome bonuses.\n\nOne scene that impresses me most is the crime-scene midnight chase between a\nsuspect, 2 local detectives, and a big-city detective (who doesn't know his local partners are there watching him). Humorously intense, or intensely humorous, whichever serves you well.\n\nThe only regret is I saw this one on DVD, while I believe a movie this big (in many senses) deserves to be seen in theaters. Korean movies rarely touch Indonesian theaters.\n\n**** out of ****\n\nTry to listen the song SAD LETTER in this movie and tell me it's not haunting you. A magnum opus.\n", u'0.121063', u"\nWhat a good movie.What a great work of casting. Perhaps a little bit long, but the most part the movie is enjoyable and there's no perfection without mistakes. I think i haven't ever seen before a Korean movie and if there are much of them like this one i shall become Korean movie fan. The tempo, the thrill, the development of characters, everything it has been well worked.The direction is good yet without emphatic resources, there are just two moments with a little much use of slow motion but it doesn't arrive to be an abuse of it.\n\nIf you can see it don't loose your time with Hollywood sad-bad thrillers bet for this Korean present.\n\n9/10 cause perfection doesn't exist.\n", u'0.341537', u'My "one line summary" might be too subjective (well it\'s just an opinion after all), but that\'s what kind of thought came to my mind after seeing this film. It just sucked me in and didn\'t let away until the ending credits appeared. I\'m really not a fan of this genre which is popular in various "detective" TV series but this film was something exceptional. A perfectly made detective film based on a real shocking murder case in S.Korea in 80\'s. This is a must see Korean film for everybody and this must be a real pearl for those who love detective stories because perhaps it\'s the best detective film ever...\n\nI give it a 10/10 this film is worth it.', u'0.41871', u"I'm one of those people who tend to think that South Korean movies are perhaps a bit too slow-paced for my taste. Memories of Murder isn't a fast-paced film, by any means, but this time the slow pace made this movie about an investigation of serial killings so much better than 95% of its American counterparts.\n\nEssentially, Memories of Murder is a drama first with thriller and comedy elements (yes, in the first hour or so the movie is actually quite funny). Kang-ho Song and Sang-kyung Kim are brilliant as the two cops who have drastically different views on how to solve a crime. The character development is fascinating and believable thanks to a great script.\n\nHighly recommended.", u'0.409189', u'This is probably the best crime thriller I\'ve seen since "Insomnia," and contains the most haunting climax of any serial killer flick since "Seven." But like most films reaching for greatness, this is most admirable for its striking details.\n\nThe filmmakers here craft a taut, careful, and delicately strung together motion picture that relishes in its amazing development of mood, place, and character.\n\nFirst, the mood: Haunting cinematography (rain falling on a small village at night, shadows darting across a thick field of grass, figures lurking in the woods, a masterfully choreographed hot pursuit scene on foot), a poignant music score (aided by the creepy use of a Korean pop song that accompanies each murder), and no-nonsense direction (peppered with fabulous doses of comic relief--how Shakespearan!) keep the film more and more intriguing at each turn and fascinating to watch.\n\nSecond, the place: South Korea, circa the late 1980\'s, and apparently under some sort of militia rule. This is inspired by the true story of Korea\'s first publicized (and still unsolved) serial killer case. This unique time and place serves as a wonderful respite from the typical American big-city setting of so many other films of this ilk.\n\nFinally, the character development: The small details revealing the haunted souls of the detectives on the case is nothing short of brilliant. Witness the tiny executions of minutae: The cloth one rogue cop wraps around his boot so as not to leave scars when he kick-boxes suspects into submission, the harried chief of police checking his own blood pressure while trying to keep his off-the-cuff detectives in line or fighting to keep headline-starved reporters at bay, the young female officer desperately trying to showcase her abilities in crime solving between serving the chauvinistic detectives cups of fresh coffee, the outsider detective from Seoul\'s insistence that documents never lie (and the brutal irony at the climax that challenges his entire sense of being), and the main village detective\'s scathing speech on the difference between American FBI agents and Koren policemen. The beauty is in the details, and this film, like all the great ones, revels in their uncovering.\n\nOne flaw is that some might find the film a bit long in the tooth, but this is not to be missed for fans of serial killer thrillers and police procedural movies. For the Korean filmmakers, and the amazing cast...this is their master stroke.', u'0.51759', u"Beginning in the fall of 1986 and continuing for the next four years South Korea was haunted by the nation's first recorded serial killer. Preying upon women in a remote rural community the killer was both vicious and meticulous, strangling his victims with their own undergarments and leaving nothing of any use to the police investigating the crimes. The killer was never caught.\n\nI do not envy any director trying to make a true crime film, particularly not one so high profile and so recent that the crimes still live on in the public consciousness. Stray too far in one direction and you devolve into saccharine sentimentality, go the other direction and you risk crass exploitation. Director Bong Joon-Ho avoided both of these traps by charting an altogether different route: he has made a film that is not about the killer or the crimes or the victims but one that is purely about the police officers charged with the case and the devastating emotional toll it took on their lives. In charting his unusual route Bong has created a bleak masterpiece, one that took home a stack of film awards in its native land but which has been largely neglected on these shores until now.\n\nThe film begins with the first body discovered, a woman strangled with her own stockings, raped, tightly bound, and hidden in a drainage culvert. The detective in charge of the case is Park Du-Man (Song Kang-Ho) and it is immediately clear that he is out of his depth, that the entire local police force, in fact, are out of their depth. The crime scene is chaos, crowded by reporters and locals trampling over potentially vital evidence. Park himself is not what you'd call a systematic investigator, scoffing at the scientific approach and trusting in his supposedly unerring eye at picking out criminals just by looking at them. He relies on swagger and bravado and the brute force of his uneducated assisting officer Jo Yong-Gu.\n\nServing as a foil to Park and Jo is Seo Tae-Yun (Kim Sang-Kyung) a detective from Seoul who has volunteered to assist with the investigation. Seo is the polar opposite of Park - methodical and rational - and it takes mere moments for the two to clash, clashes that lead to the two of them overlooking some key pieces of evidence.\n\nAs the film progresses and the body count continues to rise you can feel a sense of desperation slowly settle over the department. Under educated, under manned and woefully under equipped the local force is simply not up to the task. As the realisation that they will not find the evidence they so badly need begins to set in Park and Jo resort to planting evidence to bring in suspects Park picks out with his 'keen eye', suspects they then set out to extract coached confessions from. The process inevitably leads to public humiliation. Soon even Seo begins to lose his faith in reason and just as things bottom out they finally catch a break and settle on a prime suspect, one who truly appears likely to be their man. But can they make it stick? What sets Memories of Murder apart from the crowd are the rich performances from its leads and the sure hand of Bong Joon-Ho. Bong knows exactly what he wants to do with this film and he steers the ship with a firm hand. He has a keen eye for imagery but he consistently avoids the cheap resolve, the quick hit, in favour of a slowly building mood and the film is all the stronger because of it. Song and Kim are both stellar in their roles, giving their characters much needed depth. You can feel their frustration and helplessness continually growing and when the final crushing blow is delivered you can feel their utter despair at being abandoned by a system that they have given their lives to. Bong isn't just asking how this could happen, how someone could be as evil as this killer, but how could a government allow this to happen? How could the police not be given the tools and manpower they so obviously needed to protect the people? The DVD release has been given the standard Palm treatment. The transfer is strong and presented in anamorphic widescreen. The film is presented with both the original Korean language track in 2.0 stereo and an English dub in both 2.0 and 5.1. The English subtitles are solid, clearly translated and easy to read. The disc also includes a reel of cast and crew interviews discussing their characters and the creation of the film as well as an extensive reel of deleted scenes.\n\nMemories of Murder is a minor masterpiece, a film that moved Bong immediately onto Korea's A-list of directing talent. It is richly detailed, beautifully performed and disturbing in precisely the way that people need to be disturbed in from time to time. Don't miss it.", u'-0.0372134', u"After two women are found dead in a rural community, a detective arrives from the big city to help out. Things quickly mushroom with the discovery of more bodies, more suspects and no end in sight.\n\nWhether you like police films or not you should see this movie about the real hunt for Korea's first known serial killer simply because its a great movie. This is a movie that alters your expectations and changes your view of things. Its impossible to guess whats going to happen simply because the twists and turns are so unexpected. At times this is a funny funny movie, especially if you like shows like Law and Order or CSI since what we take for granted in those shows is stood on its head. At other times this is a very taut thriller and you become as desperate as the police in needing to put an end to the madness.\n\nOn top of all of this is a picture of Korea in 1986, a place with political unrest and civil defense drills that for me at least makes it seem like something out of the 1950's.\n\nThis is brilliant brilliant film-making.\n\nI've given the film an 8 out of 10, even though it probably deserves to be higher, simply because some 12 hours after seeing the film, I'm still pondering what I thought of it, how good is it? At least an 8. I'm sure a second and third and fourth viewings will change my mind.\n\nYea its that good", u'0.380272', u"\nI have long since heard of the excellence of this korean movie on koreanfilm.org, but it was only after reading the review in detail and realizing that the score was written by Taro Ishiwaro ( a well known Japanese musician who also wrote scores for Shohei Imamura and Japanese TV serials, including The Inanimate World ), and that the DOP was Kim Hyung-gu (who also shot Musa, One Fine Spring Day and Chen Kaige's Together) that it stumped on me I was indeed missing a masterpiece.\n\nAnd a masterpiece it is, one deeply haunting and disturbing asian crime thriller. The mood invoked during the last few minutes of the film is something you would probably never forget.\n\nWatch this film not only for its cinematic brilliance, but also because of the mezmerising score written by Taro Ishiwaro, track no 29 on the OST the favourite on my list.\n\n", u'0.628697', u'Being a movie buff and a director in the making, I watched this film (with English subtitles, Korean not being my mother tongue), I was completely blown away by this piece of cinematic excellence. There is not a single thing about this film that I can think of in a negative connotation. I wouldn\'t want to give away anything about this masterpiece. All I would like to say is that this is a film not to be missed. If I want any of my movies to be globally renowned one day, I hope it resembles "memories of murder" in any form whatsoever.\n\nThis film simply belongs in the top 10 of the greatest movies ever made. 10/10.', u'0.108019', u"\nThis film is based on the true series homicide happened in the country of Korea from 1986 to 1990.\n\nSalinui chueok is similar to Seven but focuses more on the back ground of Korea at that time and explains why the police couldn't catch the murder.  The murder is very careful and cruel.  The cops are dying to catch the murder but the military government uses the police force to cease the protest.  The cops, also uses violence to the suspects to get the false confession rather than using a scientific\n\ninvestigation.\n\nAfter the film, I felt sympathy for the victims and was furious at the murder who hasn't got caught, yet.  This is the director's intention to make the audience look back the sad past of Korea.\n\nExcellent directing, acting, cinematography.  The best Korea film lately.\n", u'-0.420257', u"\nIf you want to know why koreans (especially south koreans) are really into the movie you gotta know the history of 80's korea. during 80's south korea had been ruled by military government. Do you remember the siren which sounded when the killing is happen? that siren was controlled by military government. after the siren, nobody is allowed walking outside. they might think it could suppress commiees or anti-Gov gruop action.  AS you've seen the siren had become the perfect chance for murder.\n", u'-0.422589', u'Since a synopsis would be redundant here, I\'ll confine myself to praise alone.\n\nEach positive comment that precedes this is accurate. I watched this movie yesterday. I couldn\'t take my eyes off it. Everything taking place on screen was riveting, from the simple act of walking down a dark lonely road in the rain, to a wild chase by three desperate detectives. This movie held me in thrall.\n\nAs a new viewer of Asian movies, I try to analyze the reason I tend not to be interested in western works any longer. I finally came to the conclusion that it has to do with the accessibility of the players. They seem to be people first, actors by choice, and stars, by the public making them so.\n\nIn Memories of Murder, I saw this human factor almost too painfully. By the end of the story, I was in tears. Even now, the mood prevails. It\'s been so long since these crimes took place, and I don\'t know absolutely that they remain unsolved, but I think it\'s the case, and I think about that, and how frustrating it still must be to those who worked on the case.\n\nThe actors have become the people in my mind, and the horrible sense of defeat that becomes palpable eventually, is heartbreaking. When one relates to the inroads made on the health; mental and physical; of the detectives, who are ultimately portrayed as tireless and completely dedicated to the case, you realize that you\'ve watched something that is historic. You have seen the probable truth.\n\nThe way this movie draws you into it, so that you are walking through dangerous rain, with a warning shout in your throat, points to the brilliance of the director and the players.\n\nIt is difficult to say, "I love this movie", just as it is hard to say, I love Silence of the Lambs, because love is a peculiar word to use for such fare.\n\nBut yes, I love it for the fact that during it, I was in a small village in South Korea in a terrible era of sirens blaring, military dictatorship, and the hopeless pursuit of a serial killer. I landed back here in this time and place with a thud, only after turning off the DVD player, and going to the kitchen for a glass of water. While I was caught there mentally---I felt the desperation, and I felt the defeat and the sorrow of the detectives, who were essentially decent enough human beings when all was said and done.\n\nThere are not many movies that can time-travel you into their present. This will do it.\n\nI most seriously recommend that you view the interviews with the director and the stars (all of them are stars of a special kind in my mind) in order to dispel some of the hold the story will have on you.\n\nThese are incredibly interesting people, and it\'s a sheer joy to see them smiling and peaceful. They\'re intelligent, educated and articulate. The younger members of the cast, the less seasoned, are so beautiful in their desire to do it right.\n\nThey definitely did it right. They were wonderful, and they thanked the interviewer. How lovely that was to see.\n\nI watched the movie using the English subtitles rather than the English dubbing because I wanted the authenticity. The subtitles were very good.', u'0.129599', u"\nMemories Of Murder is based on a true story of a south-Korean little village in which someone begins to murder young women. The Police can't catch the killer so an agent comes from Seoul to give a hand in the investigation. Soon he'll find that local police's methods are rather brutal, and that they're most interested on finding a scapegoat, someone to blame in order to ease the in tranquility of the population, than on catching the real killer (according to the real facts, they never catched the author of those crimes).\n\nThe script is solid as a rock, and it's been filmed in a realistic style. trying to show the facts as they happened. Maybe they should've made a shorter movie, and cut some sequences out (the scenes of the interrogations to the three different suspects are a little bit reiterative), and the ending seems a little forced to me. Anyway, Memories Of Murder is much more effective and serious than the most of nowadays' Hollywood detective films.\n\nMy rate: 7.5/10\n", u'-0.141232', u'"Memories of Murder (Salinui chueok)" is an involving, cross-cultural take on the "L.A. Confidential" noir genre of a murder mystery with a political filter, layered with elements that gritty British TV detectives have mastered, from "Prime Suspect" on.\n\nWhile co-writer/director Joon-ho Bong uses the conventions of the contrasting buddy cop movie, sometimes simplistically for comic effect, he has more social commentary on his mind than a captivating investigation into a serial killer and avoids the usual titillating gore fest.\n\nSet specifically in 1986, the film visually captures the changes in industrializing, modernizing and politically restive South Korea, where new, dark, noisy factories were sprouting up in the middle of agricultural areas. From the opening shot that could be out of "Witness," we see a peasant bring what looks like a city sophisticated cop to a crime scene.\n\nBut that\'s just the start of the conflicting comparisons. We\'ve seen enough "CSI"s to sympathize with him immediately as he hopelessly tries to secure the crime scene for clues despite a Keystone Cops-incompetent forensics and investigative team who keep sliding into the irrigation ditch. But he starts to seem a bit of a buffoon to us as he gives more credence to gossipy tips from his girlfriend than clues from the scene and he manufactures "evidence." \n\nOur sympathies are curdled even more as we see him conduct an old-fashioned coercive interrogation of a developmentally disabled suspect -- and he\'s the good cop. Even without knowing anything about Korean law, it certainly looks like they are compromising the investigation, as his thug partner, who is nowhere as complex as Russell Crowe\'s Bud White, gets as out of control as a cartoonish "Lethal Weapon" cop, and that cop never grows and develops in the story beyond being a brutality enforcer so becomes a pathetic comic figure. Their complicit boss just seems ineffectual as he\'s clearly over his head with this kind of murder investigation.\n\nBut through the background TV broadcasts of demonstrations and civil defense alerts and drills, we gather that their interrogation procedures were more developed through oppressing political dissidents and forcing confessions than professional criminal detective work. Ironically, they ultimately can\'t get the resources they need in this difficult case because of these politically-drummed up time-consumers, especially for manpower and sophisticated forensic tools that they have to beg from the FBI.\n\nThe film changes tone and settles down into an intellectual thriller as a classic big city detective is sent from Seoul, and we have some of the interchanges we\'ve seen in "In the Heat of the Night" and in "Insomnia," as the first cop now seems even more of a simpleton in his standard operating procedures of relying on his knowledge of the locals and instincts about human nature (though even a fellow officer teases him about whether he can tell apart a rapist and victim\'s brother), while the city guy is looking and listening for clues and real evidence, like a Korean "Dalziel and Pascoe." But the tension is ramped up as the killer keeps killing \x96 and the film starts showing us the murders as they are about to happen just as the cops are getting hints about his modus operandi and even after the police are on alert. Their frustration at not being able to stop him is grippingly conveyed by the lead actors, as each starts to abandon their usual procedures out of mounting frustration, and by the editing.\n\nA droll side bar is that the macho team is given a key clue by a policewoman who they otherwise relegate to getting them refreshments. Their macho attitudes also keep them from learning vital clues from the marginalized men they pick up as suspects.\n\nThe coda in contemporary Korea is effective, reinforcing a sense of societal complicity is letting such murders happen and go on, though I was curious what happened to the city cop as well as the local guy. I had no idea until I read the IMDb message board that this was a based on a real case, so I appreciate even more that a cheap ending wasn\'t tacked on.\n\nThe cinematography and editing are terrific throughout, with many of the scenes in the dark and rain. Particularly dramatic are harrowing scenes along railroad tracks and a tunnel that are reminiscent of stark imagery from Mervyn LeRoy\'s "I Am a Fugitive from a Chain Gang." \n\nIt is frustrating for English subtitle readers that not more of the Korean on the screen, such as newspaper headlines or heard, such as the TV broadcasts and pop tunes, isn\'t translated.', u'-0.305929', u"Having seen a lot of good films this year, I picked this up after watching Thirst and wanting to see more of Song Kang Ho, remembering him being great in the Host. However, I was blown away by the fact that I never found this film earlier and while Song is excellent in it, the film and nearly everything about it is flawless in execution. The story about a detective in a small countryside town who finds a serial killer yet it's the incompetencies of the police force in general and human error which leads more and more murders. As the murders continue they find themselves powerless to use whatever clues they have to find the murderer. I'll leave it at that in terms of plot as it the film beautifully pulls you in until it's frustratingly simple conclusion. The cinematography is outstanding with a haunting score worthy of the film's amazing direction. I simply cannot find the words to describe how great this film is. I rarely watch films twice and never watched a film again without getting bored. On repeated viewings, you begin to appreciate the little scenes the director has put in and i didn't pick up one of the running gags until the third time though, they add little to the plot but are enjoyable and fascinating as the director chooses to move at his own pace. While not perfect, the quality of the film brings the smallest niggles to light and while there are only a few, this film does not get the recognition it deserves in the west, yet at the same time, it's like a little secret that is appreciated by those who are lucky enough to find it. As with any murder and mystery, you'll be looking for clues, even on multiple viewings but at best you'll be grasping at straws and jumping to conclusions until the frustratingly simple ending", u'0.338354'], u'tt0107048': [u"\nTaken as a light comedy, this movie would rate perhaps eight stars out of ten. But it's much, much more than just a light comedy. It is, in fact, utterly unique. The character of Phil Connors, played by Bill Murray, is, quite literally, a man without a future.\n\nWhat do we gain from watching this movie? Different people will take away different things from it. I discovered two very important truths in Groundhog Day.\n\nOne was the importance of concentrating on the things that last. Phil Connors must live the same day over and over again, and is forced to realize that the only real change that will ever be possible must happen within himself. (From this it is a short leap to the realization that this is the only kind of change that really matters; for in his case, it is literally true.) It is at this point that he takes up piano, begins reading, learns to ice-sculpt. But if it weren't for his unique predicament, he never would have realized this; in his routine at the TV studio back in Pittsburgh, we surmise, there was always something changing...and not changing. (It is interesting that Phil is a weatherman:  the weather is a perfect metaphor for something that changes constantly...without, in the long term, changing at all.) We can be distracted by the superficial changes in the world around us, and forget that real change in our lives must come from within. This was the great gift of Groundhog Day for Phil Connors:  the chance to discover this truth for himself.\n\nThe other thing I noticed, while reflecting on this movie, is how uncertainty can keep us from charitable acts. We use our ignorance like a crutch:  we don't give to charity because it may be a scam, we don't offer to help someone because they may not need help anyway, and so on. But Phil doesn't have the luxury of ignorance. He knows...he knows with absolute certainty that if he doesn't buy the old man a bowl of soup, that man will die in the streets within a few hours. He knows that if he isn't on hand at the right time, a boy will fall from a tree and break his neck. Faced with such knowledge, even Phil, self-absorbed as he is, cannot stand by idly. Nor could we, in his position. This is a powerful argument for knowledge as the most reliable foundation for generous behavior. What other movie can offer an insight half so profound?\n\nMany more truths can be mined from this movie. As others have said, this is a thought experiment that went very well indeed--better than anything I've ever seen on the Big Screen. As such, I'd vote for it as one of the greatest movies ever made, and very likely the most underrated movie ever made.\n", u'0.0457006', u'Even the funniest movies eventually stop making me laugh after I\'ve watched them enough times that the humor no longer surprises me. A joke never has the same effect when you know the punch line in advance. But every once in a blue moon, a comedy comes along that is so thoughtful and meaningful in addition to being funny that after seeing it a dozen times and laughing less often, I start noticing its depth and insight. For me, no movie has so perfectly united hilarity with profundity as "Groundhog Day," which happens to be my favorite movie of all time.\n\nSuperficially, this film belongs roughly in the same genre as "All of Me" and "Liar Liar," comedies in which a character becomes the victim of some weird supernatural fate and must adapt to the insane logic of the situation. But Steve Martin and Jim Carrey are geniuses of physical comedy, whereas Bill Murray specializes in understatement. I can\'t imagine any other approach having worked for this film, where the world is going crazy around Phil the weatherman, Murray\'s hard-edged character who keeps his emotions bottled up. What makes the initial scenes in which he first discovers his fate so hilarious is the mounting panic in his demeanor even as he tries to act like everything\'s normal. All he can think of to say is, "I may be having a problem." Uh, no kidding. Throughout the rest of the film, he\'ll deliver similarly muted lines to describe his situation, like "My years are not advancing as fast as you might think." It\'s striking that a man who has all the time in the world would choose his words so carefully, but it reflects a well-conceived screenplay.\n\nIn this comedy, the laughs are reinforced by repetition. The absurdity of Phil discovering that he\'s repeating the same day is funny enough, but every time that alarm clock goes off, and the radio starts playing, "I Got You Babe," and Phil goes through the same motions and meets the same people and then goes out into the street to be accosted by the same annoying high school buddy ("Phiiiil?"), I laugh again because I\'m reminded how funny it was the first time around. People who didn\'t like this film (I\'ve met one or two) emphasize how annoying it is that everything gets repeated. I sort of understand that complaint, since jokes repeated over and over usually fail miserably. "Groundhog Day," however, works uniquely well because the situation gets increasingly absurd and Phil gets increasingly desperate with each day that fails to pass.\n\nThe film would have fizzled out quickly had it spent the entire hour-and-a-half showing Phil meeting the same people and doing the same things time and again. The fact that "Groundhog Day" avoids this fate is one of its more striking qualities, since most high-concept comedies of this sort fall apart in the third act. "Groundhog Day" is a rare example of one that completely follows through with its premise, leading from the initial situation logically to the ending. Only the Jeopardy scene feels like a skit that could have appeared anywhere. But this scene actually is placed wisely: it occurs when Phil is becoming increasingly bored and lethargic, and it is used to separate two hilarious scenes where he gives nutty television reports.\n\nIt is in the middle, centering on Phil\'s attempts to seduce Rita, when the film reveals itself to be more than just a comedy. The underlying implication of these scenes is that Phil\'s powers are less important than he thinks they are. He probably could have done the same things (such as his exploits with Nancy) under ordinary circumstances, without the hocus pocus. In the end, his powers don\'t matter, because Rita is too smart and sees right through him. She may not understand the full supernatural implications of what he\'s doing, but she senses that he\'s somehow manipulating the situation. Phil may think he\'s a god, but he isn\'t all-powerful.\n\nPhil\'s character development is convincing largely because we can so easily believe the situation would force him to look inward. Because he loves such a sincere woman as Rita, the only way he can finally impress her is by genuinely changing himself rather than faking it. The change he undergoes isn\'t an implausible leap, for he maintains many of the same basic character traits he had at the beginning, even though he becomes kinder and more caring. Earlier, Rita says that egocentrism is Phil\'s "defining characteristic," and, indeed, he doesn\'t stop being egocentric at the end; he merely learns to channel the egocentrism in a positive direction.\n\nI have trouble imagining any other actor having pulled this off. Murray is not the only comic actor to have proved himself capable of dramatic depth, but he\'s one of the few who can so seamlessly combine his humorous and serious side into the same character. And he\'s a master at conveying complex emotions through an apparent deadpan. When his delivery sounds stilted in this film, the effect is intentional, for he\'s playing a man whose life has become a script.\n\nThough this film has a serious message, it is still quintessentially a comedy. But it\'s a comedy that uses psychological exploration of a fascinating character to make its point. After the laughter has worn down, "Groundhog Day" turns out to be one of the richest and deepest films I\'ve ever seen.', u'0.0268151', u'I thought the film was terrific when I saw it in theaters twelve years ago. Recently in watching it again on cable, I was amazed at the quality of the screenplay. I didn\'t notice the first time. But on repeated viewings (like reliving Groundhog Day), I was impressed at the story created by the writers. This film is so much more than witty jokes and comic riffs arranged around a gimmick. It has an internal logic and consistency that is very rarely found in screenplays. No joke seemed disposable, and as you laugh your way along, the philosophy underlying the film takes over your imagination.\n\nCheck the IMDb listings for this film\'s awards: look at the numerous British awards for writing. And yet this film was not even nominated for an Oscar. It is so rare that a film\'s jokes seem just as fresh more than a decade later, but I believe that is because the theme underlying the humor will never go out of fashion.\n\nThe acting was terrific, and I now think this is Bill Murray\'s best work (though I didn\'t take it seriously when I first saw the film.) But the screenplay is the one of the finest ever written. I don\'t know if it\'s studied in film schools, but it ought to be.\n\n* * * * *\n\nON HAROLD RAMIS\' DEATH: Ramis told The Associated Press in a 2009 story about the 50th anniversary of Second City. "When you hit it right, those things last."\n\nI found that quote in a story on Ramis\' death. The story curiously did not mention "Groundhog Day." If there is any film to serve as a fitting memorial for Harold Ramis, it must be "Groundhog Day." A totally perfect script, perfectly executed. He hit it right, and when will he get the recognition he deserved decades ago?', u'0.143532', u'In Harold Ramis\'s "Groundhog Day" (1993), an intriguing comedy about repeating the past, Bill Murray is Phil Connors, an arrogantly self-centered and cynical TV weatherman, sent for the fifth time to the small town of Punxsutawney, PA to cover the Groundhog ceremony held every February 2nd. He stumbles into a time warp and winds up repeating the same day over and over again until forced to look at himself from the distance and to examine his attitude. \n\nI love this movie \x96 not only it is one of the best, most original, clever and funniest comedies I\'ve seen, it also makes you think of the serious questions. For instance, when Gods want to punish a mean, arrogant SOB, they would not take his sanity away \x96 they will make the whole world around him mad and let him deal with the situation. Or another question, what would you do if you have eternity on your hands? Is it a curse or blessing? \n\nGroundhog Day does not reuse tired and stupid jokes; its humor comes from the situations and characters. Bill Murray was born to play Phil Connors and movie uses his talent as a comedian to the fullest. I think it was the best role Murray ever played. His character has gone through transformation before our eyes, and it was very convincing. \n\n9.5/10', u'-0.370854', u"Two clues to tell if a movie is great is how often it is copied and how it has become a part of American slang. Groundhog Day has had both happen to it. Warning: POSSIBLE SPOILERS. Bill Murray played Phil Connors, a egocentric and grumpy weatherman in Pennsylvania who goes to Punxsutawny, Pa every year to see if the groundhog sees his shadow for the local television station with his producer, played by the wonderful Andie MacDowell, and his cameraman, played by a low keyed Chris Elliot.\n\nEverything goes as Phil expects on the first day, except he is caught in a blizzard and has to stay the night. The next morning he awakes and it's Groundhog Day again! This pattern happens over and over again until he realizes he cannot escape Groundhog Day. In time Phil realizes the advantages of knowing what's going to happen before it happens and Murray takes full comic advantage of it. \n\nHowever if this film was just that, it would be just a normal run of the mill comedy. Murray's character Phil learns and grows and becomes a better person during the course of the film and learns to love the town in which he felt he was trapped in. The chemistry with MacDowell's character of Rita is wonderful. It's a great film and to my mind the best comedy, no perhaps the best movie I have ever seen.", u'0.052511', u'Often you hear the adage, "It is just a film". Well, for most times it is true. But on rarest of rare occasions, it isn\'t. This was one of them. Like a great piece literature, painting, poetry, speech it has the capacity to change the way you feel and think. It is the biggest compliment I can pay to a film. I rank Groundhog Day with Seventh Seal, Wild Strawberries, Waking Life, Synecdoche New York, Tokyo Story, Ikiru as one of the moves that has the capacity to change.\n\nIt is anything but a preachy film as the "intro" to the review might suggest. In fact it an extremely entertaining and funny film with one of the best performances ever by Bill Murray. The plot revolves around a weather man (Bill Murray) is reluctantly sent to cover a story about a weather forecasting "rat" (as he calls it). This is his fourth year on the story, and he makes no effort to hide his frustration. On awaking the \'following\' day he discovers that it\'s Groundhog Day again, and again, and again. First he uses this to his advantage, then comes the realization that he is doomed to spend the rest of eternity in the same place, seeing the same people do the same thing every day.\n\nThe challenge here for the makers was in terms of screenplay, editing and performances. Bear in mind that, the "loops" Bill Murray\'s character goes through, might become redundant for the audience after a while. This is where the genius of Harold Ramis and Bill Murray comes into play, who seem to introduce a "novelty" factor with every shot of the same sequence. I couldn\'t think of any actor other than Murray who could have pulled this one off.\n\nIt is a movie likely to deceive you in its effortless narrative and casual comic tone. Yes, it is funny, but make no mistake about it, it is a film with a strong philosophical undertone. This is a quality that separates Groundhog from rest of the movies with similar intent. It tells you what it intends to on your terms. It deals with the questions that bother us for a better part of our lives i.e. meaning of life, purpose of life, existentialism, death, god but never preaches, nor propels any propaganda. But by the end of it, you know that something has changed, something you didn\'t see coming has happened. And then you watch it again only to realize the moment of Epiphany that eluded you the first time.\n\nEvery time I am down or losing perspective this is the movie that eases everything and makes me ask a simple question, "What is important?". One of the absolute great films of the 90s, but more than just a film for me.', u'0.148231', u"\nBill Murray can be a very funny guy, especially when given roles where his character has a deliciously cruel edge. He has one of those faces, and a voice to go with it, which can make nastiness and sarcasm funny. Groundhog Day is a highly enjoyable vehicle for Murray's talents. It also has a very clever concept, neatly brought to the screen by actor-turned-director Harold Ramis (who starred alongside Murray in the Ghostbusters films).\n\nPittsburgh weather-man Phil Connors (Bill Murray) is sent on assignment to Punxatawney, where on Groundhog Day each year the locals have a tradition of consulting the groundhog to find out if spring is imminent or if they should prepare for 6 more weeks of winter. Phil despises the job and the town, and can't wait to get it over with.... even though he has a soft spot for Rita (Andie MacDowell), the producer overseeing his broadcast. Phil's dislike of Punxatawney, its people and its traditions is set to get a hell of a lot worse though.... as when he awakens the next morning he finds himself reliving the same day. And so it goes - every time Phil gets up, it's still February 2nd and he seems destined to be stuck in the same day for the rest of eternity.\n\nIt seems early on in the proceedings that the film might run out of steam and inspiration. After all, how can a film about a day which repeats itself be anything but repetitive? Thankfully, Groundhog Day is full of ingenious ideas, and it successfully throws up new developments and delightful twists at every opportunity. The film is laced with memorable dialogue, and Murray gets to play one of the defining roles of his career as a facetious, sharp-tongued misanthrope who ultimately learns the error of his ways. Groundhog Day is a very good film indeed, and restores one's faith in the imagination still lurking beneath the dismayingly shallow surface of Hollywood.\n", u'0.108228', u"* May contain spoilers *\n\nLet's face it: everyone's a sucker for romantic comedies, but this one is something special. This movie has as much charm as it has bite, thanks to a fantastic script and Murray's excellent performance. Never dull or cheesy, this wonderful fantasy tale just hits all the right notes, and if anyone knows a better rom-com, please name it. I mean: what other romantic comedies are there where the protagonist commits suicide and you just have to laugh?\n\nI've watched 'Groundhog Day' countless times and, without a doubt, I will watch it again and again (or for as long as I keep waking up to that nerve-wrecking song by Sonny & Cher). Priceless. My vote: 10 out of 10.\n\nFavorite films: http://www.IMDb.com/list/mkjOKvqlSBs/\n\nLesser-known Masterpieces: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls070242495/\n\nFavorite Low-Budget and B-Movies: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls054808375/\n\nFavorite TV-Shows reviewed: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls075552387/", u'0.613634', u'Bill Murray plays Phil Connors, a weatherman for a local news station. Every year he goes to Puxatawney, Pennsylvania for the Puxatawney Phil event: commonly recognized as Groundhog Day. You know how it goes. The groundhog comes out. If it sees its shadow, it\'s six more weeks of winter. If it doesn\'t, it\'s spring.\n\nWell, the only problem about going to this event every year for Phil is that he hates it. He hates the cheery people. The little town. The weather. The event. The story. Everything. He hates it. He is a lonely, desolate, forsaken soul. With a great cynical side.\n\nAndie McDowell plays a new manager--err, womanager :)--who goes with Phil to the event, along with Chris Elliot, the cameraman. Phil reports, they tape it, it\'s a done deal. The end. Phil goes back home. Only one problem. Due to severe weather, the roads have all been closed, leaving only one option: Stay in Puxatawney until the storm blows over. So, Phil heads back to his cheery hotel, and tucks in for a dreaded nap. But when he wakes the next morning, something odd happens. The day is the exact same day as before. It is Groundhog Day. Again. Phil panics as he finds everything exactly the same as it was the day before. He knows everything that is going to happen. He shrugs it off as a weird case of deja-vu and heads back to sleep. But when he wakes up, alas! The day is...yesterday. Again. Technically.\n\nSo Phil comes to terms with the fact that there is now way out of this small little town. He tries everything. He steps in front of a moving car. He electrocutes himself. He jumps off a building. All to no avail. Oh, he dies, all right. But the next day he\'s back and it\'s Groundhog Day again.\n\nPart of what makes "Groundhog Day" so excellent is the story. The characters and actors alone are great enough to recommend this movie, but the truth is, I cannot think of a better story to throw someone like Bill Murray into. He uses his smart-alecky ways to a new extreme. His character is a bit like Scrooge from the tale "A Christmas Story," which is ironic, because Murray was in a parody on Scrooge\'s tale called "Scrooged." Anyway. Bill Murray is perfect as the irreverent and cynical Phil. Everything he does he carries out with a dumb, "I\'m-smarter-than-you" face. He thinks himself better than everyone else. He thinks he is smart by skipping the big Holiday ordeal. It is all so stupid to him. But, as this story teaches us, having an attitude like that can get you in big trouble.\n\nHarold Ramis, director of "Analyze This," star of "Stripes," directed "Groundhog Day." Bill and he are old pals, and it sure shows. I bet they had a great time making this movie. But what is good about it is that while making a fun movie they didn\'t forget to come up with an interesting and audience-catching tale.\n\nAnother thing that is great about "Groundhog Day" is that Phil Connors does what we would do. For example: When he finds out he has this ability to repeat the same day over and over, he does things the average person would do. The human weakness. Too many comedies with the same formula don\'t try to exploit this human weakness, but "Groundhog Day" does. We see Phil memorize the steps to successfully robbing an armored truck filled with cash. But the reason he can go to bed with a clear conscience is because he knows the next day that everything will be back to normal again. He will never have robbed the truck, never have bought a Ferarri, etc. Phil does what WE would do, and that is one importance aspect of "Groundhog Day." I would never rob an armored truck, but if I was stuck living the same day over and over, it would do no harm to take the cash - it would be back in the truck in the morning! So, I might do that. (although my conscience would still get in the way.) There was a little comedy with John Candy named "Delirious." It was about a soap opera writer getting trapped in his own world. And everything he writes on his typewriter comes true. While the movie was good, and pretty interesting, there were so many things Candy could have done with the ability to create and control any - and every- thing, and he didn\'t do them. I think that\'s where "Groundhog Day" steps in, filling in the blanks. There\'s nothing I love more than watching a comedy where the main character divulges into the human nature - in other words, I love watching the character do something the average human would do when given the power(s). And that\'s exactly what Phil does in "Groundhog Day." And that is why, among other things, it is one of my favorites.\n\n5/5 stars', u'-0.143518', u"Not counting Caddy shack, this is Bill Murray's best performance. While Christmas and Halloween have their annual holiday movies, who would have thought that Groundhog Day would have a movie of its own.\n\nA terrific (family) movie, Bill Murray stars as a sullen / sarcastic news reporter who is stuck living the same day over and over again....until he gets it right. This comedy stands alone as one of the funniest and most original movies of the 90's. Not many comedies can be funny and also end with a moral. Groundhog Day has both. Before the Farrelly Brothers or Wes Anderson found an audience, there was Groundhog Day. Pennsylvania never looked better or funnier.", u'0.207583', u"\n It's kind of hard to pinpoint what makes 'Groundhog Day' work just right- many movies have great premises, some even a bit more ambitious than this one (though not as heartfelt, maybe) but fail. I think that 'ratedness' may play a bigger role than people imagine. For example, this movie came out a bit before my time, and because of that I missed the trailers and stuff for when the film came out. Even so, people that were around when 'Groundhog' came out in the theatres, might've also thought it was underrated, as the title 'Groundog Day' doesn't necessarily *try* to draw in huge crowds.\n\nOK...all my above rambling means one thing: I loved 'Groundhog Day', but I'm embarrassed I didn't watch it sooner. Having the typical Generation X-er mentality I assumed this film would have outdated humour- but let me assure you (and seeing Rushmore confirmed this for me) -Bill Murray and his humour will NEVER go out of style; he is fabulous. He takes just the right amount of self-deprication (not too much) and combines it with cynicism....well I don't want to try to *define* his humour- the easiest way would be to watch him in action! Also, the writing for this film is absolutely perfect.\n\nGo see for yourselves...  and hope that ONE DAY the groundhog will actually NOT see his shadow......lol\n\n\n", u'-0.136461', u'\nThis one is a winner in almost all respects, a kind of comic Twilight Zone episode that never quits.  Murray has had roles in which he does nothing funny but seems to stand around waiting for laughs anyway, wearing a goofy expectant smile, as in "Stripes."  But not here.  This is probably his best role.  He may still have the goofy expression but this time the laughs arrive on time.\n\nThe movie excells at three levels.\n\nOne is the overall conception, the comic theme itself.  Murray, a sarcastic and sadistic weatherman finds himself stuck in a small dreary town in Pennsylvania with two colleagues, one of them Andie MacDowell, his producer. They cover the local Groundhog Day celebration then find themselves unable to leave because of a blizzard.  The next morning Murray wakes up to find that it\'s the same Groundhog Day all over again.  And the next morning too. And so on ad almost infinitum.  So far so good.  A nice concept but it could go either way, depending on how it\'s handled.  In fact, it\'s handled very well.  What could have been a one-gag movie that ran out of steam after the first quarter hour turns instead into a neatly logical progression of plot and character development.  Murray of course is the centerpiece of the tale and it is his changes that occupy our attention; the other roles, although well done, are mostly there to provide reflections on Murray\'s moral evolution.  (Andie MacDowell, wardrobed in slacks, white blouse and checked vest, and done up with long fluffy curly black hair, looks radiantly appealing.)\n\nMurray\'s reaction discovering that he is now living Day Two is one of a terrible anxiety.  He manages to get this across effectively, even though it is tinged with his own brand of distant amusement.  On Day Three he is depressed and gets drunk.  On Day Four he realizes that tomorrow will have no consequences and tests this hypothesis by breaking all of the rules of traffic.  As the days pass, he plans to seduce MacDowell, and he implements his plan cleverly, discovering more and more about her -- her favorite drink, her favorite toast, the kind of man she is looking for.  He has so much time on his hands that he learns to play the piano expertly because MacDowell likes men who play instruments.  His scheme seems to be working but no matter how perfect his playacting he simply cannot get her into bed in one single day -- and every day he must start over with her from scratch. ("Twelve years of Catholic school speaking," she tells him.) Eventually, however, he comes to realize that he really DOES care for her because, after all, he\'s gotten to know her quite well with the passage of time, although she doesn\'t know it.  When he undergoes this epiphany he goes about doing good, no longer just acting nice but actually BEING nice, whether it advances his desire to get her in the sack or not.  Obliquely, indirectly, it works without his having intended it to.  She falls for him and they live happily ever after.  That\'s the overall conception and it\'s very well handled.\n\nLevel Two is the script, the dialogue, and this too is superior.  How many movies can throw in a handfull of quotes from Sir Walter Scott and people of that ilk -- one quote is in French -- without making a contemporary audience, used to MTV, squirm?  "And winter/ slumbering in the open ground/ wears upon his smiling face/ a dream of spring."  And it isn\'t just stuck into the script; it fits into the scene and is an appropriate comment on the plot.  But more than that, the lines are not only intelligent but sometimes very witty.  Just a few examples that come to mind.\n\nOn Day Two, I believe, Murray is sitting in a bowling alley with two local drunks, bemoaning his fate.  He once spent a beautiful day in the Carribean with a gorgeous girl.  They drank pina coladas.  They watched the sun go down and then they made love like two otters.  Why couldn\'t he be stuck in THAT day instead of this one?  "How would you feel," he asks his pals, "if you woke up every morning and it was the same awful day and nothing you ever did made the slightest difference because nothing meant anything?"  One of the drunks, glumly replies:  "That about sums it up."\n\nOn Day Three, Murray and MacDowell are sitting in the Tip Top Cafe and he has a huge tray of fattening food in front of him.  He lights a cigarette\n\nand stuffs whipped-cream pastries into his mouth.  MacDowell:  "I hate to see a man of your advanced years destroying himself."  Murray:  "Maybe they\'re not advancing as fast as you think."\n\nLast example from dialogue, somewhere down the time line, after he\'s begun worming his way into her affections:  Murray and MacDowell are walking along at night in the snow, her arm through his, and she tells him, "Thank you for a very nice day.  It\'s the kind of day that could never be planned." Murray:  "Well -- it CAN be planned but it takes a lot of work."\n\nThe third level at which the movie works is, very simply, the actual small bits of business that the actors involve themselves in.  Ramis, the director, plays the doctor who checks out X-rays of Murray\'s skull to see if there\'s any pathology.  Ramis stares at the photos and says, "No clots, no tumors, no aneurysms -- at least as far as I can see," then he turns around and squints tightly and rapidly three time in a row.  (Who thinks up something like that?)  And Murray takes a girl to a Clint Eastwood movie and does an expert impression of Eastwood, from the Man With No Name costume to the voice.  When he turns his back and speaks, it sounds exactly like Eastwood.  There are running gags about things like innocent-looking but bottomless puddles in the gutter.  I know that some of these things sound old, but they are so well realized here that we can forget their age. They seem born anew, just like Murray.\n\nThere is one danger in a story like this that the movie skirts neatly. The romance between Murray and MacDowell, had more been made of it, could easily have turned cloying.  That\'s what happens to Jack London\'s characters in "The Sea Wolf."  You\'ve got to handle this carefully, because, as we all know, comedy in itself is of no significance.  (How many comedies win academy awards?)  The movie has to be about something deeper, of course, and the sort of logic that comes to that conclusions must also come to the conclusion that the audience consists of an unwashed horde of semi-moronic dolts who must have the "seriousness" pounded into their heads with a sixteen-pound sledge hammer.  The problem is deftly avoided in "Groundhog Day."  The romance is funny more often than not.  And during the moments when it isn\'t played for laughs, it advances our understanding of the changes in Murray\'s character.  And MacDowell looks angelic enough that Murray\'s growing feelings for her are believable.  I should also mention the use of appropriate musical numbers on the track.  "The Pennsylvania Polka" is used as punctuation throughout.  Midway through the movie, we get Ray Charles\' "You Don\'t Know Me," underlining the uncertainty of the romance. By the end we have an even more romantic theme from Rachmaninoff that begins in sincerity and ends in a jolly jazzed-up version.\n\nThis is one of the best comedies of the last ten or fifteen years, including "The In Laws" and "The Freshman" and "My Cousin Vinny."  Before that, there were "Love at First Bite" and "Murder by Death."  Pure comedies, successful ones, come along rarely.', u'0.0891914', u'\nPhil Connors, a cynical and unbearable journalist goes like every year in a small town in Pennsylvania to report on "Groundhog Day", it means the beginning of the spring. But, he is out of luck because due to the bad weather, he and his crew (including the pretty Rita) he is compelled to stay at his work place for the night. The following day, he awakes and lives exactly the same day again but he is the only one to realize it. It is like this, the next days again and again! What should Phil do to stop this? Maybe an improvement of his personality would be the wisest solution.\n\nYou can easily imagine what a filmmaker like Frank Capra would have done with such a topic but Harold Ramis managed very well and he signs here his most beautiful success to date and one of the finest comedies of the nineties. The main strength of "Groundhog Day" comes from a strong and inventive screenplay which enables Bill Murray to go through all the different states which is logical because if tomorrow is the same day, anything goes for him! The script also draws its comical force from the repetition. This process gives delightful sequences, notably in the first part of the movie. You have to see Murray live the same day again, faced with the same situations and as he despises people, it can only make the spectator laugh. Moreover, Ramis described his main character by mocking at him a little.\n\nOf course, the evolution followed by Murray is a little predictable (scornful at the beginning, he will succeed in becoming nice at the end of the film and in finding love with Rita) and you easily guess the message that Ramis tries to put across. But it remains nevertheless warm and deeply humane. However that may be, the director gave us a pleasant, sometimes funny sometimes moving movie to watch. And it is one of Bill Murray\'s best performances: fair, never bombastic. What more could you ask from him?\n\n\n  ', u'0.254891', u"Groundhog Day was a Harold Ramis-Danny Green script that Ramis ingeniously shot in a freezing Woodstock, IL for a 1993 release. All the film critics at the time noted it as a cute romantic comedy with no particular accomplishment. Everyone I know who has seen it, myself included, liked it and smiled on their way out of the theater. Groundhog Day is on the American calendar, and the film is often played on that day in mid-winter where those of us in colder climates are dreaming of Spring. Today Groundhog Day is considered one of the great American Films of the late 20th Century. Danny Rubin created the concept while Harold Ramis, co-writer of Animal House and Caddyshack broke away from his previous gross-comedy productions to direct his Opus Maximus. That's how Jonah Goldberg of the National Review described it in the February 2005 issue of the Conservative magazine.\n\nI read the 2003 New Yorker piece about Ramis. He's Chicago born Jew with no religious training. He is a Hollywood director, actor, and comedy scriptwriter presently studying Buddhism with his second wife. I don't know anything about Danny Rubin other than his version of the script had Andi MacDowell also reliving Groundhog Day along with Murray's Phil, the slimy weatherman for a Pittsburgh TV station. Ramis made the necessary changes and the rest is possibly the greatest non-secular religious experience in American Cinema. The fact that Rabbi's, Ministers, and Priests are showing this film to their parishioners all over the world is a testament to the film's masterful Aristotelian philosophy of redemption and rebirth.\n\nThere are so many classic comedy bits, lines to remember, and moments of hilarity for a short review but often overlooked is the theme of rescue through learning. Adults are cursed to make the same mistakes over and over again. Every Freudian shrink has heard his patient's repetition of behavior. Every man is trapped by his wiring. Then, sometimes, maybe because of a catastrophic event, a religious insight, or an intelligent evaluation, there is an epiphany. We can't be sure how the application of intelligence, talent, or luck can establish great work, but we must appreciate it when we see it and be the Groundhog.", u'0.00889558', u'"Groundhog Day" is Bill Murray\'s serious movie. Along with Andie McDowell they make great chemistry. "Phil" is the wise-cracking weatherman who thinks he is too good for everyone else. He is in PUNXSUTAWNEY, Pa to do a newscast, and wishes he were just about anywhere else. They get snowed in, have to spend the night, and the next morning at 6AM the fun begins.\n\nIt is groundhog day again! He goes out, sees all the same people, doing and saying all the same things. To everyone else, this is the only time they have lived this particular day. But for Phil, it is the second time. In fact, every morning thereafter he awakes at 6AM to exactly the same music, the same day, it looks like it will be for eternity.\n\nJanuary 2007: Just watched it yet again, it never gets old. (pun)\n\nFeb, 2, 2009 - Groundhog Day - I just watched it again. Never gets old!!\n\nFeb 4, 2010 - Two days late. But never better, I even saw some things that escaped me the first several times. \n\nCAUTION--SPOILERS--\n\nAt first, Phil takes the "repeat" days to deal in funny, or cruel, ways with others he knows he will meet. He knows everything will be wiped clean and he can start fresh the next day. No one but he will remember what happened the prior day. After a while, he gets depressed at the thought of being sentenced to an eternity of living the same day, so he tries to kill himself. Jumping off a building, taking a bath with a toaster, driving a car off a cliff, getting into the path of a truck. He succeeds each time, however when 6AM comes the next day, he\'s back in his bed, Groundhog Day again, and his daily cycle starts again. And eventually he decides to go ahead and try to make good use of his situation.\n\nSo he takes on new hobbies. He becomes expert at ice sculpture, medicine, piano-playing, poetry, and a number of others. He comes to know all the people in town, not only their names but also intimate details of their lives. The film never hints at how many times he re-lives the same day. However, to gain all the proficiencies he did, it must have been several hundred. Perhaps even in the thousands. But that detail doesn\'t matter.\n\nAs he becomes more and more charming, he decides to try and seduce his producer, played by McDowell. Each day he gets a bit farther, only to show off as the real jerk that he is, then is slapped and snubbed. But each day, since he is the only one who remembers, he gets a bit further. However, he is destined to never get the girl, unless he really changes, and he doesn\'t realize this.\n\nIn the last 1/4 of the film, he has become a truly changed man. He helps people because it is the right thing to do. He is humble about his successes, and it is this change that ultimately attracts the woman of his dreams, and which gets him out of the seemingly endless cycle of re-playing Groundhog Day.\n\nAnd that, in a nutshell, is what the film is all about. In a unique way - the re-play of a day - it is a commentary on the need to be true and pure in our intentions to be able to get out of our rut and make any meaningful contribution to this world. I rate it "10", and is one of my favorite movies of all time.', u'-0.022494'], u'tt1201607': [u"I watched Harry Potter and the Deathly Hallows Part 1 and was very pleased with how well it stuck to the book. Because of this, I had high expectations for Part 2. I mean, if you did so well in the first half, you have to do just as well in the second half, right? Right? Wrong.\n\nThe movie started off very well, starting from exactly where it left off in Part 1 and staying faithful to the book all the way to when Harry and co break into Hogwarts. That's where it starts to go down hill.\n\n*Spoilers!* \n\nThe good: \n\n- Neville. He was perfectly perfect. I really wish they gave him more screen time because he was adorable.\n\n- The Gringott's scene. Very well done.\n\n- The emotion we are shown from Snape. Throughout the series, he's been rather monotonous and emotionless. In the pensieve, we see a different side of him and it is a refreshing change.\n\n- The battle at Hogwarts. It was intense and wonderfully done.\n\n- Helena Ravenclaw. It was very emotional and creepy. Although they did not tell us her back story with the Bloody Baron.\n\n- Rupert Grint and Dan Radcliffe shirtless. That's certainly a plus.\n\nOK you know it's bad when I resort to writing about that.\n\nThe bad: \n\n- They completely took out the scene where Harry and Luna go into the Ravenclaw Common Room, where they are ambushed by one of the Carrows. It appeared as if they would show it, as I hope they would (I've always wanted to see the other common rooms), but then they don't. Hm.\n\n- Fred's death scene. Gone. Yup. They show his body once at the end and don't even give you time to grieve before moving on to the next scene. This was an insult to his character's memory.\n\n- Crabbe's disappeared. Gets replaced by Zabini, and replaced in a different way by Goyle.\n\n- Snape's memories are rushed and they take out some of the most interesting memories. They just go through a few of them quickly. I've always enjoyed the memories, because you get to see life at Hogwarts through the eyes of someone else for a change, in a different time era.\n\n- Hermione and Ron battle Nagini, and eventually Neville slays the snake. Eventually. It takes some time getting to that scene.\n\n- There is not a single mention of Teddy Lupin. That is, until the end when Harry suddenly knows about Lupin's son. Weird, considering Harry was camping in a forest and hadn't heard of any of this.\n\n- Collin Creevey is replaced by that random Nigel kid.\n\n- The students are not sent home. No, the teachers think it's OK to just lock the Slytherins in the dungeons and let everybody else stay and fight.\n\n- Still no mention of the significance of the horcruxes. Hufflepuff's cup is just a plain old cup that Voldy turned into a horcrux.\n\n- Not enough interaction with characters other than the trio. Too much Harry. It's as if everybody else just have cameos.\n\n- Random scene where they blow up one of the bridges (ignoring the fact that there are like 2 other bridges that would take them into the school).\n\n- Voldemort's and Bellatrix's death = explosion into confetti!\n\n- Percy's on the good side all of a sudden. No explanation at all (a reoccurring theme with Yates, don't you think?).\n\n- Harry does not fix his old wand with the Elder Wand. No, instead he takes the Elder Wand and SNAPS IT IN HALF. Is that even possible? I didn't think so. So Harry breaks the wand and then chucks it into the abyss. Really Yates, really?\n\n- All of the fun and cheerful dialogue from the future scene has been resorted to everybody staring and smiling at each other. No explanation once again. They don't even say who's who! Plus there is absolutely no chemistry between Dan and Albus Severus. And it was really awkward to see them all with old make up on.\n\n- Goodbye Dumbledore's back story! \n\n- Too many attempts at one-liners and humorless jokes.\n\n*End of Spoilers* \n\nAll in all, all of the personality and charm of the series was zapped away in an attempts to make this final movie is action-packed as possible. It's a shame to see something that you've grown up with, learned to love, taken and twisted into somebody's 'vision.' I mean, why bother adding your own unimportant scenes to the movie, when there are perfectly good ones in the book that you did not bother using at all? There's no...bonding with the characters, no connection with them you felt in Part 1. I did not feel the love for this movie like I had with the book. There was just so much significance that was left out of that movie, and it is such a shame. It had such potential to be a fantastic movie, and it fell short all because of the changes that were unnecessarily made.\n\nSee the movie, and I'm sure you'll form your own opinion of it. It's not a bad movie, just disappointing and unsatisfying for a die-hard fan who's been following the books for 10 years of their life.", u'-0.161731', u"I am a huge fan of the Harry Potter books, they're all so great and magical. But I didn't think the film series were perfect at all, but they were still great movies. With that, I was extremely excited to see the end of the film franchise, and impressed with the trailers. So I had high expectations. And thankfully it did not disappoint, Harry Potter and the Deathly Hallows: Part II, blew past my already high expectations and I was enthralled!\n\nThe whole movie looked spectacular! The cinematography extremely well done, the art direction was incredible. The movie was beautiful to look at, the visuals were spectacular and truly Oscar worthy! The set designers, cinematographers really need to be awarded for their work, because it looks like they spend of time and money on the look of the film. \n\nThe cast of the film was pretty much perfect, they should all be applauded too. Emma Watson, as usual is and great and she'll have a bright career ahead of her. Rupert Grint is pretty much great also, he is a fine actor indeed. Daniel Radcliffe did an amazing job and was very memorable as Harry Potter. Although I think Ralph Fiennes was the star of the film, he did unbelievable job as the evil, crazy Lord Voldemort, I think he deserves an Oscar Nomination for his role. The rest of the cast were also great too.\n\nWe all grew up overtime with the series, we followed the adventures of Harry Potter for around 10 years, I think. It seems very weird that there will be no more Harry Potter films to look forward too. I will miss the franchise very much! However I am happy the series got an amazing ending. Harry Potter and the Deathly Hallows: Part II is not only the best film in the series, but it will probably be one of the best films of 2011. Everyone should see this film, even if they don't like past Harry Potter films.", u'0.546197', u"OVerall it was okay, and will make a bunch of money. But David Yates was not the best to direct the Potter films. His method always seems to be to just get through the movie as quick as possible. This has been true since OOTP. The problem is that such a quick pace leaves out many key scenes and doesn't allow the viewer to make more of an emotional investment in the story and the characters. Deathly Hallows 2 was no different. It was enjoyable enough, I suppose. But could have been so much better with just an additional 10 minutes of movie. A few additional scenes and extending a few of them just a little more could have added greater depth and emotion.\n\nSpoiler alert: Just some scenes that could have been added or extended: Snapes memories- a few more scenes to greater establish his closeness with Lilly and his role in fighting Voldemort. It would have helped to explain why Harry named one of his kids after a man he had hated for 7 years. And a few more lines to show his reluctance to have to be the one to kill Dumbledore. This would have shown Snapes greater respect and love for him.\n\nSlightly extend the scene leading up to Mrs. Weasley fighting Belatrix. A few more seconds to establish Jinny's peril in the fight before Mrs. Weasly stepping in and uttering her great line. IT happened so fast, you could miss that Jinny was even fighting Belatrix if you blink at the wrong time.\n\nSHould have shown the death of Fred and Percy's reuniting with the family. This wouldn't have taken very long and Fred deserved to have his death scene, rather than just being an afterthought body on a stretcher.\n\nSHould have shown a few more individual fight sequences, especially with Hagrid. I was beginning to wonder if Hagrid was even going to appear. And there was no emotion from him when he thought Harry was dead.\n\nExtend the scene of Mrs. Malfoy and Harry to better explain why she lied to Voldemort about Harry being dead.\n\nShould have shown more entities involved in the fight, like parents, Hogsmead residence, the elves as lead by Kreacher - rather than showing mainly an army of kids fighting the Death Eaters.\n\nMOre of the school's teachers in the fight.\n\nThe final confrontation between Harry and Voldemort could have been done better and stayed truer to the book.\n\nOVer all, Yates' Harry Potter movies have been rather emotionless and anti-climatic. DH2, sadly, was no different.", u'-0.287221', u"I saw this at a preview screening in London.\n\nDeathly Hallows part 2 ends this incredibly well produced saga with tremendous grace and a beautifully orchestrated climax that I am sure will satisfy both lovers of the books and films.\n\nIf you have read the books as I have you will be glad to know major key moments are intact. Much is missing but I won't dwell on that, no point, its how well this movie plays out and for me it rolls wonderfully between excitement, thrills and emotional drama towards a satisfactory (though a slightly rushed) conclusion. \n\nThere are at least 2 sequences so powerful that I defy anyone not to at least stifle a tear or choke a little. One of those sequence is an exquisitely executed flashback that is pivotal to the whole story. \n\nI have to say, that despite the woes we book readers have when elements (big chunks of it too) are omitted from the movies, much credit still has to go to Steve Kloves for adapting the books for the big screen, cleverly weaving, changing and even adding new big elements to give a kinetic flow to the narrative and here it all comes together superbly.\n\nDavid Yates assured direction has nurtured our young actors in the last 4 films to blossom into even more adept actors who convey their characters with natural tones without overacting. Daniel Radcliffe had to carry this movie more than any other and has done so brilliantly complemented with great support from his two companions, Emma Watson and Rupert Grint.\n\nPretty much all the characters we have met in all the movies have made an appearance in this finale but one actor stands out, Alan Rickman. His portrayal of Professor Snape has always been a joy to watch (if a little novel) but here his scenes will leave a dramatic engraving in my memory. Here he elevates his portrayal of one of the most complex character in young adult literature to an unforgettable piercingly emotional one.\n\nAnother actor who really shines in the few scenes that he has, is Matthew Lewis as Neville Longbottom who we see gradually transforming over the past films from the clumsy bullied boy to a brave warrior in this final film. Many other British thespians of the series also have their few moments to shine especially Maggie Smith's Professor McGonagal who was a delight to watch as she takes charge of the defence of Hogwarth School.\n\nAs for the spectacle of the battle and showdowns, while not at the scale of Lord of the Rings, I honestly cant think how it could have been done better as the film makers have intertwined heart stopping action with dramatic progressions in the narrative. Its actually more visceral and dynamic than the rather smaller scale battle of the brilliant novels (not to take anything away from Rowling's writing). \n\nDo I have any gripes? Yes I do. Although I applaud Steve Kloves for a difficult screenplay adaption...I think he could still have done better at explaining some odd anomalies that only readers of the book will understand. This might annoy you if you haven't read the books. But its a small gripe because what we get is delightful.\n\nWhat an amazing achievement to faithfully bring Rowling's epic saga to the big screen with the same cast and largely the same crew, maintaining the brilliant quality right to the end.\n\nOh my god, its only just sinking in, this was the end....but what a great great end.", u'0.397297', u"Even though I consider myself to be a huge HP fan I never thought I would actually give a movie from this series straight 10 out of 10. Just saw the movie today and the word epic is almost an understatement. This movie really lives up to the promises that have been made. Further more it is (in my opinion at least) the movie that stays most loyal to the book. I did miss some scenes from the book yet nothing relevant was left out. I don't want to give out any spoilers 'cause I don't want to ruin it for you but if you have read the book it will be very easy to follow and if not - well I think it still makes sense most of the time. I highly recommend you to watch it whether you're a fan or not. 10/10", u'0.209784', u"Overall, it may be said that the movie was good. The direction, cinematography & the special effects were brilliantly executed. The acting was good too. The children have grown so much.\n\nBut, this isn't the way The Harry Potter saga was meant to end. A movie which is supposed to mark the End of an Era could have been much better. With the expectations I had, I was a little disappointed. It DID NOT have the depth and the emotional impact WASN'T nearly as good as the book. \n\nI was pleased with Part 1 because it stuck very well to the book. That's what I was expecting with this too. But no... they had to spoil it. What's the use of making the movie in two parts if they can't do justice to the book? They should have made it a Trilogy (as all great movies are made, like 'The Godfather Trilogy', 'The LOTR Trilogy', original 'Star Wars Trilogy', The Bourne Trilogy', etc.) or they should have increased the length of the 2 parts. Who forced them to fit the whole thing within 2hrs.15mins. each. ??(Every part of LOTR is over 3&1/2 hrs. long. No one had an issue with it). . *\n\n** SPOILERS **\n\nTHE GOOD :\n\n- Snape's and Voldemort's characters were played quite well.\n\n- Throughout the series, Snape has been rather emotionless and monotonous. But, in the pensieve, we see a refreshingly new emotional side of him.\n\n- Gringott's scene was nicely shown.\n\n- They added the scene where Hermione & Ron destroy Hufflepuff's cup.\n\n- They show the future (19 years later) scene. I thought it would be cut.\n\nTHE BAD : (I have to mention these because I was disappointed as hell)\n\n- My Biggest Disappointment - Snape's Memories. They showed the whole thing within a minute. They're some of the most interesting & touching scenes of the story. They just rushed through it, even excluding many of the memories. \n\n- Fred's death. They don't even show it. Then later it was ridiculous to see Mrs. Weasley angry at Bellatrix when the latter was fighting Ginny.\n\n- The battle was too short and didn't the magnitude and impact as in the book, with Centaurs, Goblins/Kreecher, Hagrid/Spiders, Ghosts, etc.\n\n- They don't show the Common Rooms. I always imagined it while reading the books. But I badly wanted to see them in the movie.\n\n- They don't show Harry using the Cruciatus Curse on the one of the Carrows.\n\n- They wasted time in Nagini's chase.\n\n- They don't mention about Teddy Lupin and that Harry was his Godfather. They don't mention the names of Harry's other two kids.\n\n- No mention about the significance of the horcruxes.\n\n- No mention of Bloody Baron and his link with Ravenclaw's diadem.\n\n- No mention about how the Invisibility Cloak came into the possession of the Potters, how Harry and Voldemort are related through the Peverell brothers.\n\n- They don't show how Dumbledore communicated with Snape after he died.\n\n- Harry doesn't even mend is wand. He directly snaps the Elder Wand into two pieces...\n\n- In the future scene, all the funny and cheerful dialogues are excluded. Everyone's just smiling and staring at each other. And moreover, none of the them seemed in their late thirties. Didn't the film-makers have enough money to hire good make-up artists.\n\nTHE UGLY :\n\n- Dumbledore's Story. He's my most favourite character in the book. There's nothing about him in the movie. They just say he had secrets (what secrets??). They don't even tell the story of Dumbledore sister, Ariana. They don't show him getting emotional at King's Cross.\n\n- The use of ridiculous one-liners and humourless jokes when the situation is so intense and sad.\n\n- Harry & Voldemort had their final fight in the middle of nowhere. No one was even around to watch it. (In the book, they were in the middle of the whole crowd.)\n\n- Bellatrix and Voldemort die bursting into confetti!\n\nALL IN ALL, it wasn't the send-off the series deserved. Someone who has grown up reading the books and watching the movies in the series will understand my woes...", u'-0.287149', u'I don\'t know what I was expecting... To be honest apart from the first HP movie... every single one of the following movies has left out major plot points, characters and story lines. I guess I figured that was mainly because the movies only have a certain length of time to tell the story. Thus it was natural for me to assume that with 5+ hours they would be able to include everything in the one book... I assumed wrongly.\n\nFirst off - Do not see this in 3D... The 3D is an after thought and literally added nothing to the experience. The only scene that was 3D that stands out in memory was the death of Voldemort and his confetti explosion.\n\nWhat did they get right? Well its hard to say really.. I was really disappointed with the pacing for the first half of the 2nd part. It felt slow and weird and anti-climatic the entire way. The bank scene and special effects seems average and low budget for a franchise with such high profits. The acting from everyone doesn\'t quite do the job. Snapes "redemption" scene was acted out really poorly by Alan Rickman.. which is a shame because I was really looking forward to it as it\'s one of the more moving parts in the series. The only scene that felt like it mirrored the book accurately was the Kings Cross section (apart from Harry having clothes on...) My main gripe with the movie is that they left out so much considering they had two movies to cover it. Harry telling Neville to kill the snake and thus Neville having and important role in the ending of the war <- This part was the ONE part I was looking forward to when Neville pulls the sword out of the hat and cuts Nagini in two... Yet they changed it to Hermione and Ron battling the snake and Neville coming in as an afterthought... The entire war at the end was missing - Centaurs, Goblins/Kreecher, Hagrid/Aragog and just felt very anti-climatic and also have very poor CGI. The entire point of the Deathly Hallows is missed out with Harry not claiming ownership of the wand and reflecting Voldemorts death spell back onto him, and is replaced with a VERY tame action scene that went for about 10 minutes (its then mentioned as an afterthought by Harry post battle). The scene when Harry confronts Snape was also bizarre and seemed unnecessary... Overall the changes and missing scenes left me feeling very empty.\n\nMy girlfriend hasn\'t read the books and she enjoyed it.. So I\'m sitting here wondering if the knowledge of the books hampered my enjoyment of it. I have no doubt this film will be hailed a success and will make bazillon dollars, but I can\'t help but feel that another director/team could\'ve handled this a lot truer to the books.', u'-0.452193', u'An incredible journey that began a decade ago finally arrives at its close with David Yates\' "Harry Potter and the Deathly Hallows: Part II", as \'The Boy Who Lived\' comes face to face with \'He Who Shall Not Be Named\' in an epic showdown between good and evil. And what a showdown it is- tense, thrilling, breathtaking, and fitting of just about any superlative you can think of. \n\nWhereas the first instalment of the \'Deathly Hallows\' emphasised the profound sense of loss and isolation among Harry, Ron and Hermoine, screenwriter Steve Kloves and director Yates leaves behind the moody atmosphere of the previous movie for newfound immediacy and urgency. This is all about that final battle where only one can live, and from start to finish- for once in a Harry Potter movie- the action is swift and relentless.\n\nPart II picks up right where the previous film left off- the dark Lord Voldemort smiles in evil triumph as he steals the most powerful wand in the world, i.e. the Elder Wand, from the tomb of beloved Hogwarts headmaster Professor Dumbledore (Michael Gambon). The next shot is equally ominous- students are marched rank-and-file through a Hogwarts courtyard, watched closely by cloaked Dementors hovering over the school grounds. If there was any need of a reminder of the danger facing our three protagonists, these opening sequences should just about refresh one\'s memory of what is at stake.\n\nThere is precious little time to waste, and the first we get to see Harry, Ron and Hermione, they are already hatching a plan to break into Gringotts to retrieve a Horcrux. Their break-in settles upon a plan of deception that allows for some rare moments of levity in the film, as Helena Bonham Carter gets to ham it up as a polyjuice-disguised Hermoine impersonating Bellatrix Lestrange. This being the first \'Harry Potter\' movie in 3D, Yates caters for some distinctive thrills in the additional dimension with a roller-coaster ride through the vault, culminating in a daring escape on the back of a dragon.\n\nBut as readers of the book will tell you, the last stand happens back at Hogwarts, and true enough, after this thrilling early set-piece at Gringotts, the trio head back to the School of Witchcraft and Wizardry to confront their foes. It is also where the last Horcruxes are supposed to be, and Harry\'s return to the once sunny and cheery grounds now besieged by darkness and doom becomes a true test of allegiance. \n\nFans will be glad that Kloves gives room for otherwise supporting characters to step into the limelight- in particular, Neville Longbottom (Matthew Lewis) emerges as one of the unlikeliest but also truest heroes on the side of good. The Hogwarts stalwarts also get a chance to show off their magic, and Yates gives each largely enough screen time for the heroic send-off they deserve.\n\nYet he reserves the most emotional moment in the film for Severus Snape\'s (Alan Rickman) vindication, long thought to be the Judas Iscariot-equivalent in the Order and the one who pushed Dumbledore to his death. Yates delivers a truly poignant and deeply heartfelt revelation of Snape\'s true colours, and it is a farewell that even those who have read the book and can expect what is to come will be overwhelmed by its sheer emotional muscle. While Part II was always meant to be an action-packed spectacle, it is to Yates\' credit that there is still as much heart as before in the storytelling.\n\nThough brief, this revelation also works brilliantly as a catalyst that propels Harry to come to terms with the sacrifice he has to make. Harry\'s realization of this leads up perfectly to the ultimate duel between him and Voldemort, one that is fierce, ferocious and- thanks to Yates\' imagination- more exhilarating than reading it off the page. \n\nThe outcome of that battle shouldn\'t be a secret by now, and when the \'happily-ever-after\' coda in Rowling\'s book set 19 years later is also faithfully adapted here, you can\'t quite help but be moved by how it so properly gives the series closure.\n\nThey are of course no longer kids here- Daniel Radcliffe, Rupert Grint and Emma Watson now young adults who have through the film series grown up right under our eyes. While Part I had greater emphasis on Ron and Hermoine, the focus here is squarely on Harry and Radcliffe truly shines in this instalment- his usual understated performance allowing his audience to appreciate the enormities of the challenge before Harry.\n\nThat we can be so fully immersed in Harry\'s world is testament to the craft of each and every one of the technical team. Production designer Stuart Craig does a masterful job portraying the devastation around Hogwarts, complimented nicely by Eduardo Serra\'s beautiful cinematography and Mark Day\'s skillful editing. Alexandre Desplat\'s evocative score, which combines his own elegiac work with both the John Williams theme as well as Nicholas Hooper\'s mournful composition for the sixth movie, works magic with the visuals. And most deserving of credit is none other than director Yates himself, who has matured movie after movie to deliver a crowning achievement for the series.\n\nPardon us if we have also taken this opportunity to extol the merits of the \'Harry Potter\' franchise- it\'s really hard not to considering how this is the last time we will see the Potter-world in its current incarnation. It is this to which the movie is a farewell to, and it is as beautiful a farewell as it can be, packed with visual spectacle on a scale never before seen in any of the other films and fused with the same powerful emotion as Part I and the Yates films before. All good- even great- things have to come to an end, so there is really no better way to bid adieu than with this grand and glorious final chapter.', u'0.448422', u'I predict this will be the movie of the year.\n\nI was thoroughly immersed in this movie from start to finish and when leaving the cinema (twice in the last 24hours) I could only hear the endless chatter of comments like "That was great" and "Brilliant way to end the series".\n\nThough, in my opinion, some key factors were missing or needed more exploration I think you\'ll find it\'s easy to clue on whether you\'ve read the novels or not. Some previously main characters were lucky to slip in a line or two whilst some of the more minor characters sneaked their way up to the top.\n\nThe film was brilliantly directed. Music, lighting, script; everything was flawless. Some scenes had my skin crawling and heart racing for absolutely no reason other then the fact that it was utterly eerie, it was hard not to grip the armrests in anticipation.\n\nDramatic musical build up mixed perfectly with lingering silences in all the right places. Spots that would usually host a soft violin were left with the honest and real quiet so that you could wrap your head around everything.\n\nMy emotions were chewed up and spit out over and over, I didn\'t know whether to grieve, cheer, laugh or scream and neither did the audience I was with.\n\nBy the end I couldn\'t even think of the fact that it was the end of an era, I couldn\'t even grasp everything that had happened which is why I\'ll be going to see it for the third time within this next week.\n\nYou wont regret paying for the full experience with this one.', u'0.0693982', u"I quite luckily got the chance to see this at an early screening on July 7th.\n\nFirst impressions of the film? Brilliant.\n\nDirector David Yates, who also directed the 5th, 6th and 7th films is back to direct the final. This pleases me because these 3 films are my personal favourites out of the 7 that have come out so far so I think it's fair to say that I was expecting big things from this. I'm very pleased to say that he's pulled it off ending the series in a fast paced, well written final act.\n\nThe film (in case you're wondering) picks up straight after where Part 1 ended, Voldemort (Ralph Finnes) has the most powerful wand in his possession and he's finally ready to succeed in what he tried to do over 15 years ago. He finally has the power to kill Harry Potter. I won't go into much more detail in what happens as most people will have read the book and I don't want to drop spoilers! Harry (Daniel Radcliffe), Ron (Rupert Grint) and Hermione (Emma Watson) need to seek out and destroy Voldemort's remaining Horcruxes. This is the only way that will give them a chance of stopping He Who Must Not Be Named.\n\nTheir final journey takes them to places we may not have seen recently or remembered, places such as Gringotts Bank in Diagon Alley and Hogsmeade. Along the way they encounter a variety of creatures, both friend and foe from dragons to spiders, death eaters to old friends and of course, the Dark Lord himself. Will Voldemort Succeed? Or will good trump evil? For those who haven't read the book this is your chance to find out.\n\nWhat I especially love about this film and Part 1 is the direction in which they've taken, adding more cheesy lines and (for example in Part 1) that dance sequence. I feel that these small touches bring the films closer to our hearts and help us to connect with the film a lot more. Sure they leave out a lot of information that the books provide but that's the same with all film adaptations! They've got the main story down and where they've deviated from the book it has been for the best. Not everything written down on paper will translate into visually appealing footage.\n\nPart 1 to me also felt unfinished (well it was only half the book I suppose!), I mean in the way that it was long and never seemed to climax. Sure at the end of Part 1 Voldemort gets the want he so badly seeks for and leaves then the films ends on a giant cliffhanger. Part 2 definitely adds the rest of that epicness that so many other films have towards the end. It's full of action! I definitely believe that both Part 1 and 2 are best viewed with a short as possible gap in between them. Otherwise it's like watching the first disc from one of the extended editions of The Lord of the Rings and not watching the second disc for another 6 months!\n\nThis paragraph is about the visuals and 3D. Skip to the final paragraph for final thoughts.\n\nVisually the film is stunning from an effects point of view. From the trailer alone you can see that this film has quite a lot of action in it, crumbling buildings, hundreds of spells and lots of fire. Everything looks great, from the wand duals to the dragons it all is fantastic. Also this time around it is being showed in 3D and is the first (and (probably) last!) potter film to be shown in this way. Now I was very sceptical about this, especially since they announced that the films (originally both parts) would be converted from 2D to 3D instead of being natively filmed in 3D. I believe that what they should have done was what they did with Part 1, scrap the 3D. I'm going to say that it's not great, at times it's pretty good, but never great. For the most part it's okay. I'm going to compare it with the last blockbuster film to come out in 3D, Transformers: Dark of the Moon. The 3D effect is not even close to looking as good as what that film (shot in 3D) had. So I'm going to tell you now, 2D is the best dimension to watch this film in. Having said that if you still want to (or have to) see it in 3D by all means do, the 3D doesn't take away anything from the film, but it doesn't add much.\n\nI will end by saying that I definitely recommend this film for everyone, especially Potter fans. The ending that many thought could easily be done wrongly has been done right. Then when you think of Part 1 and 2 as the same film I believe that they are easily the best Potter films. This truly is a fitting ending for the boy who lived.", u'0.230477', u"This movie could not do any better, it ended the Harry Potter series with a bang. It is a good balance from the first part of The Deathly Hallows. The first part was more of a drama, while part two was action packed left and right. This may be my favorite movie of the series, though all of them are equally amazing. I have read the books, and there are definitely major changes in the movie, but I find they fit perfectly well with the story, even if it isn't the original plot. Even for those who haven't read the books (why wouldn't you?!), it is equally enjoyable. This movie, along with the rest in the series, will be loved for years and years to come.", u'0.640433', u'Yeah. I came out of the film disappointed. Not feeling like I had a good time.\n\nDon\'t get me wrong, it was a good movie. But there are things that brought it down and too many of them for it to be forgivable.\n\n1) Dumbledore\'s brother and sister. You know what I mean. Referred to and never followed upon.\n\n2) The kiss. Didn\'t happen in the Chamber of Secrets. In fact, did the Chamber scene happen at all? In the book, it happens after Ron expresses concern for the welfare of the elves (in light of Dobby\'s heroic death) in the outbreak of a fire at Hogwarts. Here, it is given to you as a variation of the "We\'re alive! Let\'s kiss!" movie clich\xe9\'.\n\n3) Fred\'s death should have been on screen. Period.\n\n4) The Avada Kedavra curse didn\'t make bodies disintergrate. Until Voldemort (and perhaps Bellatrix, too?). What? \n\n5) The roles of Matthew Lewis and Evanna Lynch (Neville and Luna respectively) were enough to warrant their names as part of the supporting cast. To only see their names in the full cast is scandalous to say the least.\n\n(And, yes, I am aware two-time Oscar winner Emma Thompson gets the same treatment. I know she makes two small appearances, but again, she has two bloody Oscars! Either she is very humble or she needs a better agent.) \n\n6) They really should have stuck with the CGI aging. Except for maybe Ginny and Draco, none of them looked like they were 36.', u'-0.265821', u"I gotta chance to see this movie in 2D (Luckily) since i read the reviews of the 3D being bad . . but after seeing the movie even in 2D and witnessing the end of such an Enormous Mega Series . . i felt this was a very very disappointing end . . the HP Fans Have Been Robbed off their immense trust and money in seeing some modified illogical end to the story ..than what everyone had pictured in the mind after reading the Final Book of deathly hallows\n\n(SPOILERS) HP Deathly hallows part 2 was very shallow. I was surprised that some REALLY special scenes from the book were excluded (robbed) off from the movie and instead they added their own new scenes which really didn't fit into any plot that was being brought up since 1st movie . . \n\n1)PLOT Mr. Yates . . i think the sole purpose of breaking this last movie in two parts was to do justice to the plot and build to an ultimate finale . what happened ?? I saw this movie with my sister who prefers to watch harry potter movies rather than reading the books . . so here i asked her a few questions after the movie \n\nQ:-How did harry survive after Voldemort killed him in the forest ? A:-I didn't understand\n\nQ:- How did Dumbledore help harry understand the mystery behind hallows? A:-i didn't understand . . he never mentioned about hallows in Harry's dream\n\nQ:-Who died George or Fred ? A:- They didn't mention it \n\nQ:- How did Percy come to fight ? A:- i don't know ..\n\nQ:- What happened to death eaters ? A:- I don't know may be they ran out of fear \n\nQ:- Why did Elder wand didn't work for Voldemort ? A:- couldn't understand \n\nQ:- Who killed Nagini ? A:- Ron Hermione and Neville \n\nQ:- WHere were all the Hogwarts teachers ? A:- I guess fighting . . i saw them only once in a scene \n\nQ:- How did u feel after harry defeated Voldemort ? A:- Nothing special. . they didn;t show any Victory shouts or glory \n\nThis clearly shows immense loopholes in the plot that Mr. Yates tried to explain in his own way . . but really it didn't work well\n\n2) The Final Battle - \n\nIt doesn't take place in front of everyone in the Hall . . In the book the whole magical fraternity witness the Epic Moment Harry and Voldemort in the centre circling each other and harry finally coming to terms and calling Voldemort . . Tom Yes I Dare . . Where The Hell Was This Scene? . . Death Eaters and Hogwarts Teachers . . Students . . Ron Hermione Neville Luna. . Kreachers army . . every one see Harry and Voldemort circling each other and Harry telling Voldemort . . I have knowledge of magic and a weapon more powerful than yours. . that wands choose their masters on their own. . that Snape was never yours he was Dumbledore's \n\nNothing of this is in the movie . .Very Disappointing. .all that happens is harry and voldemort fight outside the castle and Voldemort curse backfires,and he turns into smoke . .what nonsense \n\n3)Dumbledore's Scene\n\nDumbledore doesn't explain why harry doesn't die after Voldemort killed him . .this is where the whole plot and mystery of entire Potter Series is to be explained . . the elder wand killed only the Horcrux inside harry and how Harry's blood still runs in the veins of Voldemort and so he'll be able to return back\n\nDumbledore doesn't explain how he was destined only for the elder wand because he was meant to tame it . He doesn't explain at all why only Harry was worthy to posses all the three deathly hallows . . because he is not scared of death . . instead accept it as a friend . . and becoming a true master of death. Giving movie the title The Deathly Hallows . . ask yourself truly what did they do in the movie ? . . Nothing\n\n4) Lack Of Emotion and Glory \n\nThe Trailers say very bright and Loud 'THE Epic Battle' . . ask anyone who saw the movie 'Did it actually feel that epic ??? Did they feel for the characters during the movie ? In the book . . everyone run towards Harry . . Ron and Hermione lift him up they hug him . . there are cheers and cries of Victory . . Glory.. Harry Ron and Hermione go into Headmaster's Office . .where they are welcomed with a standing ovation of Victory . . An Epic Feeling that something huge has finally ended . . \n\nIn the movie . . you don't feel anything . .Harry just walks by in the hall and no one looks at him until Ron and Hermione . . Then he takes them to the bridge and tells them about the Elder Wand and breaks it . .Ha Ha Ha. . Come on Mr.Yates\n\n5) Background Music \n\nImagine huge action scenes without a thrilling background music. . neither rejoicing nor scary . . That is not how you make things EPIC.I think the music given to the trailers was really perfect . . it set theme for the final battle . .it was no where in the movie \n\nOver all i think the movie could had been done a lot better if some plots would had been explained properly .\n\nFor those who haven't read the book . . its a Visual Treat \n\nFor those who have read the books . . this is Severe Disappointment for their favourite series to end this way . .", u'-0.181095', u'Harry Potter and the Deathly Hallows, part 2 also known as the movie that tore my heart and soul into oblivion. If you thought goosebumps was the criteria for a good scene, then mix those goosebumps with emotional upheaval, coupled with your hands almost shaking and this is Deathly Hallows part 2 in its entirety.\n\nHarry, Ron and Hermione are still on the pursuit to collect and destroy Voldemort\'s horcruxes. They believe the next one is hidden away in Bellatrix Lestrange\'s vault in Gringotts, the wizarding bank. But going into the bank is near impossible \x96 unless you know a goblin who worked there, which they do. And so a deal is stricken. At Gringotts, they are discovered to be impostors. Hearts will race as they try to escape with the horcrux and as Harry soon finds out the next one is hidden inside Hogwarts and it\'s something that belongs to another founder of the school. And it is to Hogwarts that he goes. But Hogwarts has changed. Snape is the new headmaster.But there are many things that Harry doesn\'t know, the ultimate secret being one that revolves around his every being. Things are never as it seems. People will show their true colors and they will come out as triumphant even after years of hatred.\n\nDan Radcliffe, Rupert Grint and Emma Watson have done the impossible here. They are possibly the only set of actors that you have seen grow up on the big screen and as the actors grew up on a personal level, they added their maturity to their characters. It\'s very fascinating to watch them interact. Their acting is relentless, captivating and charming as it should be now that they have mastered the characters they\'re playing. You cannot imagine other actors portraying Harry and Ron or another actress to portray Hermione. \n\nAlan Rickman and Maggie Smith as Snape and Professor McGonagall respectively gave their all in this movie. You cannot help but be on the edge of your seat whenever any of these two actors are doing their thing. Rickman has a part of the movie entirely dedicated to his character\'s personal story. It is also one of my favorite parts of the book. The Prince\'s Tale is transferred so magnificently on screen that it WILL bring you to tears.\n\nProfessor McGonagall takes a stand \x96 several, actually \x96 in Deathly Hallows as well. She stands up for a Harry and when she does, the whole theater will explode in applause. Maggie Smith fortifying Hogwarts and then cracking a joke to lighten up the mood\x85 Just the way I like it. You cannot but share the pain in Smith\'s eyes as she sees her beloved school crumbling around her, as she sees all the work that they\'ve done go to waste\x85 \n\nAnd what better actor to portray this generation\'s most bad-ass villain than Ralph Fiennes. He gives his character an extra dimension in this movie now that he has the room to spread his wings so to speak, seeing as he\'s one of the movie\'s main pillars. Lord Voldemort is all evil. But in this movie, another side of him shows up: anguish and misery. And yet, there\'s this subtlety to the nuances of the portrayal that make up the overall result to be very epic, indeed.\n\nSteve Kloves is the movie\'s screenwriter. He captured the movie\'s essence perfectly. He presented J.K. Rowling\'s work in such a brilliant way that even the slight deviations from the book (and they are very few) do not even matter anymore. He portrays the gravity of the situation to the letter: the deaths, the destruction, the revelations, the build-up\x85. His version of the story is so well done that it would be incredible not to see an Oscar nod (and a win!) for him in the Screenplay category. He added his touch while keeping Rowling\'s magic. Some of the lines from the book are transferred to the movie as they are and for someone who has read the book over and over again, I was ecstatic to hear them on screen. "Look\x85 at\x85me." Enough said.\n\nDirector David Yates has helmed the last four Potter movies and while I had my doubts about him at first (Order of the Phoenix was not exactly great), he more than surpassed my wildest expectations in this. The pace he sets for the movie never dies down. It keeps on building up and up like a beautiful orchestral crescendo. He guides his actors and actresses with confidence. He\'s working with a marvelous script based on a terrific book. And he has the green light to give it all out. What do you expect from a very talented director with those options? Something not less than magical.\n\nHarry Potter and the Deathly Hallows, Part 2 provides you with a sense of catharsis as it ends. It lets your senses go. It lowers your inhibitions more than alcohol. You cannot help but see your hands automatically clap at some points in the movie. You shout in desperation without even controlling your voice and you root for your characters like they\'re really in front of you. Tears flow down your face without any power of you to stop them. There isn\'t any better way to end the epic series that was Harry Potter. If only it weren\'t ending\x85', u'0.0853018', u"We've been to the first session (virtually) of each Harry Potter movie. You expect the movie to never be exactly like a book (when is it EVER?!) but this one really did change a few things that shouldn't have been touched.\n\nThere was a lot of good work in this movie. Lily, James, Sirius and Remus joining Harry to go into the Forbidden Forest was well kept. The acting was impressive as usual, something one has come to expect from this group. The visual effects were also excellent, and the storyline was well followed up to a point (this is why the movie got 7/10 from the writer); however, when major changes to this occurred, disappointment set in.\n\nThe lack of use of the Invisibility Cloak (which we all know is one of the most important hallows to possess) by Harry throughout the movie (except for when they are at Gringotts) is puzzling, as he used it extensively to get around Hogwarts so he could manage to obtain the diadem horcrux as well as make his way to Voldemort within the Forbidden Forest. Also, when Harry 'falls' out of Hagrid's arms out in Hogwart's grounds (when all Hell breaks loose due to Nagini's demise) he uses the Cloak to escape and cause panic amongst the Death Eaters.\n\nAlso, the fact Harry didn't tell Neville it was imperative Nagini needed to be killed, but Hermione instead, diminishes Neville's importance! In the book, it is completely up to Neville to destroy Nagini as he is the only one left who it is thought to be able to. Also, it can be tied into the prophecy that Trelawney made all those years before as Neville killing the final horcrux, causes Voldemorts vulnerability. Thankfully, Neville is the one that kills Nagini, but more by luck than good management.\n\nHarry telling Dumbledore that he had nothing to kill Voldemort with (at Kings Cross Station) was not correct, as well, as he went into the Forest with both the Cloak and a wand, which was what made him so special as he did not raise that wand against Voldemort. He instead died willingly, again showing his great strength and love of those important to him - his friends/family at Hogwarts.\n\nThe adaptation by the screen writer, Steve Kloves, of the final scene between Voldemort and Harry of the novel - well...THAT'S A DISAPPOINTMENT!!! What J.K Rowling wrote was good enough and whenever I've read it I've always loved it and pictured it so clearly in my mind, so the whole battle scene between Harry and Voldemort was ridiculous, and could only occur because they ruined the sequence of events. VERY UNNECESSARY! The wands locking in battle \x96 what the???? That should not have occurred, as they had different cores, different timbers and were nothing like the Twin Core Phenomenon that occurred in book four (Goblet of Fire). You don't even hear Harry say Expelliarmus which had become his 'trademark spell'.\n\nHarry, Ron and Hermione not going to the Headmaster's Office after defeating Voldemort, and there getting a standing ovation from all previous Headmasters and Headmistresses, and Harry not mending his phoenix feather core wand through using the Elder Wand (Death Stick) was very much an anticlimax. Instead, Harry (in the company of Ron and Hermione) snaps the Elder Wand (the possibility of which I would think is questionable in the first place!) and chucks it off the bridge (never to be seen again?).\n\nIt would have been nice to have had the connection between the Dumbledore's and Grindelwald explained, especially Adriana's death. This actually moulded Dumbledore into the man he became - a professor and later Headmaster of Hogwarts; never Minister of Magic; and a supporter of Muggle-born witches and wizards. It also explained how he came into possession of the Elder Wand.\n\nI was so glad, and there was applause in the theatre when the epilogue occurred as its lovely to see Albus Severus Potter and the short conversation between him and his father, Harry.\n\nOverall, probably not one I will see again at the movies, which is something I have done with the others (though they were disappointments in ways as well!).", u'-0.220304'], u'tt0338564': [u'This movie has been regarded as the cream of Hong Kong gangster and cop movie. And has won 22 awards. But we all know awards don\'t mean a thing sometimes. The God Father of America cinema "Martin Scorsese" himself is making a American version of the movie, titled: Departed. I\'m somewhat happy to see that this movie is being recognized and acknowledged by a true master, but distraught to the possibility of disappointment.\n\nA little history of Hong Kong film industry, being in somewhat government free state for over 100 years, Hong Kong movie industry proliferated to the state of hysteria. On one hand, everything goes as long as people get what they want for 2 hours worth. On the other hand, lack of political drama has afforded the gangster and cop drama to truly grow and mature.\n\nNow back to the movie itself. 3 years ago, when I was still a poor student, I was loitering in the local Chinese video store as usual, looking for something exciting. The owner handed me a VHS copy of this movie, he personally recommended it and said it\'s new and unique. So I went home and watched it immediately. And then I said in my then dark and dingy apartment for 30 minutes, in utter silence.\n\nThere was no plot twist, and no surprise ending, no Mr. M Night\'s heavy handed gimmicks and Hollywood\'s camera tricks. But from the beginning to the end, for full 2 hours, you can cut the tension with a knife. In the end, you still don\'t want it to end. The story goes on in your mind, questions, bits and pieces start to put together, characters start to take shape even after the movie ended.\n\nIn my entire life, I\'ve never seen a movie that there isn\'t a single excessive frame, until I saw this movie. It has forever changed my expectation on crime drama.\n\nThe story is genius and simple enough. A mole in police department working against an undercover cop in drug trafficking mafia. They don\'t know each other\'s identity, so it is like a invisible tug war between the two competing against each other\'s wits. I won\'t reveal too much of it even though like I said, there\'s no plot twist.\n\nIt\'s a fairly popular movie that has generated huge buzz when it came out, and since been talked, compared and still highly regarded as unsurpassed by countless fans worldwide. It has an all star cast in Hong Kong cinema, and of course, the screenplay, the acting, the editing, the camera work and overall directing is flawless judging by all standards.\n\nIf you are adventurous enough to try even one Hong Kong movie, try this one.', u'-0.0292385', u'Most western viewers will only know the Asian crime scene from the bleak and lyrical canvas of Takeshi Kitano\'s work. Here we get something that at first seems far more westernized and very close to the work of one Michael Mann. Okay, enough allusions: yes "Heat" comes heavily to mind at first. but this is no simple "Heat" in Hong Kong. This a splicing of everything Asians do best in a moody, stylish tension-based thriller. From the beautiful cinematography(reminiscent of Wong Kar-Way\'s films)- step forward visual consultant Christopher Doyle! - and music to the graceful ying-yang undertones (mirror-images are a key theme), the film\'s most heroic achievement lies in its leads and in the bold ending.\n\nHearing that this is being considered for a remake stateside comes as no big surprise, but how Matt Damon and Leonardo DiCaprio could possibly compete against Andy Lau and Tony Leung evokes cynicism at best. Both leads are perfect. Lau\'s cold calculating intellect against Leung\'s anguished and tormented heart, complimentary opposites. There aren\'t enough words to commend this fresh, invigorating film with...', u'0.0679504', u'This movie is well-made, stylish and extremely entertaining. However, as stated by the review from a Hong Kong viewer, there is also depth and subtlety rarely found in action/thrillers. It is this depth that makes this movie brilliant. The depth of this movie is best served by the understated yet deeply moving performances of the main characters. Viewers are allowed into the inner changes of these characters and before long, the viewers begin to care about them, be it the "good guy" (Yan) or the "bad guy" (Ming). The rest of cast successfully relate the complicated and exciting plot to the viewers, and all the supporting performances are almost flawless, perhaps with the exception of the female psychologist who seems sadly one-dimensional. I grew up in Hong Kong but has since lived most of my life in Canada. With this duo-cultural background, I have mixed feelings about the Hollywood remaking of this movie. On the one hand, I am happy for the Hollywood recognition of this great movie by remaking it. On the other hand, I would hate to see how badly sabotaged the end result would be. Some things just do not translate. As a minimum, I hope the great director Scorcese will make good use of the major plot line and generate a haute thriller and with the excellent cast, develop some in-depth characterization. The Chinese philosophy and the spirit of the original film is better left undisturbed.', u'0.3031', u"I looked over a squad of reviews and was sad not to see anyone writing from Hong Kong. So I am putting in my piece.\n\nHong Kong movies have changed a lot in the last decade and when Infernal Affairs came out it was a real change. I noted 'Golden Chicken' was mentioned earlier, and that sums up many of the lame comedies that have recently been churned out. However the comedy is a large part of Hong Kong cinema, as is the gangster genre. \n\nInfernal Affairs breaks with the comedy, keeps the gangsters (lau being a first class clean cut one - whilst Leung acts a remarkable strained police officer) and adds clever and intelligent tension. The acting is first class, as is the mood that truly captures the zeitgeist.\n\nThis movie is about the two characters and their similarities and moral obstacles. It also has something subtle to say.\n\nThis film was huge news in Hong Kong and the mainland. It is an important Hong Kong film. \n\nThe US remake will be more clich\xe9d than you can imagine. This film will translate, it is not that original, no. But it has substance and mood that is valuable.\n\nSee it.", u'0.182178', u"\nAs cadets, Lau and Chan both show promise as police officers.  However, Chan is removed from the training and send to be a long-term undercover in Sam's gang.  However, unbeknownst to the police, Lau is also a long-term mole who is feeding information back to Sam.  When Sam and police chief SP Wong both have their operations scuppered, each realises the other has a mole and sets out to uncover each.  With each other's lives at risk, Lau and Chan must be the first to uncover the other.\n\nI decided to see this after hearing good things about it but I was conscious that often foreign films can be given more leniency than Western films doing the same thing.  After a slightly confusing opening few moments as characters settle down (not helped by using completely different actors for characters at late teens and late 20's - do people change that much?) the film immediately becomes gripping.  The plot may well have the occasional hole and have unnecessary personal details (Lau's girlfriend and Chan's ex weren't really needed) but the central story is well written and told with such urgency that it is hard not to be totally engaged.\n\nThe film doesn't have many massive shoot outs or action scenes but it has a\npretty consistent sense of tension that is enjoyable right up to a typical but impacting ending.  The direction is stylish and only occasionally overuses the slow-mo jump cuts.  It may owe more to American cinema than that of the Orient but it is still a very good film and I hope the inevitable remake will be as good.\n\nThe cast don't need to do that much apart from look intense and portray the tension of the story in a realistic fashion - something that they do well. At times the lead two actors are pushed out of this by the personal asides but they happily keep things on track.  Both Lau and Leung play it very well - it never came down to good guy/bad guy and the audience was pretty well split.  Wong is a solid officer while Tsang is good as Sam.  Chen and Cheng may not have a great deal to do apart from slowing the film but they both look good doing it.\n\nOverall this is a solidly enjoyable cop thriller, regardless of what country it comes from.  It will eventually be remade I imagine and when it is I hope that it manages to retain it's consistent sense of tension, double-edged characters and a real tight hold on it's audience just as this did here.", u'0.572413', u"\nA seriously refreshing police thriller that cranks up the tension to the max. There's no overblown gunplay or buddy cop crap here, this baby is tight as a drum and will have your nails down to the quick. Superb performances, a\ntight script and tense direction make this a winner in every department. Pick it up if you can, it's fantastic.\n\n9/10\n\nNiz", u'0.577146', u'This movie should be compared to movie like Heat, even when the storyline are not the same. Movies like Hardboiled and A Better Tomorrow are predominately action-based, whereas this movie is more dramatic and emotionally-driven.\n\nThe main attraction is the mole hunts but it would not be as brilliantly done if not for the fireworks between the major characters.\n\nThe title from the explanation in the intro means "Endless Purgatory Road". This philosophy, to me, really made this movie more thoughtful. The two central characters both had to walk their road, in life and in their minds for a long time. Both had no choice but to keep walking. As they cross path, they were forced to play the game of cat and mouse by their superiors. While it is not certain who\'s the cat and who\'s the mouse, one thing is certain - the loser will die.\n\nWhile there are four main characters, they are all males. This should be bad for any movie but I think this is one of the exception to the rule. The emotions and tension between the four were well-scripted and brilliantly played. It is no surprised each had at least one best actor awards in the Hong Kong industry. The sequels(2 prequels) will delve deeper into it.\n\nPlotwise - it is hard to see any holes.\n\nSeen it around six times, a lot for a drama.\n\nI think you should ask yourself after the movie, "what would I do if I am in the same situation?". Right and wrong is harder to separate.', u'-0.13957', u'I\'m late in discovering the Hong Kong crime thriller genre so I can only compare "Infernal Affairs (Mou gaan dou))" to its Hollywood compatriots. It grippingly is the equal of such intense examinations of the anguish of undercover cops as "Donnie Brascoe" or dirty cops such as "Narc" or "Training Day." \n\nKey is the dynamic opposite pairing of two leonine, charismatic actors, Tony Leung Chiu Wai, the self-sacrificing heart throb from "Hero (Ying xiong)" and the languid lover from "In the Mood for Love (Fa yeung nin wa)" here as an antsy, anguished too long undercover cop versus Andy Lau as his crisply efficient, ambitious counterpart. \n\nThe plot, propelled as well by the music, unpredictably twists and takes hairpin turns from the beginning so that even with helpful flashbacks it\'s a thrilling roller coaster ride to try to follow the constantly changing loyalties, manipulations, deals and revelations, not unlike the TV series "The Wire." \n\nRegardless, you get that the real battle is for the characters\' souls as much as their lives and you hold your breath to the last surprising minute. The initial motivations for how the men came to be at this crossroads will doubtless be explored in the prequel and sequel that haven\'t been released in the U.S. yet. \n\nThe women are just the girlfriends, but they do have separate lives, jobs and choices that impact the men in their lives. \n\nWith noted cinematographer Christopher Doyle is listed as a "visual consultant" in the credits, the great bulk of the film takes place at night, like a comparable chase film "Collateral," so it was unfortunate that the print I saw was not pristine. \n\nIt was also annoying that the subtitles were white on white illegible and that ideograms that are shown in the scene are not translated, even when the camera rests on them for a length of time that makes one assume something significant is written there.', u'0.059602', u"\n- Infernal Affairs: 9/10\n\nA brilliant cop movie out of Hong Kong, with a sublime plot and great acting by the two leads Andy Lau and Tony Leung (an indescribably great actor). An amazing concept with Lau as an undercover Triad member in the police force and Leung as an undercover cop in the Triad... which leads to many interesting situations. Great stuff, and the DVD even has the alternative ending (which isn't nearly as good as the main one).", u'0.651021', u"A deceptively simple idea lies at the heart of this complex thriller: the Hong Kong police and a triad gang both have an informer in each other's organisation: whoever's man picks the enemies' spy first wins the game for his side. Add to that the customary double-agent-doesn't-know-which-side-he-is-on-anymore subplot (doubled, of course), and you have plenty of ingredients for a plot, although it's to the movie's credit that although a little stylised, it never seems false or contrived. Fast-paced and bold, with a generous score, it never insults the viewer's intelligence either, and features just the right level of moral ambiguity. At one level, it's just another thriller, and there's little in the way of wider political or social subtext; but on the other hand, it's a textbook lesson in the art of making this sort of film.", u'0.376897', u"\nOne's an undercover cop inside a Triad, the other is a undercover Triad inside the police force.  Which one will expose the other first?  Riveting drama throughout. Included in the package is a top-notch cast at the peak of their powers and expert direction.  Did I mention this is also an allegory for a Buddhist hell?  (If you don't know what hell is, just take a look at the surviving character at the end of the movie and you'll have a fairly good concept) Just when you think a genre has been done to death, something like this takes you by surprise.  This is a must see film for anyone interested in delving much deeper than standard cop versus crook fair.", u'0.28897', u'I ran across this movie some time ago on Netflix, and the description intrigued me. While I am not always one for subtitled films, I did not find it to be a distraction with his movie because the plot captivated me.\n\nAs many of you are aware, this movie was remade by Hollywood and released in 2006 under the name "The Departed" where it has been treated by the media as such a "fabulous" and "innovative" storyline. None of them bothered to discover that "The Departed" was a remake of this movie.\n\nHappily, some of the classic lines such as chopping one up and feeding him to the poor survived the Hollywood chopping block, but the fabulous method of communicating secretly via Morse Code did not make the transition from Hong Kong to Hollywood.\n\nMy suggestion: if you loved this original, then do not disappoint yourself watching the Hollywood remake.', u'-0.495913', u'After I enjoyed Martin Scorcese\'s "The Departed, I decided to watch the film that inspired the celebrated director to re-make it and move the action from Hong Kong to Boston, MA, USA. I must say that I liked the original movie better: 50 minutes shorter than Scorcese\'s magnificent remake, "Infernal Affairs" is tighter, faster, more compelling and tells the same story better. It does not have a grand acting Jack Nicholson who basically plays Daryl Van Horne with the attitude and "Infernal Affairs" characters don\'t talk and don\'t curse as much as they do in "The Departed" but the Hong Kong\'s movie only benefits from it. As much as I admire Leonardo DiCaprio as Bill Castigan, Tony Leung (Yan) in his role is simply unforgettable.', u'0.868495', u"Mou gaan dou (U.S. Title Infernal Affairs) has one of the best scripts ever of the contemporary cinema. the actors, the director are great yes, but all the power this movie has is in the script.\n\nThe script is as realistic as a movie can be (There is no realistic movie) it has flaws (because there is no perfect script either) but all the great things in it overwhelmed the flaws.\n\nTwo main characters is all you need to create a great movie you don't need to write the classic clich\xe9s to make the movie work you just have to feel what they feel. If you can do that your movie will be perfect.\n\nYan is a troubled man working as undercover for 10 years he became crazy (anybody should) up to the point when he becomes paranoiac. He has nothing to loose because he has no identity, he hates his job. in one word he is desperate to get his life back. Be somebody again \n\nMing on the other hand has got everything since he did things straight he became troubled because he friends with all his partners, he moves in with his girl, he now has something loose and he knows that if his cover is blow he will loose everything. He doesn't want to be a nobody again.\n\nThe script is how the environment where we live and the people we are surrounded changes us up to the point where we become different people that we once were.\n\nThe film is great mainly because of his script and the reason I hate the American remake (The Departed) is because William Monahan took away everything beautiful the original script had and turned it into a C-Action movie full of Hollywood clich\xe9s.", u'-0.346294', u"This movie is packed with heart pacing action and suspense, my favorite of all time. If you just read the premise/storyline of the movie it will give you tingles. Didn't yawn once, if you like action movies and even if you don't you will love it. The movie contains some of the hottest actors in Asia and the acting is superb. The beginning is sort of confusing but the rest of the movie is excellently put together and is in perfect sync leading to the climax. The depth of the movie is amazing and is true to the story line. There's great rising action and falling action, I really don't think action movies and get any better than this. The greatest 101 minutes of my life.", u'0.558815'], u'tt0058461': [u"ALthough in many respects this film pales in comparison with Leone's later films, it is itself a brilliant cinematic achievement. In part, this is because its failings primarily appear to be due to constraints of budget (very small and highly uncertain) and time more than anything else. Even to the extent that the skills of Leone, Morricone, and others hadn't fully flowered yet, this film is incredible at how brilliantly it is handled for what is really a first-time go. Leone had worked on, and even directed, films before, but this is his first real foray in his own direction, and into a genre that he revolutionised and with which he became forever synonymous. Who can imagine westerns without at least thinking of Leone's films, while who can think of Leone without thinking of westerns (even though his last, and arguably greatest, film was a sort of gangster film)? Similarly, one should not criticize this film for being based on Yojimbo, for that film itself was based on an American story while A Fistful of Dollars really is very different in many key respects, not least of all Leone's visual style or his own sense of irony and symbolism derived from Italian precedents and Hollywood westerns.\n\nWe also see the nascent Leone visual style here, with the close-up style and contrast of close-ups and long shots appearing. This alone sets it apart from previous films, westerns and non-westerns alike, and still provides for great visual treats that one can appreciate today.\n\nThis film also ushered in Leone's obsession with details, hard faces, grungy people, etc., that also revolutionsed the genre.\n\nThis films also marks the first brilliant score of Ennio Morricone. It is here that he introduced the lonely whistling, guitar music, chorus, and unusual combinations and styles that developed into the music that has become in the U.S. synonymous with westerns and duels in the same way that Leone's visuals and themes have. \n\nDespite its minor flaws, this is still a great film that is not only revolutionary but still great and fun to watch even today. Like Leone's other films, it is timeless. \n\nOne must also admit that it is amazing that in the U.S. an Italian film maker basing his films partly in Italian culture and an Italian composer could come to so define and be synonymous with this genre that Americans had considered so uniquely American, and highlight its underlying universality. That alone reveals the greatness of the films, of which this is the first.", u'0.604755', u'\nWhen Per un pungo di dollari, or A Fistful Of Dollars, was released in the mid-1960s, the term "Spaghetti Western" was coined as a putdown to these brazen new films that dared to recreate the Wild West in a place as far away as Italy. However, the last laugh was shared by the Italian directors, whose new style of portraying Colonial America in a realistic style rather than the romanticised way that was characteristic of John Wayne and his contemporaries will be remembered long after the films of the romanticised style are no more.\n\nThe plot is indescribably simple, as Clint Eastwood simply wanders into a town where gang warfare has stripped the economy to the point where only the local undertaker makes a profit and turns the two warring families against one another. Sergio Leone\'s best-known trademark, his dynamic use of widescreen ratios, comes to the fore here as Clint shares a film frame with no less than four of his enemies, all of whom have plenty to say to him and vice versa. This is one film where a pan and scan transfer is purely and simply vandalism. Some of the dialogue that is included here absolutely takes the cake for cleverness and wit, too. Asking four gunslingers to apologise to a horse, well, if it wasn\'t a man as famous for playing a gunslinger as Clint Eastwood, it\'d be ridiculous.\n\nTransplanting old Samurai legends into the Wild West works well, as you can see here. Simply having an old mercenary who travels the land in search of wrongs to right and battles to be fought makes the story a lot more compelling than the Westerns where we are told every iota of the characters\' motivations in the hope that it will give them some depth. The element of the main hero not getting involved in every scuffle that the bad guys cause, our semi-nameless hero\'s ignoring a drunken thug shooting at a little boy being the most obvious example, was another master stroke, one that got Eastwood involved in doing the film to begin with. The confrontation at the end of the film works well, too, with pyrotechnics exploding all over the picture in a bright display that keeps the film powerful and yet focused at the same time.\n\nAll in all, Per un pungo di dollari gets nine out of ten from me. The lack of any interesting support characters does dull the story a little, but this mistake was quickly rectified in the two sequels. The addition of Lee Van Cleef also worked well, but in this effort, it\'s all Clint Eastwood, and while the rest of the cast are nowhere near as interesting, it\'s all a better watch than anything the Americans were lumping out at the time.', u'-0.184506', u'\nClint Eastwood was best known to American audiences for his role as Rowdy Yates in the series Rawhide. The series had ended and he was offered this strange new and challenging role in this movie of the American West that was made in Italy! Eastwood said his wife read that script and liked it. She said it was really "wild" because it was written in Western "slang" by Italians who really didn\'t understand English. He did this picture almost as a lark, and then read that it had become one of the biggest hits in Europe and then when it was released in America it outgrossed even the most popular current American films and made Clint Eastwood both a star and a phenomenon. Its strange to me that the best films ever made about the American west should have been made by Sergio Leone, an Italian who couldn\'t even speak English. Clint Eastwood said that all he knew in Italian was "arrevadershi" and all Leone knew in English was "goodbye" and yet these two combined to make an awesome film. As the poncho clad "Man With No Name", Eastwood created a role that hit us like a punch in the face and really re-defined the definition of the true Western hero. Eastwood tore out pages and pages of the dialogue and reduced his character to the bare bones to make him more mysterious. Leone said that he clad Eastwood in that sweat stained serepe to give him a cloak of mystery and put the cheroot in his mouth as a pendant between his two cold eyes and it worked like a charm. He broke all the rules and re-defined screen violence. I read that Leone wanted to make a blood and guts Western and show to the audience "I want them to feel what the hell it is like to get shot" and he does it! The scene where Clint is beaten to a pulp is one of the most graphic that you will ever see. It would have killed most other men!', u'0.13109', u'\n\'A Fistful of Dollars\' is the first from Sergio Leone\'s trilogy about "The Man with No Name". The other two movies are \'For a Few Dollars More\' and the famous \'The Good, the Bad and the Ugly\'. Although \'The Good, the Bad and the Ugly\' is considered the best this one comes pretty close. It is a remake of Akira Kurosawa\'s \'Yojimbo\' and it comes also pretty close to that movie. It was also the first real Spaghetti Western.\n\nClint Eastwood is "The Man with No Name" who comes to a small town where two families run the place. Both families hate each other and he thinks he can make a lot of money with playing both parties against each other. This is basically the main story. There are some sub-plots, one of them involves Marisol (Marianne Koch) who is taken by a leader of one of the families. Her husband and child still live in the town.\n\nFor me it was not the story that made this movie interesting. It was the whole atmosphere. I like all Leone\'s westerns for that reason. Of course some are better than others, but they are never boring. The way we see Eastwood kill four man early in the movie is simply spectacular.\n\nThis no \'Once Upon a Time in the West\' or even \'The Good, the Bad and the Ugly\' but we have the same atmosphere, the same kind of score by Ennio Morricone and a Clint Eastwood at the beginning of a great career.', u'0.1941', u'\nYesterday I had a wonderful chance to see "Per un pugno di dollari /A Fistful of Dollars" on a movie theater where it clearly belongs. For me as a fanatic Eastwood fan it truly was a bliss to view Clint\'s legendary breakthrough film and a mother of all spaghetti westerns on a big screen and to marvel Sergio Leone\'s astonishing directing! Rundown houses, dusty streets, shabby clothes and faces with lots of stubble and dirt are just something you have to watch as large as it\'s only possible. All that filth doesn\'t belong in a small television. Morricone\'s fantastic score makes the experience stunning.\n\nI have to remind that this flick made Eastwood what he is today. Without it there wouldn\'t be no "Dirty Harry", "High plains drifter", "Unforgiven", "True Crime" or even "Every which way but loose". It\'s funny to state that although western is naturally an American genre, at least three of the best ones are made in Europe. Any of you who still don\'t know what I\'m talking about, I mean Leone\'s Dollars trilogy. As it\'s said, "A Fistful of Dollars" is the first motion picture of it\'s kind. It is and it looks like a pretty cheap production but it became one of the most memorable westerns ever. I\'m not revealing anything significant if I say that the undertaker got what he wanted the most: work.\n\nClint\'s character is just magnificent: he\'s witty, smart and dangerous and he doesn\'t take s**t from anybody, not even from guys who "insult his mule". Eastwood is the kind of a hero I love and look up to. Even though this is something I would definitely call a perfect western (10 out of 10) best was yet to come in the shape of "The Good, The Bad and The Ugly". No disrespect to Kurosawa but this beats "Yojimbo" anytime. "Aim for the heart or you\'ll never stop me..."', u'0.315607', u'\n\'A Fistful Of Dollars\' is a wonderful movie which, despite having an enormous following of fans around the world, sometimes gets unfairly dismissed in my opinion. For two reasons - firstly because the second and third movie in Leone/Eastwood "Man With No Name" trilogy (\'For A Few Dollars More\' and \'The Good, The Bad and The Ugly\') are so damn good it\'s easy to overlook this one. Despite being made on a much tighter budget and being less ambitious than the sequels to follow, it\'s still one of the greatest westerns ever made in my opinion. The second reason is the Yojimbo thing. Now movie buffs frequently slam \'A Fistful Of Dollars\' as being a rip off of Kurosawa\'s \'Yojimbo\', which I think is extremely misleading. I\'m not disputing that Leone was familiar with Kurosawa (I have no idea one way or the other), but one name I rarely hear ANYONE mention is Dashiel Hammett. Hammett\'s hard boiled crime classic \'Red Harvest\' was published THIRTY YEARS before \'Yojimbo\' and features the same central premise of an anti-hero playing two rival groups off against each other. So if anyone deserves acknowledgement as uncredited inspiration for Leone (AND Kurosawa) it\'s Hammett. Anyway, this is an absolutely brilliant movie and it launched Clint Eastwood, a popular TV actor, into being a major movie star, and likewise put Sergio Leone on the map. I can\'t recommend \'A Fistful Of Dollars\' highly enough, it\'s pure entertainment, and very, very cool!', u'0.237805', u'Sergio Leone shared a rebellious desire to tumble the old values and present the audience with a new, more mystifying piece of storytelling... The violence, the speed of action in his film announced a totally new European style...\n\nLeone placed the poncho on Eastwood\'s shoulders to give his character a veil of mystery... The cigar acted as a sort of pendant to those ice-cold eyes... He creates a quite unique character, with no name, no horse and no money, a cynical bounty hunter whose impassivity is his main attraction, an ultra-cool gunslinger who leaves us impressed by his exceptionally swift draw... He is a mysterious \'gunman with green eyes\' who comes from nowhere and returns there, a cult hero (set against a dry and dead landscape) entering a noisy violent world where evil competes with evil...\n\n"A Fistful of Dollars" is distinguished by Sergio Leone\'s visual gift, and convincing fashion in handling violence, rape and torture... He presents his sadistic killers, invariably unshaven, sweating and bleeding in frequent big close-ups... Both the real and the unreal invincibility of his \'Stranger\' are never better illustrated than in the final scene when the trembling Ramon fills the gunfighter\'s heart with bullets...\n\nLeone\'s very dark brand of humor stands out when Eastwood walks past a coffin-maker: "Gets three coffins ready" he orders... The town heavies make fun of him, asking where his old mule is... "You see, my mule don\'t like people laughing, gets the crazy idea you\'re laughing at him!" All four heavies get their just punishment for such mockery and as Eastwood returns past the old man, he corrects his miscalculations: "My mistake, four coffins." \n\nThe film is strong on passionate emotions, and bloody violence... This aspect is completely foreign to the American tradition based on John Ford concepts of honor, bravery and romantic adventure... Sergio Leone\'s film deeply influenced the future of the Western in general and the Italian \'spaghetti\' Western in particular...', u'-0.0956141', u'A drifter gunman (Clint Eastwood) arrives in the Mexican village of San Miguel in the border of United States of America, and befriends the owner of the local bar Silvanito (Jose Calvo). The stranger discovers that the town is dominated by two gangster lords: John Baxter (W. Lukschy) and the cruel Ram\xf3n Rojo (Gian Maria Volont\xe8 \x96 a.k.a. John Wells). When the stranger kills four men of the Baxter\'s gang, he is hired by Ram\xf3n\'s brother Esteban Rojo (S. Rupp) to join their gang. However, the stranger plots a scheme working for both sides and playing one side against the other.\n\n"Per un Pugno di Dollari" is a milestone in the history of the cinema, since the genre of "Spaghetti Westerns" didn\'t really exist previous to this movie. Sergio Leone used the storyline of Akira Kurosawa\'s "Yojimbo", replacing the samurai without a master ("ronin") Sanjuro Kuwabatake performed by Toshir\xf4 Mifune and the scenario of the rural Japanese town in Nineteenth Century by the stranger without a name (Clint Eastwood) and a small Mexican town in the border of the Wild and Far West. The result is a magnificent and remarkable movie, and beginning of the trilogy of Clint Eastwood\'s character Joe, who proves that "a man with a rifle beats a man with .45", completed by "Per Qualche Dollaro in Pi\xf9" and "Il Buono, il Brutto, il Cattivo", . My vote is eight.\n\nTitle (Brazil): "Por um Punhado de D\xf3lares" ("For a Fistful of Dollars")', u'-0.105522', u'\nThe first of Sergio Leone\'s "spaghetti westerns" is now overshadowed by its superior successors, but remains an exciting introduction to this peculiar genre. Clint Eastwood redefined the notion of a hero in this film, a man who seems to operate by a code but doesn\'t feel the need to explain it. Although the U.S. advertising campaign billed Eastwood\'s character as "The Man With No Name," a name is one thing he does have - Joe - but almost everything else about him is a mystery except for his deadly proficiency with a gun. Leone\'s style would be more pronounced in later films, but this one provided the template. Eastwood is superb, of course, as is Gian Maria Volante (billed as Johnny Wells) as his deadly opponent, Ramon Rojo. If it\'s slow moving at times, the music of Ennio Morricone always takes up the slack.\n', u'-0.165046', u'\nA classic. The first, or one of the first, films to introduce the concept of the Western antihero. Sergio Leone pioneered a lot of things here. The brightness, the oppressive sunlight. The ugly brutality of Western gunfights, that had always been cleaned up in Hollywood. I understand that Leone\'s occasional framing of the shooter and his victims in the same shot was not allowed at the time in American films. I thought, upon seeing this film years ago, that some characters (Eastwood) spoke in English, and other characters in Italian. Who knows, maybe some spoke Spanish or German. Must make for an interesting acting job. I rarely notice a movie\'s music, but the original score by Ennio Morricone was so fitting. Probably the best match of film and music up to that time, and only bested by Hugh Montenegro(?) in "The Good, the Bad, and the Ugly". A very good movie. Grade: A', u'0.26632', u'A Fistful of Dollars(1964) is a stylish western that begin the era of the Italian Western as well as being responsible for the rise to stardom for then TV actor, Clint Eastwood. He was not the first choice to play the main character but got the role due to the fact there no one left to offer the role to. Two people who were offered the role of the man with no name were Charles Bronson and Henry Fonda(four years later Charles Bronson takes the lead role in Once Upon a Time in the West after Clint Eastwood was the first choice for the part). A Fistful of Dollars was inspired and remade from Akira Kurosawa\'s Yojimbo(1961). Many crew members from A Fistful of Dollars ended up directing themselves like for instance, Fernando Di Leo, Duccio Tessari, and Massimo Dallamano. Sergio gives a colorful and crude portrayal of The Wild West around the Texas-Mexico border. Both A Fistful of Dollars and Yojimbo are based on an obscure Italian play called "the man with two masters". This was also the film that introduced the cinema world to film musician, Ennio Morricone. Although not as good as later films, A Fistful of Dollars is still a terrific Western', u'0.369651', u'This isn\'t that great of a movie. It\'s best known as the first of the Sergio Leone Westerns. It is no doubt the worst of his films. It\'s pretty clear it had a very low budget. Worth watching just because it\'s interesting to see both Leone and Eastwood develop their styles progressively through the "Dollar" trilogy. \n\nHere\'s what I liked:\n\n- Atmospheric music and high operatic style is of course the main positive quality of all Leone Westerns. \n\n- Eastwood is very good as the "Man With No Name".\n\n- Interesting scene where bandits dressed as American soldiers flip up the canvas on a covered wagon to reveal a machine gun, then surprise ambush a bunch of guys. Eastwood reused this idea in the beginning of "The Outlaw Josey Wales".\n\nHere\'s what I didn\'t like:\n\n- Plot was very disjointed and confusing with all the back and forth between the two families.\n\n- Too much gratuitous graphic violence.\n\n- Supporting acting was terrible.\n\n- Very few locations shots outside of the cheap town set.', u'-0.365111', u'Not many will be surprised that "A Fistful of Dollars", the first of Sergio Leone\'s famous trilogy, is in fact a replica (or if you prefer \'a westernisation of the westernised Samurai genre\') of Akira Kurosawa\'s famed Ronin drama "Yojimbo" (predating this movie by just a few years). The plot will also not come of any surprise, as multiple movies borrowed inspiration from the original Japanese movie. In a town overrun by thieves, crooks and murderers two families rule the wealth and life of its inhabitants: The Rojos and the Baxters. That is until one day an unnamed stranger (The Man Without a Name), concealed within an eternally memorable poncho, arrives on his horse. Offering his services to both sides in an attempt to dispose both of them...\n\nGiven how classic "Yojimbo" is and its undying relativity to international cinema, it is almost impossible to not draw any comparisons. And those almost without exception favour the Japanese original. "A Fistful of Dollars" lacks the artistic coherence that Kurosawa effortlessly instills into his movies, whilst at the same time keeping it funny, intriguing and well paced. Despite Leone\'s best intentions he fails to outdo "Yojimbo" in either of these departments, while the best scenes are almost shot by shot taken out of the Kurosawa original. Meanwhile most script changes or adjustment fail to improve the story. As a stand-alone piece these deficiencies could have been overlooked, but pasting from the master really causes all the flaws to become glaringly obvious. Especially since Kazuo Miyagawa\'s cinematography vastly overshadows Dallamano\'s and Larraya\'s feeble attempts to replicate.\n\nThe place where deficiencies are most obvious is in the acting department. Whereas Clint Eastwood\'s personality and scene presence allows him to go toe to toe with the legendary Toshiro Mifune, the rest of the cast fails to perform and gives some exceptionally cardboard characterisations. Whereas in "Yojimbo" the est ethical experience was a total package.\n\nThe sole place where Sergio Leone\'s movie is a sublime and meaningful improvement is the unforgettable music of Enrio Morricone.', u'-0.252644', u'Well, I was late to see this movie. I only checked it out after I saw it on the top lists here. At the moment I didn\'t know it was a remake of Yojimbo by Akira Kurosawa. By a quirky coincidence I saw the latter movie only a day later and must say: To call "For a Fistfull of Dollars" a remake is almost an understatement. It\'s a ripoff.\n\nThe story is a total clone (OK, this is to be expected with a remake). The sets and camera angles are nearly identical, and even the jokes are stolen. After this experience my appreciation of the western sharply dropped. This is too early to be a homage (only 3 years later) and too uninspired for a remake. \n\nHad the story and dialog been original I might have forgiven this movie it\'s small other failings (soundtrack, bad acting by everyone except Eastwood - and he\'s not really up to his usual standards here, either). But the way it is, there is really nothing to recommend the clone over the original.\n\nStill, the original is brilliant. Detracting from that all I have said doesn\'t make "For a Fistfull of Dollars" a bad movie - merely a mediocre one.\n\nMy advice: If you have the choice, go check out Yojimbo instead.\n\n5/10', u'-0.411161', u"A Fistful Of Dollars marked the start of the spaghetti western genre and launched Clint Eastwood's career. Until this film, Eastwood had been a bit player in numerous forgettable potboilers and the star of the modest TV western Rawhide. But his ultra-cool performance in this atmospheric western really sealed his long and lucrative future. The film also marked the emergence of Sergio Leone as a masterful director - the ultimate evidence of his talent coming a few years later with the stunning Once Upon A Time In The West. Here, Leone uses a dazzling array of close-ups and long shots, and fits the terrific Ennio Morricone score around the action, with considerable skill.\n\nThe simplistic plot is basically a borrowing of the Japanese movie Yojimbo. A tough, stolid, resourceful drifter named Joe (Clint Eastwood) arrives in the border town of San Miguel. He learns that the town is controlled by two feuding families - the Baxters and the Rojos. One one side, John Baxter (Wolfgang Lukschy) acts as the town's ineffective and respectless sheriff; on the other side, the Rojos have murdered and bullied their way to mock-aristocratic status under the guidance of the psychopathic Ramon Rojo (Gian Maria Volonte). Aided by a reluctant bartender and a considerably over-worked coffin maker, Joe cunningly plays each side off against each other. For each family he carries out various killings and other such dirty jobs, pocketing increasing amounts of money for his lethal services while showing no loyalty to either party. But his plans come unstuck when he learns that Ramon has taken a girlfriend named Marisol (Marianna Koch) against her will, forcing her to leave her husband and son and forbidding her from seeing them again. That kind of bullying Joe just won't stand for.....\n\nDripping with atmosphere and suspense, A Fistful Of Dollars was a totally new slant on the tired western genre in 1964. The minimalist plot actually becomes a strength rather than a weakness, lending the film an air of enigmatic mystery (reportedly Eastwood, at his own insistence, had his scant dialogue cut further in order to make Joe come across as the archetypal man of mystery). Gian Maria Volonte is excellent as the villain, giving a performance of real menace and cruelty as the despicable Ramon Rojo. And Ennio Morricone's simple but energetic score has since become an iconic piece of western movie music. A Fistful Of Dollars is an important western milestone. Admittedly, it steals its story from elsewhere and is full of far-fetched gunfights, but it oozes style and is so cleverly put together that its influence on subsequent movies is almost beyond measurement.", u'0.0850579'], u'tt0092067': [u"\nHayao Miyazaki has no equal when it comes to using hand-drawn animation as a form of storytelling, yet often he is being compared to Walt Disney.  That is just so unfair, because it becomes apparent by watching Miyazaki's films that he is the superior artist.  He really has a gift of thrilling both grownups and children, and Laputa is indeed one awesome ride.\n\nBut where can I begin to describe a movie so magical and breathtaking!  Miyazaki's works have never cease to amaze me.  Laputa is an adventure of a grand scale and I wonder how a film can be so packed with details and imagination.  Ask yourself this question: if you are a kid dreaming of an adventure so grand in scope and so magical, what would it be like?  The answer would be to strap yourself in some seat and watch Laputa, because it's truly a childhood fantasy come true.  Every minute of the movie is rich and engrossing ... from the train chase to the amazing air-flying sequences... and to the wonderous sight of the floating castle itself.  Not to mention the excellent score by Joe Hisaishi!  Everything you ever possibly want from an adventure movie is here.", u'0.793664', u"\nI have seen just about all of Miyazaki's films, and they are all beautiful and captivating. But this one rises above the rest. This movie totally impressed me!\n\nI fell in love with Pazu and Sheeta, and their sweet, caring friendship. They were what made the movie for me. Of course, the animation is also superb and the music captures the feelings in the film perfectly. But the characters are the shining point in this movie: they are so well developed and full of personality.\n\nNow, let me clarify: I'm really talking about the Japanese version of the movie (with English subs). While the English dub is good (mostly), it simply pales in comparison to the original language version. The voices are better, the dialogue, everything. So I suggest seeing (and hearing) the movie the way it originally was.\n", u'0.700068', u'This is one of the best animated family films of all time. Moreover, virtually all of the serious rivals for this title came from the same creative mind of Hiyao Miyazaki and his Studio Ghibli. Specifically, other great films include "My Neighbor Totoro" and "Kikki\'s Delivery Service." Spirited Away is quite good, but a bit too creepy for typical family fare - better for teenagers and adult. The one thing that sets "Laputa: Castle in the Sky" apart from other films by Miyazaki is that it is far more of a tension-filled adventure ride.\n\nWhy is this film so good? Because it\'s a complete package: the animation is very well done, and the story is truly engaging and compelling.\n\nMost Japanese anime is imaginative, but decidedly dark or cynical or violent; and the animation itself is often jerky, stylized, and juvenile. None of these problems plague Castle in the Sky. It has imagination to burn, and the characters are well drawn, if slightly exaggerated versions of realistic people. (None of those trench-coat wearing posers) There is plenty of adventure, but not blood and gore. The animation is smooth, detailed, and cinematic ally composed - not a lot of flat shots. The backgrounds are wonderful.\n\nThe voice acting in the dubbed English version is first rate, particularly the two leads, Pazo (James Van der Beek) and Sheeta (Anna Paquin). The sound engineering is great, too. Use your studio sound, if you\'ve got it.\n\nOne aspect that I particularly enjoyed is that much of the back story is left unexplained. Laputa was once inhabited, and is now abandoned. Why? We never know. We know as much as we need to know, and then we just have to accept the rest, which is easy to do because the invented world is so fully realized. Indeed, it is fair to say that the world is more fully realized than most of the minor characters, who are for the most part one-dimensional stock characters (e.g., gruff general, silly sidekick, kooky old miner, etc.) Highly recommended for people aged 6 to 60!', u'0.213741', u'I first saw this film when I was about 8 years old on TV in the UK (where it was called "Laupta: The Flying Island"). I absolutely loved it, and was heartbroken when it was repeated a while later and I missed it. I was enchanted by the story and characters, but most of all by the haunting and beautiful music. It would have been the original English dubbed version which I saw - sometimes erroneously referred to as the "Streamline Dub" (the dub was actually by Ghibli themselves and only distributed by Streamline) which is sadly unavailable except as part of a ridiculously expensive laser disc box-set.\n\nUnfortunately I feel that the release has been partly spoiled by Disney. The voice acting is OK but the dialogue doesn\'t have the same raw energy that the "streamline" dub or the original Japanese had, and I think James Van Der Beek sounds too old to play the lead. They have made some pointless alterations, such as changing the main character\'s name from "Pazu" to "Patzu", and added some dialogue. But worst of all I feel that they have ruined many scenes with intrusive music - the opening scene of the airships for example was originally silent but has been spoiled thanks to Disney\'s moronic requirement that there be music playing whenever anyone is not speaking, which I find annoying in many Disney films.\n\nThis film still blows away most recent animated films, and I cannot recommend it highly enough. The plot is simple yet captivating and the film shows a flair which is sadly missing from most modern mass-market, homogenized animation.', u'-0.415619', u'This is one of my all time favorite movies, PERIOD. I can\'t think of another movie that combines so many nice movie qualities like this one does. This flick has it all: Action, Adventure, Science Fiction, Good vs. Bad and even some Romance (without even an innocent "peck" on the cheek between the Pazu and Sheeta). Maybe best of all, you don\'t have to be in Mensa to "get it" and enjoy the movie like you do with some of Miyazaki\'s other movies (I don\'t know about you, but I watch movies to take a break from thinking). This is just a flat-out enjoyable movie that everyone will like, so do yourself a favor and go buy it. The only sour note is the American Dubbing. I found Vander-Geek to be just plain annoying. But all is not lost, the original Japanese version is on the two-disc set and it rocks! Who cares if you can\'t understand spoken Japanese? If you can read at a second-grade level then watch the original Japanese recording with English subtitles. You won\'t regret it.', u'0.0641372', u'Have you ever wished that you could escape your dull and stressful life at school or work and go on a magical adventure of your own, with one of your closest friends at your side, facing all sorts of dangers and villains, and unraveling the mystery of a lost civilization that\'s just waiting for someone to discover all its secrets? Even if you\'re not quite that much of a fantasy-lover, have you ever wished you could simply experience what it\'s like to be a kid again, and not have a care in the world, for just a couple of hours? \n\nThis is exactly what Miyazaki\'s "Castle in the Sky" is all about. Pazu, a young but very brave and ambitious engineer, lives a rustic life in a mining town until one day, a girl named Sheeta falls down from the sky like an angel and takes him on a journey to a place far beyond the clouds, while all the while they have pirates and military units hot on their trail. Simply put, it is just the incredible adventure that every kid dreams of at one point or another, and I can\'t help but feel my worries melt away every time I see it.\n\nAs it is one of Miyazaki\'s older works and takes much place in the everyday world, the film is not as visually spectacular or deep in its storyline as Spirited Away, Howl\'s Moving Castle, or even Princess Mononoke. Still, I find it difficult to say that any of these films are superior over the other, because all three of those films are, at some point or another, mystical to the point of being enigmatic, if not perplexing, especially for the youngest of viewers.\n\n"Castle in the Sky", on the other hand, doesn\'t try so much to be an allegory of any kind, and it\'s not a coming-of-age story either; it is instead quite possibly one of the best depictions of the inside of a child\'s mind I\'ve ever seen. Not only is the artwork beautiful, but the use of perspective from the kids\' eyes is just amazing; whether it\'s the panning up of the "camera" to see the enormous trees or clouds overhead, or the incredible sense of height from looking down at the ground or ocean while hundreds of feet in the air, I just can\'t help but FEEL like I\'m there with Pazu and Sheeta, just a kid in another world, far far away from reality.\n\nEven the kids themselves don\'t have a complex relationship that suggests a need for hope like Ashitaka/San or Chihiro/Haku; Sheeta is Pazu\'s angel, having literally fallen into his life from the sky one day, the absolutely perfect person for him right from the very start. As the film progresses, more and more of their true adventurous childhood spirit comes out through their kind words and beautifully realistic facial expressions. Not only are they an adorable reminder of who I used to be, but their endearing friendship never lets up throughout the whole film, only growing stronger all the way to the last frame. For that reason, I\'ve fallen in love with the two of them more than I have with any other Miyazaki couple.\n\nAt the same time, "Castle in the Sky" is such an easily accessible film because no matter what kind of casual moviegoer you may be, you\'ll be sure to find your fix here. Mystery, action, drama, comedy, suspense, sci-fi, romance, even some western...it\'s all here, just about everything people go to the movies for (except maybe horror). This why I can easily recommend it as a first Miyazaki film; it\'s perfect for those who have no expectations from having already seen the incredible otherworldliness of some of his more recent works.\n\nEven the ending song of the film, when translated into English, conveys the sense of longing for the discovery of some kind of lost civilization, and some kind of soul-mate, that could not be found in our mundane lives. "The reason I long for the many lights is that you are there in one of them...The earth spins, carrying you, carrying us both who\'ll surely meet." Miyazaki has always provided poetic lyrics to make ending songs out of Joe Hiasashi\'s gorgeous scores, but this is the only one I\'ve seen that\'s both a touching love song and an inspirational dream. I have found myself near tears just listening to it.\n\n"Castle in the Sky" may not be Miyazaki\'s most developed, spectacular, or meaningful work, but it\'s absolutely perfect for what it really was meant to be: a true vision of childhood fantasy, and a wonderful escape from reality for any adults who wish they could have the same wonderful sense of imagination they had when they were just carefree little kids. Sit back, relax, and love it for what it is.', u'0.479153', u'\nBy now you\'ve probably heard a bit about the new Disney dub of Miyazaki\'s classic film, Laputa: Castle In The Sky. During late summer of 1998, Disney released "Kiki\'s Delivery Service" on video which included a preview of the Laputa dub saying it was due out in "1999". It\'s obviously way past that year now, but the dub has been finally completed. And it\'s not "Laputa: Castle In The Sky", just "Castle In The Sky" for the dub, since Laputa is not such a nice word in Spanish (even though they use the word Laputa many times throughout the dub). You\'ve also probably heard that world renowned composer, Joe Hisaishi, who scored the movie originally, went back to rescore the excellent music with new arrangements. Laputa came out before My Neighbor Totoro and after Nausicaa of the Valley of the Wind, which began Studio Ghibli and it\'s long string of hits. And in my opinion, I think it\'s one of Miyazaki\'s best films with a powerful lesson tuckered inside this two hour and four minute gem. Laputa: Castle in the Sky is a film for all ages and I urge everyone to see it.\n\n\nFor those unfamiliar with Castle in the Sky\'s story, it begins right at the start and doesn\'t stop for the next two hours. The storytelling is so flawless and masterfully crafted, you see Miyazaki\'s true vision. And believe me, it\'s one fantastic one. The film begins with Sheeta, a girl with one helluva past as she is being held captive by the government on an airship. Sheeta holds the key to Laputa, the castle in the sky and a long lost civilization. The key to Laputa is a sacred pendant she has which is sought by many, namely the government, the military and the air pirate group, the Dola gang (who Sheeta and Pazu later befriend). Soon, the pirates attack the ship and she escapes during the raid. She falls a few thousand feet, but the fall is soft and thanks to her pendant. As she floats down from the sky, Pazu, an orphan boy who survives by working in the mines, sees Sheeta and catches her. The two become fast friends, but thanks to her pendant, the two get caught up in one huge thrill ride as the Dola gang and government try to capture Sheeta. One action sequence after another, we learn all of the character\'s motives and identities as we build to the emotional and action packed climax which will surely please all with it\'s fantastic animation and wonderful dialogue. Plus somewhat twisty surprise. I\nthink this film is simply remarkable and does hold for the two hour and four minute run time. The story is wonderful, as we peak into Hayao Miyazaki\'s animation which has no limits. The setting of the film is a combo of many time periods. It does seem to take place at the end of the 1800s, but it is some alternante universe which has advanced technology and weapons. Laputa is also surprisingly a funny film. The film has tons of hilarious moments, almost equal to the drama and action the film holds. I think the funniest part is a fight scene where Pazu\'s boss faces off against a pirate, and soon after a riot breaks out. It\'s funny as we see the men compare their strength and the music fits right in with it perfectly.\n\nNow let\'s talk about how the dub rates. An excellent cast give some great performances to bring these characters to life. Teen heartthrob James Van Der Beek plays the hero Pazu, who has a much more mature voice then in the Japanese version, where in the original he sounded more childlike. Either way, I think his voice is a nice fit with Pazu. Anna Paquin, the young Oscar winner from "The Piano", plays Sheeta. This is also a nice performance, but the voice is a bit uneven, she doesn\'t stay true to one accent. At times she sounds as American as apple pie, but at other times she sounds like someone from New Zealand. The performance I most enjoyed however was of Coris Leachman, who played Mama Dola. Not only is this an excellent performance, but the voice and emotion she gives the character really brings it to life. If there was ever a live action Laputa movie (G-d forbid), she would be the one to play her, you can just imagine her in the role (well, somewhat). Luke Skywalker himself, Mark Hamill is Muska, and this is another top rate Hamill performance. You may be familiar with Hamill from a long line of voice work after he did the original Star Wars movies, but he renders Muska to full evil. His voice sounds like his regular voice and mix of the Joker, who he played for many episodes on the animated Batman series. Rounding out the cast is voice character actor Jim Cummings, who does a great, gruff job as the general and Andy Dick and Mandy Patakin as members of the Dola gang.\n\n\nNow let me talk about what really makes this dub special, Joe Hisaishi\'s newly arranged music! For those who have never heard of him, Mr. Hisaishi does the music and like all of Miyazaki\'s films, the music is very memorable. Each of his scores has it\'s own personas which fits the particular film perfectly. Now, these new arrangements he has done are more "American like", which I think was the goal of the new recordings. Don\'t worry, the classic tunes of the Japanese version are still here in great form. The score, to me, sounds to be arranged like this is a Hollywood blockbuster. It has more power, it has more emphasis, it\'s clearer and deeper. The film\'s prologue, the first seconds where we are introduced to the airships, has some new music (I am not sure, but I believe when we first saw the ships there was no music at all). But a majority of the music has new backdrops and more background music to enjoy. Things seem very enhanced. In a powerful scene, the music is more stronger then in the original versions. In a calm scene, it\'s more calmer. Overall, I think many of you will be pleased with the new arrangements an mixes, I highly did myself, and personally think it helps improve the film. I prefer the new score over the old one, and I hope Disney will release or license the music rights to a full blown soundtrack.\n\nAnother plus side to the dub is that the story remains faithful, and much of the original Japanese lines are intact. In Kiki, I\'m sure a few lines where changed, and this is the same way, lines have been changed. But a majority are close or exactly the original lines and dialogue Miyazaki has written. I\nwas afraid some excellent lines would be butchered, but they were there intact. Some new lines have been added as well which help out. But I am not sure whether to consider this a good thing or a bad thing, Disney DID NOT translate the ending song, it was in Japanese. I was mortified when they did completely new songs for the Kiki dub, but with this version it\'s the original song... in Japanese. So I guess it\'s good it\'s still the original, but bad since a majority of people seeing this dub speak English.\n\nThere is a big down side to this dub, and it deals with how the voices match the character\'s lips. Of course in any dub it won\'t be perfect, but I think in Kiki and Mononoke the dubbing of lines to match were much better executed (and Disney had a little bit more time with this one...). Some of the time everything matches perfect, some of the time it doesn\'t completley match, and in a rare case, someone says something and the lips don\'t move at all (there\'s a scene where Sheeta chuckles and her mouth doesn\'t move one bit).\n\n\nAs far as things about the film itself, these are my thoughts. I thought the most amazing part of Laputa was the animation. From the opening sequence to the ending, the animation is so lush and detailed, you just have to watch in awe. You see the true nature of each character, true detail to their face with extreme close ups and action. You have to give a ton of credit for the effort that these animators put into this film. Everything is so well done and beautifully hand drawn, it\'s like a moving piece of art. And to think, this was done in the mid 1980\'s. The animation is quite different from Disney, Ghibli has it\'s own distinctive flare which is very different, but very good. And after all these years, the colors look as vibrant as ever. Laputa also has tons of action sequences, lots of plane dogfights plus a few on ground. These sequences are so well done and so intriguing, it\'s scary that they are comparable to a big budget action film. And the finale is just something you MUST see. The sound effects are pure and classic and fit explosions, guns firing and everything else well. And like all Miyazaki films, each one focuses on a different theme (i.g. Kiki: Confidence). This one has a great a lesson on greed and power. People don\'t realize how greed can take over you, and how having too much power isn\'t good. People are obsessed with power, and are greedy, and the main villian, Muska, greatly shows this.\n\n\nAll in all, Laputa: Castle In The Sky was a great film to begin with, and is now improved for the most part. I am glad a more mainstream audience now have the chance to see this classic animated film in all it\'s glory. With a great voice cast who put a lot into the film with the excellent redone musical score from Joe Hisaishi, Disney has done a nice job on this dub and is quite worthy. Though I think the voices matched the mouths better in the Kiki and Princess Mononoke Disney dubs, Castle In The Sky is still a great dub and is worth the long delays because now more can expierence a fantastic film.', u'0.525441', u"I first saw this back in the early 90s on UK TV, i did like it then but i missed the chance to tape it, many years passed but the film always stuck with me and i lost hope of seeing it TV again, the main thing that stuck with me was the end, the hole castle part really touched me, its easy to watch, has a great story, great music, the list goes on and on, its OK me saying how good it is but everyone will take there own best bits away with them once they have seen it, yes the animation is top notch and beautiful to watch, it does show its age in a very few parts but that has now become part of it beauty, i am so glad it has came out on DVD as it is one of my top 10 films of all time. Buy it or rent it just see it, best viewing is at night alone with drink and food in reach so you don't have to stop the film.\n\nEnjoy", u'0.638315', u"Laputa: castle in the sky is the bomb. The message is as strong as his newer works and more pure, fantastic and flying pirates how could it be any better! The art is totally amazing and the soundtrack, which is reused many times after this, (im not sure if this was the first time i heard it) and evokes in me the most emotional sentimental response of any movie soundtrack. Sheeta, the female lead in this movie is totally awesome and the boy, Pazu is also a great role-model--he lives on his own! The plot is classic Miyazaki. I won't give it away, but the end is really great. I rank this as one of Miyazaki's three best with Nausicaa and Spirited Away. Also you may want to check out Howl's Moving Castle when it comes out (sometime next year i hope) If you like Miyazaki check this one out as it readily available in the USA. Enjoy, Piper A", u'0.670485', u"It's always difficult to put a stamp on any film as being 'the best,' whether of all time, a certain genre, or what have you, but I believe a strong argument could be made that in fact, Laputa is the greatest animated film ever made. It is in my mind the masterwork of Hayao Miyazaki, the most talented of Japan's animated directors, and it best captures his strengths as a director, storyteller, and designer, as well as encapsulating all of his favorite underlying themes. The version I'm reviewing is the 2003 American dub (I know, sacrilege for a hard-core anime fan to not watch it in its native language); there is at least one other English language dub out there, I have it on VHS (I have no idea from what source), and that version is the single best dub I have ever encountered of any film. But I thought it better to concentrate on the version people can actually find.\n\nLaputa tells the story of a boy named Pazu (voiced by James Van Der Beek here), who's growing up in a mining town when one day a young girl named Sheeta (Anna Paquin) literally drops from the sky. It seems she is being pursued by a sinister government agent, Colonel Muska (Mark Hamill), who is more interested in the magical crystal that hangs around her neck. To keep things lively, there's also a wickedly funny pirate gang after the crystal, led by the aging but still boisterous Dola (Cloris Leachman). The plot revolves around the crystal's ability to reveal the location of the fabled flying city of Laputa, a potential treasure trove of scientific knowledge and hidden treasure. It's all very much in keeping with a fairy-tale setting, but Miyazaki knows exactly how far to take the story, and the plot is peppered with 'gosh-wow' moments and threaded with his customary morality and warnings about abusing the power of nature.\n\nThe design work on Laputa, nearly twenty years later, is still revolutionary. Flying machines of all sorts abound, utterly impossible but so meticulously designed that you instantly accept them without blinking. The world is set somewhere around the start of the twentieth century, with telegraphs and ancient motorcars alongside those wonderful impossible flying machines. But it is the city itself that is sheer brilliance in execution; Laputa is both the Garden of Eden and the Fire of Heaven itself, and in that juxtaposition lies its appeal, its power, and its danger.\n\nBesides being a thoughtfully designed and beautifully rendered film, Laputa is blessed with a wonderful sense of cinematography. From sweeping flying shots to high speed chases on tiny one-man flyers to ships submerging into the clouds as if they were water, Laputa displays a scope that most films \x96 even with the magic of CGI \x96 can only daydream about. Though we only see a small fraction of this world, its simple elegance extends beyond the borders of the frame and we have no trouble believing in it. The film also contains one of my favorite, if not the most exciting, action sequences ever: a guardian robot that fell to Earth is accidentally reactivated and wreaks havoc on the fortress it is kept in, all the while trying to protect Sheeta (who was the one who woke it up). Meanwhile, Pazu and the pirates swoop in on their little flying machines to snatch her, literally, from the jaws of destruction. From the horrific sight of the robot incinerating the countryside to the exhilarating last-second rescue, the entire sequence is a masterpiece of timing and camera angles and knowing exactly how far to take the audience.\n\nIt helps that Laputa has an amazing score. Composer Joe Hisaishi captures the wondrous beauty of this world, the dewy innocence, the exciting action, and the creepy otherworldliness of the flying city and its bizarre robot guardians. Though he re-recorded it for this DVD release (which IMO is not an improvement over his original score), adding pieces here and there, the score matches the visuals perfectly, a rare total union of sound and vision.\n\nThis isn't a bad dub. I'm inordinately fond of the older English dub, and this one over-explains things just a tad in spots, but I was almost shocked how closely these voices matched those (and those matched the Japanese pretty well). Dola in particular is hard to get right, but Leachman is spot on as the fiery old pirate woman (her sons aren't quite as good as the original). Paquin does a good job as Sheeta, and Mark Hamill, while I knew it was him early, is more than talented enough to do Muska (I liked the other English dub of Muska a little more, but Hamill's good). Much of the film rests on Pazu's shoulders, and Van Der Beek is wonderful. Listening to him made me think this crew must have had access to the other English dub, because VDB matches up very closely with the original Pazu. Although again watching a dub is grounds for excommunication among the otaku faithful, as much as I love this film, I don't think you're sacrificing a great deal simply watching this particular Anglicized version. John Lassiter of Pixar introduces it up front, and my suspicion is that he, like so many others, simply love this film so much that they tried very hard to ensure its high quality.\n\nMiyazaki has had success in America in recent years with Spirited Away and Mononoke (one of his few films I didn't care for), but to me Laputa is still his crowning achievement. Anyone familiar with his later work will almost certainly enjoy this earlier work, and again, this film is a master at the top of his form hitting on every cylinder. I'd pay big money to be able to see this on a large screen; while that will probably never happen, it's good to know that at least this classic has been preserved on DVD.", u'0.372976', u"\nThanks to the success of SPIRITED AWAY, I was recently able to obtain this title. In fact, thanks to SPIRITED, it is now available just about anywhere videos are sold, along with PRINCESS MONONOKE and KIKI'S DELIVERY SERVICE. (The warm and fuzzy MY NEIGHBOR TOTORO remains widely available, of course.) This one is a bit different, being a sci-fi adventure, but it retains many of the themes close to the director's heart so that it bears close ties to some of his other works. While not his best work by any means (that honor would fall to PRINCESS and SPIRITED), this is well worth viewing at least once, and possibly a second and third time. Kids of course will watch it over and over again. The music is by far the best of any of his existing films. It absolutely soars. (No pun intended, for those familiar with the plot.)  ", u'0.58105', u"Hayao Miyazaki name became prominent with Spitied Away, however what is often overlooked are director's first film efforts. Who remembers that Spielberg directed Duel or George Lucas directed THX 1138? I remember seeing fragments of this movie - almost certainly the last 45 minutes in late 80s and what stuck with me was the visual lushness of the design and animation. So when I found a copy in a well known store for \xa39 I couldn't resist but buy it. The odd thing is that the last 45 minutes of the movie do not tally with my memory of it (memory is funny that way).\n\nViewing this movie now with all the gained knowledge of artists portfolios is how very like Jean 'Moebius' Giraud some of the artwork is. I can only assume some influence here.\n\nWhen Pazu catches a falling girl (Sheeta) his adventure really begins - the quest for Laputa - a reference to Jonathan Swift's overlooked portion of Gulliver's Travels. With healthy references to Jules Verne it's a basic good vs. bad chase movie with the final portion having the heroes end up on Laputa.\n\nThis is the portion that is strongest in my memory - the 'pastoral' ecological aspect of Laputa returned to nature - the multitude of robots covered in moss beneath the giant tree. This is, in my opinion, the highlight of the movie - the views of the surface of Laputa, as opposed to the mechanised underground.\n\nAlthough this is the dichotomy of this movie - to show that even technology cannot overcome nature - the irony of the last robot tending the garden and animals. The ending of the movie Silent Running is almost exactly the same.\n\nIt is incredibly stylish, I would not say 'slick' - very beautiful and organic and a tremendous amount of detail in the buildings, airships and the design and look of just about everything.\n\nMyazaki is a true master of this kind of Japnanese anime. Buy this movie and treasure it.", u'0.374266', u'I first saw this film when I was about seven years old and was completely enchanted by it then but for years was unable to find out what the film was called. now i am twenty one and stumbled upon the film by accident about two weeks ago and bought a copy. although my memory of the film was a little hazy I was in no way disappointed by what I saw. the animation in this film is superb conjuring up an entire world that is so believable and so well animated that you are drawn in to the film by that alone. But this film also has a plot that will enchant and entertain adults and children alike. with a floating island, a mad general, a friendly pirate granny and a well constructed love story this film will not let you down I would recommend this film to any one.', u'0.892021', u"I know Anime. I've been into it long before it became a national phenomenon; i loved Ranma before most people knew what Dragonball Z even was. And just so you know I'm not bragging about my, let me say this: out of all the animes I've seen, Castle in the Sky is by far one of the best. It's obvious people say Spirited Away is the best, but I really disagree. Most people only know that movie because it one an Acedmy Award; this isn't an exaggeration - I've shown Princess Mononoke and Castle in the Sky to people who'd only ever seen Spirited Away, and they agree that the latter two are the superior of the three. Personally, I'd never thought that anything could compare to Princess Mononoke, until I finally saw Castle in the Sky. I still think that the prior is the better of the two, but Castle in the Sky is easily on par with it; in many ways, Castle has major elements that Mononoke was missing. In either case, if you've only seen Spirited Away, and think that that is Miyazaki's best film, be prepared to have your earth shaken.", u'0.0158159', u"Listening to the soundtrack at the moment, the images come back with a vividness that makes my longing for a dry eye very strong (in order to be able to type this). I've seen it twice thus far, and I should be ashamed for having seen it *only* twice.\n\nI've seen all Miyazaki & Studio Ghibli films, and they are invariably nothing less than masterpieces (except maybe for Nausicaa which was, even in the non-cut up version too premature compared to the nec-plus-ultra manga). Still, their strength sometimes becomes their weakness, as they tend to get too naive/positive (Chihiro), or, with more nuance, a bit too explicit/moralist (Mononoke). At least, compared to for example the other Ghibli master Takahata (Grave of the Fireflies / Only Yesterday / Raccoon Wars). But not this one.\n\nIn Laputa, Miyazaki pours all the brilliant storytelling that tellers of tales have gathered and perfected over the ages, combined with a bit of morale, but nicely interwoven with not only a completely transcendental atmosphere, but also with the humor and amusement of for example Totoro. Every single main character is perfectly portrayed with their doubts and fears and their qualities that help them overcome difficulties. The pacing is so perfect that I know of nothing except a black hole that would be able to exert such a gravitational pull on your whole being. The story sets out as an action flic with mysteries hinted at, but when the girl falls from the sky, unconscious, floating with the stone, and the main theme kicks in, you get a glimpse of the grand mystery you're about to uncover, but the story then settles and gradually, over a number of carefully selected scenes of action and serene beauty, builds to an unforgettable climax of melancholy, hope, beauty - like, following days of sombre gloom, finally seeing the horizon on a clear morning, knowing the path walked, seeing the distance ahead, but smiling at the mere fact of being able to catch a glimpse of it.\n\nIt is so like an exploding white light in your skull that if by the time the credits start rolling you have kept your eyes dry and your mind numb, you should see a therapist.\n\nDespite the fact that technically-image-wise some more recent Miyazakis might be more overwhelming, this to me remains his undisputed masterpiece. If you take a fraction of a second to realise that this was made back in 1986, you can only come to the conclusion that Hayao Miyazaki is a genius like a star that appears only once every 200 years. This of course has been suggested before, but to me this is his only film that can, on its own, fully illustrate that simple fact. If you miss this during your lifetime, you'll die with a huge gap - which would be a pity, as the coffin costs the same.", u'-0.0438756'], u'tt0198781': [u"\nWhile monsters in the closet may seem to be a scary reality for some children, `Monsters, Inc.' makes it light hearted by showing them it's all in a night's work.  The characters are as charming as the cast that speaks for them.\n\nIt's a learning experience children get to see how an industry works. Monsters, Inc. is an in-genius corporation that has scientifically learned how to channel children's screams into energy that is used for electrical power.  It has monster employees, an assembly line of doors (which give monsters access to children's bedrooms), a top-flight training program and some of the top Monsters in the scaring business.\n\nThere's a colorful Metropolis, filled with houses, buildings, businesses, cars and everything that makes a city run smoothly along with a population of colorful creatures.  One of the colorful groups of creatures is the yellow swat team.  Their job is to protect the Metropolis of Monsters, Inc. from human contamination.\n\nBut what happens when a human child mysteriously gets through the bedroom door and terrorizes the city with screams and boo's.  It's wondrous and funny.  In the mist of all this is industrial crime, brought on by greed. But, the story ends on a very happy note.\n\nJohn Goodman is the voice of `Sulley' a colorful large blue-green ape like monster who's the star Monsters, Inc. employee.  He's some type of monster, cut, cuddly, and he has a conscience that leads him to feelings of regret about scarring children.  He becomes attached to Boo (voice of Mary Gibbs) a\ncute, little big-eyed girl who is mysteriously brought to Monsters, Inc. and in his quest to return her home becomes very attached to her.\n\nSulley's best friend is Mike (voice of Billy Crystal) who's a funny looking green ball with stick legs and one huge eye.  His comedy is seen through out the movie.  Mike is Sulley's driving force, acting as his agent.  Mike's job is to make sure Sulley remains the top Monsters, Inc. employee. But when it comes to laughter Mike proves he's on top.\n\nMike's girl friend Celia (voice of Jennifer Tilley) is the stylish employee who has Mike's best interest at heart.  Her job is to keep him out of trouble.\n\nI give Monsters, Inc. a ten.  It is an animated movie that can be enjoyed by the whole family.  It makes for great family fun.\n", u'0.335035', u'\nMonsters, Inc.\n\nWe were all, at one time, scared of monsters under the bed. Shadows of clothes in the closet. Weird sounds outside in the trees. I remember thinking there were all kinds of monsters in my room - not as much under my bed as in the closet. And once again, Pixar, who brought us "Toy Story" 1 & 2, plays on both adults\' memories and children\'s dreams, making it equally enjoyable for both children and adults.\n\nJohn Goodman voices James P. Sullivan, known as "Sulley" to friends. He is a big, blue, hairy monster with horns on his head and hands the size of a watermelon. Billy Crystal is Mike Wazowski, his wisecracking, one-eyed best friend. Both of these monsters live in Monstropolis, a world where monsters roam freely. Their city is powered by a rare source of power - children\'s screams. That is where Monsters, Incorporated comes in. At Monsters, Inc., monsters like Sulley and Mike open portals into children\'s rooms - through closet doors - and scare the children, capturing their scream in a little yellow bottle. Sulley is the top-scarer, bringing in the most scares. But Randall (the always enjoyable - even when animated - Steve Buscemi), a wormy, multiple-armed lizard-monster with the ability to change appearances to its surroundings, is jealous of Sulley, and will attempt anything to get more scares...even if it means taking a child from the real world and bringing it into Monstropolis. But after the child escapes, Sulley and Mike reluctantly look after it, all the while trying to get it back to the real world before Mr. Waternoose (the late James Coburn) and others find out about the incident...\n\n"Monsters, Inc." does for monsters what "Toy Story" did for toys. Pixar once again not only expands our mind, but our very worlds. I respect their company and commitment values very much, as you can read in my "Toy Story" review. They stick to the values that made Disney films so family-friendly back in the fifties and sixties: Respect for the audience, respect for quality, and respect for the audience\'s INTELLIGENCE, something Disney, who has recently coughed up a bunch of lousy, thoughtless sequels, has forgotten. Now, I know that LEGALLY Disney is co-creator of "Toy Story" and "Monsters, Inc.," but they really are not. They just give Pixar the money and get their name branded on the front box of the film. And even then, I have heard multiple claims that Disney is very mean-spirited towards Pixar (read into sequel trouble for "Toy Story 3") and gives them the bare minimum.\n\nBut that is straying off the subject. "Monsters, Inc." is one of the most enjoyable animated films I have ever had the pleasure of viewing. I didn\'t enjoy it as much the first time, but I then bought it, and have since watched it many times. It is an instant classic. I will be watching it years from now, when I am old and frail and in a rocking chair. It ranks right up there with "Toy Story" 1 & 2, and all the OLDER Disney films from the 50\'s-70\'s. It has all the elements of a sweet, charming, emotional and pleasurably good-natured animated film. And, more coudos to Pixar: Thank you for not packing it full of the language and inappropriate content that Disney shoves into the dark recesses of their films nowadays.\n\nNot only has Pixar brought back the "Family Film" genre to what it should be, but it also redefines it. Pixar\'s animated films are some of the most thoughtful, imaginative and enjoyable animated films ever - not to mention 100 % family safe. Thank you, Pixar, for getting back on track.\n\n5/5 stars', u'0.101855', u"\nYou may admire the hair detail on Sully the Yeti's arm, but you will be amazed at the warmth of characterization in `Monsters, Inc.,' surpassing even the great `Shrek' earlier this year. Goodman and Crystal are a comedic team reminiscent of the zaniest Martin and Lewis days. Crystal's Borscht-belt routines brought smiles even to this jaded and admittedly tough-on-comedy critic.  I thought Eddie Murphy's donkey in `Shrek' was smart and funny; Crystal's one-eyed monster is even better with its wry and annoying wit.\n\nCleaning the environment of child contamination is a hilarious conceit that turns around the usual fears children have of monsters in closets.  It is also a chilling parallel to the challenge of removing anthrax from today's letters. Generally, the allegorical underpinnings of animation are natural for the medium, powerful like the images of the novel `Animal Farm' for political and sociological levels of meaning.  For example, the endless-door motif in this film is an ingenious metaphor for the scary and glorious possibilities the present and future hold for kids.\n\nEven before you see this feature, Pixar offers the short feature `For the Birds' -- a brilliant takeoff on Hitchcock's memorable film besides being a great commentary on diversity. The expressions around the animated eyes, as the little birds deal with the big bird interloper, are more expressive than those of most contemporary film actors, with the exception of Brando, Pacino, Depp, and Streep.\n\nThe short trailer for `Star Wars II: Attack of the Clones' may precede the showing as it did ours for an added delight.\n\n`Monsters, Inc.' is the best animated feature this year and one of the greatest of all time.\n", u'0.748132', u'\nUntil now I couldn\'t bring myself to believe that computer animation was the equal of either stop motion animation or hand-drawn animation.  All computer animated films looked a little (usually more than a little) too sterile, many were animated poorly ("Antz", "Shrek", "Final Fantasy"), and even the single unqualified success ("Toy Story 2") provided little evidence that a computer animated film COULD reach the heights other kinds of animation could.  "Toy Story 2" had flawless character animation, but nothing as inspired as the best in "Tarzan" (released the same year, although I could have chosen almost any other Disney cartoon to make my point); effective art direction, but nothing to match "Fantasia" or "The Nightmare Before Christmas".  And I thought that "Toy Story 2" was as good as the art was ever going to get.\n\nI was wrong.  This is far better.  And what\'s more, there\'s no sense whatever that the script (an unusually rich and uninhibited script) is bumping up against the limits of what the medium will allow.  It\'s now been proven that computer animation CAN be just as good as any other kind.  Whether it will be allowed to be in future is another question, but for now, I\'m hopeful.  What we have here is computer animation\'s first ENTIRELY unalloyed artistic delight, with every character gracefully and characteristically animated, every virtual set just right and pleasing to look at, and an eye-tickling mastery of colour, light and shade that I thought would forever elude CGI artists.\n\nIt\'s not fair to judge anything good as "Monsters, Inc." as though it were a children\'s movie, but I can\'t resist comparing it with "Shrek" - which emphatically IS a children\'s movie.  "Monsters, inc." is admittedly ABOUT children, in a sort of a way.  The inhabitants of Monstropolis rely on children\'s screams for their energy, and the central story is kicked off when one of the monsters accidentally brings a small child (which he calls "Boo") into the city.  But we never see things from her point of view.  We see things from the point of view of the monsters, who are all adults - and who, like most adults, see children as frightening, almost incomprehensible members of another species.  And they ARE.  To be sure, Wazowski comes to feel strong affection for Boo, but she never becomes more than a humanoid pet (which is not to demean the relationship).  This is a story about adults looking at childhood from the outside.\n\n"Shrek", of course, is a children\'s movie through and through.  Its attention span is short, it has an unthinking mean streak, and children will have a whale of a time watching the central characters (the bigger they are, the more fun it is) act childishly and make poo-poo jokes.  "Monsters, Inc." has too much genuine wit, characters too rich, a world with too much depth, and a story at once too coherent and too complicated, to be PRIMARILY a film for children.  This is not to say children won\'t like it.  Maybe they will.  (Who can say?)  Here\'s the bonus: if they DO like it, it will (unlike "Shrek") actually have a beneficial effect.  It will make them less frightened of the dark.', u'0.0651156', u'MONSTERS, INC. (2001) **** (Voices of: Billy Crystal, John Goodman, James Coburn, Jennifer Tilly, Steve Buscemi, Mary Gibbs, Bonnie Hunt, Bob Peterson, John Ratzenberger, Frank Oz, Steve Susskind, Jeff Pidgeon, Sam "Penguin" Black, Daniel R. Gerson. (Dir: Peter Docter/Co-directors: David Silverman, Lee Unkrich)\n\nThere\'s something undeniably magical about a Disney movie that brings out your inner child and the streak continues to manifest itself in the latest with its fine track record with upstarts Pixar (the "Toy Story " films) in delighting children of all ages in one of the year\'s funniest (and most fun) films.\n\nThe childhood phenomena of imagining monsters lurking in one\'s bedroom closet or under the bed is in actuality a reality that exists solely for the world of the monsters to use all the energy extracted from a child\'s screams as their natural resource to power their communities and subsist in their parallel universe. Specifically Scream Heat ("We Scare Because We Care"), the corporate entity that harnesses the youngsters\' reactions to its hard-working crew of creatures including our heroes James P. "Sulley" Sullivan (marvelously voiced by Goodman) and his best buddy Mike Wazowski (ditto Crystal). Sulley is a bear-like, blue and purple hairy and horned monster and Mike is a cyclopean lime green M&M clone. The two couldn\'t be more different yet both share their passion for their vocation and the only thing getting in their way is their rival colleague Randall Boggs (Buscemi, at his oiliest menacing), a reptilian nasty who wants to beat Sulley for the all-time factory record of most points racked up in a single day on the job \x85 at any cost. Watching the proceedings is Sulley\'s father-figure boss Henry J. Waternoose (Coburn) \x96 a cross between a crab and Edward G. Robinson \x96 whose main priority is avoiding any "rolling blackouts" (in one of the film\'s subtle jabs at the current climate in our nation). Mike is in love with cutie pie receptionist Celia (Tilly) who also sports one eye and is afoot taller than him, with a hairdo sporting a Medusa twist (snakes sit atop her head) who wants something from him besides excuses to their frequently put-upon dates together. One day after work Sulley accidentally lets into their world a tiny 4 year old girl \x96 a big no-no \x96 legend has it that one touch is toxic and fatal! \x96 which causes mass havoc wreaked upon the populace as the authorities attempt to corral the tyke while decontaminating the infected workshop\'s workers (a running gag has the SWAT like DEA agents popping in at a moment\'s notice whenever a sign of human contact \x96 i.e. a small cotton white sock attached to an unsuspecting monster \x96 makes its ugly presence known!) Mike is in a panicky sweat that they will lose their jobs and tells Sulley he can\'t hide Boo (the nickname the big guy dubs the adorable tot) and they must return her to her bedroom. Easier said than done when Randall gets wind of the partners abetting the unsuspecting crime and he too has his plans to use Boo for his own selfish endeavors\x85at any cost! The film is a laugh a minute romp and an incredible mix of state-of-the-art computer generated dynamics that truly enhance the candy-colored world of Mike & Sulley with its picture perfect depictions of moveable hair (see how Sulley\'s locks sway to and fro so naturally! A first for CGI imagery!) and expressiveness given to the one-eyed Mike who works his brow into a real sweat. Never before has voice talent been so perfectly matched and acted to a t than in the comic team of Crystal and Goodman with their characteristics smartly enhanced into their characters with Crystal\'s liberal use of his "SNL" Willy the Masochist ("Oh I hate when that happens!") and Goodman\'s burly, awshucks demeanor fits his soft-hearted meanie like a golden glove. Sulley is the true star of the show with his emotional overload not unlike a kid learning to make a new life transition as he discovers there\'s more to his existence than meets the eye (same for Mike; pun intended). When he realizes that Boo (by the way, nice job by the producers to use real-life 4 year old Gibbs, in easily the cutest turn by a child performer ever without making an audience gag) is not threatened by his hulking presence. The laughs are largely thanks to Crystal\'s myopic M&M who is always one-step behind his behemoth buddy and slow on the uptake as the plot proceeds with his sly one-liners, sudden bursts of unrestrained anger and confusion, and slapstick antics leads the film into uncharted territories of hysterical laughter and a great breakneck roller-coaster ride with Mike & Sulley attempting to find Boo\'s bedroom door with Randall in hot pursuit gives the film a giddy headrush of adrenaline. The film is witty, bright, upbeat and has its shares of incisiveness (I loved the use of HarryHausen\'s as a local chic eatery that all the monsters are dying to get into; in case of those who don\'t know Harryhausen, Ray Harryhausen, is the premier stop-motion animator pioneer who gave life to scores of sci-fi creatures including the fabled "Sinbad" flicks of the 1960s and 1970s among others) that will undoubtedly have its constituents clamoring for a sequel pronto. Arguably one of the best films and funniest of the year; I loved it and so will you (and your kids if you have any; if not all the more to see it again) An instant classic.', u'0.136331', u'"Monsters Inc" came out on DVD this week, and now I have my own copy!! It is not very useful to try to evaluate this one against others since such an evaluation is so subjective. But I put it in the same superb category that such animated films as "Toy Story", "A Bug\'s Life", "Shrek", and "Disney\'s Tarzan" are in. \n\nFirst, the quality of the animation and the picture quality. Unbelievably good. I can categorically say it is the best picture quality I have seen on DVD, and the movement and facial expressions of the animated characters makes it almost feel like they are real. \n\nSecond, the story. How inventive! The only thing separating the monster world from the real world are the doors. The company, Monsters Inc, must have millions of them in inventory, computerized for quick call-up to send in a monster to get screams and charge up their energy cells.\n\nThe main characters are voiced by John Goodman (big, blue, hairy "kitty" with purple spots) and Billy Crystal (short, green, one-eyed monster) and their acting add so much. Plus the great music provided by Randy Newman. Overall an hour and a half of pure edge of your seat entertainment. And that doesn\'t even include the 3+ hours of extras on the second disk. \n\nYou can select either standard or widescreen format, and I watched mine widescreen on a 16:9 HDTV with 5-channel surround system with powered subwoofer. Almost like being in a theater!!', u'0.212121', u'Pixar is the best! Of them all, Monsters, Inc. takes the cake. The realism of the characters\' movements & feelings is perfect. The ending is a tear jerker on a happy note. At first I was concerned with the plot of monsters scaring children with a "business as usual" attitude, but right away you discover that the monsters are as terrified of the kids as the kids are of monsters.... wonderful juxtaposition throughout the film... a totally enjoyable, feel-good story. Buy it for the kids and let them watch it over and over. (adults may want to sit-in on more than one occasion themselves). Personal Note: For me, a mystery about this film was "Roz"; the voice reminded me so strongly of the grandmother in "Dinosaurs", and I thought the character drawing was similar as well; upon researching the two, I found they are definitely different actors.', u'0.684749', u'The best way to describe this movie in one word is; fun! "Monsters, Inc." is a movie you can easily fall in love with. It has some great fun character, some awesome moments and some well placed comical moments. "Monsters, Inc." is entertainment at its bests.\n\nThe voice cast is amazing. John Goodman and Billy Crystal form a great leading duo. Steve Buscemi is a great villain and James Coburn has a great voice that fits his character perfectly. John Ratzenberger as always is very entertaining this time in a role as banished Yeti.\n\nThe story itself is pretty simple but thats what makes it easy to follow and so much fun to watch. The movie not only knows how to entertaining but also knows how and when to emote. The combination of fun and emotional things is perfectly balanced and placed within the movie.\n\nThere is some great dialog but the true power of "Monsters, Inc." are the wonderful characters. Not is there only a wild variety of strange and weird characters but also some characters that are good for some serious laughs and Boo is simply adorable and a pretty fair representation of a kid in real life. Well done Pixar!\n\nPure entertainment for the entire family!\n\n10/10\n\nhttp://bobafett1138.blogspot.com/', u'0.778066', u"I thought Billy Crystal and John Goodman were great. I like them anyway, but I can't imagine anyone else in their roles. John Goodman comes across as a warm, fuzzy teddy bear type in so many of his roles, and this time he was actually drawn that way. Crystal and Goodman were great together, even when their characters showed signs of not getting along. And Boo sounded so natural, so childlike. There's no way an adult could have done her lines the way they were executed.\n\nAnd the writing was so intelligent, this movie was not just for kids. There were a lot of clever jokes that kids might not get. Still, the warm and fuzzy qualities of so many of the monsters make this a perfect choice for kids as well as adults, and I really don't get why ABC couldn't give this a TV-G rating. It may have been a little violent or scary at times, but never all that intense. Kids see worse on Saturday morning.", u'-0.106466', u'This is a very entertaining animated film. I\'ve seen it twice and enjoyed even more the second time. Billy Crystal said he enjoyed making this film as much as any film he\'s ever done, so that\'s a good testimony that you\'ll get some laughs and enjoy this movie as an adult, too. \n\nKids will love it, I am sure. The "monsters" in here are funny-looking and almost lovable, nothing that would scare your kids (or you). Crystal has a bunch of funny lines but overall I found this to be as much if not more of a human interest story than a comedy. \n\nThere is a lot of sentimentality to it, even overdone a bit at the end, but that\'s okay. There is absolutely nothing offensive in here, either. The colors look spectacular, too.', u'0.413812', u'This is a resubmitted comment, the original was removed by a complaint from some anonymous aggrieved party. Let\'s hope the edits are sufficient this time.\n\nYou already know that this is the usual Pixar fare, which is to say that it is excellent, better than any non-Pixar animated film. Sure, you also know that and you probably know the usual reason given: that Pixar spends more time on basic storytelling values than anyone else.\n\nHere are two elements of this that may deepen your appreciation. The first is that Pixar recognized early that 3D animation software allowed two types of advance in the third dimension. The first is obvious, that everything has depth and reflection and shadow more or less like reality.\n\nThe second is that once these objects and scenes are defined in the computer, it is no extra work to move the camera anywhere. it can loop and swoop in ways that we never could have before. Pixar decided to exploit this in their storytelling here and later in "Nemo."\n\nNemo was set in an environment where there was no horizon so the camera could flow and the watery feel of the place could make the unfamiliar fluidity of the camera seem more natural. Here, is where they tested some of those perspectives in the three dimensional door warehouse and the extra dimensions of going in and out. Those scenes make this for me.\n\nThe second interesting thing is some competitive background. In those days, there was a shooting war between Bill Gates, financier of Dreamworks Animation (and leader of Microsoft) and Steve Jobs of Pixar (and leader of Apple). This was in the heyday of Gates\' dirty tricks and he was intent on burying Jobs forever. Pixar depended on the success of "A Bug\'s Life" their followon to "Toy Story," so Dreamworks rushed "Antz" -- a cheapy -- to open a week or so before to steal the market.\n\n"Bugs" prevailed, sufficiently at least, and Pixar ramped up for their usual three year development of "Monsters." Dreamworks, getting wind of this, went all out with "Shrek," their "monster" movie that could be released six months earlier. It only took a year because the animation is less perfect. But they were overt in their attack this time: "Shrek" made literal fun of Disney, the Pixar partner. The head guy at Disney was the model for the blowhard King who reigned over a fairytale kingdom populated with -- can you guess? -- all the old Disney characters.\n\nPixar/Jobs would never do something so spiteful. But perhaps they did subtly appreciate the use of windows and gates to the future that always seemed to go wrong. And now you can too.\n\nTed\'s Evaluation -- 3 of 3: Worth watching.', u'0.0636976', u'Pixar. With only seven movies you\'ve built yourself a reputation as the greatest current animation studio of them all. Dreamworks has made some good ones and 20th Century Fox\'s movies have made me chuckle a bit, and Disney has gone downhill in recent years. But you can consistently produce quality work with almost no stain on your track record (except A Bug\'s Life, the one Pixar movie I did not enjoy). But I\'ve lost track of my thoughts.I\'m here to talk about Monster\'s Inc., my personal favorite Pixar movie.\n\nI\'m a doodler myself, and wan\'t to be an animator someday. And I love drawing monsters. Weird looking, many armed, strange-eyed creatures. That may have been the 1st reason Monster\'s Inc. appealed to me. So many of these creatures looked like something I would draw, and I spent much of my movie time looking at the creatures in the background.\n\nI also was captivated by the world that was created in Inc. A big problem for me in Pixar\'s newest movie Cars was lack of real explanation for their universe, like how they built their buildings. In Monster\'s Inc. the monster world is explained so much more in depth, and we really believe this world could exist. There\'s a beauty in watching the thousands of closet doors zoom around and I always get goosebumps from watching the "scare montage", because I now know the mechanics of the world these creatures live in. \n\nThe characters in the world are also incredibly well realized. Mike and Sully both are easily relatable to, and even small characters have feelings and motivations we can understand. "Boo" actually behaves like a young child would, and that helped me believe she had real emotions. But the creature Randall is what stole the show for me. With his many arms, chameleon-like ability and sheer voice presence, it was hard for me to keep my eyes off of him. But what really made me love this movie so was the characters. When it comes time for the "sad part" of this movie, I was sad. I was actually seeing an animated cartoon that managed to make me feel for these animated creatures without being emotionally manipulative. And I\'m not afraid to admit that I cry 4 out of 5 times at the ending.\n\nSo, in the end, I can\'t recommend this film enough. I think this stands above all other Pixar productions and is definitely one of the best animated films I\'ve had the pleasure of seeing.', u'-0.035242', u"There's A Monster in My Closet!\n\nI would definitely recommend Monster's Inc. to people of various ages. Not only would I recommend this movie for its endless comedic scenes, but also because of its refreshing story line. The combination of these two elements makes this film relatable to everyone for we seem to seek for movies that allow us to express amusement or for a new plot. Furthermore, the unique characters added to the overall appearance of the film.\n\nI watched the film Monster's Inc. at the comfort of my own home on Saturday, November 13th, 2005 at approximately five o'clock in the afternoon as I listed my twenty dialectics and worked on my Film Reflection Journal.\n\nI recommend Monster's Inc. to anyone for it contained many comedic parts. I believe that people of all ages would relate to this film because it achieved to have both humor for children and adults. It has the simple amusing scenes that children would laugh at for example when Sully gets stuck in the trash can and books fall on his head and there were also the new generation, hilarious scenes that adults would get such as the scene with the Abominable snowman. Its story line was another factor that would make everyone admires the movie. It was unique in the sense that everything that happened in the film was nothing like any other movies that I have seen. The beginning started out with Mike and Sully doing their regular routine of getting up, greeting everyone monster they pass by, and going to work where they would scare children for the sake of Monstropolis. Then a child from the human world comes into their lives, which will eventually affect the city of Monstropolis including theirs.\n\nThe characters in the film were made for the purpose of having the audience see a whole different side of them rather than focusing on their appearances. People could relate to the characters for they showcased personalities that we would display. They showed traits like jealousy, greediness, love, caring, confidence, anger, and more. Being able to relate to these characters allows us to become more attached to the movie for we see ourselves in the figures that are in the screen. We tend to remember some parts of our lives when something similar occurs in the movie. The last parts of the film showed Sully and Mike getting chased by Randall, who was attempting to capture Boo. I remembered my aunts chasing my cousins and me as we rode around with tricycles in the Philippines. This brought back memories from when this happened to me.\n\nIn my opinion, I think that the movie would relate more to children than adults for some reasons. First, the characters were full of life and animated, which would suit the likings of children. It included a lonely but friendly Abominable snowman who wanted to be accepted. Secondly, the character of Boo speaks for every child who watched the film. There were probably some children who felt the same way that Boo did and possibly even have dealt with a similar problem. I know that I related with Boo because she brought me back to my past time when I had dilemmas with monsters at night. If I could relate to Boo, I know that other children will as well. The way that the monsters went to work and used the doors of children to enter their realm and scare them was a brilliant idea. This concept really tied the whole movie together. It was a critical part of the film for this is where Sully and Mike met Boo. The way that they competed on who can gather the most screams from children affected the movie in a positive way for it added more comedic parts in it.\n\nIf you are looking for an animated yet memorable movie to watch that contains drama and comedy, Monster's Inc. is the film to choose.", u'0.0463954', u'This film is great. It made me laugh out loud and made me feel sad when I was supposed to too. The monsters all live in a city called Monstropolis and they need the screams of children to power everything. Sully (the big blue furry monster) is the top scarer and he and his one-eyed green friend Mike work together at "Monsters, Incorporated" gathering screams. The monsters are terrified of the children however, thinking that if they get touched by a child they will die. One of the children (she ends up being known as Boo) gets into the monster world and everyone goes into a panic. Sully and Mike must return her to her home before she gets caught. Boo is a cute little character and that\'s a lot coming from me (I am not a huge fan of small children - it may be because she isn\'t real). There is also an evil creepy monster called Randal who is planning on kidnapping children to harvest as much scream as possible. The animation was great, I am always amazed at the patience that must go into animating hair, Sully is very hairy. As with all Pixar films there are "bloopers" during the credits which were really funny. With some of the rubbish that Disney seems to be coming out with (Little Mermaid 2, Jungle Book 2 anyone?), Disney/Pixar has to be the wave of the future.', u'-0.409969', u"\nMonsters Mike Wazowski and Sulley are the best scare team in Monsters Inc.  The company catches the screams of children to power the city of Monstropolis.  However Sulley's main rival, Randall Boggs is up to no good and is working the rooms after the factory is shut.  Sulley stays late one night to find a door has been left open and that a highly dangerous little girl gets trapped on the wrong side of the door.  With the contamination unit closing in on them, Mike and Sulley must get the girl back into her room and uncover Randall's plot.\n\nFrom the Toy Story producing Pixar comes yet another child/adult cartoon.  The story here will satisfy adults and children but it feels like an excuse for things to happen rather than a story in itself.  Where Toy Story had layers of story this is quite straightforward.  That's not to say it's not good, but it is more aimed towards the children than the adults.\n\nSimilarly the majority of the comedy is aimed at children.  The only consistent laughs for adults come from the original `one-eyed monster' (where was that joke!?) Mike - he delivers plenty of funny lines and his musical over the outtakes is the funniest thing in the whole film.  The problem is that it doesn't have Toy Story's spread of backup characters to deliver one-liners, here we have the three main characters and a couple of baddies, other than that there are no really good support roles - even Celia is wasted as Mike's love interest.\n\nThere are still more laughs than many real comedies!  But it's unfortunate that it's only left to Mike to carry the adult humour.  The animation here has really advanced from Toy Story - just check out Sulley's hairy coat to see the detail.  At times you forget it's a cartoon - the characters and backgrounds just look so very real.  The final chase through the many doors of the factory is really exciting visually and is pleasing to all.\n\nA great voice cast includes Crystal, Goodman, Coburn, Buscemi, and Tilly all do well, but Crystal is the only one that has much to do and he comes away with all the praise.\n\nOverall it is aimed more at kids than adults and it's not near the heights of Toy Story.  However there is still lots to enjoy for all ages.", u'0.0594847'], u'tt0848228': [u'Have movies become so bad these days that a merely well-executed totally formulaic film, like "The Avengers," is heralded as an exceptional film?\n\nSure, this film hits all the marks and has some good one-liners, but once we expected films to be refreshing and new. "Star Wars," while having obvious flaws, provided us a totally new universe with its own unique political conflicts, worlds, and even its own theology (the force). Its first twenty-minutes is mostly watching the story of a robotic English dandy (C3-P0) argue with a chirping rolling trashcan (R2-D2), but amazingly enough Lucas made that unique and crazy idea entertaining. The plot of "The Avengers" is just your run-of-the-mill comic book story-line. Compare its plot to that of "Inception" or "The Matrix" or even "Back to the Future" or "The Good, the Bad, and the Ugly." Much of what makes those films so great is that their plots are highly innovative. You have no idea where they are going. You always know exactly where "The Avengers" is going. \n\nAlong these same lines, "Psycho," "The Empire Strikes Back," "The Matrix," etc. provide classic twists--Norman has gone insane and has, in his mind, become his mother, the film\'s apparent killer; Darth Vader, the film\'s main villain, is revealed to be Luke\'s father; the first half of "The Matrix" turns out to have transpired in a totally false reality. Nobody expected these twists. What unexpected occurs in "The Avengers"? Even its minor twists have appeared in other recent films. Its most significant--Loki allowing his own capture--comes straight from "The Dark Knight."\n\nGangster films before "The Godfather" were just pulp. "The Godfather" transcended the genre just as "Unforgiven" did with Westerns. The same is true about "The Dark Knight." "The Avengers" doesn\'t transcend; it regurgitates a done-to-death plot. Unlike "The Avengers," "The Dark Knight" was more than a comic book film. It was entertaining, compelling, yet it explored complex moral ideas, and its plot went in innovative directions. Did anyone know that "The Dark Knight" would end not with a fistfight but instead with a battle between the Joker and Batman for Harvey Dent\'s soul, a scene that leaves it open to interpretation whether the Joker or Batman really won in the end, a scene far more compelling than any sequence of destruction could ever be? And did anyone NOT know that "The Avengers" would end with a huge battle with the Avengers ultimately triumphant? Uncertainty about how a plot will be resolved is what once kept the audience hooked, not the continual spectacle of fights and explosions. In fact, look at the IMDb Top 250. With how many of these films would you know exactly how they\'d end if you were seeing them for the first time? In fact, apart from the cartoons, is there a single entry as totally formulaic as "The Avengers" is? \n\nAnd let\'s not forget, did you ever worry that any of the Avengers would not survive? If not, then where was the real dramatic tension? One of the things that made "The Dark Knight" so compelling is that one of its two heroes not only dies but is also believably turned evil before he is killed. And did anyone expect what happened to Rachel Dawes, Harvey Dent\'s girlfriend? One of the things that made "Psycho" so dramatic is its main protagonist dies halfway through the film. Great films--serious or fun--must make the audience feel that there is something truly at stake. \n\nAnd do I even have to go into how voting to give "The Avengers" a 10 places it on par with the all-time great works of film art--"One Flew Over the Cuckoo\'s Nest," "Schindler\'s List," "Taxi Driver," "Apocalypse Now," "Citizen Kane", "Vertigo," "Crimes and Misdemeanors," "8 1/2," "Manhattan," "Cinema Paradiso" etc.? A vote of 10 for a film like this diminishes the worth of these works of art that explore the deepest issues concerning the human condition.\n\nThough I\'ve brought up some films that are darker than "The Avengers" or more serious, that is not my complaint about "The Avengers" at all. "Star Wars, " "The Empire Strikes Back," "Back to the Future," "The Good, the Bad, and the Ugly" were fun movies, but they also had plots that went in unexpected directions, had surprising twists, introduced us to unique characters. The elements I\'ve listed here are what make a film exceptional and deserving of an incredibly high rating. Just a well-done totally formulaic movie like "The Avengers" simply does not deserve the praise it is getting. Of course this film does not deserve a 1 out of 10. I would really give it 3 or maybe 3 1/2 out of 5 stars, which is equivalent to a 6 or 7 out of 10 on the IMDb rating scale. However, until others don\'t alter their votes to put "The Avengers" more in line with where it should be in comparison to other great entertaining films of history, my vote will remain a 1. \n\nGo watch "The Avengers" a few more times. Once you\'ve gotten used to the 3-D, the special effects, the digital surround sound, you\'ll see that the film is predictable, the jokes are so-so, and the violence of the fights and of the long climactic end battle actually gets kind of boring.\n\nIf you\'re a teenager still reading comics or a lover of comic books who\'s always dreamed of watching Hulk fight Thor, Thor fight Iron Man, then this movie is what you\'ve always been waiting for, but for the rest of us, "The Avengers" is not the tour de force it\'s been made out to be. \n\nOh wait a sec. \n\nI just learned that there\'s a movie based on "Battleship"--you know, that dull board game for eight-year-olds. I guess movies really are that bad. If you compare "The Avengers" only to garbage like that, I guess it really does seem great.\n\nNever mind...', u'-0.0599097', u'I have got to tell anyone who will listen that this is one of THE best adventure movies I\'ve ever seen. It\'s almost impossible to convey how pumped I am now that I\'ve seen it. I purposefully avoid hyping myself for movies because when expectations are too high, nothing seems to be able to reach them. I usually avoid the hype train whenever possible. That said, I was jacked to see this movie and was fully aboard the hype train. It couldn\'t be helped. So, I was certainly open to intense disappointment had this movie not been good. I\'m so happy to report just the opposite has happened.\n\nThe only word I can think of to describe this movie is AWESOME. It\'s amazing work and everything I had hoped for and more. It\'s exceptional entertainment for the uninitiated but it has everything a fanboy could want to be sure. It has every little nuance of what a fanboy wants to see. One of the MANY things I loved was the tension and flat out conflict that arises between team members. It\'s not a two dimensional "team wonderful that bands together to fight crime ho ho ho." Most don\'t like each other at fist and there is so much texture to be played. That is great because so many of these characters are larger than life. They have egos and the big guns aren\'t used to working with other people or even playing by the rules. Stark, Thor and Banner all work "the other side of the fence" so to speak. Then there\'s the Widow, Hawkeye and Captain America who are used to following orders and playing within a command structure. They are all thrown together in a wonderful and, best of all, believable fashion. Again, more than I ever dreamed possible.\n\nThe entire cast really delivered. You needed more than just action actors or stunt doubles to play all these parts. The pathos is there but so are the timing and true deep performances. Look, I was missing Ed Norton as much as anyone on that hype train I talked about but I\'m so happy to say that Mark Ruffalo won me over. I hope he\'s locked up for the long haul because we don\'t need any more changes. Three was the lucky number for movie Banners. Every other actor in Avnegers that we\'ve seen before is BETTER than their previous incarnation (EVERY single one) with the possible exception of RDJ as Stark. He\'s great but it\'s hard to top his take on the character from the original Iron Man in an ensemble movie. I also have to fully disclose that I\'m insanely attracted to Scarlett Johansson. I thought her Widow character was amazing but I\'m definitely judging that through rose colored glasses. The character arcs that run there course during this film will surprise a lot of general audiences expecting nothing more than a Transformers type popcorn scarfdown.\n\nI honestly don\'t want to give away ANY of the movie with this review because this is one film that needs every scene to be savored. Do yourself a favor and remain unspoiled. It\'s how I saw the movie (apart from what the trailers showed) and even though you\'re obviously reading this review, read no others with any kind of spoilers whatsoever. Experience the awesomeness for yourself. Avengers as a movie and as a team on screen is an unstoppable force. I\'m just going to say, Hulk & Thor combination equals AWESOME and leave it at that. This movie defines MUST SEE.', u'0.135076', u'I\'m sorry to say The Avengers isn\'t a good movie; it\'s a GREAT \r MOVIE!!!! It\'s not only the best team superhero movie ever made, but it \r may just be the best comic book adaption made period!\r \r\nThe Avengers is the culmination of what began in Iron Man; and \r continued through The Incredible Hulk, Iron Man 2, Thor and Captain \r America. It was only a few years ago that my son and I had just \r finished watching Iron Man and as the credits were ending, Samuel L. \r Jackson appeared on screen as Nick Fury and spoke to Tony Stark about \r joining Avengers Initiative\x85in that short scene, the framework for \r potentially the greatest comic book movie of all-time had begun! \r \r\nDirector Joss Whedon, most known for the T.V. series Buffy The Vampire \r Slayer, takes the foundation that was built in the prior films and \r brings together the greatest team of superheroes in film history, The \r Avengers: Iron Man/Tony Stark (Robert Downey Jr.), Captain \r America/Steve Rogers (Chris Evans), Thor (Chris Hemsworth), Hulk/Bruce \r Banner (Mark Ruffalo), Black Widow (Scarlett Johansson), and Hawkeye \r (Jeremy Renner) as "assembled" by Nick Fury. Whedon\'s scripts usually \r include clever banter, gripping action sequences and an air of mystery \r and The Avengers is no different. Whedon has an utter love for comic \r books, and it is proudly put on display in The Avengers.\r \r\nThe cast does a great job of bringing these iconic characters to life, \r beginning with Robert Downey Jr. Unlike Iron Man 2, in which Downey \r seemed to skate through scene after scene, Downey plays Stark almost \r effortlessly, delivering his lines with relative ease allowing his \r charisma, charm and smugness to shine through; Robert Downey Jr. IS \r Tony Stark! Chris Evans\' solidifies himself in the role of Captain \r America. He was very good in his solo film, but truly owns the role \r standing alongside Iron Man and Thor. Chris Hemsworth\'s Asgardian god \r Thor has some incredible battle scenes and indirectly provides one of \r the film\'s most funny moments. After being seriously underutilized in \r Iron Man 2, Scarlett Johansson\'s Black Widow is provided a back-story, \r which helps in developing the character and provides an opportunity to \r prove she is much more than just a pretty face; she\'s as dangerous \r psychologically as she is physically. I could envision myself enjoying \r a beat-down at the hands (and feet) of Black Widow. The character I was \r most concerned about being given little story and the least amount of \r screen time was Jeremy Renner\'s Hawkeye; happily, he\'s not left by the \r wayside and does a more than admirable job of developing the character. \r Hawkeye stands alongside Robin Hood and Katniss Everdene (The Hunger \r Games) as the best archers to grace the silver screen. I\'d like to see \r more of him in a film of his own. Mark Ruffalo, the most recent choice \r to play Hulk, is far better suited to the role than Eric Bana (The \r Hulk) and Ed Norton Jr (The Incredible Hulk). Ruffalo looks more the \r part of the nerdy scientist Banner and plays the part without looking \r angry in every scene. In The Avengers, the Hulk is at his most \r impressive, both in his on-screen transformation and the violence he \r displays when the opportunity calls for him to "hulk out". If any \r character appeared to stand out a little bit more than the others, for \r me it was the Hulk. Samuel L. Jackson\'s Nick Fury is finally more than \r just the guy making surprise appearances. Fury is finally able to \r stretch his legs some, and Jackson slides quite easily into the role. \r Clark Gregg\'s Agent Caulson returns, and Cobie Smulders makes her \r Marvel films debut as Agent Maria Hill, and she is a welcome addition. \r The film\'s main villain is Thor\'s adopted-brother Loki, played by Tom \r Hiddleston. You would think the part would be a difficult one to play \r being opposite such powerful personalities and strong characters, but \r Hiddleston does a fantastic job; the performance should not go \r unnoticed, because it\'s one of the strong points of the film. Loki is \r not a villain without purpose and Hiddleston comes across as a devious \r mastermind without being cartoonish.\r \r\nAt a running-time of 2+ hours, The Avengers is well paced and time \r flies by. The effects are top-notch, the acting is very good, and the \r script drives the movie elevating its strengths. For viewers that may \r not have seen any of the other films (and if so, why not!?!?), we\'re \r provided just enough information to bring everyone up to speed without \r feeling overdone. Whedon provides more than just a standard comic book \r film, but a story with reason that\'s backed up with incredible action \r and humor. \r \r\nAlthough the film is filled with larger than life characters, none are \r short changed; each character is given at least one great scene to work \r with, and the opportunities don\'t go to waste. The film\'s finale \r provides a deafening crescendo of action that is breathtaking. As usual \r with Marvel films, be sure to stay around for the post credit sequence, \r which provides a surprising reveal.\r \r\nI went into The Avengers with unfairly high expectations, due to all of \r those that were involved, as well as the films that came before it. \r After viewing the initial trailers and not being blown away, I had set \r myself up for disappointment. It was only a matter of minutes after the \r film started that I was put at ease, and just minutes later when my \r expectations were blown away. I never imagined that it was possible to \r put onto the screen, what I was watching. I\'m happy that Marvel had the \r sense to keep these properties to themselves and to move forward with \r these characters in the manner in which they did. Marvel Studios and \r Disney are going to make a boatload of money off this film, and \r deservedly so; because there\'s never been another movie made of its \r caliber.\r \r\nGrade: A+\r \r\n', u'0.410372', u'LA Review of \'The Avengers\' (No spoilers)\n\nI was lucky enough to attend the Marvel screening of \'The Avengers\' on Saturday morning in Century City, CA. This was an unusual screening as movies of this caliber are not screened some three weeks before it\'s release date. Just minutes before the movie started, we were all surprised when writer/director Joss Whedon walked in with Kevin Feige to introduced their little "Justice League" movie. Not only did we all laugh, but some booed. lol. If that wasn\'t enough of a surprise, the soft spoken Whedon introduced on stage Chris Hemsworth (Thor), Tom Hiddleston (Loki), Clark Gregg (Agent Coulson) and Cobie Smulders (Agent Maria Hill). Wow is she stunning in person! The audience gave them all a standing ovation with deafening cheers! (This explained why the secret service like security were searching, wanding everyone. No cameras, cell phones, nothing was allowed in.) What a nice surprise for an early Saturday morning screening. \n\nI\'ve never read comic books. This is a comic book movie. It was made for hardcore fans of comics, and I appreciate the care Joss Whedon gives to this movie. It was very entertaining to see Tony Stark (Iron Man), Thor, Dr. Bruce Banner (Hulk), Steve Rogers (Captain America), Natasha Romanoff (Black Widow), Clint Barton (Hawkeye), Agent Maria Hill, Agent Phil Coulson and Director Nick Fury all interact with one another. \n\nCapt. Steve Rogers was fighting in WWII just yesterday. Having been recently awoken from his frozen sleep, he struggles to fit in our modern world with all this technology around us. The God of Thunder, Thor, is not from this world (realm) and doesn\'t understand modern technology on Earth as well. Dr. Bruce Banner has been on the run from the government, practicing medicine in third world countries. He hasn\'t been the Hulk in two years (What\'s his secret? ;). Tony Stark is still the same, playing with this high tech toys and inventing new technology. So how do you get them all to interact and play well together? Well, Director Joss Whedon is the secret to making it all work. \n\nThe highlight of the film for me is how Joss Whedon has all these characters interact. Deep character development was not needed for this film. (That is what the respective movies are for: Thor, Iron Man, The Incredible Hulk, Captain America: The First Avenger) He does a great job of not forcing dialogue, and the interaction of the characters is much more organic than I would have ever anticipated. That is where Whedon deserves the most credit. He took what appears to be a very silly premise, with silly looking characters and made it completely work. Seeing as the Avengers comics date back to the 1960s, you can tell he not only did his homework, but he really cares deeply for the material, and his passion definitely shows on- screen. \n\nThe movie is vastly entertaining. The Action scenes are amazing and satisfying. Nobody is short changed when it comes to the fighting or action sequences. I felt as if there was not a single bad performance. A couple of dialogue lines seemed off, but once you remember who the character is, and why they talk the way they do (think of where they come from), it all makes sense. Each respective character is true and honest to itself. Each of the characters brought their personality (from their respective movie) to the table. It is by far the best Marvel movie to date.\n\nSo who was my personal favorite character from the movie? Dr. Bruce Banner (played by Mark Ruffalo) of course! He is by far the BEST Bruce Banner/Hulk since Bill Bixby. His intelligence (genius) is unparalleled (greater than Tony Stark\'s) and his compassion for human lives is what drives the good side of his character. As a kid growing up, he was my favorite Marvel super hero. I enjoyed watching Bill Bixby play medical doctor/physicist Dr. David Banner on television. I\'d watch, terrified with my hands up to my face, as he transformed into the raging green hulk. Yet i was so fascinated with him being a scientist, helping those in need. When Mark Ruffalo was first announced to play Bruce Banner, i didn\'t know what to think of it. I knew that he\'s a good actor. All he needs is the right director to get the needed on-screen character out of him. I really hope they make an Incredible Hulk movie sequel starring Mark Ruffalo as Dr. Bruce Banner. Or at least, i vote for him to reprise his role in any sequel. He was a natural fit for this role. \n\nOverall, the best thing about these characters is that they are not silly twenty-something terrible actors who were chosen for on-screen eye candy. They all do a fine job of bringing these characters to life and their chemistry together works great. Assembled, they are unstoppable. When i heard an Avengers movie was rumored to be in the works, i was ecstatic. The day has finally come. Go see it. Thrice. 10/10 Stars.', u'0.372142', u'I was lucky enough to be included in the group to see the advanced screening in Melbourne on the 15th of April, 2012. And, firstly, I need to say a big thank-you to Disney and Marvel Studios.\n\nNow, the film... how can I even begin to explain how I feel about this film? It is, as the title of this review says a \'comic book triumph\'. I went into the film with very, very high expectations and I was not disappointed.\n\nSeeing Joss Whedon\'s direction and envisioning of the film come to life on the big screen is perfect. The script is amazingly detailed and laced with sharp wit a humor. The special effects are literally mind-blowing and the action scenes are both hard-hitting and beautifully choreographed.\n\nWhile all of these things (script, action, special effects and so on and so forth) are important... it\'s no good having them spot on if you don\'t have a cast that just isn\'t right. But fortunately, for fans and for the actors involved, Whedon\'s cast not only work brilliantly together but are perfectly comfortable wailing on each other and threatening each other all day and night.\n\nThe actors\' performances in "Marvel\'s The Avengers" are simply captivating and there are many instances where we get a glimpse further into their characters pasts and innermost feelings. Robert Downey Jr. will have you in stitches. Scarlett Johansson will have you staring in disbelief as she winds her way through sticky situations. And Tom Hiddleston will have you simply shaking in your seat with fear.\n\nAll in all, Marvel\'s The Avengers is a visual delight and I cannot wait to see it again, and again, and again. Marvel fans will not be disappointed, and something tells me that most of you will agree with me wholeheartedly.\n\nThe Avengers, assembled and awe-inspiring. Ten out of ten.', u'0.48792', u'If you\'re a fan of epic adventure movies, then this is your dream come true. This is the type of film you fantasized about growing up! It really is the ultimate superhero mash-up and it\'s done perfectly. The makers of this film certainly understand spectacle but they also get the intricacies and depth these type of characters can provide. That right there assures this instant classic will be thought of as the best as well as the biggest film of 2012. The depth of this movie really did surprise me. Even though the high quality of the actors involved and there previous work as these very same characters seemed to indicate otherwise, I was expecting a wild popcorn movie. I was wrong in thinking it was too much to convey in one film. I couldn\'t be more pleased because they balanced everything masterfully. Sure, there\'s the popcorn fun we were all expecting but there\'s also a definite soul to the film and a smart plot as well. It\'s truly a stupendous movie regardless of genre.\n\nMarvel did it, they pulled off the culmination of a master plan that\'s been taking shape for years. They deliver a movie the likes of which we\'ve never seen before and as good of a film that\'s ever been made in its genre.\n\nThere\'s a reason this grand of a movie has never been attempted before now. How do you fully flesh out, care about and establish this vast group and still deliver a fun, crisp and coherent story? It\'s extremely difficult to navigate that edge-of-your-seat excitement while at the same time caring about each one of the characters and their struggles. One of the most impressive aspects of The Avengers is that they managed to get each hero their time in the spotlight and their own character arc. Every single main lead steps up and is treated with remarkable intelligence and given room to shine.\n\nI loved that the stakes in this film are ridiculously high and the threat so impressive that there really is a need for these diverse characters to come together. That could have been a stumbling block in terms of story but it\'s treated just right. It\'s also a great idea that they chose to introduce all the characters to the audience as if you\'ve never seen them before. Sure, the other films set up and give depth to each character but even if you missed their solo films, you\'ll still know and care about them in this movie.\n\nIt\'s also wonderful that everything is as big as it should be. This truly is the comic book epic of our lifetime (the fanboy version of Gone With The Wind circa 1939 if you will) and it all shows up on screen. Everything looks GREAT and feels epic. The equipment (love that Helicarrier), the relationships, the stars, the characters themselves and the battles are all huge and as fully mesmerizing as they should be. There are scenes that are emotional and there are scenes that are going to make any audience member scream "BADASS!" and mean it.\n\nI\'m serious when I say that the big, explosive moments are as grand as they should be but it\'s the smaller character moments in this film that really take it to another level. At this point, we\'ve all seen how good some CG action can get but grounding it with a great story and with meaningful quieter moments is what makes a movie good. That\'s the ace up the Avengers sleeve. This is NOT some CGI video game movie. Cut out the action and I\'d still want to see this movie. So, it\'s safe to say that they are replicating the comic book experience on the big screen. Years of depth coupled with spectacle and advanced fiction is a treat for non-comic book and comic book fans alike. That\'s is The Avengers greatest power... the ability to entertain all comers!', u'0.574711', u'This remarkable movie easily fulfilled and then exceeded all expectations. I\'ve been waiting for this movie since Sam Jackson\'s character uttered those famous words after the first Iron Man film... Stark now knows he\'s not the only superhero in his world and it\'s as big a treat for our real world as it gets. Seeing the "Avenger Initiative" in action is as great as I would ever have hoped! Hell, who am I kidding, I\'ve been waiting to see this movie all my life. Who would\'ve thought years ago that ALL these characters could fit in to a film and all of them be done justice? It delivers greatness from scene one and has to be considered the best this genre has EVER produced. Truthfully, as good as some of the previous work has been from every studio, nothing else has come close. That\'s not hyperbole; I really think most will agree if they see it with an open mind. I loved this movie\'s depth, heart, humor, gravitas, action, performances, emotion and payoff. I honestly can\'t wait to see it again with the rest of the world later. Right now, I\'m simply basking in the greatness I just witnessed!', u'0.509577', u'I just saw the early screening for San Diego through the top 10 cities on facebook who got them. And suffice to say I am glad I was privileged enough to.\n\nFirst off, this hands down is the best Marvel movie ever. I don\'t say that lightly. And in terms of superhero movie with maybe the Nolan Batman series being tied with this, I thought Whedon did an amazing job to bring out all these characters in this one movie. I especially like what was done with Hawkeye and Black Widow just because those two didn\'t really have their individual movie with their back story. \n\nYou can tell when a comic book fan writes and directs a comic movie because it clearly showed in all areas of production for this film. Going into the film I honestly thought that a lot of the cool mutant action scenes would be strictly Iron Man and Captain America. But Whedon does such a great job giving each mutant their 15 mins of fame and by the end of it you seriously feel like "Wow this guy/chick is a badass" for every mutant. I will admit i am not a Hulk fan. I like the inner story for it but was never a fan of the films, show or comic. But Hulk\'s role in the movie is so awesome I became a fan just from it. \n\nIf any of you are Whedon fans then you guys/girls will love this movie. It has his M.O. written all over the humor and story presentation. And there were definitely parts in the movie where I thought "Wow this seems like Firefly and Serenity". And story aside, if you read, watched, or idolized Marvel superheros as a kid, the action alone will make you cheer just out of sheer nostalgia of imagining The Avengers or X-Men all together on the screen kicking ass. \n\nIn summation, I don\'t need to say you NEED to watch this movie because I think anybody who is anybody already knows they want to see this. All this review has done was just reaffirm the hype behind this movie. I don\'t say this much but job well done Marvel and Disney for hiring a writer/director who has the audaciousness to keep it honest and true for those most dedicated comic fans who are the backbone of Marvel comics being a success. And in this day and age of superhero movies and movies in general that is very hard to do. Cheers Joss Whedon!', u'0.560927', u"'Avengers Assemble' ('The Avengers') is a truly enjoyable superhero film that lives up to its hype and creates a story that allows for four of the greatest superheroes to connect in this mega-blockbuster extravaganza. Joss Whedon has created one of the most action-packed Marvel films to have graced the screen, full of humour, thrills and a great cast of characters, all of which impel this visual effects-driven spectacle. Whilst I had the great opportunity to watch this epic in the cinema in 3D, the film is equally as stunning on an average television set, with the final battle between the Avengers and Loki's army being one of the most spectacular scenes in a superhero movie. An impressive and remarkable fantastical superhero flick from Whedon.", u'0.973448', u"I'm happy to report that everything established in previous movies pays dividends in a big way. It's not that anyone needs to see those other Avenger solo films before seeing this gem but it certainly adds depth and texture to this amazing product. Not having to intro big main characters deeply allows the action to flow but also allows for better development. This also allows them to probe deeper into the character's personalities. This heightens the tension, so often missing from comic-book movies, and adds real weight to the story as well as the action sequences which are thrilling and often mesmerizing. The result is a film that's just flat out exceptional.\n\nOf course all the phenomenal heroes got to shine and the story accommodated them all perfectly. What I loved is that Marvel did it again with their main villain. Loki was just so wonderful and complex in this amazing movie. Spurned Loki masterfully dances on the fault lines of villainy and redemption. He always keep people guessing and. Again, that's just shear perfection coming from the god of mischief. He has such a mixture of emotional psychological complexity. You have somebody who's capable of thinking and strategizing at the speed of light, but underneath that is a deep well of pain that at any moment threatens to boil over and Tom Hiddleston plays it like the master he has become. This is Oscar worthy villain performance good.\n\nThe performances in this movie are as good as any I've ever seen in an adventure film. The great actors say that acting akin to playing tennis. The rally that they play with a new partner is completely different from one to the other. Each of these GREAT actors have such specific talents that it's fun to see them play off each other at different times in this movie. I think Whedon realized this as both director and writer and shuffled things around on purpose to play to strengths. It's just another wonderful aspect of this spectacular movie event.", u'0.5887', u"I just loved Marvel's Avengers. I thought it was smart and the impressive cast really delivered! This movie works on so many levels and makes you draw on just about all of your emotions. I don't remember when I enjoyed a movie this much! Such cool fantasy but what makes it extra special is following this film after all the other solo efforts from each character. I enjoyed the others films quite a bit but they all delivered something different. Seeing them blend together in Avengers and the sparks that resulted was the extra special treat. Example: They blended the grounded futurist (Tony Stark) with the Norse thunder god and his angry brother in a perfect way. Same could be said for every other character. It all works. In fact, it doesn't just fit, it's a symphony and that dyconomy and difference in characters are what makes it truly great. It's why this movie stands so tall above any other franchise at the moment. Things like Transformers, GI Joe and even Star Trek all operate with monotone restrictions. Avengers covers all angles and delivers depth with its fun.\n\nI haven't enjoyed a movie this much in years if not ever!", u'0.50317', u"The Avengers movie must be a dream come true to everyone. Seeing these superheroes uniting together to save the world in the big screen. While the heroes' stand alone films doesn't have that enough action, this movie executes more of their super abilities. It's really fun and exciting. A lot of people will cheer to their favorite superheroes. This is what all fans and moviegoers want in Avengers. More fighting, more explosions, more smashing, and more fun. In the end, you will crave for more because of its awesomeness. The Avengers is simply marvelous.\n\nOur modern blockbusters are just full of explosions that makes no sense, bland characters, and too long runtime. The runtime here is long but it's necessary. The storytelling is quite simple as it gets. We already knew who these characters are. The best part is when they develop their relationship to each other. This happened mostly in the second act. These scenes are funny and entertaining. It's more entertaining when there's Robert Downey Jr. stealing the show. Of course, he will always be like this. His chemistry with Bruce Banner is wonderful. Two geniuses working together. Other than that, the rest of the performances were also good. Chris Hemsworth is just mighty enough as Thor and Chris Evans is cool enough as Captain America. Scarlett Johansson is probably the weak link here. She's still sexy though.\n\nMaybe the only problem here is the secondary villains. They are not as dangerous or as threatening as they suppose to be which makes it too easy for Hulk to smash them. But it doesn't matter because there's Loki stealing all of his scenes once again. Tom Hiddleston is simply fantastic as Loki. The action is pretty awesome. It's suppose to be awesome! The Hulk nails it in these scenes. It's exciting to see him smash stuff with glory. While there's Iron Man flying, Thor wielding his hammer, Captain America throwing his shield, and Hawkeye shooting with his archer. More explosions, just what everyone wants. It's fantastically cool and fun.\n\nThere are still compelling moments and drama here but the main attraction of this film is the action and explosions. The film also cares about the characters which makes it reasonable for us to care about them and cheer to them. It's a rare kind of blockbuster these days. It has clever humor, awesome action, and really fun characters. It makes the Fans and Moviegoers happy and amazed. This is the kind of blockbuster that people should watch. This film is just cool and highly recommended to see this summer. Though, I still think the first Iron Man movie is the best of this set, but still, this is a big, fun experience you will have in the big screen.", u'0.46129', u"The danger with every superhero movie is that it will end up either horrifically unrealistic or unappealing to anyone over the age of ten. I am pleased to say that 'The Avengers' does not fall into either of these pitholes - in fact, it has to be awarded the title of one of the best films of 2012.\n\nThe actors were all amazingly casted in their respective roles and do an amazing job of creating intriguing and lovable characters. Many of them were reprising roles they had taken on in previous films - Captain America, Thor or Iron Man, for example - so we already had a good idea of how they would perform, but I feel they all exceeded expectations. Robert Downey Jr was incredible as the humorous yet conflicted Tony Stark/ Iron Man, and Chris Evans was brilliant as the confused, out-of-time Steve Rogers/ Captain America. Mark Ruffalo, the newbie of the cast, stepped into the role of Bruce Banner/ Hulk with great skill and dispersed all doubts as to his suitability. On the other side, Tom Hiddleston really has to be congratulated for his convincing and somehow relatable performance as the villain Loki, whose wit and tricks appealed to fans everywhere.\n\nThe special effects in this movie were undoubtedly excellent, and despite their need to be ostentatious never seemed unnecessarily unrealistic. The director Joss Whedon did a fabulous job and has created a cinematic classic that will be praised for years to come.", u'0.552096', u'"The tesseract has awakened." spoken in the opening scene, picks right up where \'Captain America: The First Avenger\' and \'Thor\' left off. S.H.E.I.L.D director Nick Fury (Samuel L. Jackson) is forced to call upon earths mightiest hero\'s to stop the self outcast Asgardian Loki.\n\nIron Man, Thor, Captain America, and The Incredible Hulk, along with Black Widow and Hawkeye, are the only hope to save the world from an invasion, and boy do they in an instant superhero classic. Possibly the best thing about The Avengers (or Avengers Assemble in the UK) is that each hero has grounded powers the exception being Thor (unless you count Hulk\'s strength as a super power), which makes the Marvel hero\'s more believable than their DC. counterparts.\n\nThere\'s drama, action, comedy, and some amazing CGI, and thankfully doesn\'t fall into the same category as the not so fantastic Fantastic 4 movies. Mark Ruffalo, replacing the underwhelming Ed Norton, excels as Bruce Banner/Hulk, which is without a doubt the best on screen version of the iconic hero after the awful 2003 \'Hulk\' movie and 2008\'s slightly improved \'The Incredible Hulk\', as well as Ruffalo and co star Robert Downey Jr. Playing Tony Stark/Iron Man for the 4th time, having some fantastic chemistry in a scene on-board the Hellcarrier.\n\nChris Evans plays Captain America perfectly as the man out of time, Chris Hemsworth is believable in his role as Loki\'s Brother (like in Thor) Scarlett Johansson is the surprise of the movie though with a lot of the action revolving around her Black Widow, the only major disappointment with The Avengers is that Jeremy Renner\'s Hawkeye is underused. That being said every hero gets decent screen time to justify their appearance as well as everyone having a big part to play in the fantastic final sequence.\n\nHowever, The Avengers towers over every superhero movie in recent memory with the only real challengers being X-Men and The Dark Knight Trilogy, Joss Whedons hit is sure to please Marvel fans and the everyday movie goer. Next up for Marvel studios, Iron Man 3, cant wait.\n\nBest quote in the movie: Loki:"How desperate are you that you call upon such such lost creatures to defend you?"\n\nIf you enjoyed watching: X-Men, Fantastic 4, Iron Man, Thor, Captain America: The First Avenger, The Incredible Hulk, you\'ll enjoy watching The Avengers (Avengers Assemble).', u'0.572695', u"I'll admit it, I was extremely doubtful about this film. I've loved Joss Whedon's work my entire life and I had enjoyed all the previous Marvel films that led up to this one, especially Iron Man. But the fact that they brought together all of these different characters from all these different movies and put them together in 2 1/2 hour film was unprecedented and almost seemed impossible. But the optimist in me got me to the theater with me expectations shaky. Once the film started I was quickly drawn in and once the title appeared on the screen I knew that Joss Whedon had done it. The Avengers is without a doubt my favorite Marvel film and even my favorite action film ever made. Whedon did a great job writing this masterful, witty script that ingeniously put together all these characters and made it flow perfectly. The actors did such a great job playing these characters again and it didn't seem like anyone was underutilized and everyone got a chance to be in the spotlight(especially the hulk). Once you see all of the characters assemble and fight the bad guys you can't help but fill with happiness. The entire movie was such a fun thrill ride from the beginning to the end and the ending battle scene was brilliantly done. I am extremely delighted to say that Joss Whedon has done the impossible and made one of the most entertaining movies ever made.", u'0.422488'], u'tt1454029': [u'I just returned from seeing a special preview of "The Help," which is due out in theaters this summer. \n\nOkay, so here\'s the truth: I\'m a middle-aged, white male... I didn\'t read the book and I assumed, based on the fact that this is a virtually an all-female cast, that this was some sort of chick flick. Boy, was I wrong! \n\nThis is an incredible film that not only pays justice to the bestseller on which it\'s based (according to those who have read the book AND seen the film), but is phenomenally cast, with exceptional performances by Viola Davis, Emma Stone, Octavia Spencer, Bryce Dallas Howard and Allison Janney. Veteran actresses Sissy Spacek and Cicely Tyson also deliver incredible performances. While Tyson\'s character is central to the storyline, her role comprises what seems to be a few, precious minutes of the 2:20 running time, she delivers, in my opinion, one of the most powerful and moving moments in the film...one in which she doesn\'t even utter a line (trust me, you\'ll know when you see it.)\n\nThe Help also delivers some very funny moments and will make you laugh. I\'ll go so far as to say that this film and a few of its cast members will draw some Oscar nominations. I certainly think this takes Stone into a whole new level.\n\nThe racial imbalances of 1963 are well illustrated in "The Help," and will, no doubt, underscore how far America has come, as well as how little progress we\'ve made in the last 50 years. Either way, this is a powerful movie that needs to be seen on the big screen as soon as you can get a ticket.', u'0.499405', u'If this film were total fiction bearing no relation to reality, it would still be worth seeing for the fine acting and production values--even if some of the young white women approached "Southern Gothic." \n\nBut it wasn\'t fiction--at least, the depiction of Southern society wasn\'t. As I watched I kept drifting back to small-town South Carolina in the 1950s, where I grew up. It was moving and disturbing to be reminded how black people were treated then--loved and yet "kept down in their place." Our neighborhood was all middle-class and every family had a maid. There were plenty of boys my age, we visited in each other\'s homes, and called every maid by her first name. One even started a baseball team for the little white boys, for which her reward was a visit by the Klan.\n\nOur maid helped my mother cook and clean. One of my parents picked her up and took her home every day--and she rode in the back seat. She ate her lunch in our kitchen--without being allowed to use our utensils. I remember her eating with her fingers. I do not remember ever seeing her use our bathrooms. I thought about that during the movie and truly cannot recall what she did, an embarrassing gap in memory.\n\nI do remember when my father was out of work and our maid had to be cut back to three days a week. I actually cried; she was a member of our family. When talk about civil rights began in the late 1950s, my mother became annoyed at our maid for getting "uppity." And so it went. We moved to central Florida in 1961, where there were no maids.\n\nTravel back in time with this film. It\'s quite real, and I highly recommend it.', u'-0.0801165', u'I just got back from a special-screening of "The Help" at my local movie theatre, so I thought that I might as well do a review for all of you who are wanting to see this movie when it comes out.\n\nNow, first off, I must admit that I have only read a portion of the book, but I definitely do know a lot about it. After watching the trailer, I was intrigued, so of course, I visited the IMDb boards to learn more about it. At first glance, the casting caught my attention big-time. Emma Stone as \'Skeeter\'? I bet most people were as shocked as I was to find out that she was cast as the main character -- but let me tell you what: the casting was superb! I could not have chosen a better cast than what was already chosen. There was amazing chemistry between both the antagonists and protagonists. I won\'t go into too much depth about the characters, but for me, Emma Stone, Jessica Chastain, Sissy Spacek, and Octavia Spencer were the shining stars of the movie.\n\nCasting: 9.5/10 I know that there has been an on-going issue about this movie from a lot of people claiming that "the blacks had to be \'saved\' by the whites" (pardon the language), or something along those lines. I have to agree that the trailer does give off that type of vibe -- Skeeter saving the colored-folks -- however, the movie tells and depicts otherwise - the colored-folks actually saved themselves. Minny and Aibileen, as well as the other colored-folks in the community, were the real "heroes" of the movie; they just needed someone to push them to their potential (Skeeter).\n\nI can not remember the last time I saw a movie that inspired me, made me cry, made me laugh, and made me sad, angry, and hopeful, all at the same time -- this is what "The Help" strides and aims for, without making it "cheesy". Without a doubt in my mind, there are definitely Oscar-worthy performances in this movie. Not only does this movie depict just the colored-folks\' side of the story, but it also equally shows the feelings of the white-folks, as well. So, you definitely get both sides of the story without it being more or less "mean" or "degrading" to any sides.\n\nThere are definitely a few awkward moments in the movie, but what movie doesn\'t have them? This movie started around 7:10 and ended around 9:20 -- about 2 hours and 10 minutes, give or take, if my calculations are correct. However, this movie only felt like it was an hour-long. It was so good that I didn\'t even know the two hours passed by until the theatre lights lid and the rolling credits began.\n\nAll in all, this is a DEFINITELY-MUST-SEE movie. I personally believe that it is one of the best movies of 2011. Go see it -- you will not regret it. If you have any questions, feel free to ask.\n\nMovie rating: 9/10', u'0.260896', u'Greetings again from the darkness. The film is based on the controversial best selling novel by Kathryn Stockett. It was controversial because it is the story of Jim Crow-era maids written by a white woman. Yes, the book is actually the fictionalized story of a white woman getting black maids to discuss their lives as maids for white folks. Rather than get into some politically correct dissertation on the book, movie or story, I will only comment on the film itself ... this very entertaining movie that also manages to deliver a timeless message.\n\nLet me first start by saying that this movie is incredibly well acted. It is quite rare to have so many developed characters in one movie. There are some characters we immediately connect with, while others draw our ire each time their face appears. The script and these fine actresses utilize humor to point out the shameful behavior of those who saw themselves as superior. The humor doesn\'t soften the ignorance or abuse, but it does make the film infinitely more watchable and entertaining. Please know this is not a documentary.\n\nMs. Stockett\'s novel has a very loyal following in addition to the naysayers. A two hour film must, of course, take short cuts and trim story lines. Still the key elements are present. Based in Jackson, Mississippi during Governor Ross Barnett\'s term we see the social shark, Hilly Holbrook (Bryce Dallas Howard), in her full glory of ignorance, entitlement and superiority. We see her minions and followers emulating her moves while trying to gain her approval.\n\nThe story takes off when Skeeter (Emma Stone) graduates from Ole Miss and returns home and takes a job at the local newspaper. Possessing observation skills and humanity that her lifelong friends can\'t comprehend, Skeeter desperately wants to tell a story from the perspective of the maids. As expected, the maids are hesitant, but Aibileen (Viola Davis) does relent. The stories begin to flow and soon the robust Minny (Octavia Spencer) joins in. Others soon follow their lead and Skeeter\'s education goes to an entirely new level.\n\nThat\'s really all of the story I care to discuss. The brilliance of this one is actually in the details ... individual scenes and moments of acting genius by most of the cast. In addition to those mentioned above, Jessica Chastain plays Celia, the "white trash" outcast who so desperately wants to be allowed back into the girls\' club. Ms. Chastain was seen a few weeks ago in the fabulous "Tree of Life" in quite a different role ... I would venture to say no actress will have two roles of such variance this year. Also, Allison Janney plays Skeeter\'s cancer-stricken mother, and Sissy Spacek is Hilly\'s mother who gets tossed aside before she is ready to go! The great Cicely Tyson makes a brief appearance as Constantine, Skeeter\'s childhood maid who was done so wrong after 29 years of service. Mary Steenburgen has a couple of scenes as a big NYC book publisher.\n\nAs a said, this is pure acting heaven, but I must single out Viola Davis and Octavia Spencer. Viola is so powerful at the beginning and end of the film, and Ms. Spencer is a force of nature during the middle. This movie is really their story and these two ladies make it fascinating, painful and a joy to behold. They both deserve recognition at Oscar time.\n\nThere are so many fantastic details to the film. At times, it is like watching a classic car show ... the late 50\'s and early 60\'s models are works of art. The wardrobe, hair and make-up are perfect in setting up the class differentials. The TV and radio segments provide context and timing with the deaths of Medger Evers and JFK. Even the books on Skeeter\'s shelf make a statement: To Kill a Mockingbird, Huck Finn, Native Son, and Gone With the Wind.\n\nThis story takes place 50 years ago and director Tate Taylor does an admirable job of bringing Stockett\'s novel to the big screen. Mr. Taylor is a longtime friend of Ms. Stockett\'s and was quite fortunate to get the directing rights. He doesn\'t disappoint. Sure the story is a bit glossy at times ... it is geared towards the masses. If you are looking for more depth, there are numerous documentaries available on the Civil Rights movement. If you are seeking a very entertaining movie that uses humor to tell a story and send a message, then this one\'s for you.', u'0.444819', u"I took our 12 year old daughter to see this movie and we both loved it. She was not thrilled when I told her we were going to see a film that told a story from the civil rights era but when we left she said she loved it because of the women's courage, their humor and the power of their friendships. We had never seen most of the actors which was refreshing and the acting by the entire cast made it easy to get totally involved. I laughed out loud and shed quite a few tears in The Help, and will remember it and recommend it to my friends. It was wonderful to see so many scenes in which the actors related to each other so perfectly. Even the vilest characters showed moments of conflict within themselves as they played out poor behavior that had long been inbred in them. I am especially grateful to the team who provided a film that told an engaging story about human relationships with important lessons for my daughter. That is a rare occurrence in today's movies.", u'0.626719', u'Recently the other Dude and I were discussing that not many award worthy movies come out during the summer; then I see The Help. To say it is not a story that I am normally interested in would be an understatement. I wasn\'t around during the time of segregation to fully appreciate the depth of this story. Additionally, if there was ever a movie that screamed "chick flick" it would be this one. In spite of that, I\'ve heard wonderful things about the book and decided to view the movie. I\'m happy to say that I\'m glad that I did. Virtually unknown director Tate Taylor put together a cast of relatively unknown actors and actresses that truly made the story go. \n\nTaylor, whose last movie was the little seen Pretty Ugly People, grabbed a familiar actress to join him in making The Help, Allison Janney. Other than Janney the only other familiar actresses in the movie are Cicely Tyson and Sissy Spacek. The rather unknown cast has a fresh feeling on the story and there are no preconceived notions based on a past actor or actresses work. That being said Emma Stone (Easy A), and Viola Davis had a true coming out party in The Help. Both women played fantastic parts, which really made the cast mesh nicely together. Bryce Dallas Howard, Octavia Spencer and Jessica Chastain were all spectacular in supporting roles alongside Stone and Davis.\n\nWhen a movie doesn\'t have the explosions, crazy action or crude humor that we\'ve become accustomed to seeing in newer movies there has got to be a great story attached in order to maintain your interest; The Help had that great story. There aren\'t many movies that have you laughing, crying, or getting angry and end up still being fantastic and that is where this one had me. With my common rule of no movie should be over 2 hours unless it is special; this one is very special. I would be surprised if there aren\'t a number of nominations coming.\n\nChildren: If they can handle a lot of dialog it is age appropriate for 10+ Award Worthy: YES! Nominations for: Best Actress, Best Supporting Actress, Screenplay, Picture, Director Entertaining: Yes Summer Movie Grade: A+ Is it Worth the Price of a Movie ticket: Yes Would I watch It Again: Yes\n\nVisit our site at www.twodudereview.com', u'0.477083', u'Oscar Oscar Oscar \x96 Kathryn Stockett\'s beautiful book is Oscar worthy in this film -- for editing, screenplay, supporting actress (several deserving) \x96 Emma Stone just shines \x96 at just 22 years old, this film proves she is a force to be reckoned with in Hollywood. There are so few roles written for black women and I was thrilled to see such great roles filled by Viola Davis (Abigail) and Octavia Spencer (Minnie) - both should be nominated for supporting roles although in my opinion, along with Emma Stone, all three share top billing.\n\nThe character development in this movie is really outstanding \x96 I hate movies with flat single dimension characters and these from the lowest to those with the most screen time are just remarkably developed \x96 even the newspaper editor, the lines they chose for him to keep gave you enough information that even he is a memorable character with only three scenes, maybe 4 in the entire movie. Same for Stuart, Skeeter\'s love interest \x96 you actually like him then hate him and he only has maybe 3 minutes of air time. Great great job. Sissy Spacek with so few speaking moments is great as is Cicely Tyson who speaks volumes even in scenes with no words. Admittedly, being based on an amazing book the background story was already set out and tracks the book closely without some of the details but they have done a great job of putting it to film \x96 \n\nThis movie sets out beautifully a terrible time in our history that unfortunately is not over \x96 it is better, but not over by a long shot. Being a child of the south and coming up during that time, being raised by such bigoted grandparents and parents, it leaves me pause to wonder how I avoided this rabid virus of hate and takes me back to long hot lazy days in the deep south before every building was air conditioned \x96 such attention detail right down to the Jesus fans they waved in church \x96 awesome flick. You FEEL the heat, the tension, the pain, the injustice of the time but still you laugh with them even as you cry for them - both races - ignorance is to be wept over.\n\nHowever, I think this movie does more, goes further in its exploration of the behavior of the privileged during that time. They were rabid toward blacks but were not that much better toward anyone who did not share their socio-economic status (the way the "Junior League" treated Celia) and the enormous peer pressure they put on one another (the club encouraging Skeeter\'s mother to make a poor decision). It visits the sins of the parents passed on to their children \x96 the bigotry and injustice that is learned at the knee of our elders. OMG it is just an awesome, poignant, moving, NOT TO BE MISSED film.\n\nMesmerizing from start to finish \x96 never once drags \x96 just an easy easy easy 10', u'0.119764', u'I grew up in the 60\'s, the setting for The Help, a story of Southern prejudice and cruelty toward African Americans, who were chattel of the Southern rich treating their servants as expendable and marginal. I can say that as a Northerner with a black maid for our household, there was love but always a barrier, a carryover from the strict separation still prevailing after reconstruction.\n\nDirector Tate Taylor keeps the race relations taut but not strident, as if we were living through the emerging civil rights movement slowly but inevitably aimed at equality, not "separate but equal." Skeeter (Emma Stone) graduates, returns to Jackson, Miss., and decides to write about the black help, whose "perspective\' needs to be told. As more maids join in the writing of the manuscript, the more possible it is to counter the assassination of Medgar Evers and eventually that of Martin Luther King.\n\nWhile we have grown used to the base scatological humor of the Hangovers, Change-UP, and other rom-coms, the fundament motif in The Help is as low-key as will ever be depicted in film. Not only is the idea of the bad guys "eating s\x97t" effective, it is funny and poignant.\n\nA note about the performances\x97Bryce Dallas Howard as the conservative, prejudiced Hilly, is remarkably successful, making her a full-fledged actress and not just a famous director\'s daughter. Jessica Chastain as the ditzy but big-hearted Celia Foote cements her place as a great modern actress following her memorable role as the compliant wife in Tree of Life. Emma Stone no longer need rely on rom-coms, for she stars in The Help with a performance nuanced and underplayed, just the way I like it, albeit a bit too hip for the times.\n\nAlthough the film tends toward the simplistic, e.g., there are no bad blacks and most whites are obtuse, Viola Davis as maid Aibileen Clark successfully carries the film displaying the ambivalent nature of slavery ready to burst out of its chains.', u'0.596377', u'So....\n\nI went and saw The Help last night.\n\nI must say, I was pleasantly surprised. It wasn\'t as offensive as "The Blind Side" (ala the big overgrown, illiterate, strong as an ox, loyal, gullible, clown saved by a white Christian savior caricature) but the overall story was pretty watered down. \n\nThe acting is solid, but I was torn about this movie. It does elicit the "Great White Hope" character, in that the maids only come together through the unlikely liberalism and goodness of a young white character. Its message for the future is also disturbing. For example, toward the end, one maid is offered salvation by a white couple who offers her the security of being their maid for the REST OF HER LIFE...a deal that makes her eyes grow wide with happiness. Meanwhile, the main white character goes off to greener pastures outside the limitations of her town.\n\nThere are also some unsettling caricatures...like a "Mammy" figure who gets misty eyed when she talks about how frying chicken makes her feel good inside.\n\nI think they were pretty spot on in the portrayal of the white "southern belles (given that I\'m from Jackson myself)." They were mostly ridiculous, petty and cold...which, to my understanding, is how they really were. It makes for some good comedic moments.\n\nThis is a "safe" film...there\'s no violence, and the threat of violence doesn\'t feel very immediate or nearby. The racism of the day feels like an omniscient boogey-man...and the white men in the film are all portrayed in an indifferent "they could care less" light...which seems VERY unbelievable. And the Black men were either abusive, docile or messengers...I mean, not a single, strong Black man?\n\nThe real sad thing about this film is what it says about Black progress in Hollywood. I haven\'t seen "real" roles for black women this year...and it\'s telling that the project that employs the most black women at once is one where they all have to play maids. Even in a trailer shown before this film for "Tower Heist," Gabourey Sidibe (from "Precious") is playing a maid...complemented by Eddie Murphy playing a convict with expert knowledge on robberies. So, blacks are either subservient, criminals, comedic clowns...or the ever present "token black friend." The exception to this rule are the few Blacks that are seen as being "negro-lite"...e.g. Will Smith, Halle Berry and Beyonce. \n\nMany whites don\'t understand why Blacks are sensitive to their portrayals on film...but whites have to realize...you have an abundance of images to choose from. However, we have very few. Imagine taking your children to the movies...and the people that look like them, on screen, are usually stupefied, marginalized, subservient or comedic to the point of buffoorney. That\'s not the reality whites EVER have to accept, adapt to or address. This is not playing the race card...as there is no card to play when this is your life.\n\nMy grandmother was a maid, like these women in the film. She went to work every day for the local car dealer\'s family...doing housework, cooking their meals and taking care of their kids for $5/day. She supplemented her income ironing white people\'s clothes from town. She raised 10 kids and helped with the war effort at home. While a film like "The Help" gives her a voice, it also robs her of hope that things will get better. After all, one maid quits her job even though her options are extremely limited and she has jeopardized her own safety by helping Skeeter...the other maid accepts a position to be the lifetime maid of another couple and then leaves her abusive husband...and the third maid that we come to know is rotting in jail. The only people who make out with better futures are the white characters....Skeeter is off to New York. Celia learns how to cook and, through the "wisdom" of her maid, learns how to communicate with her husband and develops self worth. The young white child Viola was raising may get a "fighting chance" because Viola tells her mother to give her one. And Hilly may actually become a better person who\'s finally learned the error of her ways.\n\nFinally, there is one part that really summarized this whole film to me. At one point, Skeeter is sitting at Viola Davis\'s table. She asks her if she ever wanted to do anything else rather than be a maid. Viola Davis nods...and Skeeter never follows up with her to ask her what she wanted to do. My feeling was she didn\'t ask because it was irrelevant...irrelevant to the story and to the reality of the time. Black women didn\'t have choices, so there was no reason to speak of dreams that they both knew were empty.\n\nAll in all, I think this film is a nice effort for what it was, and fluff for what it was not.\n\n6.5/10', u'-0.10748', u'Lovely performances makes this far too clean and neat story, not merely palatable but enjoyable. We know by now that the plight of the "colored" in the South wasn\'t that clean cut or gentle in any way or shape. Here we can sit and watch discovering the depth of he ordeal in the wonderful face of Viola Davis. But, it all remains in the mild margins of the real story. Entertaining yes but I couldn\'t forget documentaries of the period or "The Long Walk Home" with Whoopi Goldberg and Sissy Spacek. Sissy Spacek is in "The Help" too and she\'s very funny. It also shows Bryce Dallas Howard under a new light. The bitchy, almost evil light. She\'s better here than she\'s ever been. Emma Stone is lovely and the wonderful Allison Janney in a disturbingly recognizable character raises the film to unexpected levels. I felt the film was too long and too careful not to offend anybody and that\'s were its weaknesses lay. But, I do recommend it.', u'0.450637', u'I saw a preview of this film a few weeks ago in Philadelphia. I am huge fan of the book and could not wait to see the movie. I was not disappointed. I LOVED this movie. I have not seen anything more moving or more real in such a long time.\n\nThe movie stays very close to the book. The book has a bit more details, but all the parts of the book that make it so great were in the movie. There was not a thing missed in the screenplay.\n\nThe characters come alive on the screen. There is no stretch of imagination. The casting is perfect.\n\nGo see this, you will not be disappointed!', u'0.261733', u'\'The Help\' is a well-meaning attempt to educate the film going public about the civil rights era in the deep South through the perspective of the relationship between black maids and their white female employers.\xa0 Author Kathryn Stockett, who wrote the book on which the film is based, does well in reminding us that the black \'help\' not only had to endure the threat of violence as a result of the encroaching backlash from white racists upset over a new black militancy in southern communities, but also had to deal with a multiplicity of indignities on the drab domestic front, including being forced to use separate bathrooms in the homes of their white female employers.\xa0 Not only does Hilly Holbrook (the film\'s principal \'villain\') enforce this rule in her own home and influences her immediate neighbors to follow suit, but lobbies local politicians in order to have her racist initiative be codified into law.\n\nWhile Hilly may be a tad bit melodramatic as Stockett\'s \'Cruella de Vil\', she is undoubtedly the most compelling character in the entire film. Stockett also does well with Elizabeth Leefolt, Aibileen\'s racist employer, who is perhaps more repulsive than Hilly, in that she does not have the self-awareness to realize that she is an incompetent mother. Occasionally, Stockett even suggests that some of oppressed maids may not have all their moral compasses in order. In perhaps one of the most interesting scenes in the film (due to the ambiguity), one of the maids is roughly pulled off a bus and arrested by seemingly racist, redneck policeman. I could hear the indignant sounds of the audience suddenly go quiet, when it\'s revealed that the maid arrested was the one who pilfered a diamond ring that had fallen behind a cabinet in the home of one of the white employers.\n\nDespite Stockett\'s noble attempt to relate the atmosphere of institutional racism so prevalent in the south during early 1960s, her main character, Skeeter, feels wholly anachronistic. It\'s as if Stockett projected her own modern day sensibility on to Skeeter and asks us to believe that such a character would have existed at that time. If there were progressive minded white liberals participating in the civil rights movement in the early 60s, usually they came from the north and were often met with outright violence. To have such a progressive minded white female from the south take up the cause of the oppressed black \'help\', let alone create a book based on interviews with such women, is simply wish fulfillment on the part of the author. Stockett is obviously trying to mitigate some of her own guilt by creating the illusory, "feel-good" character of Skeeter. No book like "The Help" ever appeared in the early 60s and it would have never been published at that time.\n\nThere\'s another reason why \'The Help\' makes little sense. Why would "The Help" ever agree to Skeeter\'s plan? They certainly receive little financial compensation for their efforts and in the end, they\'re only setting themselves up for retaliation. A character in a book might take some satisfaction in mouthing off against an employer who subjects them to racist humiliation, but in the real world (and especially in the 60s deep South), one doesn\'t \'talk back\', unless one wants to lose their sole source of support. Of course there were individual black women who worked as maids who could have \'talked back\' and lost their jobs, but to suggest such a large group of women agreed to interviews en masse, is another one of Stockett\'s \'feel-good\' conceits! \n\nWhile all those juicy interviews Stockett collected from the \'Help\' may have worked in the book, the stories come off as dry recitations in the film. We don\'t actually experience the maids\' stories visually\x97they are merely communicated to Skeeter during the interviews. Obviously, flashbacks wouldn\'t have worked during the interview scenes since there were too many of them. Stockett\'s other big problem with the \'Help\' is that she\'s forced to place her main \'Help\' characters on a pedestal. Yes Aibileen and Minny ARE victims but can they do no wrong? It may have been a more interesting story if "The Help" were REALLY told from their perspective. Stockett unfortunately is unable to make the Help\'s world come alive\x97do they actually have a back story? (the best we get is an allusion to Minny\'s "abusive" husband who never appears on screen). Or is everything defined by their relationship to the white world?\n\nStockett resorts to melodramatic form, by offering up storytelling akin to a decidedly unsubtle \'quid pro quo.\' You have your evil Hilly and then you need to counter it with the ditsy but kind Cecelia Foote, another unbelievable character designed to prove that whites weren\'t all that bad during the era. Even Charlotte, Skeeter\'s mother, must be subject to Stockett\'s quid pro quo treatment (Charlotte channels Hilly when she banishes beloved family maid Constantin in order to appease her racist club members but then sticks up for Skeeter when Hilly tries to blackmail her daughter).\n\nWorst of all are Stockett\'s male characters who are practically non-existent in the film. I didn\'t buy for one second that Skeeter would have actually been attracted to the boyfriend and gone out with him for a time. Wouldn\'t she have clarified from the beginning that he was a racist and had nothing to do with him? \n\nFor those who are interested in getting a better picture of black life during the civil rights era, can I recommend the classic 1964 picture, \'Nothing But a Man\'? \'The Help\' only seems to suggest that white people deserve more credit than they really should receive for aiding black people in their quest for social equality and justice.', u'-0.421302', u"This movie wasn't badly made, it's just bad that it was made. In it every character is a clich\xe9 cartoon in support of a fictional rose coloured glasses version of 60's America, where almost every white person is a villain and every black person loves fried chicken. If this is how America learns its history (and judging by the reviews where many have viewed this film as having a positive and accurate message of hope and struggle????), then no wonder the western world is in trouble. Is it worse that a story about the struggle of black people to overcome oppression in racist 60s America is centered on a privileged white woman on the road to New York success? Marginalized yet again it seems. This movie started out as passable entertainment but by the time it crossed the finished line it had stepped full force into misguided and offensive. And shockingly many people seem to not know the difference.", u'-0.330002', u"This film uses every clich\xe9 in the book starting with the liberal minded white person who is the voice of conscience and the long suffering good hearted but somewhat simplistic black people.This film is emotionally manipulative and panders to a sentimental reduction of complex history. Its moves were predictable and uses every trick in the book, even the scene in the church is clich\xe9. Both the white and the black characters are mostly reductive caricatures out of some story book world which doesn't do justice to the historical complexity of such situations. Why would you want to make a saccharine comic book out of profound historical situations-- other than to pander to audiences longing for a feel good experience for the sake of box office. I actually don't mean to disrespect to people who like it, and I don't want to attack the actors. They didn't write the film, but at the same time, I can't believe that so many people fell for this bag of tricks. Still, a bigger problem and disservice a movie like this does to our culture is that such bad history and simplistic human portrayals turns race dynamics into good guy bad guy stories which we can watch with a complacent feeling of how much better we are than those bad old days. Such complacency leads to a historical ignorance that retards honest critique and real progress. This movie would be better if it just didn't pretend to be about something. Let it be some sappy comic book. That wouldn't be the worse thing in the world. At least it would be more honest.", u'-0.609132', u'This is like one of those afternoon made for TV "life affirming" dramas. Full of sugar, whimsy and wholesomeness but totally lacking in truth and bite. Ugh! The performances are almost uniformly two dimensional - even Allison Janney opted for cartoon like characterisation. The period detail is sometimes accurate but occasionally glaringly inaccurate. For example no girl in the early 60s would have worn her hair in Emma Stone\'s hopelessly anachronistic style. I blame Tate Taylor who was credited with the screenplay and direction. Apparently Taylor was born in Jackson and is a close friend of Kathryn Stockett. Can this really be how Ms Stockett wished her novel to be brought to the screen? But there again I haven\'t read the novel. Could it be full of the same yukky apple pie philosophy?', u'-0.17022'], u'tt0046911': [u"\nAre you alone? good. Have you turned off the lights? good.Is there a storm brewing in that dark foreboding sky?Excellent. Do you like brilliant black and white movies? Wonderful.Now, sit back and enjoy the best of the best. This is quite simply the best psychological thriller ever made.Often imitated but never bettered. If you have a problem with subtitled films then don't worry because you will understand this film without reading them. If you want slash and gore, go elsewhere.If you want sophisticated entertainment,you've come to the right place.Georges Cluzot's finest work is a thing of beauty as is his wife Vera, who stars opposite Simone Signoret as the schoolmaster's wife.From the very start it is very clear that all is not as it seems. But why? and who? What is the terrible secret of the swimming pool and later on, the bathtub? As the tension builds to an unbearable climax, we sit and hide behind our hands, peering through the gaps in our fingers.Oh my God!! it can't be!.....it is!  Do not confuse this movie with the disgraceful remake starring Sharon Stone. All copies of that disaster should be burned. Watch this movie if you are a serious film buff. Rent something else if you have the attention span of a goldfish.Brilliant. 10/10\n", u'-0.0990711', u"\nLes Diaboliques is one of the tightest, pure suspense movies I have ever seen.  The story starts out slowly, but as it moves on, peculiar things start to happen.    This movie keeps you guessing in such a way, you are riveted to your seat, hoping for a quick resolution to the suspense.  Yet, as the story unfolds, the suspense deepens.  The final scene of the movie had me sitting back holding my breath.\n\nThis movie does not offer cheap, pop out and scare you tactics. Rather, it makes the viewer expect things to happen that don't.  You wait on the edge of your seat for the quick jump out and scare you event to take place, but instead, it sneaks up from behind you.  What an effect!\n\nLes Diaboliques is a classic film that delivers the complete suspense package.  It's not surprising that many suspense movies of the modern era have tried to copy the plot.  This movie is well worth renting in a video store, if you can find it.\n", u'0.214634', u'Hitchcock must have forever wondered how he managed to allow this story to slip out of his hands, but the fact remains: had he filmed CELLE QUI N\'ETAIT PAS into his own version of what is known as LES DIABOLIQUES, there very well might not have been a VERTIGO, also an adaptation from the authors of the aforementioned one and D\'ENTRE LES MORTES. All in all, this is an excellent horror film that has strong Film Noir overtones and precedes New Wave by a couple of years and its simple yet powerful direction by Jean Georges-Clouzot elevates it from a standard thriller to one to which all others are measured spawning countless imitations with much less satisfying degree. One wonders what treatment Hitchcock would have given it, and interestingly, it\'s all here: the almost casual presentation of spousal abuse that occurs off-camera in one chilling scene early on, the events that lead the women (Vera Clouzot and Simone Signoret) to make a drastic decision concerning killing Clouzot\'s husband (Michel DelaSalle), and then the growing, deadly certainty he may not be quite dead after all... and may be after the terrified women. The last 15 minutes are one of the most tension-inducing I\'ve ever seen in any climactic montage (even if it does veer into a certain implausibility but the intent is to tell a suspense story and Hitchcock has often mentioned the "suspension of disbelief" factor) and have long gone into history as one of the most horrific moments in cinema.\n\nTo those interested in watching LES DIABOLIQUES, please do NOT watch its American remake, DIABOLIQUE, with Sharon Stone and Isabelle Adjani. It pays to read the subtitles in this film.', u'0.0184593', u'\n"Les Diaboliques" has one of the best plots you will ever find in any mystery or suspense thriller.  The excellent directing, acting, and writing combine with the story itself to make it a memorable experience.\n\nIf you enjoy quality mysteries or thrillers, you will almost certainly enjoy this one - and if you have not seen it yet, you might just want to buy or rent it now, before you read any more reviews.  This comment will avoid any discussion at all of the actual plot itself, because the less you know in advance, the more you will enjoy it.  The few implausible elements in the story do not detract at all from the enjoyment.\n\nA great plot does not all by itself make a good movie, and everything works especially well here because of the expert pacing by director Henri-Georges Clouzot and good, mostly understated acting by the main actors.  We are drawn into their world very nicely.  Everything about the characters and events is built up perfectly, to give the brilliant climax its full effect.  Once again, see it before you find out any more.\n\nEven if you do not normally watch black-and-white films or foreign movies (this is in French), if you enjoy thrillers, watch "Les Diaboliques" as soon as you have the chance.\n\n\n', u'0.379048', u"\nThis is not a legend : after reading Pierre Boileau's novel, Alfred Hitchcock phone the editor in the morning to buy the story for making a film. But another great master, Henri-Georges Clouzot, had phone 30 minutes earlier. Mister Hitchcock was angry! But Hitch couldn't have done better than Clouzot. This is P-E-R-F-E-C-T! The black and white, the dialogues, the acting and even the reclusive French scool of the 1950's. And for the suspense... well every viewer of IMDB had said the same things I could said. So, Diaboliques is the best suspense thriller of all time, and also one of the best movie ever made. Please, I really said please, don't ever watch the remake with Isabelle Adjani and Sharon Stone. There are certains movies that you can't make two times. Like all the Hitchcock and Clouzot films, for example...", u'0.312221', u"Scare the crap out of you! \n\nI don't hand out many 10s. Some movies don't really require much thought or analysis. In the end all that matters is what happened to you when you first saw it.\n\nI remember when I first saw this. Nothing scary at first, but the nastiness of the place and the people is effortlessly shown. And then the bad stuff starts to happen.\n\nUgliness...shock...suspense...shock...mystery...eeriness...awful shock.\n\nI remember, though it must have been forty years ago, the climactic scenes with my neck hairs standing up, sweat on my face, clutching the theater armrests like I was in danger of falling, and finally realizing I was weeping- not tears of sadness, tears of helpless terror.\n\nI envy anyone seeing this for the first time.", u'-0.448455', u'Another terrific suspense film from Henri-Georges Clouzot, Les Diaboliques (also known as "Diabolique") is a tense story of murder, suspicion and revenge. The plot revolves around two women, Christina (Vera Clouzot) and Nicole (Simone Signoret) who conspire to murder the brutish man who is Christina\'s husband and Nicole\'s lover Michel, played by the delightfully sullen Paul Meurisse. He is the principal of a boarding school for boys who relies on Vera\'s money to support his excesses, and the two women are both teachers at the school.\n\nVera has her doubts about committing murder, even though Michel is incredibly abusive. But Nicole convinces her to help drug and then drown Michel. All seems to be going well until Michels body goes missing and the two women turn against each other. The situation is complicated further by the appearance of a retired police inspector who is determined to help Vera find her "missing" husband, despite the poor woman\'s protests. The tension continues to mount until the hair-raising climax.\n\nThis movie is on a par with some of Hitchcock\'s best work, although Clouzot doesn\'t mix much humor in with the suspense, as Hitch often did. However, Vera\'s interaction with the droll inspector does provides some chuckles. Unlike his previous film, The Wages Of Fear, Clouzot doesn\'t spend a whole lot of time on the set-up of the plot, but gets right to the meat of the matter, and from there Diabolique rolls along very quickly with barely a letup in the action.\n\nI can\'t believe it took me so long to see this masterpiece. Highly recommended.', u'-0.0371929', u'Set in a French boarding school for boys, "Les Diaboliques" tells the story of two teachers, Christina (played by Vera Clouzot), and Nicole (played by Simone Signoret), who conspire to kill the sadistic headmaster, a man who also happens to be Christina\'s abusive husband.\n\nLike most murder mysteries, the story is highly improbable; nevertheless, the film is still hugely entertaining, thanks in part to plot twists and turns that even Agatha Christie would admire, and to the film\'s B&W lighting, that renders a noirish, sinister atmosphere.\n\nThe first half is interesting and tightly plotted. But the real strength of the film\'s underlying premise begins at the mid-point plot turn. The second half is riveting, because the tight plot begins to ooze with mystery and suspense. It builds to a final ten minutes that are as frightening as almost any ending in film history; dark interiors, shadows, ominous light at the end of a long hallway, a general absence of sound, a gloved hand, a scream, and an unexpected image. It\'s the very definition of spine-tingling suspense.\n\nThere is a clue to help solve the story\'s mystery in the film\'s first ten minutes; but like any good mystery, that clue is very subtle. All the film\'s acting is excellent, even down to the children actors. And, Simone Signoret is as wonderful here as she is in all of her other movies.\n\nEnglish subtitles require a little more work for viewers who cannot understand the French dialogue; yet, the story, the acting, and the cinematography should more than offset this minor irritation. Background music occurs only during the film\'s title sequence and closing credits; this general absence of music thus enhances suspense.\n\nAlthough not strictly speaking a whodunit, "Les Diaboliques" is a classic murder mystery that has earned a well-deserved reputation for setting the standard for cinematic suspense. The story is riveting, and the film is technically well made. More recent films have tried to copy it; but this is the original.', u'0.322798', u'Clouzot is possibly the cinema\'s most devout pessimist: no other director has portrayed human vices so persuasively\x85 If his bitter vision of the world is finally limited and unattractive, his status as a major filmmaker, entertaining through suspense while simultaneously expressing his private dismay with cool and detached visual precision, remains intact\x85 \n\n"Les Diaboliques" is a mystery set in a shabby boys\' boarding school\x85 The plot \x96 a sadistic headmaster is murdered by his wife and his mistress; ominously and inexplicably, his corpse vanishes is too contrived to survive repeated viewings, but the stark gray images emphasizing physical decay offer a precise, grimly poetic visual correlative for the characters\' warped emotions\x85\n\nClouzot\'s moral pessimism, shock tactics and readiness to display man\'s worst excesses suggest parallels with Hitchcock and Fuller, while his focus on cruelty, domination and decay may be compared with that of figures as diverse as Leone, Blier and Fassbinder\x85', u'\nLes diaboliques is an unusually intense movie. I believe this is due to the well thought out choice of real locations and the masterful use of spatial entities and textures. Your memory really gets hooked on those things, and it gives the story a sense of reality that makes you feel uneasy.\n\n\nLes diaboliques is as much a horror movie as it is a thriller. When I watch this I perceive an intense mouldy smell throughout. The crumbling boarding school where the main characters live and act is worse than any nightmare \x96 even the swimming pool filled with murky water appears like a menacing abyss. The stifling crummyness is accentuated by the plot: School teachers sit at the sadistic principal\'s table in the refectory and have to force unspeakably ghastly meals down their throats (only one glass of wine is allowed). The second location is the principal\'s lover\'s apartment in a dead borough somewhere in no man\'s land. It\'s stuffy and utterly claustrophobic. The transfer between the two places is made with a "deux chevaux" station wagon \x96 its characteristic back part of corrugated sheet metal once was a common feature in our parts of the world, as was the snarling sound of the deux chevaux\x91s engine. In the corrugated iron "box" sits a creaky wicker crate, which on the way back from the lover\'s apartment contains evidence of the crime, wrapped in a checkered wax tablecloth. So you see shells within shells, not unlike one of those Russian wooden dolls. You don\'t know what you will find in the innermost until the end.\n', u'0.100635', u"DIABOLIQUE (Henri-Georges Clouzot - France 1955). \n\nI must admit I found Clouzot's earlier WAGES OF FEAR(1953) slightly disappointing and therefor temporarily held back from watching any other films he made but how wrong I was! This much discussed classic was one of the most frightening and disturbing films I've ever seen. The music theme played during the opening credits with the organ and the singing schoolchildren still makes the hairs in my neck stand up, even at this very moment.\n\nThe story revolves around the tyrant schoolmaster Delasalle (Paul Meurisse) of a seedy boarding school, his wife (Vera Clouzot) and his mistress (Simone Signoret). An he maltreats them both, they decide to work together to murder him. They drown Delasalle in the bathtub and dump the corpse in the abandoned swimming pool next to the school. But then, eerie things start to happen. When the pool is drained and no body is found, the two women grow increasingly fearful that Delasalle is still alive. When subsequently his suit is returned from the dry-cleaners and the schoolchildren repeatedly testify they've seen Delasalle, they start to panic and the strange occurrences surrounding his supposed resurrection slowly drive them into insanity and complete paranoia.\n\nJustifiably hailed as one of the most suspenseful films ever made and often compared to Hitchcock's work. Clouzot lacks the master's wit but as far as suspense goes, he is incomparable. Very much opposed to Hitchcock, this film - like most of his work - has a very cynical and misanthropic feel to it. Perhaps largely due to this very dark tone and Clouzot's excellent eye for detail, even today it still has the power to drive you right up the wall. And Simone Signoret, whom I've never (consciously) seen before in other films, greatly added to my admiration of this film. A sublime actress and an absolutely hypnotizing screen presence. The entire cast is terrific for that matter with Charles Vanel as inspector Fichet another standout.\n\nClouzot takes his time to build up the story very precisely but once the mysterious things start to happen every scene adds to an almost unbearable tension. You'll watch every facial expression and every detail on screen with increasing paranoia yourself, in order to understand what on earth could have happened. And the ending is so surprising that I wasn't quite sure anymore about the things I just saw, even right after the film's ending. A genuinely great movie that more than lives up to its status and has lost none of its impact over the last five decades.\n\nCamera Obscura --- 10/10", u'0.0580192', u'Director Henri Georges Clouzot must not have had a sunny disposition. \r This movie is painful to watch, the angst-ridden actors bite and hack \r each other to bloody pieces, and the camera contemplates the action \r like a vulture, waiting for raw carcasses to dismember. All this, \r without really showing any violence. It\'s all in the mind.\r \r\nLes Diaboliques is shot in black and white, but as I remember it, it \r was all murky grey. Maybe it was just the worn-out print, maybe it was \r intentional, but it really worked on me. Like the constant drizzle of \r October rain, the dirty, bedraggled schoolchildren, the delapidated \r buildings, the rotten school-lunches! I felt deeply suicidal!\r \r\nThe movie is full of scary scenes, of something unspeakably bad waiting \r to happen to the "murderesses". The long-awaited bathroom climax is not \r the most scary part, yet it is a welcome release for all the pent-up \r emotion, and Vera Clouzot truly appears to be near death. Her features \r twisted and tortured,her expressive body wretched and thin like a \r concentration-camp prisoner. She looks to be in real pain.\r \r\nLes Diaboliques means The Devilish, and the Devil is clearly at work \r here. I have seldom felt a stronger presence of evil, and Clouzot \r manages this feat without a single concession to the bloodbath that is \r the modern horror-movie. This one has influenced everything from "the \r Exorcist" to "Rosemary\'s baby", yet still feels like an original, \r subtle classic. I loved it.', u'-0.188794', u"\nThe odds against writing and directing two all-time classic thrillers/suspensers back to back must be fairly remote, featuring your wife in both remoter still, and starring Yves Montand in the first (The Wages Of Fear, in case there are any first-time buyers out there) and his wife, Simone Signoret in the second, astronomical. Say hello - and tip your hat while you're about it - to Henri-George Clouzot who pulled off this double whammy with ease.  Clouzot made only a handful of films but those he did make were worth seeing, from Le Corbeau thru L'Assassin habite du 21 thru Quai des Orfevres and up to Wages and this one. Again many previous commenters have set the scene and described the plot and most of them are more than positive in their praise.  I can only endorse their opinions and raise a glass to all involved especially Paul Meurisse and Charles Vanel who tend to get lost in the shuffle.  9/10", u'0.119962', u'I expect that Criterion films are of certain importance. They are films that have something unique to offer. Even Armageddon deserves a certain amount of recognition. It documents the way that blockbusters are going nowadays.\n\nI can honestly say that I think I understand the importance of Diabolique. The film was most likely incredibly innovative for the time period. I am impressed that the only shots that felt dated were the head-on driving shots, and aside from those, the direction is entirely appropriate. It does not call attention to itself, it has grace, and it is not feel like it has been copied since. The script is tightly written, no lines are wasted.\n\nOn a personal level, I felt a little disappointed. I figured out the ending very quickly. My father, who would have been 16 when this was released, had no idea the ending was coming at all. The originality of this ending has been sacked by modern thrillers, horrors, and dramas. Regardless of deciphering the ending, this is still worth watching, even for historical purposes.', u'0.333422', u'The boys\' school in Saint Cloud, a suburb of Paris, run by Michel and Christina Delassale, serves as the background for one of the best suspense thrillers of the French cinema. The school belongs to Christina, but it\'s Michel who has the last word about everything. This penny pinching man insists in giving his students living at the boarding school the worst food money can buy. Michel is also a man who loves to slap his wife, and his mistress, Nicole Horner, who is a teacher at the school. \n\nWhen we first meet them, Nicole has a swollen eye and wears dark glasses to hide her shame. Obviously, everyone guesses what is really going on between Michel and Nicole, even his wife. Christina is aware of the extra-marital goings on between her husband and his mistress. A strong minded Nicole shows how she dominates the weaker Christine. Nicole, who is fed up with the situation convinces Christina something must be done. She sets things in motion to go to her home town during a brief vacation so that Christina and Nicole attract Michel to come after them as they have a plan of their own about how to deal with his abuses.\n\nThe women\'s plan is to bring Michel\'s body back to the school and dump him in the murky swimming pool, where he would be discovered as drowned by accident, or perhaps his own suicide. When the pool is drained, there is no corpse. When one of Michel\'s suits is sent from a dry cleaner\'s the women are dumbfounded. When they go to investigate, the owner hands them a key for a nearby hotel room.\n\nChristina, who is a fragile woman with what appears to be a weak heart, feels guilty. When she reads in the newspaper about a drowning victim found on the Seine, she has to find out to see if it\'s her husband. Of course, the dead man is not Michel, which heightens the mystery. What Christina didn\'t count on is the retired inspector, Alfred Fichet, who watches her outside the viewing room at the morgue. This man will become the key figure to solving Michel\'s disappearance. \n\n"Les Diaboliques" was Clouzot\'s triumph because the suspense works until the end. He based his screen play in a novel by Pierre Boileau and Thomas Narcejar, who also served as the basis for "Vertigo". In fact, much has been said about the similarities between the two directors, but it is unfortunate because both men approached their work in different ways. Clouzot hints subtly at perhaps a lesbian relationship between Nicole and Christine as it appears both want to be rid of the horrible Michel.\n\nThe acting is first rate. Simone Signoret, one of the best and most attractive actresses of her era, makes an earthy Nicole. She is calculating because there is a lot at stake. Vera Clouzot plays Christine as a bundle of nerves because of the gravity of her actions. Paul Meurisse is the evil Michel. Charles Vanet is the old inspector Fichet. Also in the cast, a young Michel Serrault, and the singer Johnny Holiday, who appears uncredited as one of the boys in the school.\n\nHenri Georges Clouzot was at the top of his craft and he clearly showed he was a master of suspense, bar none.', u'-0.174112'], u'tt0114746': [u'\nTerry Gilliam\'s fantastic, twisted story of a virus destroying all but a handful of people across the Earth and forcing them to move underground and the man sent back in time to gather information about it is a fantastic, dizzying, and highly stylized film that boasts Bruce Willis\' best performance ever.\n\nWhat sets 12 Monkeys apart from most time-travel sci-fi movies is that Bruce Willis character actually deals with what the psychological effects of time-travel, that is, not knowing what reality is actual reality: the place that the time-traveler comes from or goes to.  Also, the film recognizes that things that have past cannot be altered and that the prevention of a cataclysmic event, in this case the release of said virus, cannot be stopped or changed.  As Willis asserts "It\'s already happened," while he\'s in a mental hospital, the major dilemma the film trudges into is not a trite, overdone plot to save the world; instead it\'s Willis\' inner struggle to simply survive himself.  It\'s a fresh, innovative concept, and it works beautifully thanks to a tautly written script by Peoples and Gilliam\'s unique brand of dementia.\n\nBesides this, 12 Monkey\'s storytelling is totally non-linear and instead opts to distort and bend the way the story is told skillfully incorporating a bevy of different time sequences: flashbacks, dreams, memories, the present, the past, the future, and even a scene that is lifted out of Hitchcock\'s Vertigo.  All serve to envelop the viewer into its disturbing cacophony of madness and futility.\n\nVisually, Gilliam is a master of desolate umbrage and shadow rivalling Tim Burton in his strikingly despondent scenery and imagery.  With cold, wide, and immersing cinematography, Gilliam plunges into the colorless surroundings and darkness of his characters.  The scenes are often bathed in a strangely antiseptic, dead white and help serve as a contrast to the often veering-on-madness characters.\n\nPerformance-wise, Brad Pitt steals most scenes, filling them with a patented loony, off-the-wall performance that deservedly garnered him an Oscar nomination.  As mentioned, Bruce Willis gives the best performance of his career, not reverting to his heroic cliches and cardboard hero and instead portraying Cole as a simple, poignant, tragic everyman.   Equally good is Madeline Stowe as Willis\' psychologist.  She holds her own, injecting her character with both wild energy and strength as she collapses under the weight of what she comes to believe is a false \'religion.\'\n\nGilliam\'s expert, overwhelming, and complex handling of what could have been a routine action/sci-fi film makes 12 Monkeys a compelling vision of a nightmarish, futuristic landscape.  Its rich, well-thought out, intricate storyline along with bravura performances from the entire cast and its brooding, bleak cinematography make it a masterpiece of madness.  Ranking in my top 10 of all time, 12 Monkeys is a darkly lavish spectacle of a film brimming with brilliance.\n\n10 out of 10', u'0.342252', u'\n"Twelve monkeys"\'s got all the elements to become Terry Gilliam\'s masterpiece. An outstanding screenplay, a sustained rhythm, clever sometimes ironic dialogs. Moreover, he had a good nose about the cast. "Twelve monkeys" is also the first movie where Bruce Willis stands back from the kind of character he used to play in his previous movies. Here, a jaded and hopeless character which you could nickname a prisoner took over from a fearless and invincible hero (as it was the case in "Die hard"). No matter how he tries, he\'s a prisoner of the time. The movie contains a very thrilling end too. It\'s got a real dramatic power. But this terrific movie is also a reflection about man, the dangers he dreads (notably, the ones that could cause the end of the world and here, these are virus that can create illnesses). No matter how long it will take, "twelve monkeys" will be estimated at its true value: one of the masterpieces made in the nineties. \n', u'0.425821', u"Just kidding, I rented 12 Monkeys the other day because I am a huge Bruce Willis fan and I heard some things about the film. Some good and some bad, but it was one of those films you had to pay attention to every second, so I was a bit worried. Just because I felt like for a minute if this was going to be one of those films that I had to watch several times to get. But I watched it last night and I was really impressed, this movie had everything in it: action, drama, sci-fi, history, dark humor, and even a little romance. The actors all did a terrific job, I give a lot of credit to Bruce, during his scene in the car with his psychiatrist, he really got to me. But Brad Pitt, I'm just amazed with how much of a great job he did. He didn't over do his character, who was crazy, and just made it work and was extremely believable. The story was just scary, but very good and a wake up call.\n\nJames Cole is a man in the future where a virus broke out in the past and killed 5 billion people and only 1% of the population survived including him. Animals are now ruling the ground above while the humans are down below, but scientists send James to the past of 1990(really meaning to send him to '96), to find out about information of the virus. James gets put into a mental institution meeting his new psychiatrist, Dr. Kathryn Raily and another mental patient, Jeffrey Goines. He tells them the future, of course no one believes him, he goes back to the future. But the scientists send him back to the correct year to where the doctor is kidnapped by James, but he tells her more, and believes him. Now they are set on trying to prevent the virus from ever happening.\n\n12 Monkeys was an incredible film. Like I said the story was so scary just because it's not at all hard to believe that we are not far from that happening. But the whole movie was just great, the cast, the sets, just the whole picture was a great one. It had a Terminator type of feel to it where we might loose something precious one day, ourselves if we don't listen to others. What is right and what is wrong? Who knows? But I would highly recommend 12 Monkeys, it's a great movie that if you give it the proper chance, I'm sure you'll enjoy it.\n\n9/10", u'-0.00788933', u'\nI had the privilege of seeing this film at a preview screening years ago, and outside the theater I was confronted by a camera crew from a local TV station looking for comments on the film. At the time, the only words that escaped my mouth were "Awesome. Just awesome." I like to think I can articulate myself a little better than that, but at the time I was somewhat incapable of doing so.\n\nThe story is intriguing and thought provoking, and the acting is first rate from all the principals. This film was the first one that Terry Gilliam directed that he didn\'t have a hand in the writing credit for. Back with Universal after his long, arduous battle with them over "Brazil", Terry had achieved what he wanted most; the "final cut". Terry is a master craftsman, and each shot is like a beautifully conceived painting that has been constructed carefully with determination and conviction. It is only justice that such an individual should be unfettered in his attempts to convey a concept. Unfortunately, limitations still exist in such arrangements.\n\nThe Universal Collector\'s Edition DVD of this film is simply amazing, although most of the bonus features aren\'t listed on the box. It contains among other things, a director/producer audio commentary and an informative and extremely interesting 90 minute documentary on the making of the film called "The Hamster Factor and Other Tales of 12 Monkeys". It tells of some of the creative pitfalls in filmmaking, including a test of mettle when preview screenings tested poorly, striking the team with feelings of self-doubt and despair. Fortunately, for all of us, they decided to change very little about the film and released it to an enormous success. \n\n', u'0.175827', u'In the future humans exist underground, the surface having become uninhabitable due to the release of a virus years before in 1996. The ruling classes are scientists and large sections of the population are held as prisoners in tiny cells; prisoners who "volunteer" to help work out what happened back in 1996 that killed off 99% of the population. Requiring information about the visit, James Cole is sent back to 1996 to gather what information he can. However, sent to 1990 by accident, Cole finds himself in a mental hospital where he meets From the very start this film marks itself out as being very much a Terry Gilliam product and those who hate his work will probably dislike this film for the same reason. However, pleasing people like that is not my concern and 12 Monkeys is actually one of Gilliam\'s most accessible films as it sets his imaginative style within a narrative that is satisfyingly complex and thoroughly enjoyable from start to finish. The story is not perfect though, the connection to the start is nice but the ultimate twist behind the virus just seems to have been thrown in to keep the film tidy; a minor complaint though because even then the main thrust of the story (Cole) keeps it together. The twisting plot plays with both Cole\'s and our sense of reality and it is genuinely gripping from start to finish Gilliam\'s direction is superb, whether it be the realistic world of the 1990\'s filmed with clever angles and shots or the wonderfully twisted world of the future, it is all excellent and was such a pleasant find in my local cinema at the time.\n\nThe film benefits from great turns from the cast. Willis was having a bit of a career resurrection in the mid-90\'s when several films showed us that he could actually act \x96 for me, 12 Monkeys was one of them. Willis is superb as he spins from madness to sanity and back again; he underplays all the way and is so much better than the wise-cracking everyman that he is better known for. Pitt is just as good but in a different way. Getting an Oscar nomination that he deserved, Pitt risks overdoing it but pushes his crazy performance as far as he can without being indulgent \x96 I\'m not saying he is perfect but I would could this as one of his best performances to date. Stowe is very much in the shadow of these two but she holds her own well. Morse, Seda, Meloni and Plummer are all good in minor roles but really the film belongs to the lead three \x96 Willis in particular and Pitt in a great supporting role.\n\nOverall this is a great sci-fi; the story is great and is only helped by Gilliam\'s imaginative direction and awareness of the fantastic. Meanwhile the cast are very strong, with the famous leads giving some of their best performances to date. Downbeat, imaginative, engaging and one of the more accessible of Gilliam\'s films, it stands out as one of the best American sci-fi\'s of the past few decades.', u'0.39745', u"\nTerry Gilliam's stunning feature-length adaptation of Chris Marker's short film LA JETEE is full of mind-bending surprises, yet still touches your heart thanks to the superb cast.  Gilliam's flair for the phantasmagorical works with the script by David and Janet Peoples to play with your head as much as it does with poor James Cole (Willis at his most Steve McQueen-like -- better than McQueen, even!), a time-traveling convict from the future who literally doesn't know whether he's coming or going as a team of scientists keeps sending him back to the wrong eras while trying to prevent a 1995 plague that's deadly to humans but harmless to animals.  Willis, the justifiably Oscar-nominated Brad Pitt, and Madeline Stowe as a well-meaning psychiatrist give some of the best performances of their careers.  Even Paul Buckmaster's tango-style score is haunting.  This one's a don't-miss!", u'0.428535', u"\nI grew up on Python and have followed Terry Gilliam's subsequent directorial career for more years than I care to remember. Half his output leaves me cold, the other half dazzle me beyond belief. 'Brazil' is his movie that I would rate the highest, but I've come to think that I have unfairly underrated 'Twelve Monkeys'. I have always enjoyed it, but I've only come to realize just how good a movie it really is. Sometimes I think it is even better than 'Brazil'. It's a close pick. Unlike 'Brazil' Gilliam didn't come up with the script. He basically was initially involved as a director for hire. Thankfully the script itself (by David and Janet Peoples) is first rate. On top of that Gilliam manages to stamp his own style and approach on to the material without sliding into complete self-indulgence as he sometimes does. The budget of this movie wasn't anywhere near as large as you would imagine from the impressive results on screen. It looks superb. Gilliam coaxes  first rate performances out of Bruce Willis (quite a surprise) and Brad Pitt (not such a surprise, see also 'Johnny Suede' and 'Kalifornia'). Madeline Stowe is also very good, as is Christopher Plummer, and in a small but important role, David Morse. It's difficult to fault this movie. It is a joy to watch, and improves with each viewing. I also highly recommend Chris Marker's 'La Jetee', the short experimental film which inspired 'Twelve Monkeys'. It is also brilliant.", u'0.150143', u'There is a story (possibly apocryphal) about an exchange between Bruce Willis and Terry Gilliam at the start of Twelve Monkeys. Gilliam (allegedly) produced a long list (think about the aircraft one from the Fifth Element) and handed it to Butch Bruce. It was entitled "Things Bruce Willis Does When He Acts". It ended with a simple message saying: "please don\'t do any of the above in my movie".\n\nThere is a fact about this movie (definitely true). Gilliam didn\'t have a hand in the writing.\n\nI would contend that these two factors played a huge role in creating the extraordinary (if not commercial) success that is The Twelve Monkeys.\n\nVisually, the Twelve Monkeys is all that we have rightly come to expect from a Gilliam film. It is also full of Gilliamesque surrealism and general (but magnificent) strangeness. Gilliam delights in wrong-footing his audience. Although the ending of the Twelve Monkeys will surprise no one who has sat through the first real, Gilliam borrows heavily from Kafka in the clockwork, bureaucratic relentless movement of the characters towards their fate. It is this journey, and the character developments they undergo, which unsettles.\n\nI love Gilliam films (Brazil, in particular). But they do all tend to suffer from the same weakness. He seems to have so many ideas, and so much enthusiasm, that his films almost invariably end up as a tangled mess (Brazil, in particular). I still maintain that Brazil is Gilliam\'s tour de force, but there\'s no denying that The Twelve Monkey\'s is a breath of fresh air in the tight-plotting department. Style, substance and form seem to merge in a way not usually seen from the ex-Python.\n\nWhatever the truth of the rumour above, Gilliam also manages to get a first rate (and very atypical) performance out of the bald one. Bruce is excellent in this film, as are all the cast, particularly a suitably bonkers - and very scary - Brad Pitt.\n\nIt\'s been over a decade since this film was released. When I watched it again, I realised that it hadn\'t really aged. I had changed, of course. And this made me look at the film with fresh eyes. This seems to me to be a fitting tribute to a film that, partly at least, is about reflections in mirrors, altered perspectives and the absurd one-way journey through time that we all make. A first rate film. 8/10.', u'0.0848538', u'Normally I try to avoid Sci-Fi movies as much as I can, because this just isn\'t a genre that really appeals to me. Light sabers, UFO\'s, aliens, time traveling... most of the time it\'s nothing for me. However, there is one movie in the genre that I\'ll always give a place in my list of top movies and that\'s this "Twelve Monkeys" I remember to be completely blown away by it the first time, but even now, after having it seen several times already, I\'m still one of its biggest fans. Every time I see it, this movie seems to get better and better.\n\nSomewhere in the distant future all people live underground because an unknown and lethal virus wiped out five billion people in 1996, leaving only 1 percent of the population alive. James Cole is one of them. He\'s a prisoner who lives in a small cage and who is chosen as a \'volunteer\' to be sent back to in time to gather information about the origin of the epidemic. They believe it was spread by a mysterious group called \'The Twelve Monkeys\' and need the virus before it mutated, so that scientists can study it. But their time traveling machine doesn\'t work perfectly yet and he is accidentally sent to 1990, where he meets Dr. Kathryn Railly, a psychiatrist, and Jeffrey Goines, the insane son of a famous scientist and virus expert...\n\nWhat I like so much about this movie is the fact that it is never clear whether all what you are seeing is real or not. Is this just an illusion, created in the mind of a mentally ill man or is it real? Does he really come from the future and can he really travel through time? Was the population really wiped out by a virus, released by the army of The Twelve Monkeys? Those are all questions that will leave you wondering from the beginning until the end. If the makers of this movie had chosen to make it all more obvious, I\'m sure that I would never have liked it as much as I did now. It\'s just that mysteriousness that keeps me interested time after time. But that\'s not the only good thing about this movie of course. The acting is amazing too. Normally I\'m not too much a fan of Bruce Willis, but what he did in this movie was just astonishing. Together with Madeleine Stowe and Brad Pitt he should have won several awards for it, because together with the amazing story, they made this movie work so incredibly well.\n\nEven after several viewings, I\'m still a huge fan of this movie. Except for this movie, I have only seen one other Terry Gilliam movie and that\'s "Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas", which wasn\'t bad, but didn\'t really convince me either. However, it\'s this movie that really makes me look forward to his other work. I give it a 9/10, maybe even a 9.5/10.', u'-0.0920116', u'Stories about the possibility of a post-apocalyptic future have been around for ages, since the very creation of science-fiction as a genre per se. The fact that today\'s society is responsible for what may become of the future in the near tomorrow, and that our own abuses and refusals to see what is right before out eyes are at the very center of all of these stories, whether they are good or bad.\n\nTerry Gilliam of course is a natural for this kind of film. He gives the movie a decadent feel throughout, showing a society run ragged by its own excesses and bringing forth the a sense of imminent tragedy despite having moments of comedy. His world, the world in which TWELVE MONKEYS transpires, is a place where the mad run wild, where cities are collapsing in filth and neglect, where everything reeks of foreboding despite the luminosity of the opening sequence, where madness looms at every corner. This is a very dark movie, but his very best, most linear (despite the plot twists which hold up under examination), and one which gets better with repeated viewings.\n\nA tragic event in which a deadly virus was unleashed onto humanity in 1996 and thus led to the extermination of Life On The Planet As We Have Known It leads to scientists of the future to try and make amends to change humanity\'s fate on the Earth by employing renegade citizens -- the scum of the Earth -- as guinea pigs to go back in time, among them one James Cole (underplayed to great effect by Bruce Willis). Cole could be any person. We don\'t know anything about him, but in a way, that doesn\'t matter since he is little more than one of many expendable volunteers and hints of his character sneak in later as he gets closer to fulfilling his mission. What we do know is that he is a man who dreams, and his dreams may have been reality: he may have already been at the scene of the Event of 1996.\n\nIt\'s this constant sense of deja vu that keeps popping up throughout the movie. When taken to a mental ward by mistake in 1990 he meets Jeffrey Goines (spastically played by Brad Pitt, Oscar-nominated here) who frantically spews forth talk about doom and destruction, and later Cole believes he has seen Goines in his recurring dream as a man pushing a boy aside while escaping... what? He doesn\'t know. Later he meets a psychologist, Kathryn Railly (Madeleine Stowe), and one of her first reactions to him is that he\'s insane, and that she\'s seen him before. This becomes a running notion throughout her participation in this story from passive/resistant to active and even slightly crazy believer that Something Terrible is coming This Way, especially when she meets him six years later: she has seen Cole before. At the same time, Cole continues talking about a dream he keeps having in which she also plays a part as a blonde woman running down the aisle, screaming for help, after shots have rung out and a particular red-headed man in a ponytail (Jeffrey Goines?) has apparently escaped, not before pushing the little boy who is an innocent bystander. The questions arise: have these events happened? Are they going to happen? Who is really a part of this, or better yet -- is everyone, down to the smallest player, a part of a Greater Plot? Or is this all some trick in the fabric of time in which Time in itself is one huge conveyor belt showing repetitions of fragments of events that slide by over and over again? \n\nThese questions are formulated in a masterful sequence which includes key scenes of Alfred Hitchcock\'s masterpiece VERTIGO in which Madeleine Elster/Judy Barton mourns her own brief existence ("You took no notice," she says, as Cole and Railly watch from their seats in the movie theatre they are hiding in). Snippets of dialog from VERTIGO form a foil to the dialog between Railly and Cole and later, when Cole awakens from having apparently dozed off in the theatre and goes looking for Railly, he comes face-to-face with her in disguise (looking almost exactly like Eva Maria Saint from NORTH BY NORTHWEST) as the swelling Bernard Herrmann score plays the emergence of Judy Barton, dressed as Madeleine Elster. It\'s a fascinating sequence, more so because of the most improbable occurrence of the names of the actors in both films: Madeleine Stowe plays Kathryn Railly who dons a blond wig and grey trench-coat and calls herself "Judy Simmons" while helping an "insane" man named James Cole; James Stewart plays a detective who tries to help "insane" Madeleine Elster who will later re-appear not once, but twice, first as brunette Judy Barton, and later, as Madeleine. Action and re-enaction, play and re-play.', u'-0.0822206', u"\nThe big problem is where to begin as this movie needs your attention the forthcoming two hours and you better not miss some minutes for getting a coke as there is a danger you can't follow. But good there is also a pause-button. Bruce Willis must travel into a timemachine to find out some antivirus for a virus that made animals rule over the world in 1996. Thanks to some mistakes he first ends up in 1990, then in the First World War and how messed up it all might look like, Terry Gilliam comes up with what must be one of the most intelligent scripts ever. This ex-Monty Phyton man knows exactly how genius SF-stories has to be told like and his choice of cast couldn't have been any better, there is the lunatic Brad Pitt (his performance in the asylum is memorable) and a superb Bruce Willis who proves he is more than some Schwarzenegger-wanna be. It's a movie you can watch over and over again as the script is so weird and complicated (and yet you can follow) that every view gives you other surprises. One of my big favourites.", u'0.247992', u'\nWith \'Twelve Monkeys\' you need to pay attention, but if you do that you probably find a lot to appreciate. I know I did. The story is interesting and deals with time traveling. A virus killed a lot of people back in 1997 and a guy named Cole (Bruce Willis) is send back to 1990 and 1996 to find a cure for the virus. In 1990 he is arrested and put in a mental hospital. There he meets Jeffrey Goines (Brad Pitt), who probably has something to do with the virus. He also meets psychiatrist Dr. Kathryn Railly (Madeleine Stowe) who doesn\'t believe him in 1990. When Cole disappears from the mental hospital while he is chained and locked in a room and re-appears in 1996 Kathryn starts believing Cole\'s stories.\n\nThe movie constantly plays with time. Cole makes a phone call and leaves a message in 1996, it is picked up in the future and "they" send someone. For Cole that someone appears only seconds after the phone call. Things like this happen throughout the movie and therefore you must keep attention. You could ask some questions but since you can\'t have an answer yourself it is better to agree with the movie.\n\n\'Twelve Monkeys\' works as sci-fi, with some great images and a dark atmosphere, and it works as a thriller. You are never certain of what will happen next and that helps the movie. May be it has some flaws in the story, but since it is about a fictional thing like time traveling, you should accept what the movie tells us and just try to enjoy. That was the easy part for me.', u'0.149304', u'A linear travel within a non-linear structure. It\'s a fact that time, in 12 monkeys, flows in this come-and-go between present, future and past. However, the movie\'s linearity can\'t be avoided: it\'s the very work of the projector, the unfolding of the narrative.\n\nWhat we can see underlying the temporal theme is a reflection on the inevitability of our actions. The world of this Terry Gilliam film is a world with little space for free-will.\n\nRight from the beginning we are informed about a schizophrenic\'s prophecy, according to which a plague would rule the Earth in 1997, forcing the few survivors to live underground - the only place not affected by the virus.\n\nCole\'s (Willis) mission is clear: return to the mid 90\'s to investigate whatever and whoever is related to the release of the virus. There\'s no way to change the past: all that can be done is gather information that can help the scientists of the present (that, for us viewers, is the future) find the cure. Not to change what happened (the past is inevitable), but make the present better.\n\nIn his "returns" in time, Cole gradually comes near a striking dilemma: his life in the past is better than his life in the present.\n\nThe latter is dark and dehumanizing, controlled by totalitarian scientists that elect "volunteers" (this word is incisively ironic) to embark on the journeys to the past.\n\nThe scientists have not yet reached the highest level of achievements in time travel, and Cole ends up on wrong dates - this will, later in the plot, work as a proof of his sanity for the psychiatrist Kathryn (Stowe).\n\nWe can see, through the evolution of the story, that linearity and non-linearity interlace in a circular temporality.\n\nThere is more than one moment in which the scene that is the first and ends up being almost the last - and certainly the climactic - appears. It modifies itself, according to the evocation of Cole\'s memories, that come up in his dreams.\n\nIn an airport, a man is shot dead while running, armed, toward someone else. A blonde woman runs after the murdered one.\n\nThis is the scene that connects the past (in which Cole is a kid that visits the airport with his parents), the present (the time of the narrative) and the future (adult Cole) Throughout the narrative, Cole has the feeling of having already lived the reality he is experiencing now. His prophetic dreams are the proof that it is impossible to escape or avoid what happened. The agents that shoot him stop him from killing the mad scientist, doctor Peters (Morse), that is the responsible for the dissemination of the disease.\n\nWhat was can\'t be changed. And, in Cole\'s case, what was is what will be. Eternally.\n\nA film not quite well understood for many. To me, nothing less than a masterpiece.\n\nOther good movies with similar theme: The Back to the future trilogy (that has another angle regarding the "mad scientist" character, and although it shares the atmosphere of decay - particularly in the second film -, it is way more optimistic than Gilliam\'s work, that is an odd Hollywood picture).\n\nIn another register, there is "Wild strawberries", one of Bergman\'s masterpieces, that involves a striking and enlightening travel to the past through dreams and reminiscences.\n\nI\'ve never watched "La Jet\xe9e", but only because I can\'t find it.', u'-0.0152176', u"Terry Gilliam's and David Peoples' teamed up to create one of the most intelligent and creative science fiction movies of the '90's. People's proved a screenplay with bizarre twists and fantastic ideas about the nature of time \x97 I especially love the idea one can't change the past; it's a nice counterpoint to so many time-travelling movies which say otherwise \x97 biological holocausts and the thin line between sanity and madness. Gilliam visualized his ideas with unique quirkiness, perfection and originality.\n\nThe story itself is engaging: one man, James Cole (played by Bruce Willis in a heart-warming performance) travels several decades to the past to retrieve information about a virus that's wiped out mankind and left only a few survivors alive living underground: with the information he'll collect, scientists hope to find a cure so everyone in the future can return to the surface. But because their time-travelling technology isn't perfect, he ends up being sent towards different other pasts and complicating things. And from that a brilliant science fiction thriller with shades of film noir ensues as the multiple pieces of a huge jigsaw start fitting together to form a bizarre narrative involving animal right activists, end of the millennium paranoia, biological weapons, the perception of reality, and the definition of sanity. With such a complex movie, it was easy for Gilliam and Peoples to create a mess, but instead Twelve Monkeys is a thought-provoking narrative which will please those who like to be challenged and have patience to appreciate some crazy ideas.\n\nI watched this movie once around 10 years ago. It marked me a lot: I remember still thinking about many days after-wards; for my young mind this seemed quite mind-blowing and it was one of the first movies to make me appreciate cinema as something serious and important. I've re-watched this movie a few days ago on DVD and it's better than I remembered it. Brad Pitt still steals all the scenes he's in, playing Jeffrey Goines \x97 almost a prelude to his Tyler Durden character in Fight Club \x97 a rich kid with some anarchist/non-conformist ideas who's also crazy and, according to Cole, perhaps responsible for the virus. The scenes between Jeffrey and Cole in the madhouse are the best in the movie, Pitt's eyes, voice and quirky mannerisms convince you he's really a crazy guy locked in a warped logic only he understands. Pitt's Oscar nomination was well deserved! Surprising was also Bruce Willis' performance: his I didn't remember very well, but it's beautiful and full of sensibility; he plays a man who spent almost all his life underground, and when he comes to the past you'll share his childish fascination with something as simple as breathing the fresh air of the morning or watching the sun go up. Cole is a rather ambiguous character, Peoples' tried to imbue some darkness in him, and he does other disturbing things to other people and to himself: the scene where he removes his own teeth reveals how far his dementia has gone unchecked. Ironically Cole didn't start as a crazy character, but when he starts warning everyone about the end of the world, he's considered mad and convinced it's all in his mind, until he arrives at a point when he can't distinguish past from future, reality from fiction. Willis spends a lot of time looking confused and insecure, and it works perfectly. One of the fun twists in the narrative is when Cole's shrink, Dr. Kathryn Railly, finds undeniable proof he's really from the future and now has to convince him again of his mission to save the world. The screenplay is full with weird twists like this and it keeps the movie in a fast pace. Their relationship is also well-handed, although perhaps a bit compressed for time's sake. But I enjoyed watching Cole and Railly falling in love and trying to escape the authority of the future to live a peaceful life in the past. But then things end in a tragic/bittersweet climax at an airport, wrapping all the pieces together, which will blow many minds away.\n\nThere are two great endings in this movie, a twist in the sense of Se7en or Fight Club, and a more intimate ending where Railly is crouching next to Cole who's just been shot and looking around for a younger James Cole who's witnessing his future self die; the two share a brief look, and she smiles at him. The twist is brilliant, but I prefer this ending for emotional impact. Madeleine Stowe is very good playing Dr. Railly, she drew many different emotions from me in her performance. The movie is filled with a sense of fatalism with the idea the past can't be changed: this movie shows that in a terrifying way. It reminds me of Chinatown in that sense, the way Jake Gittes messes everything up the more he tries to help. Railly's character shares that fatalism, the more she tries to help Cole \x97 first dealing with his 'madness' then helping him in his mission \x97 the more they're sucked into tragedy.\n\nThe twist ends with a hopeful note, though, with the feeling Cole's mission hasn't been in vain. Twelve Monkeys is a great movie to watch if one wants to be entertained; it's not supposed to be art, although it's more artists than many artistic movies. It's an unpretentious movie where all elements, from music to editing to costume design, etc., came together beautifully to produce a modern cinema masterpiece.", u'0.430286', u'\nWithout a doubt, 12 MONKEYS is one of the best films of the Sci-fi genre and director Terry Gilliam is no stranger at pulling off such cinematic originality.  An apocalyptic film that holds you completely spellbound, 12 MONKEYS never lets up and has you guessing all the way throughout. Excellent use of Philadelphia locales and netherworld sets create a gothic sense of tragedy and two people caught in time at the wrong place.\n\nBruce Willis escapes his macho image and portrays a true loony who happens to be right about all that will happen.  He is actually sane, but the people of the future (or present if you will) distort this guy\'s head so bad through time travel, no wonder he unravels.  He gets sent to World War I just after beng sent to the wrong year to find out how the Army of the Twelve Monkeys pulls off the annihilation of civilization as we know it. They finally get it right and in what is truly a remarkable screenplay to match the performance, we get to see Willis, Madeleine Stowe and an ominous Brad Pitt cross-referenced over the course of 6 years.\n\nStowe is sensual and solid as the risk-taking shrink who slowly starts to realize that Willis may not be as cracked up as he seems.  A captivating element of the relationship between her and Willis is their sense of "seeing" each other before, in another place or time.  12 MONKEYS is essentially about time and the madness the futuristic people immerse into it and the times of the present, when killers and a psychotic genius can alter the world.\n\nThe brooding city of Philadelphia is a dark and gothic backdrop for Willis\' plight to complete his mission which is, against all usual Hollywood stereotype, NOT to save the world.  He is gathering information.  The film plays tricks on the viewer as well, placing Willis in a new setting at the drop of a pin.  This must have been an extremely difficult picture to make but Gilliam seems to be the master of hard-boiled movie making.  He even drops in some humor reminiscent of other great works like TIME BANDITS, and BRAZIL.  The screen is this man\'s canvas and he knows how to paint a sometimes terrifying picture of the world and its possible future within the mainstream atmosphere of big-budget films.  If you want sincere madness and ironic tragedy, see 12 MONKEYS.\n\nRATING: 9 of 10', u'0.141161'], u'tt0061184': [u'An undisputed classic that chronicles every appalling moment of a drunken night in hell as middle-aged George and Martha tear each other, and their guest, to pieces.\n\nElizabeth Taylor proves categorically that she was a truly great actress. Her Oscar-winning performance as the psychologically tormented Martha is one of the greatest performances in the history of cinema. Taylor\'s imperceptible shifting from sadism to tenderness, from bullying condescension to exhausted vulnerability, is a masterclass in character building. Martha is a truly monstrous character, and yet Taylor is able to imbue her with sympathy, allowing you brief glimpses of the warm and lovable woman she could have been.\n\nRichard Burton is equally magnificent as George; an ageing, failing college professor whose initial meekness gives way to a raging torment all of his own. His verbal sparring with Taylor, like two pit-bulls in the ring of an endless and bloody dogfight, has become legendary. Every word drips with malice and contempt, every sentence is designed to cut the deepest wound. At times, it becomes painful to watch, but like true train-wreck television, you cannot drag yourself away from the inevitably terrible conclusion.\n\nQuite possibly, this is as close to perfect as movies can get; beautifully written dialogue, deeply complex characters, an evolving and suspenseful storyline, beautiful photography, and a wonderfully understated score by Alex North. Nominated for 13 Academy Awards in 1967, but lost out to A Man for All Seasons and Born Free to win only 5.\n\n"Who\'s Afraid of Virginia Woolf?" "I am."', u'-0.064799', u'\nThis is still an exceptional film from the 1960s. Though some of the epithets are obviously softening much stronger words, the language is frank and brutal, Martha\'s bludgeoning body-blows balanced by George\'s icepick thrusts. Edward Lehman\'s respectful screenplay gently opens up Edward Albee\'s one-set play while keeping a certain claustrophobic atmosphere. Mike Nichols\' first directing effort is stunning in its lack of artifice; rarely do you feel that the director has done much more than turn on the camera and watch four actors, all at the top of their game, tear into their roles. George Segal\'s work in this movie is criminally underrated, but his reactive work as studly, ultimately disappointing Nick should be mandatory study by all young actors. Sandy Dennis\' fluttery turn as mousy, wifey Honey is powerful also; a lot more is going on than you might think. Richard Burton is staggering as George ("Georgie Porgie Put-upon Pie"), and his performance demonstrates the magic that he could bring to a worthy role. Elizabeth Taylor\'s work here still astounds. The physical transformation she undertook to become aging harpy Martha is amazing enough, but her performance seems to channel a hurricane\'s force and fury. By turns hilarious, maddening and then, at the end, exhausted and defeated yet again, Taylor demonstrates acting, particularly film acting, at its best. The film is by no means easy or "Hollywood" in feel-- the audience is as exhausted as the characters at the end. But this was a bracing, necessary antidote to the impossible ideal of marriage usually portrayed in the movies. A towering film.', u'0.210969', u"'Who's Afraid of Virginia Woolf' tells the story of two couples that are quite different at first sight - one used to each other for years, the other one rather freshly wed in comparison. Actually it doesn't tell their story, but it displays their relationships. \n\nThe film begins on a Sunday morning at 2 o'clock, right after a party, and ends just after the sun rises. In these few hours we get to know these four people better then we might possibly want. \n\nGeorge and Martha are the older couple. He is a history professor, she is the daughter of the head of the university. Their relationship seems to be from hell, full of mutual disgust and humiliation. Their guests are Nick and Honey. He is the new, ambitious biology professor, she is his naive young wive. As all these four characters are more or less drunk throughout the entire film, alcohol works as a catalyst, and we quickly see the different kind of character traits they have: George is a cynic, Martha loves to torment her husband, Nick is an opportunist and Honey is very much a stupid blonde. \n\nThe two relationships deserve closer examination: We wonder why Martha and George married in the first place. They keep swearing at each other. Martha can't stop humiliating George, when they are alone as well as when Nick and Honey are there. Maybe there is still a rest of love in them, but there mutual respect has vanished completely. And then there is the strange story of their son, who is supposed to visit on his birthday. They way George and Martha talk about him make us feel that there is something peculiar about him. At the end we get to know more about him, and we can only guess how important the son is for their relationship. \n\nNick and Honey, on the other hand, seem to be quite the opposite. But, being used as weapons by the older couple, we see that their relationship isn't as perfect as it seems to be, either. Nick didn't marry Honey because he loved her, but because he thought she was pregnant and because of her money. And when Martha tries to seduce him to tease George, he plays the game with her, always in mind that this woman's father is the head of the university. Honey, on the other hand, is much more emotional than her husband, but she also is the most passive character, and the one most affected by the alcohol. \n\nMike Nichols assembled an outstanding cast for his film. Casting Elizabeth Taylor and Richard Burton as Martha and George is a stroke of genius - not only are they terrific actors, but it also heats the imagination of the viewer how much their real-life-marriage resembled the relationship they had in this film. Elizabeth Taylor outshines her co-stars a little. Never was she any better than in this one; although her character is the meanest in the film, she manages that we still feel compassion for her at the end. But Richard Burton, George Segal and especially Sandy Dennis deliver memorable performances, too. \n\n'Who's Afraid of Virginia Woolf' succeeds at something rather difficult: It makes us care for characters we wouldn't want to have anything to do with in real life. And although it actually consist of nothing but four people talking for two hours, it never bored us for a second.", u'-0.0599739', u'Ailing couple George (Burton) and Martha (Taylor) invite a young couple over for a late-night drink - much to quiet and repressed George\'s annoyance - and what starts off as a twisted game by sultry Martha to annoy her husband and get her way with young stud Nick (George Segal) ends up in a horrific duel of wits.\n\nAdapted from the play and boasting very few locations, "Virginia Woolf" is notable for many unsuspected reasons. Designed for the stage, the film makes the story uniquely cinematic and tense, amped up by stunning photography (in Black and White, a daring choice in 1966). The younger leads are superb, but Burton and Taylor still manage to walk away with film, giving stunning renditions of the world\'s most demented couple. They make the surreal dialogue hurt and touch in ways never thought possible.\n\nThough there are countless reasons to recommend this jewel of a film, there are also reasons why one would wish to avoid it. This is the kind of film that makes you feel like having a showing (or a very concentrated drink) to wash away the grit and human evil and pain absorbed. You\'ll feel dirty, but in a way you\'ll also feel enlightened: that a small character film can carry more punch than any explosion-packed blockbuster out there is a thing of beauty indeed!', u'0.120985', u"Who's afraid of Virgina Wolf? contains what I would call the most outstanding old school actor/audience experience I'ver ever seen. This movie is 131 minutes long and only contains 5 actors, on of which hardly gets any screen time and the two leading characters played by the famous couple Richard Burton and Elizabeth Taylor are on screen almost the whole time. Also this movie only contains a couple of locations so the whole project depends almost entirely on these two actors superb performance. The two of them fight almost the entire movie and it never gets boring for a second. Well, I gave this movie ten stars..... definitely a classic must see if you're interested in acting.", u'0.254293', u'\n     Simply put, this is one of my favourite films of all time. Great acting, great writing and great camerawork make this close to cinematic perfection. Liz Taylor and Richard Burton give the performances of their lives. Sandy Dennis also shines in an early-ish role. It\'s a dramatic film, but the wicked humour that permeates the film is absolutely devastating, and I mean that in the best possible way. Many moments in the film I find myself laughing only to think, "Should I be laughing at this." Certainly the film is loaded with uncomfortable moments, enhanced by the camerawork replete with uneasy close-ups. Most of all, this film shows how a lot can be accomplished with just a little: a cast of four and minimal scenery changes. "Who\'s Afraid Of Virginia Woolf" has become an absolute icon of American cinema. If you haven\'t seen it, what are you waiting for?', u'0.219347', u"\nIt's hard for me to accept a film as perfect. This is partly because of IMDb \x96 the movie ranked highest on the Top 250 list ('The Godfather') has a mere 9.0, meaning there is ten points worth of things wrong with even the best film ever made. What IMDb voters fail to realize is that if a movie has an intention \x96 a purpose \x96 and it serves that purpose effortlessly and hits every note that it's supposed to hit without even the remotest hint of an off key, it is perfect by its own right, and therefore worthy of a ten out of ten. 'Who's Afraid of Virginia Woolf?' is one of those movies.\n\nThe plot is ecstatically simple: a troubled married couple (Elizabeth Taylor and Richard Burton) has a younger and \x96 we assume \x96 happier couple (George Segal and Sandy Dennis) over late at night for quick drinks. The reason for the get together is that Martha's (Taylor) father runs the university where George (Burton) and Nick (Segal) work, and the father told them to 'be nice' to the younger couple, so Martha invited them over for a late party. Like I said, the plot is simple, but the characters are so deep and complex it'd take a whole lot more than 1,000 words to describe them correctly (but I'll try with what I got).\n\nThe film starts with George and Martha coming home from a late party. Both are drunk (Martha is a loud and obnoxious drunk but George just has a headache) and Martha constantly berates George when he fails to come up with the name of the Bette Davis movie she's thinking of (and dozens other reasons). It's early in the movie so we don't know if her insults are for real or if they're just a way of being playful with her husband. George acts to stone faced that we can't tell if he's being hurt or played with.\n\nIt's when Nick and Honey (Sandy Dennis) come over that we get to really see how George feels. Martha insults him, calls him names, yells at him while Nick and Sandy look on, baffled as to whether they should laugh or not. As the insults keep on coming George's anger and hurt grow, and the tensions reach a high when he takes a rifle from the closet, points it at Martha and fires. But surprise! It's just a toy with an umbrella that shoots out of the barrel.\n\nAs the movie goes on the characters get drunker, angrier and some painful secrets are revealed, and the actors never lose focus. Burton is sort of disintegrating in front of our eyes, both physically and emotionally, from the drink and his wife. He starts off rigid and unbreakable but soon turns cruel and sadistic, while still keeping his sort of suave, charming personality.\n\nTaylor won an Oscar for playing Martha, and it was an Oscar well deserved. At the beginning she looks like the most vile, unlikable character, but as thick layers are torn away we get to see the hurt and pain her character feels from years of berating George. She loves him, she says, but she doesn't deserve him because of how horrible she is. She doesn't want to be happy, but she does at the same time. We feel for this woman because she is a person, not a caricature of a drunken wife.\n\n From when we first see him we know that there is more to Nick than meets the eye. He seems, in a way, sort of ashamed and embarrassed of his goofy wife, and doesn't put up much of a fight when Martha makes advances on him \x96 right in front of Honey's eyes. Of course, he's not just the clich\xe9d hotshot character of so many movies either. He has an agenda he feels he needs to use to further his career, but he doesn't like using it. He says early that he doesn't like to get involved in other's problems, and gets increasingly awkward and uncomfortable as the movie progresses. Nick also thinks he's the only sane one in the whole house, even insulting his own wife.\n\nSandy Dennis' Honey seems like the smallest character of the film, but her work is in the background. Watch the movie twice, and focus only on her the second time. She reacts; she is always the character who's reacting, never in control. And she has the hard task of acting like a drunken moron for the majority of the film, a task that she excels at. But she only appears as an idiot, she knows what's going on around her but she denies it and tries to act like a playful child to rid herself of the horribleness that's happening. None of this is spoken, of course, but we see it in her face. She won her Oscar for the movie too, and deserved it.\n\nThis is a horrifying film of the dangers of the lies we tell ourselves (with other themes, too, like alcoholism and marriage). It is a perfect film. Few have reached this equality of tragedy, drama, suspense and dark comedy. A recommendation to all, no one could turn away this film.\n\n10/10.\n", u'-0.152789', u'Who\'s Afraid of Virginia Woolf leaves no scabs or stones unturned with the characters. George and Martha are a couple who have a marriage that is truly love-hate. They can never be called too unemotional, though to say whether or not they\'re being truthful at all in the \'games\' they play with married Nick and Honey is a little trickier. Martha invited them- at her father\'s insistence (he IS the chairman of the university where George and Nick are professors)- at two in the morning for a quick drink. Or rather, make that many drinks, like chain drinking, if one could call it that, where George and Martha prove themselves as pros in that area, with bitter slinging of enraged bouts of bile at one or the other. \n\nThis goes on the rest of the night, also leading to a roadhouse on the way to drive a flustered Nick and hammered Honey home, and then it starts all over again, with Nick and Honey picking up the tortured and, as well, fractured personalities of this middle-aged couple. Bitter, enraptured, hateful, and, in a way, also sort of filling a void, George and Martha become two of the most powerful characters in modern drama.\n\nEdward Albee\'s play is full of the kind of stinging dialog that made it controversial in the 1960s, and today it still retains its potential for hitting its characters on to the audience in a shockingly overwrought and, in connection with this, very funny manner. How can one not cringe and give a laugh of relief/perplexity when George goes to get a shotgun after getting p-o\'d by Martha and then opening it up to everyone\'s shock as... an umbrella! \n\nThere\'s a dementia to these characters, but it\'s one that makes for the kind of drama that is lacerating and, as off-putting as the guessing game that the son element becomes in the equation (dead or not dead?), it somehow works. This was before most dramas of today, which are made with that big colossal twist that suddenly jolts the characters into perspective. Here, it just makes them more human and fallible and deconstructed. As Mike Nichols directs it, he doesn\'t shy from getting personal with his angles, close and intrinsic as, in a weird way comparable with, Bergman\'s Persona, also released that year.\n\nWhat Nichols and Albee present for audiences is a logical next step following other plays from before them that broke ground from the likes of Miller, Beckett and, especially, Williams- it\'s more adult, or rather more for mature audiences (the first quasi rated R movie ever released), and it hits to a cynical nerve that was further gestating by this time in America, that everything would not be alright in the American marriage, that something, as Martha says, will "SNAP!" \n\nIt should also be mentioned, acting here is classic, fearless. Burton and Taylor have rarely been as good as they are at digging so deep into these characters that, especially with Burton, we can\'t imagine these people being anyone else. It takes a little to get used to Segal and Sandy Dennis (the latter because her character isn\'t quite as "deep" as the others), but then again their characters are the uncomfortable outsiders, "us" as one might say (however, as the play peels the layers away from the characters they\'re all rotten and ultimately very vulnerable instead of just "normal").\n\nIt packs a punch, it jiggles its little glass full of bourbon or brandy or gin, and as a first feature from its director it could only get better from here. It\'s a dangerously fun, dangerously emotionally violent picture. Will look forward to seeing it next time it\'s on TV', u'0.247949', u'\nThis is one of the most powerfully written and acted movies I have ever seen. I was emotionally drained at the end and could not imagine how actors could have done this on Broadway night after night. The terrible verbal inhumanities Taylor and Burton inflicted on each other were done so well, one never knew what was truth and what was game. A must see if you can handle such a well acted but emotionally traumatic film.', u'0.141271', u"Edward Albee's award winning play, Who's Afraid of Virginia Woolf ran for 664 performances on Broadway and just closed down when this film version made its debut in 1966. The Broadway play was set entirely in the living room of George and Martha's home and starred Uta Hagen, Arthur Hill, Melinda Dillon, and George Grizzard. All eminently respectable players, but none of them exactly movie box office.\n\nThis film was destined to make money when the most publicized couple of the decade, Elizabeth Taylor and Richard Burton, chose it as a star vehicle for themselves. Of course what was not clear was how well a one stage play would adapt to film.\n\nIt adapted very well and went quite beyond one stage. The action of the film moved effortlessly to an all night diner at one point with some stops along the way. You'd hardly know the story as originally told only had one setting.\n\nThere's no real plot to it. For reasons I can't fathom this middle aged and bitter couple George and Martha have a younger couple, Nick and Honey, over to their house at two in the morning. I don't know about you, but I'm usually not my best at that time. Also they had just come from a party at Martha's father's house. Martha's dad is the president of a college and George teaches there. Nick and Honey are a newly hired professor and his wife.\n\nThe late night and the liquor bring out the worst in everybody. A whole lot of ugly truths get told.\n\nWho's Afraid of Virginia Woolf was the summit of the professional team of Elizabeth Taylor and Richard Burton. Playing against type, Elizabeth Taylor got her second Oscar the one she felt she earned. She always disparaged the one received for Butterfield 8 as it came on the heels of her well publicized pneumonia bout.\n\nIn fact all four members of the cast were nominated with Sandy Dennis winning Best Supporting Actress. Ironically Richard Burton didn't win, losing to Paul Scofield for A Man for All Seasons. I guess the Academy voters figured Burton would get another shot. He never brought home the big prize though.\n\nGeorge Segal usually gets overlooked. This film and Ship of Fools was the start of his long career, but no Oscar for him either.\n\nWho's Afraid of Virginia Woolf is quite the indictment against marriage, especially after the love has died. It's far from the whole story of marriage. There are many who stay married longer than George and Martha and happily. But it wasn't in Edward Albee's life experience to draw from. \n\nBut this should be seen to see Liz and Dick at their very best.", u'-0.126784', u'\nABSOLUTE TEN !!  This is a masterpiece and it is mandatory that you watch it.  If you are an adult (not for children) and have not seen this movie, please reward yourself and rent or buy the movie.  Like Jonah and the great whale, you too will be swallowed, but into the overwhelming emotions of this very very great screenplay.  The movie was shot in B&W with a small cast of actors, but who notices?  Burton and Taylor at their absolute B-E-S-T.  Like a bug-light draws moths, you will be dragged into this one.', u'0.352047', u'This is one of those special movies that manages to be good but unwatchable at the same time. In other words, while the script may be an accurate of the most unpleasant couple in history as they spend an evening entertaining some annoying guests, some (like me) might wonder why anyone would want to see this! For example, they could film a brilliantly executed heart transplant or the removal of giant parasitical worms from someone, but why watch it? To me, the film was just too painful to endure.\n\nLiz Taylor and Richard Burton play a couple of drunks who are married and spend all their time destroying each other. Now, according to the film it\'s because of the death of their son but they would have been terrible people regardless--they truly despise each other and themselves. Then, as if an afterthought, some guests arrive and actually stay and watch as this couple destroy each other right in front of them. And so, the newcomers get drunk and the drunks get drunker. Wow...now THAT\'S fun! Then, tongues loosen some more and a lot of unpleasantness results.\n\nSure, having worked with alcoholics I understand that Taylor and Burton did an excellent job here. But for a two-hour plus film it\'s an endurance contest I don\'t wish to do again. So the overall verdict is that it\'s well made but thoroughly awful. If you can endure and appreciate this, fine. But if you can\'t, don\'t feel like you must. Just because it\'s rated so highly on IMDb does not mean it\'s a "must-see"--especially because this film may well leave you feeling depressed and in need of a drink!', u'-0.387955', u'Although Elizabeth Taylor\'s acting performance is excellent (with the exception of a few instances of overacting), I didn\'t enjoy this film. I thoroughly disliked the characters and the screenplay. It\'s a difficult task sitting through a movie this depressing and boring. I had to watch it in two sittings.\n\nThe two main characters are uninteresting, crude, gloomy people whose dismal lives are engineered by their own dismal personalities. It held a morbid interest to me for about the first 20-25 minutes but then got very old very quickly. Regarding story, as far as I\'m concerned there was none. The entire movie takes place during a single unbearable evening in which a new young teacher and his wife visit an unhappy, unsuccessful, drunken, obnoxious middle-aged couple of a college history department. As liquor flows the elder couple proceeds to tell the young couple the boring story of their miserable discontented personal lives, including dirty laundry, in a lengthy vulgar drunken loud argument. No plot, no moral, no endearing qualities. One descriptive adverb for this film is "over"; over-dramatic, over-acted, and mostly over-irritating; another word that comes to mind is "dumb", and another is "vulgar". The dialog of this movie is just a stream of vulgar sarcasm spewed by gloomy characters. Not my cup of tea. It gets a rating of 4 from me only because of the acting (the other three actors performances were also quite good) and the good film production.', u'-0.488532', u'It could be great and is braying for a remake so it\'s more than an interesting art school film seen by a tiny audience. A film you keep waiting to begin until you realize it\'s not going to. You won\'t be the only ones asking if you can go now by the time this film ends. I guess the director/writer deserves some recognition for the indirect, internal reference to itself as a flop.\n\nThe title connection to the story is either extremely limited and painfully unimaginative or the writer/director assumes a great deal. One of the many things that will leave you asking, "Was that all there was to it?" For future filmmakers, a film should not need to be explained. It is the nature of a film, or a play as this is based on, that being enclosed from the rest of the world and uninterrupted that it should explain and give context to itself. Woolf massively fails this most basic aspect. It partially makes up for it in other ways, like deep relationship, marriage, and family insights, which is why I\'m not rating it a 1.\n\nThe score is exceptional and simple, but the soundtrack music is, at best, less annoying than the story.\n\nCompared to another film that, like this, is essentially composed of a room full of people less than happy with each other, it reinforces how great 12 Angry Men is, despite being done a decade before Woolf. A recent film, Compliance (2012), does it much better and also works with hard to believe dumb/naive characters.', u'-0.184425', u"Its hard to explain how I felt about this film. I didn't particularly love it and at time found the dialog to go on and on, but I couldn't stop watching and wondering just what was going on. For a movie that only takes place in about four different places there house outside the house, the bar, and outside the bar, there was a lot going on. There was this awkward couple with tons of problems and a younger couple, they seem to playing with as a sort of game.This film had this dark creepy aspect to it, without ever really showing to many creepy parts except when George pulls out the fake gun and pretend to shoot Martha with they all find hilarious which just add to the whole creepy factor this film has going for it. I found this all interesting and wanted to found out more but I just didn't find it entertaining which I feel is the main job a movie has. I though Martha and George both were great and very convinces actors but at time Martha was just a little to over the top with her drunken antics. I have no idea why anyone who had couldn't have a child would accuse each other of killing it. Not the mention why wasn't George just as intoxicated as the rest, I found many inconstancy's in the whole drunk aspect, at certain points it seemed as they would just snap out of being drunk then go back into it. I think the fact it only involved four characters and I have no idea why anyone who had couldn't have a child would accuse each other of killing it played into why I wasn't entertained by this film, but I though it was well done maybe just not my taste", u'-0.57195'], u'tt2015381': [u"Guardians of the Galaxy is nothing short of an amazing movie. If there's anything I can say, it's that it is the best superhero movie I have seen. Not only does it have the impressive set pieces and enough action to last you a lifetime, it has an emotional core and you actually get to care about each and every single character. Overall this movie is filled with all the required thrills and spills and is a first class action movie. It also has a great mixture of comedic value and a deal of seriousness. \n\nThe film's unlikely hero is Quill (Chris Pratt), an eccentric gunfighter in the Han Solo mould who we meet stealing a metal orb coveted by the evil warlord Ronan. When he dispatches his top assassin, the green- skinned Gamora (Zoe Saldana), to recover the artifact, the pair find themselves locked up, along with the galaxy's most unlikely bounty hunters \x96 a gun-toting raccoon (Bradley Cooper) and his sidekick (Vin Diesel) who just happens to be a walking tree. All the actors do a great job at portraying there characters, they feel real beings. You get to know about them and their struggles and you become attached to them. Every character in the movie got their time to shine, especially Rocket Raccoon who is voiced perfectly by Bradley Cooper. Everyone is pitch perfect in their roles even Batista! \n\nFor those that want specifics: effects were top notch, acting was excellent, story lines were compelling, the comedy was perfect 99.5% of the time and surprise there were a lot of one line typical superhero zingers that worked really well. What really can't be stressed enough is just how insanely fun and entertaining Guardians of the Galaxy is for literally its entire two-hour-plus run-time. I still have a hard time wrestling with who was my favorite actor in this. all in all, the film is brilliantly well done, action scenes are engrossing and genuinely done, you genuinely worry about certain characters and I for one was thrilled with it. Go see this.", u'0.460906', u'I remember sitting in Hall H at Comic-Con two years ago, when Marvel first announced Guardians of the Galaxy. This came on the heels of the title reveals for Captain America: The Winter Soldier and Thor: The Dark World, and my initial reaction was one of utter confusion. What the hell was Guardians of the Galaxy? I was completely unfamiliar with the source material, and upon learning that the team featured a gun-wielding raccoon and a fighting tree creature whose could only speak a single phrase, I was even more puzzled.\n\nFast forward to Comic-Con 2013, when James Gunn appeared onstage in Hall H to showcase the first trailer for the film. It was so unlike anything Marvel had ever done before, so far outside the box that I immediately fell in love with it and couldn\'t wait to see more. Although that first trailer was well-received by the Comic-Con audience, the general public seemed to be scratching their heads in much the same way that I had when the film was first announced. Marvel fans would love this, no doubt, but could this bizarre little sci-fi romp with a cast of unknown characters actually work?\n\nThe answer is a resounding "yes," as Guardians of the Galaxy is not only an exceptionally well-made comic-book film, but an exceptionally well- made film, period. It\'s a sprawling space opera with a host of memorable characters, a joyous sci-fi romp through beautifully realized worlds, wildly inventive action sequences, and an almost nonstop barrage of humor and fun. The protagonists are a bizarre assembly of losers and misfits, with the CG-created Rocket and Groot providing some of the most emotional and human moments of the film, and it\'s all brilliant. Marvel should be applauded for allowing Gunn the opportunity to realize his vision, because rest assured, this film wouldn\'t have been nearly as good with someone else at the helm.\n\nGuardians of the Galaxy has a distinct personality that sets it apart from other Marvel offerings, yet there are enough recognizable elements to remind audiences that it exists in the same world. Clocking in at just under two hours, the film maintains an impressively well-balanced pace, avoiding the problem of over-inflation that many superhero films fall victim to. I can\'t think of a single moment when I wasn\'t completely enthralled with everything that happens on screen, and as soon as the credits began to roll I was ready to watch it all over again.', u'0.107066', u"I entitle my review A New Hope as I walk out of the cinema feeling like I have just watched the Star Wars of our generation!\n\nAs a huge Marvel fan (both comics and film) I was delighted to hear this film was getting made with the perfect choice of Guardians and what a perfect cast to play them. The biggest surprise for me was Dave Bautista who I thought was only cast for his size but his delivery was spot on for Drax. Chris Pratt was hilarious whilst still excellent at delivering some of the films most emotional scenes.\n\nCGI in this film was super, there's nothing I hate more than too much CGI in a film but it was so good in Guardians that I was completely lost in it. Never have a seen space look so good, the battles were incredible and Groot and Rocket never looked out of place (aside from being a tree and raccoon).\n\nGunn is the perfect director for this, his tone, his balance of comedy, action and emotion blended perfectly and directing GOTG would have been no easy job. DC are still trying hard to get Justice League going, Marvel just made a film with a talking tree and Raccoon and it was AWESOME!!!\n\nNot a bad performance all round and comic fans will be happy with certain nods and winks scattered throughout. Probably my top Marvel film yet, it has the fresh new feeling the first Iron Man had with all the action and humour of The Avengers. 10 stars from me, even if your not a comic book or sci-fi fan, this movie has something for everyone.", u'0.531791', u"Expectations: surpassed - and they were pretty damn high to begin with.\n\nExcitement: met - after watching the teasers, the clips, and after Captain America the Winter soldier I was crossing my fingers Marvel were on a roll.\n\nFace: still trying to recover - you know when you go to the cinema to see a comedy ( a film designed to make you laugh ) and you feel like an idiot for paying for the ticket as you were forcing most of the laughter in the company of your friends? This is a film that it's genuinely easy to laugh about: \n\nThe humour is so subtle because the characters are so subtle - they're not too animated, they're not too stereotypical and they are NOT what we've come to expect from traditional superheroes and THAT'S WHY THIS FILM WORKS SO WELL! Regardless if you're a Marvel fan or simply a fan of movies in general this is an experience you will welcome as it's new and refreshing to a sci-fi genre which really needed something new and refreshing and with great performances, stunning visuals and a barrel of laughs mixed with the right amount of action this was a real treat to watch.\n\nThank you Marvel Studios.", u'0.678088', u"Great expectations before the film, definitely, and they really paid off. Guardians of the Galaxy is one of the best Marvel films to date, and a really good sci-fi at that too. The film is strong on so many levels, outstanding characters, great worlds, is emotional and humorous.\n\nPeter Quill, or Star Lord as he likes to call himself, is a quick-witted man of Earth thrown into the far reaches of galaxy, who has stolen an artifact that everyone seems to want. By accident he stumbles upon four other characters, Gamora the assassin, Drax the Destroyer, Rocket the enhanced raccoon and Groot the humanoid tree, and the five of them form an unlikely team. The characters are really well presented, their emotional core is strong and back stories engaging. In short, they're interesting and easy to like. All of them have great moments and keep us wanting for more and more. Rocket, in particular, steals the show with his anger management problems and bright one-liners. It was great to see a group of people each with their own agenda come together, this dynamic worked really well. Star-Lord carried a lot of this weight, and was very sympathetic.\n\nThe film doesn't take itself very seriously, which was refreshing to see after also great yet darker themes of Thor and Captain America 2's. Guardians has a lot of laughs, witty dialogue, characters rub off on each other (and the audience), writing is perfect. The film is so entertaining, non-stop adventure but also knows when to balance with more dramatic themes. Scenery and worlds are spectacular, visual effects top notch. As a reader of the Guardians comics it was great to see some smaller motifs thrown in that may not be necessarily caught by regular viewers, but which the comic book readers will definitely be thankful for too.\n\nAll in all, Guardians of the Galaxy was an awesome watch. Amazing characters, vivid cinematography, great dialogue, lots of humor, soundtrack was nice, story exciting. This wonderful adventure and its captivating characters will be in mind for a long time.", u'0.624597', u"I know, I know. This will incontrovertibly attract a lot of hate from die-hard Dark Knight fans, but guess what? I'm one of those who thinks Nolan is the epitome of how to make a perfect superhero spectacle. \n\nOr at least, I was until tonight. \n\nThis film will blow your mind. Quite literally, it is jam-packed with edge-of-your-seat action thrills and pure comedic gold. Don't be expecting a moody companion piece like that of Nolan's trilogy, or Man of Steel. It keeps more in touch with Avengers, although it's a lot funnier and really builds upon the upcoming Infinity Gauntlet arc. \n\nThe actors are incredible, matching the character developments, the dialogue and action sequences are spectacular and the visual effects should surely earn a nod come Oscar time, as I'd personally put them on par with those seen in the recent Dawn of the Planet of the Apes. The run length compliments the well-scripted pacing of the movie itself, whilst plenty of interesting secondary characters litter Guardians with an ensemble cast that has exceeded anything yet seen in the Marvel/DC movie worlds. I don't pertain to the DC versus Marvel argument, but this masterpiece alone has certainly put Marvel on the front foot in terms of cinema outings, far surpassing the very enjoyable Man of Steel and, I believe, edging out Nolan's trilogy and then some. \n\nI thoroughly recommend this for any with a borderline sci-fi/superhero love, and advise you to remain for the tantalising post-credits scene, although many of the non-comic fans might not get the references. \n\nEasily a perfect ten out of ten for me.", u'0.520429', u"(Rating: 12A, 121 mins) Written by Zen Terrelonge \n\nStarring \x96 Chris Pratt, Zoe Saldana, Bradley Cooper, Dave Bautista, Vin Diesel\n\nIf you've seen the trailers for Guardians of the Galaxy, you'd be within your rights to think Marvel Studio execs have been hitting the bottle hard or taking LSD.\n\nThe film revolves around a group of dysfunctional but goodhearted criminals \x96 think Robin Hood's Merry Men of the future \x96 comprising human thief Peter Quill aka Star-Lord (Pratt), green assassin Gamora (Saldana), talking raccoon Rocket (Cooper), knife-wielding Drax the Destroyer (Bautista), and walking tree Groot (Diesel).\n\nLike the Avengers, the Guardians get off to a false start but soon unite over a common cause, namely, the galaxy being obliterated by genocidal maniac, Ronan \x96 not Keating \x96 the Accuser.\n\nAh yes, the old, let's-exterminate-everyone-for-the-mistakes-of-their-forefathers ploy.\n\nBut unlike Avengers Assemble, Guardians of the Galaxy oozes offbeat originality and frankly, it's the most unique and delightful film Marvel has created to date.\n\nIt's a hell of an achievement given the extensive movie library the company is building up and when you consider the characters aren't household names like 'big three' Iron Man, Thor and Captain America, but Marvel seems well aware of that fact with the final production risky to say the least.\n\nThe film opens in 1988, which is when Quill is abducted from Earth, and 26 years later we see he's become a crooked intergalactic outlaw with a taste for all things shiny, valuable and not his.\n\nGiven the distinct decade in which he was taken, his cassette player and mixtape of 70s and 80s tracks are laced throughout the film, which creates a quirky yet grounded quality in the midst of all of the dazzling interstellar warfare that takes place along the way.\n\nIn addition to the soundtrack, jokes and comedy have never been more of a feature in a Marvel film \x96 perhaps Iron Man 3 was the closest \x96 as gags are thrown into the unlikeliest of scenarios to lessen the tension, and I would imagine, to really differentiate itself from Avengers Assemble, Star Wars and Star Trek, which by comparison are left looking very sombre.\n\nThat said, if you were going to compare Pratt's Quill to someone, the character is quite reminiscent of Chris Pine's Captain James Kirk \x96 smart, womanising, reckless leaders, who eventually find their feet.\n\nThe editing is supreme and makes each bit of dialogue super-sharp and tight, so when the infamous five are bickering or talking generally, the repartee all feels really clean and natural without being awkward or forced.\n\nThor can be stubborn, Iron Man can be arrogant and Captain America is considered too stiff, but all of the Guardians bring even more wildly different qualities to the table and offer some diversity that doesn't ever grate or bore, which wouldn't have been possible without such excellent casting.\n\nMeanwhile, the film is very much in the here and now, with Quill's backstory the only one that truly gets a look-in, which creates a sense of intrigue about his colleagues who only have their pasts hinted at, meaning sequel fodder.\n\nThere's just no way of knowing where you're going and tonally the movie delivers a piece of everything and it's done big and without hesitation.\n\nGuardians may have been a gamble, but I'm Grooting for it to Rocket to the top.\n\n10/10", u'-0.0743522', u'Guardians of the Galaxy is just another mediocre film. Under the pretence of future, it sneaked in embraces of the past. Perhaps it tried to be both, but it was neither a serious film nor a comedy. It failed to trigger any deeper emotion inside me. Its humour was out of context. There were too many characters, most of which were not properly developed. The purposes of existence of those figures were very confusing. I\'ll comment in detail on the triggering of deeper emotions and the humour in the following 2 paragraphs.\n\nSomeone commented that the films like the Dark knights series set a standard that superhero films must be deep and thoughtful. That person further commented that this film, Guardians of the Galaxy challenged this standard. I generally don\'t like dogmas. But here it\'s not at all about dogmas. It is just the fact that those "deep" ones could trigger deeper emotions, or provoke thoughts, or inspire the audiences, or help the audiences learn something, or help the audiences learn themselves better. By these, the audiences like, think about, involuntarily recall, remember and give high scores for those "deep" films. Of course different people have different opinions on deepness. So, I don\'t comment on the deepness of Guardians of the Galaxy. Just commenting on triggering deeper emotions, or provoking thoughts, or inspiring me, or helping me learn something or learn myself better, unfortunately, Guardians of the Galaxy did none of these to me. So, it just didn\'t make me feel that way, that it was one of those all-time great films.\n\nSomeone commented that Guardians of the Galaxy was not a serious film, but rather, it was a great, light-hearted comedy. Even for this, I don\'t think I could agree. Great humour exists in context. In the right context, something plain could be hilarious. Out of context, brilliant jokes were just nothing. In Guardians of the Galaxy, too much humour ran out of context. For example, the raccoon said later, that he asked for one prisoner\'s prosthetic leg was just a joke. What did this convey? It was clever to play such heartless jokes on your partners when it was time to be serious? No. How about it tried to portray a figure, the raccoon, who was unfazed in front of great danger? But then you had to make the situation look dangerous. Even in The Wizard of Oz (1939), the scenes felt more creepy than here in the prison. The prison here felt just like a noisy second-hand market. So, I didn\'t find the joke funny and didn\'t know why it was in the film otherwise either. There were many such lines. I knew they were intended to be something to make people laugh, but I just didn\'t feel that entertained at those improper moments.\n\nAll in all, Guardians of the Galaxy has no place on the all-time great list. Perhaps it was the last joke it could play, on itself, being put into the Top 250 list. Among those great films, its mediocrity would just manifest itself. Just within the first month of its release, it dropped 20 places on the Top 250 list from the 34th to the 54th. As time goes on, this film will likely drop further when the enthusiasm fades after its initial surge. There are great films, like In the Name of the Father (1993), A Beautiful Mind (2001) etc. They were not on the Top 250 list before, but gradually rose up and emerged into the all-time great list. Just on the contrary, Guardians of the Galaxy will gradually drop out of the Top 250 list.', u'-0.258411', u"As a fan of Marvel movies I was excited to see Guardians of the Galaxy. However, this movie failed on several levels.\n\nIt is supposed to a comedy but the jokes are not funny. I genuinely laughed once. Furthermore, one 'joke' was weirdly inappropriate.\n\nThe story is completely generic. It seems like they just needed some story, any story, as a vehicle for the characters to get together and try to be funny.\n\nI wanted to write a review without spoilers but the big set-piece ending of a spaceship crashing into the ground has to be called out. This was done in the Avengers and Star Trek: Into Darkness. To me, it's like directors have to have this '9/11' shot in every movie (big thing crashes into buildings) and it has to stop. It's boring now.\n\nThe only positive about this movie was the special effects and space backgrounds.\n\nIt seems that Marvel have figured out punters will pay cash money for any old junk if its wrapped up in special effects and a decent soundtrack. I will approach the next Marvel with extreme caution, and I will not see Guardians of the Galaxy 2.", u'-0.305773', u"With each new film they release, Marvel outdo themselves time after time, from 'Captain America: The Winter Soldier' to 'X-Men: Days of Future Past' and now to this amazing and irreverent superhero space opera packed full of humour and action in a visually stunning galaxy. Admittedly, I have slowly become more and more bored with superhero films since the high point of DC's 'The Dark Knight' and Marvel's 'Avengers', however 'Guardians' was something that was truly different, something that truly blew me away and has, as a result, become what is arguably my favourite Marvel film. Previous Marvel films have tried too hard to place humour in situations that didn't require it, 'Guardians of the Galaxy' however employs it frequently and due to the constant stream of jokes it works perfectly. Chris Pratt is by far one of Marvel's best casting choices since Robert Downey Jr. as 'Iron Man', even beyond this the other acting bodies were cast perfectly. The visual effects are utterly stunning and the battle scenes are epic, 'Guardians' is a truly amazing and thrilling superhero flick full of visual splendour.", u'0.871125', u'You might expect a movie studio at the top of its game to play it safe rather than strike out in new, bizarre directions. Certainly, it\'s hard to imagine any other studio giving the greenlight to Guardians Of The Galaxy - a huge blockbuster movie based on a title unfamiliar to anyone who isn\'t a comics aficionado, starring a relatively unknown actor playing a character most people have never heard of. And yet, Marvel scores once again with its willingness to head off the beaten track. GUARDIANS is a fun, fizzy delight, even as it mines some surprising depths of emotion from its ragtag group of anti-heroes.\n\nPeter Quill (Pratt) - a human abducted from Earth as a child - has grown up into an intergalactic thief who has no idea what he\'s getting into when he takes possession of a mysterious Orb. Little does he know that Ronan (Pace) - a genocidal Kree radical - will do just about anything to get his hands on said Orb, including sending alien assassin Gamora (Saldana) after it. Gamora, as it turns out, has an agenda of her own. Trapped in an intergalactic prison (long story), Peter and Gamora are forced into an uneasy alliance with three other misfits: a brainy, sarcastic raccoon-like creature named Rocket (voiced by Cooper), a giant tree by the name of Groot (Diesel), and the vengeance-minded Drax The Destroyer (Bautista).\n\nThe truth is that there\'s almost too much going on in GUARDIANS. Not only do we meet a host of characters we\'ve never met before, on a raft of new planets teeming with brightly coloured life and detail, we\'re also introduced to several plot lines all stuffed somewhat awkwardly into the film. We have Ronan\'s planet-destroying aspirations, which are somehow bound up with the evil plans of Thanos - that creepy purple- skinned dude who popped up at the end of The Avengers. Peter\'s kidnappers turned surrogate \'family\' are also on the trail of the Orb, turning up at moments both enormously convenient and inconvenient to the plot. It all makes sense in the end, but until it all clicks into place, it can make for a rushed, unsettling experience.\n\nBut, despite its occasionally unwieldy script, GUARDIANS triumphs because of the gang of scruffy losers (a term that will take on a different, more heartfelt meaning during the film) at its heart. Director James Gunn, who co-wrote the script, clearly feels a strong affinity for each one of these outcasts, all of whom are easily outlaws in some (if not all) parts of the solar system, each one battling - at least initially - to save his or her own skin rather than to save the world. It\'s fascinating to watch the five members of this unlikely group slowly banter, bicker and batter their way into becoming a team.\n\nMost joyfully of all, Gunn never loses sight of the prickly, selfish side of his characters. He gives them plenty of rich, emotional moments - whether it\'s Peter and Gamora bonding over the loss of their parents, or Rocket\'s ability to read a whole range of meaning into Groot\'s extremely limited vocabulary (\'I am Groot\') - but never allows the film to descend into dangerously sentimental territory.\n\nIn fact, Gunn pumps up proceedings with a healthy, hearty dose of humour. Films in the Marvel Cinematic Universe (MCU) have always been more tongue-in-cheek than the likes of the considerably more dour Dark Knight franchise, but GUARDIANS is a heady trip of a different order. It practically delights in bursts of odd, subversive comedy, and actually dares to punctuate its most epic face-off with a sly homage to, of all things, Footloose.\n\nPratt - so winning in TV\'s Parks And Recreation - holds the emotional core of the film together. He exudes an easy, rakish charm that makes Peter both dashingly arrogant and achingly vulnerable. He\'s matched very well by Saldana, who is clearly delighting in the opportunity to play the world-weary, no-nonsense Gamora - bred into a killer, born a fighter. The rest of the cast does justice, too, to the film\'s cheerful swing from drama to comedy and back again: Bautista brings unexpected pathos to Drax\'s occasionally comical determination to avenge his family against Ronan, while Cooper sounds completely unlike himself - in a very good way - as a creature who hides a world of hurt beneath his mouthy exterior. Even Diesel manages to find a great deal of depth in a CGI character who only communicates via the same languid burst of three words.\n\nIf anything, GUARDIANS is let down by a trio of not particularly threatening villains. Pace snarls and spits in heavy make-up, but can\'t quite rustle up much in the way of nuance or genuine menace. Ronan is a one-note madman, with so little in the way of backstory that he automatically becomes less interesting. Thanos, too, now voiced and performed in motion-capture by Brolin, doesn\'t get much to do beyond lounge on his space throne. Only Gillan\'s cyborg Nebula manages a smidgen of complexity; even then, she struggles to be half as fascinating as her conflicted "sister", Gamora.\n\nBefore the film was even released in cinemas, Marvel announced that a sequel would be coming in 2017. It\'s a no-brainer as to why. The film is smart, funny and quite wonderful on its own merits. But, even more crucially, GUARDIANS is a gamble that pays off handsomely for Marvel. It opens up the MCU in, quite literally, all directions. Don\'t be surprised if you see our more earth-bound heroes heading into space sooner rather than later. The film also adds a new cast of lovable rogues to the MCU\'s roster of characters: a gang who, one might say, are actually all the more heroic for being people who would ordinarily be running in the opposite direction from any galaxy-guarding duties. Frankly, we can\'t wait to see what they get up to next.', u'0.124996', u'It\'s no surprise that when Marvel\'s latest movie was released many, many people (the non comics reading kind, mainly) said "Who?" The comic itself has never been what you call top tier, with various incarnations having been around for decades, although the film is based on the team created by Dan Abnett and Andy Lanning in 2008, now being serviced by top writer Brian Bendis.\n\nMarvel certainly have made sure the Guardians have plenty of publicity, turning a bunch of also rans into a must see event and even having the confidence to proclaim "The Guardians Of The Galaxy Will Return" at the end of the movie. This is a company with the utmost confidence in their product, and after seeing it it\'s very easy to understand why.\n\nFirst and foremost, Guardians... is fun. After a truly heartbreaking beginning everything goes a bit daft, mixing swashbuckling sci fi action with larger than life characters, and whilst at first you may be a little puzzled, it all streamlines into a simple plot soon enough. Basically, Guardians leader Peter Quill (known mainly to only himself as Star Lord) has a plot device, and other people also want the plot device. He forms an alliance with a very disparate bunch of people who each have their own reason for helping him. To go into more detail really isn\'t that necessary, as all it will involve is laying out a roster of names and personal grievances, and you\'ll get all that when you watch the film, because if you\'re reading this review I will lay odds you\'re going to see it.\n\nThe movie looks beautiful throughout, probably thanks to the thousand or so "Digital Artists" who take up a large part of the end credits. Ship design is fantastic, with many looking like they were pulled direct from a Chris Foss art book, and if you know Foss you\'ll know this is a high compliment. Yeah, the bad guys have dull, dark vessels with inadequate lighting (surely evil needs to see as well?) but the good guys have some sexy vessels indeed. Sound wise, it may seem odd that a 2014 state of the art sci fi movie will have a 1970\'s chart soundtrack, but the inclusion of The Runaways, Rupert Holmes and, of course, Blue Swede\'s "Hooked On A Feeling" is completely explained and rather poignant. It would be nice, too, if kids start downloading some of this awesome old stuff and finally start listening to real music (so speaks an old fart).\n\nSo in a nutshell this is a very good movie. It\'s packed with fun and enjoyable characters, but also has it\'s fair share of down beats and dead beats. Top honours are fought out for between Chris Pratt, excellent and ridiculously likable as Peter Quill, and the brilliant Rocket Raccoon, a purely CGI character stuffed with attitude and some great one liners. The other main characters all do well, however, with even big bag Ronan (no, not the Boyzone one, mores the pity) being well served and very well played with menace aforethought by Lee Pace.\n\nOne thing people want to know about Marvel films is what\'s the after credits scene like? Well, without being spoilery, I\'ll say two things: one, it\'s NOT a big reveal or anything like that, but two, it\'s really funny if you have a knowledge of a certain old Marvel character. Oh yeah, and you get to play everyone\'s favourite game in the movie - \'Spot Stan Lee\'. It just wouldn\'t be the same without him mugging it up somewhere.\n\nIn closing, "Guardians Of The Galaxy" is right up there with the rest of Marvel\'s cinematic output, making a clear mark by being totally different to anything else we\'ve so far seen. It\'s Fun with a capital \'F\', and engaging throughout. Some of the violence may be a bit much for smaller kids, and there\'s a bit of moderately fruity language (is \'dick\' fruity still? I fall behind sometimes). That said, kids who don\'t mind a walking tree impaling people or a raccoon murderising people with a kick ass gun will have a blast. Big, beautiful and bad ass, "Guardians Of The Galaxy" is definitely the feel good fantasy of 2014, as evidenced by the grin still stuck to my face. All together now... "I\'m hooked on a feeling..."', u'0.313541', u"I thought it would only be fair giving this 1 star, even though it's maybe - at BEST - a 4, because this is definitely not worth 8. GUARDIANS OF THE GALAXY was a shot I chose to try in god knows how long since I've been to the cinema. This is just another load of Hollywood trash. I had the impression it was innovative, considering the Guardians being pulled out from the bottom of the pile and the whole outlaw thing... but I was wrong...\n\nIN THE BEGINNING, what's-his-name is on Earth and it is APPARENTLY '88. The kid's mother dies. OK. Is this meant to be emotional despite the fact I have no attachment to any of these characters yet? OH WOW IT'S THE FUTURE NOW!! I'm sorry; his mother dies, he goes outside and then he gets abducted? What is this supposed to signify? Not to mention it's (obviously) unbelievably and strangely timed, but this is probably an attempt at giving some depth to the main character, but really doesn't do ANYTHING for the major plot of the entire film.\n\nThe rest of the film was just a bunch of underdogs coming together because they end up in the same space prison (because what happens when you're arrested together is you share a block, not to mention gender is no issue here). Then they fall into this orb situation. What is it? It.. it is this orb.. and it is powerful.. a bit like the cube or something. There was little development in the story at all really, a few changes in direction but no real twists or anything surprising. I don't even know, I was almost asleep half the time. I was constantly checking my watch to see when it was over.\n\nSo we have hideous CGI here. Ridiculously unprofessional, but I guess I'm not in with the CGI in blockbusters. They have this obnoxious claim to fame with technology it seems; having the ability to do these things doesn't make it cool, it just looks like a video game. Another thing, visually, was the designs. It was just so typical of the action/sci-fi genre in the technology and whatnot, and the characters... very much in the same boat but more-so thrown together effortlessly.\n\nThen after that its all EXPLOSIONS - SPEEDING - ADVERTISING - HITTING! In between there's a conceited amount of one liners that made me cringe. The best kind. And in the end we have some false suspense because we know everything is going to be okay.\n\nOVERALL: >The comedy was... horrid... >The story was simple. >The characters were lacking in... everything really. -The cinematography didn't even involve cameras. >The soundtrack was a bunch of pop classics chucked together. So what was good about it? The ACTION!!!1111 Wait, no... >The action was too much, unnecessary and clearly there to fill in time. \n\nMain reason I even saw this was I received an invitation from some mates. I think I'll try go back to sticking to films with a point. The only point of this was to brainwash and make big bucks.", u'-0.399104', u'The movie was recommended to me by a friend who saw the reviews and somehow believed those. Huge mistake.\n\nTo say the movie is childish would be an honor for this movie, I have seen plenty of animated movies which were a huge lot better.\n\nThe story is dumb and entirely predictable. The characters are almost flat and have absolutely no credibility from either a serious point of view nor from a parody point of view. Acting was also poor.\n\nVisual effects were OK and being a 3D movie helped, but that is the only positive thing that I can say about the movie.\n\nThe theater was half-full but during the entire movie there was not a single time when you could hear everybody laughing hard.\n\nThe only way I can imagine that so many 9 and 10 star reviews were added for this movie is since all the brainwashed Marvel fan-boys and sock-puppets for the studios somehow managed to overwhelm normal reviewers.', u'-0.597215', u"This movie is a mess of the worst kind: a never-ending cascade of contrivance after contrivance.\n\nThe plot, if it could be called so, is kickstarted by the theft of a magical plot device that evil people want. This also happens in The Avengers and Man of Steel, and it's not getting any more creative. The evil people fight the good guys, there's explosions and snarky humor everywhere, and it never rises above the level of an excuse plot. Characters get beaten close to death so the movie can have a sad moment before they get revived - all the protagonists are invincible. There's one particularly shameful scene where a character gets cast out into space and another character risks death to save them. But surprise! Somehow, a fleet of spaceships somewhere managed to find their exact location and arrive to save both within a minute! See, friendship saves the day again!\n\nThe dialog is just as useless as the plot: the characters either make juvenile jokes, exposit once again that they need to bring the magical plot device somewhere in order to prevent genocide by the evil guy (in case the audience forgot), have ham-fisted discussions about the value of friendship and overcoming adversity with all the subtlety of a bull in a china shop, or explain completely obvious things. The worst of this is when a character steps out into a visibly darkened corridor and comments on how dark it is.\n\nI saw this movie because it was compared to one of my favorites: The Fifth Element. This comparison is worthless because while The Fifth Element was a movie, The Guardians of the Galaxy is a product. Every bombastic special effect and every cardboard cutout character reek of a movie trying to sell itself and its tie-in action figures and comic books to 12-year old kids. The humor is juvenile, the plot and characters are shallow and facile, explosions and fighting are shoehorned in at every turn... there is no natural characterization, no genuine emotion, and no signs of intelligence. This movie is junk food cinema at its worst. We deserve better.", u'-0.593295'], u'tt0072890': [u"I've watched this film for the third time in a few years last night. Instead of writing a straight review, I'd like to jot down ten thoughts just off the top of my head concerning this exquisite movie: \n\n1) Watching this film will change forever your perception of the bank heist genre, making you question the contrived cinematic conventions these films usually make use of.\n\n2) The source of this film's paradoxical and/or farcical elements spring from life itself, not from film or pre-existing cinematic conventions. Sometimes, the absurdities of life are so great, they dwarf those included in any form of fiction. Without even trying to make that point, this film captures that concept beautifully. \n\n3) Its tone in relation to the homosexual theme is ahead of its time. In fact it's ahead of OUR time, even, in hardly making an issue out of it at all - it just IS. \n\n4) It captures the climate of the 70s in a manner so sober, you'll remember its unshowy yet authentic feel forever.\n\n5) Lumet's film brings to life the concept of the distorting lens of the media and how different groups with different agendas will turn an outlaw into a hero, with far more efficiency than Oliver Stone's brash, bloated, childish and repetitive Natural Born Killers.\n\n6) Watching this film will illustrate to the younger generations exactly why Al Pacino has earned himself the legendary status he probably no longer would deserve with his performances of the last 10 years alone. **SPOILERS**: Just watch those last ten minutes of him handcuffed against the bonnet of a car, where he doesn't say a word, but speaks volumes with his eyes and his soul just oozing out of every frame at the end of the movie; you'll remember those eyes for as long as you live! \n\n7) Watching this film, you'll realise that firing a gun-shot is a BIG DEAL in real life, and that other films make too much use of gun fire in a highly contrived way. \n\n8) All that tension deriving from pointed guns unable to fire a shot OR move away\x85 you realise Tarantino must've taken notes sometime along the way. \n\n9) No genre is old or done too many times before if it's handled with this amount of freshness, inspiration and talent. \n\n10) Watching Dog Day Afternoon for the third time has filled me with the same amount of wonder at the power of truly inspired but unobtrusive film-making as it did first time round.", u'0.283005', u'By the time Sidney Lumet\'s "Dog Day Afternoon" came around he had already learned to let Al Pacino loose. Forget the holdbacks of "Serpico"; here we get a glimpse into the real Al, the actor who would bring Tony Montana to life in the years to come and the same man who provided Michael Corleone with such heartfelt warmth that was lacking in some of his lesser characters.\n\nThere\'s essentially the Al Pacino as an actor and the Al Pacino as a character, and here he\'s the character, and it works splendidly. Al Pacino the actor comes into play when he is given a recycled script and a talentless director, which has been happening a lot lately, although fortunately his comparison, De Niro, has been lucky enough to generally avoid these blunders of older-age film-making.\n\nThis is based on a true story, like "Serpico," only it\'s better and more involving. It connects with the audience more than "Serpico" because it doesn\'t jump through the same old hoops; it goes for the long trek and comes off better than it would have had the team behind it been lazy. The clich\xe9s are gone and the originality creeps in early on. Watch Pacino indulge himself in character and let the plot sink in. It\'s more touching than it seems at first.\n\nPacino is Sonny Wortzik, a Brooklyn man who takes a bank hostage in order to pay for his "wife\'s" operation. The wife is actually Leon Shermer (Chris Sarandon who was Oscar-nominated for this, his first role in a mainstream film), Sonny\'s gay lover who doesn\'t have the money for a sex operation.\n\nThe bank robbery was going to be what one of classic cinema\'s greatest bad guys once described as a quick "in and out," but Sonny gets held up inside the bank and soon he\'s all over the news and police are standing outside the building with guns drawn. It\'s like Denzel\'s movie only better and more original. Oh, and true. This one actually happened and we can tell.\n\nSonny\'s partner in crime, Sal (John Cazale), is worried that he\'ll be treated as a homosexual by the media outside. His fretting is comic relief and one of the connections between the film and the audience. Charles Durning is the frustrated cop handling the situation. His performance is as subtly convincing as Cavale\'s.\n\nPacino\'s performance is exceedingly excellent, manic and energetic. He\'d display this same talent in "Scarface" again eight years later; only he would be bashed by the critics for going over-the-top. (Although they really just had problems with the excessive profanity and violence, just like Mel Gibson\'s "The Passion of the Christ" will soon become a well-known classic and people will laugh when they hear that someone once called it the most violent film ever made.)\n\nThere\'s also one of the best scenes of all time in this movie that rivals Montana\'s Last Stand in "Scarface" or the Baptism Scene in "The Godfather," which involves Sonny speaking on the phone to his "wife," carefully concealing his motive from any listeners nearby. Watch Pacino delve into character here and you\'re immediately hooked. We like his character because he seems real and Pacino makes him real, and that\'s why this will go down as one of the best tour de force performances of all time.\n\nIs this Hollywood trying to ease our culture onto homosexuality and sex change operations? Is Hollywood trying to gradually introduce us to gay characters in the hope that the uptight American families will be increasingly invaded by the images of gay men? No. This is Hollywood showing us a true story, regardless of the homosexuality. Pacino could be playing a frustrated postal worker and it would still work because it all settles down to the fact that the suspense and dramatics of the movie affect us, not the background of its characters.\n\nSarandon\'s Oscar nomination was more than worthy; here he displays the smarmy talent that would shine through in his characters in the years to come. Prince Humperdink from "The Princess Bride" is equally memorable but less realistic. Here he seems more real, which is good for this film and would have been quite bad for "Bride." We don\'t like real characters in fantasy tales, do we?\n\nLumet, who ruined "Serpico" with his bad editing, out-of-place music, clich\xe9d dialogue/events and unnecessary scenes, directs "Dog Day Afternoon" with style and flair and good pacing and a surprisingly heartfelt sense of emotion and care. This isn\'t exactly a good example of a perfect motion picture but it\'s pretty close.', u'0.0475507', u"A brilliant movie, and a mesmerizing Al Pacino. If u thought he was spectacular in GF I, II, and Scarface....then just watch him in Dog Day Afternoon. Quite simply one of the greatest performances in movie history. Definitely my favorite. The depth with which he plays Sonny is such a treat to watch that I lost count of how many times he left me in AWE. There's this indescribable nervous energy to his performance that there's no way he'll leave u NOT feeling sorry for Sonny.\n\nSadly, for some reason this movie is kinda forgotten when discussing Al's greatest movies/performances. That's because not many people have watched it. So please, if u consider yourself a movie fan, then go rent DDA and watch a fine movie with the legendary Al Pacino performing his art at the absolute peak of his career.", u'0.160066', u'Sidney Lumet\'s "Dog Day Afternoon" is one of the most highly enjoyable and wildly funny movies I\'ve ever seen - smart, sharp, complex, witty (and often quotable) dialogue, and superbly acted. Al Pacino stars as Sonny, an optimistic loser who decides to hold up a bank with his friend Sal (played by the late, great John Cazale) to get money for his lover Leon\'s sex-change operation. \n\nThe film is only worked around a few sequences, and may seem overlong to some, but it works excellently because it is held together by the fantastic acting. Al Pacino is astounding as Sonny, and his work here even eclipses the excellent work he did as Michael Corleone in "The Godfather" (and that\'s saying something, because I adore that movie and his portrayal). Pacino has the facial tics and the energy and the wide-eyed optimism down pat, and his performance is extremely engaging and entertaining. Take, for example, his scene where he rouses up the crowd against the police by chanting, "Attica! Attica! Put your f---ing guns down!" A lesser actor would have made it insipid, but Pacino makes it oddly poignant and hilarious at the same time. (And he was robbed of his Oscar for his role.) The late John Cazale is also superb as Sal, the dopey-eyed follower, the quiet laid-back calm to Pacino\'s maniacal energy. It\'s a less flashier role, but Cazale still brings on all the laughs, especially in his deadpan delivery of the line, "Sonny, they\'re saying there are two homosexuals in here...I\'m not a homosexual." \n\nFrank Pierson won an Oscar for his script for a reason - the dialogue is hilarious, sharp, and witty. Many of the lines in this movie are extremely quotable (and you can check some of them out under "memorable quotes"). This is intelligent writing, in the sense that you will laugh and be moved at the same time. \n\nGreat movie! It belongs in your VHS or DVD collection. 10/10', u'0.665241', u"This high-tension thriller captures the true events of one summer afternoon when accomplices Sonny (Pacino) and Sal (Calzale) walk into a Brooklyn bank, and rob it. \n\nOf course not all goes to plan. An hour later they're still inside and the bank is surrounded. Cops, media, crowds of fans and the FBI are each hanging to Sonny's every word \x96 and why? Because he has 9 hostages as pawns, a bank as his board and all the time in the world to think up a strategy. Inside the bank however is a different story. You can't help but sympathise with Sonny (due to Pacino's terrific performance) as the first-time bank robber who's unprepared, out of his depth, and just trying to think up a way out. Even the audience begin to feel the effects of Stockholm Syndrome as Pacino's character gains our affections. The 'villain who's a nice guy at heart' could have been disastrously clich\xe9 but Pacino's portrayal is nothing short of brilliance. Even Sal with his morbid disposition is magnetising as his childlike innocence shines through. Calzale was wonderfully cast as this awkward accomplice, wordlessly following Sonny. A huge success combining the skills of Lumet with the talent of Pacino for the second time in Pacino's best role yet. A true story that's compelling and tragic but most of all tangible \x96 and that's what makes it so powerful.", u'0.338946', u'\nAl Pacino has portrayed some memorable characters in some classic movies like \'Serpico,\' \'Scent of a Woman,\' \'Donnie Brasco\' and the three \'Godfather\' Films. \'Dog Day Afternoon\' and Sonny Wortzik belong high on that list.\n\nAs the movie opens, Sonny and his two-man gang are nervously waiting outside a Brooklyn bank which they intend to rob. Sonny has a plan all worked out, but after the robbery begins, it quickly unravels. Not the least dismaying development is that the bank is almost out of cash. Shortly after this revelation, police begin to arrive in numbers that would be able to lay siege to a small country (Wyoming, maybe?) This sets up a hostage situation that lasts the afternoon and late into the night.\n\nOne might think this setting might make things a little claustrophobic but director Sidney Lumet has handled this problem before; witness his film \'Twelve Angry Men.\' The goings-on in the bank itself are fascinating as the moods and relationships of the hostages and their captors develop and change over the course of the long day. Out on the street the crime scene immediately turns into a circus with thousands of onlookers straining at police lines, news media doing everything they can to get close to the story, and a new busload of police arriving every few minutes.\n\nGreat performances are all over the place here. This is a tour-de-force for Pacino, even by his standards, as the bungling crook who has instantly become the biggest media star in the city. Sonny may have blown the first role, but he shines in the second. One of Pacino\'s "Godfather" brothers, John Cazale is excellent is the less-flashy role as Sonny\'s partner Sal, definitely not the brains of this operation. Events are soon beyond Sal\'s comprehension and his subtle performance is wonderful. Charles Durning is super as police lieutenant Moretti who works as hard as he can to keep the situation from spinning totally out of control. He\'s juggling desperate fugitives in the bank, a crowd growing crazier and crazier, aggressive newspeople, and some of his own cops who are ready to end this thing with a\nbang. When the FBI shows up, the agent in charge (James Broderick) doesn\'t even say hello to Moretti. He cooly assesses the situation and decides their plan of action, and from that moment on there is a grim air of fatalism hanging over Sonny and Sal.\n\nThere are more twists and turns we won\'t go into here. This is a great work by Pacino, Lumet, and most of the other actors in the film. I loved it.\n', u'0.0158547', u"It was so freshening and attractive to see His Majesty, Mr. Al Pacino, in this breathtaking movie of 1970s. The first thing that a discerning eye would notice throughout the film is the undying uniqueness of Pacino's originality. This was just another movie destined to reassuring viewers of Al's status of an icon. The movie itself is endearing and entertaining. Though the movie is supposed to appear like a bank robbing, and in a sense it is, but deep in the heart robbing is simply a way to achieve a totally different goal, of course other than money! It is about affection and mutual caring. It's about what situations a person is ready to embark into in order to show how much he cares for another one. And I guess this is the point of the whole movie, which is stylistically decorated with dozes of sarcasm and pleasantry with sporadic undertones of bravery. The characters are all innocent which innocence seems to relate them to each other. What I deem as very courageous here are the thematic elements, homosexuality. I guess the time when the movie was made the society had still been ruled by prejudiced mentalities that could really ruin this innocuous piece of art. For this, I praise the very daring Sidney Lumet, one of my favorite directors. 10/10", u'0.385666', u"\n'Dog Day Afternoon' tells the true story of Sonny (Al Pacino) and Sal (John Cazale). These two guys went into a bank in 1972 in Brooklyn to rob it. They could have been out in five minuted but things went terribly wrong. Instead of a robbery it became a hostage situation. And a media circus as well.\n\nFrom the first second you will be totally in the movie. Afterwards I wanted to write my review and I was not able to remember how the music was, if there was any. It says something about how much the movie grabs you. The first part is very funny, I laughed a lot of times. The second part is more a drama and a thriller. Great director Sidney Lumet creates a certain atmosphere for the movie that is just right. Pacino in one of his best performances is surrounded by a great supporting cast. He was nominated for an Oscar but didn't win it. He lost it to a guy named Jack Nicholson in a movie called 'One Flew over the Cuckoo's Nest'. The chances were probably fifty-fifty and the Oscar went to the better movie, I have to admit that. Still, one of the best performances I have ever seen. With any other actor this movie was a nice one, with him it is a great one.", u'0.148717', u"During the late sixties and into the seventies, the bank heist seems to have become a metaphor for the counter culture rebellion. Bank robbers were no longer the villains, but the heroes, fighting against the capitalist establishment like an urban Robin Hood. Dog Day Afternoon is part of that tradition.\n\nAl Pacino is, as ever, brilliant. He is able to bring charisma, charm and vulnerability to the character of Sonny Wortzik in nothing more than a way of walking, or the way he holds a phone. Troubled, insecure, confused, Sonny makes for a lousy bank robber. And yet, when he steps from the relative safety of the bank building and into the street, before a hundred waiting armed police, he changes completely. He becomes a strong, proud, prowling voice of the working class, goading the police, riling the gathered crowd. In referencing the prison massacre at Attica in 1971, he becomes a voice for the urban poor, and it is a powerful and raging voice that contains the potential for victory and success, even when you know it is doomed.\n\nAn incredibly powerful work, very much of its time, and all the better for it. The 1970's was a decade when major studios hired actors for their talent, not their looks or teen appeal. When major studios hired writers proud to take on sensitive political and social issues. When major studios financially backed and strongly promoted movies that mattered and said something. Dog Day Afternoon is the product of that system and as such, could never be made today.", u'0.0833411', u"I've seen this movie and for me it's Al Pacino at his best! The movie has a very simple premise, two guys rob a bank, but everything that can go wrong does. In the beginning the women who work in the bank are afraid, but once the situation escalates into a sideshow, some the women become comfortable with the situation. Basically, the entire movie is in the bank and all types of comedy and drama surrounds it. This is Al Pacino early in his career and for anyone who hasn't seen the movie, I definitely recommend it. Just keep in mind between all the madness you see in the film that this is a true story, and very entertaining!", u'0.176114', u'\nOutstanding character-study that is unique, interesting, highly-unconventional and definitely brilliant in every way. Two dim-witted bank robbers (Oscar-nominated Al Pacino and the late John Cazale) decide to rob a New York City bank on a summer day in the early-1970s. The robbery is to be cut-and-dry, but nothing goes as planned. Instead of getting away with a load of money, there is only a miniscule amount as the money was transported away earlier in the day. As Pacino tries to burn bank records, a\nsmall fire is noticed outside the bank and total chaos ensues. Now the bank is surrounded by the police and the FBI. Charles Durning and James Broderick are among the officials outside the bank as they attempt to negotiate with Pacino to get the bank\'s employees out safely. It is learned that Pacino is involved in a homosexual relationship with Chris Sarandon (Oscar-nominated) and that his main goal was to steal his share of the money to get Sarandon a\nsex-change operation. The nervous Cazale is more worried that the media will think he is homosexual than anything else. The film is dark in many ways, very light-hearted and funny in other ways, but always dramatic and tense. As the clock ticks, the realization occurs that this will not end well for the robbers. Sidney Lumet\'s Oscar-nominated direction is sharp throughout. Based on actual events, "Dog Day Afternoon" is another great winner from the 1970s, Hollywood\'s second Golden Age. 5 stars out of 5.', u'-0.144147', u"We've seen this story before, but then again maybe not. This is the attitude that director Sidney Lumet takes (as he did with films like 12 Angry Men and Serpico, the later also starring Al Pacino) with Dog Day Afternoon. Bank robbery films are a staple in cinema since The Great Train Robbery filmed in 1903. However this story (not even saying based on a true story, just saying 'this is a true story' is enough) is set in 1972, and filmed a couple of years later, at a time when attitudes in society were changing, as was storytelling. Lumet here could get away with things he couldn't get away with if he tried this in the 50's; with unapologetically homosexual (but truthful is the key) characters, one of them the lead character; surprises that add to the unconventionality of the style of the film; and an ending that will keep you guessing. Lumet did a lot of good with this movie, and in a small way some not so good; people would look at many bank-robbery pictures that would come after this and size them up to this, as it was almost transparently influential (the 'Attica, Attica' tirade is something a child knows years before he actually sees the film).\n\nBut its the honesty in the truth of the story and problems of the main characters, and in fact the lead up to the robbery and the (unsuccessful) robbery has truth out of it. It is manipulative in a sense, as it is so truthful artifice is almost excluded entirely from the picture. Take when Sonny (Pacino) and Sal (John Cazale) first whip out their guns in the bank. Their friend can't take it and wants out. This is a great moment, and the film has them scattered about. In some ways these great parts and scenes make up for the fact that beneath it all is a story that we have seen too many times (the robbers faced with intense media attention, wanting a plane to take the hostages, etc), or maybe not; maybe one has to put the film into context of the period. But a scene, for another example, when Sonny talks to his 'friend' on the phone. This is one of those moments where Pacino is of course as always 'Pacino', but also totally immersed in the character and the situation. Lumet lets this play for painfully real results.\n\nDog Day Afternoon is one of Lumet's grittiest successes, as he takes the city he's made most of his films in, New York, and gives it the right tone, inside the bank and out, for this story of eventuality to unfold. The opening montage, with an Elton John song in the background, really has little relevance to the rest of the film, except to set up mood, and style, and it is a wonderful style (interestingly, the rest of the film aside from this opening is without music, another touch of the gripping realism). In a way, as I mentioned, its almost TOO intense, and too spectacular in the power that it has. This is Al Pacino in his prime, after all, off the heels of Serpico and The Godfather films, with his Sonny loaded with vigor and ambition and delusions of grandeur. John Cazale's Sal, by the way, is equally convincing in his own right, bringing a level of sanity to some of Sonny's over-the-top ideas. This film, and its actors and characters and Dede Allen editing, is almost a blue-print for how many other films that would come after this would take. One almost wonders what's the point of all of it, but when it makes its moments to shine, its dynamite.", u'0.395224', u"Personally, this is one of the most touching films I've seen.\n\nThe acting is superb, both Al Pacino and John Cazale deliver outstanding and memorable performances as the unexperienced bank robbers Sonny Wortzik and Sal.\n\nI should highlight the late John Cazale's performance of Sal, a character that says more with his face than he does with dialogue. Perhaps the most realistic character ever portrayed on film.\n\nAl Pacino as usual delivers a great performance as was nominated for an Academy Award playing the role of Sonny. \n\nThis is a very entertaining film, filled with humor, social issues and moral issues, definitely a must-watch.", u'0.857048', u'What transfixes me throughout every scene of this sinewy, offbeat film is the extraordinarily pragmatic realism of the hurtles Sonny and Sal confront inside the bank. Not even twenty minutes into the film, we find we\'re already seeing things absolutely no other crime film has ever included that are astonishing in their dramatic persuasiveness. The head teller and the bank manager picking apart Sonny\'s plan with him. One clerk\'s husband calls and asks what time the robbers will be through so he knows if he has to cook for himself or not. While ordering the bank manager to help him block the back entrance by moving a big desk, Sonny asks offhand why he\'d hire a diabetic as a guard, and is told in ordinary person-to-person terms what a guard\'s salary is and why poor old Howard has that job.\n\nAnd when does Mulvaney the bank manager, played by captivating unknown character actor Sully Boyar, tell hostage-taker he\'d like to see his family again but if someone must be taken, take him? When he\'s helping his captor move a big desk to block the back. They sound like regular working urbanites so caught up in the daily grind of city life that they might as well be making small talk in an elevator. Later, the phone rings, Sonny picks up, it\'s a sicko telling him to kill \'em all. Sonny hangs up after four seconds, moving on. The female tellers sit and sweat while giggling about the same silly things---"He said the f-word." "Well, I\'m a Christian and my ears are not garbage cans."---in the thick of a hostage situation and a media circus. Poignant, real.\n\nEvery nuance of Pacino\'s performance is incredibly realistic. He practically possesses the audience, as we can begin to expect certain things from him and care about him because he\'s played by an actor who completely subsists as him. At points when characters speak of him off-screen, speaking of things that we are surprised to hear about him, that take us aback and color his image, Pacino has prepared the size for those turning points to fit in. His improvised scenes are exceptional as well, and are in fact some of the most riveting, nail-bitingly intense scenes in the entire film. In such scenes, he is matched by the great actor Charles Durning and Chris Sarandon\'s becoming fulfillment of his role.\n\nIndeed, this is by far Durning\'s most riveting performance. He works so well here because in shouting matches with Sonny, he looks and sounds entirely his age, not a movie character. He\'s fat, middle-aged, tired, just as surprised as everybody else. He runs short of breath, trying desperately to keep up with the pressure cooking higher all around him. As Det. Sgt. Eugene Moretti, Durning epitomizes the thankless job of a police officer more candidly and perfectly than any other movie cop I\'ve ever seen. One of this stunning succession of brilliant scenes is the first time Sonny emerges to talk face-to-face with Moretti in the street, which begins with a protracted pin-drop silence and slowly, steadily, invisibly culminates in deafening, ear-splitting chaos.\n\nLumet opens the film with a montage of city scenes in NYC with a good getting-up-in-the- morning song like Elton John\'s Amoreena and with the same indifference ends up on Sonny, Sal and their friend waiting outside a bank in a car, an image that just happens to continue. This is a great way to demonstrate the it-could-happen-anywhereness. Lumet\'s overall direction of the film is beautiful, indicative once again of the masterful mainstay of cinema in the 1970s. The climactic final ten minutes are ruthless in their steadily unraveling, almost unbearably intense tragedy. It\'s not only one of the most effective uses of sound to create drama I\'ve ever seen, but everything concludes exactly as it would in reality.', u'0.347524', u"\nSpoilers herein.\n\nThis was back when Pacino had control of himself. He's fun to watch. It's an energetic style of acting that has too much `watch me act' quality to qualify for greatness. But enjoyable.\n\nLumet scalpeled himself to the world class with `12 Angry Men,' where his camera breathed with the same rhythm of the ensemble. Here, he generally lacks that magic, and the writing isn't very tight either.\n\nBut one scene is immortal, on my list of the best 50 scenes in not-excellent films. The phone conversation between Sonny and `wife' Leon is great naturalism. This is Lumet and company at their very best. Watch how the framing moves, the conversation unfolds, how we are drawn into the most intimate pathos -- how they help us escape the voyerism of the crowds right outside, and the many others listening in.\n\nThis was Sarandon's first film. His excellence here and his mundane career since (including Prince Humperdink in `Princess Bride') may say something about how a director can weave an emotional potential in others.", u'0.317777'], u'tt0113247': [u"\nReminiscent of Costas-Gavras' film Z with its rapid-fire dialogue and staccato rhythms, La Haine (Hate) directed by 28 year-old Mathieu Kassovitz, is a passionate look at racial tensions at a Paris housing project. Although drug dealing, urban decay, and police brutality have been shown in films before, rarely have they had the sense of vitality and urgency shown in La Haine. \n\nThree friends from different ethnic backgrounds live in the Bluebell housing projects on the outskirts of Paris. This is not the Paris of travel brochures or films like Amelie, but a desolate urban landscape, harsh and grim with housing projects that look as if they could be in any big city in the world. Vinz (Vincent Cassel), is a working class Jew; Hubert (Hubert Kounde), the most intelligent and self-reflective of the three, is an African boxer; and Said (Said Taghmaoui), an Arab from North Africa is younger but just as embittered. \n\nThe film depicts their rage against the police whom they see as oppressors. Marginalized economically and politically, without jobs, parents who care, or hope for the future, the streets are their home and they are open targets for police who are shown as brutal and racist. In one startling scene, a veteran cop taunts and physically abuses Said and Hubert while training a rookie cop. The rookie can only look on and shake his head in disbelief.\n\n\nShot in black and white, La Haine shows a single day in the lives of the three friends. Following a major riot in which a local teenager, Abdel, is critically wounded by the police, Vinz, the most volatile of the group, vows that if Abdel dies he will kill a cop to get even. Hubert wants to restrain him, and Said doesn't seem to care either way, as long as he can get his money from a drug dealer named Snoopy. When Vinz finds a Smith & Wesson 44 lost by the police during the riots, the spiral of violence escalates and builds toward a memorable conclusion. \n\nLa Haine does not offer any solutions to social problems but clearly shows the anger and frustration of people who feel trapped by their circumstances. In its depiction of a society in free-fall, it also has immediacy. Three weeks after the film was released, riots broke out in the Brixton section of London, following the death of a young black man in police custody. Though it is a wake-up call for action on society's growing gap between rich and poor, La Haine makes a powerful statement that violence does not solve anything and that hate begets hate. Someone should pass the word to a few of the world leaders.\n", u'-0.332027', u'\nI have seen La Haine a handful of times now and with each viewing it just gets better.\n\nThe first thing that stands out about the film is the cinematography. It\'s rare that a film like this is considered both genuine and a good example of it\'s art but La Haine is both.\n\nThe plotline is compelling and realistic and neatly shows the way that inner city life has gone in the big cities in France as well as proving that despite the romance of Paris, it suffers from the same problems as any other major city.\n\nThe characters are above all believable and the cast did a great job. The quality of acting is simply stunning from several actors and it would be a shame if it was simply dismissed as "just another foreign art-house movie" by audiences outside France.\n\nAbove all the film whilst showing the influences of American films and society has a very clear sense of it\'s own identity and at no time does it feel like another US Ghetto film transposed to France. This is a major boon to the film and it stands out of the crowd for this, even though many people will dislike it because of this. It is, however, their loss.\n\nIt\'s hard to recommend this film highly enough, but I should add that more than one viewing is required to get the best from La Haine.', u'0.33099', u"'Mean Streets' in french - and so much more. While there are so many references to Scorsese that you could almost call it an homage, this French milestone deals with the disillusioned youth who live in the outskirts of Paris in such an elegant - and honest - way, that I would go so far as to call it the most relevant French film of the last 20 years. But it's also a cinematic masterpiece and great, often hilarious entertainment. Everything fits: the musical choices, the outstanding performances by the 3 main characters, the beautiful cinematography and flawless direction. And, perhaps most of all, THE perfect script. \n\nAs much a realistic portrayal of a torn society as it is an artistic achievement, 'La Haine' is essential viewing.\n\nMy vote: 10 out of 10\n\nFavorite films: http://www.IMDb.com/list/mkjOKvqlSBs/\n\nLesser-known Masterpieces: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls070242495/\n\nFavorite Low-Budget and B-movies: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls054808375/\n\nFavorite TV-Shows reviewed: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls075552387/", u'0.861934', u'\nLa Haine aka Hate is a story about three friends living near Paris in France (one Jew, one Arab and one black) who have nothing special in their lives and try to live a day at a time by drinking and having a good time and also working (at least the black character, who owns a boxing hall). Their friend, however, is captured by a police which tortures and maltreats him so badly that he is sent to a hospital in a critical condition. This makes the youth gangs in city including the three protagonists start a war against the police and authorities for the horrible wrongs they and their friend have suffered, and suddenly they notice the whole society is collapsing, and all there is is hate and need to revenge...Violence and mayhem is almost everywhere, including authorities which should do nothing but fight against it..\n\nThis film is powerful and grim. Totally unforgettable is the last scene which at my first viewing time blew me away. It comes very suddenly and there are no warnings what will happen at the end of this film. The message is so important and these marks of the "apocalypse" can be found in our everyday life everywhere. The society is falling and it is "spinning" as the voice over says just before the end credits..The film brings into question such horrific facts as racism which should have passed away long times ago, but no. Racism is such a primitive, stupid and despisable cancer among people, that there is no hope of better future if individuals don\'t understand the real facts of life and right ways to live with each other. Hate feeds hate as the character Hubert says, and that is something that our stupid race has not learned.\n\nThere is one very powerful scene just before the end scene and it deals with a skinhead and these three characters who could kill him right away and pay something back. It is very challenging scene and even Vinz, the most revenge seeking character, starts to see things different way after that. The whole point of La Haine is violence in all its forms. Why there is violence and why the hell it is used so often everywhere in every form? Don\'t we ever learn? These kind of films are important and so powerful that unfortunately people who should see them don\'t want to or they can\'t bacause it would be as a mirror for them..\n\nThe film is also a comment on power used by police as they are pretty tough and hard in this film. Police think that they can use any methods in order to get some answers, or in order to have some fun..It certainly doesn\'t judge police as "pigs" or violent sadists in general, but it is a warning example of what must NOT happen anywhere ever, by police or by others. One has to see through the film and to its core in order to understand what it says. Otherwise there is no point in watching these kind of films. La Haine is that kind of a film that it should be seen by police and youths as well, because there are still possibilities to prevent things to go too far in our life and world we live in.\n\nThe camera techniques used in this film are magnificent. Director/screenwriter Mathieu Kassovitz uses camera so smoothly and passionately and there are many similarities in techniques between this film and his more recent, Assassin(s). I am very happy for this young talent to have won the director\'s award at Cannes. These kind of talents deserve their prizes because there are so many stupid and worthless films which don\'t have nothing artistic in them and have nothing to say, and are just mindless and greedy entertainment. The black and white is very great element and the film strikes greatly without colors. The same case is with the Belgian classic Man Bites Dog, by Remy Belvaux, Benoit Poelvoorde and Andre Bonzel.\n\n\nA great masterpiece in French modern cinema and recommended for the fans of intelligent and important cinema so seldom found from big studios or Hollywood (there are exceptions, of course) nowadays.\n\n10/10', u'-0.0473601', u"\nI first saw this film in 1997, after seeing and reading reviews about it on tv and the net for a couple of years. I never thought a film could actually make you truly think about things around our world, not just how bad it can be in places like the projects set in the film. I could truly see this happening where I am from(Rochdale,Manchester,UK).\n\nThe situation set in the film is a dark and nasty one. you watch 3 friends fall apart from the aftermath of a riot in a parisian project.a friend is near-fatally injured in police custody, which sparks a chain of events, part forced onto the 3 friends, part of self-inflicted.\n\nthe acting is amazing. Vincent Cassel's performance is electrifying. his mentality is distorted with hate(hence the film name), but you truly feel he is not a bad seed. His problem is he can't see the wood for the trees, which Hubert tries to point out to him.\n\nHubert is a character who has the potential to better his life, but he is trapped in his parisian project cell. he tries to guide vinz to a healthier and more productive way of thinking about life.\n\nsaid seems to be the one who doesn't want trouble, but it is thrust upon him. he sees the relationship between hubert and vinz, his 2 best friend, deteriorate, but doesn't know who to side with, or what to do about it.\n\nMathieu Kassovitz made this film in a way that you feel for both the police and the the 3 friends. It is amazing to watch, as mathieu takes the simplest things, and makes them look classy(check out the DJ scene for a true example of what I mean). he uses black and white as to colour, and it doesn't look fake, or cheesy. in fact it enhances the film more than you could imagine. you won't sit there and wish he filmed it in colour by the end. the action, although relatively mild compared to todays film, is believable.\n\nspeaking about the end, it is one of the most simplest and powerful endings I have seen in a film yet. the soundtrack is awesome too. who would have thought french hip-hop would sound so sweet.", u'0.0529731', u"\nMoviemakers when filming French based films have traditionally tended to sentimentalise the \x91people' through the celebration of les petits gens, the little people of Pagnol and Clair as well as more recently the fantastical Parisian wonderland environments of Amelie and Moulin Rouge. With La Haine, young director Mathieu Kassovitz took the flipside of this and gave an illustration of the awfulness of life in the depressed blue-collar areas of Paris\n\nLa Haine (\x91Hate') begins after a night of rioting on a dismal housing estate on the northern outskirts of Paris and focuses on 24 hours in the lives of three close friends aged around 20. They are Vince (Vincent Cassel), an explosive working-class Jew, Hubert (Hubert Kounde), a handsome, soft-spoken black, and Said (Said Taghmaoui), a mercurial streetwise Arab. With little hopes or prospect of regular employment due to where they come from, the trio drift aimlessly, engaging in petty theft, and seething with aggressive resentment against an uncaring world. L'Avenir c'est nous (We Are the Future) is the ironic slogan on the estate's playground, but this is a film about people who believe they have no future.\n\nThe quality of the performances from the 3 main actors, their conviction, the way they interact with one another and the vigour and fluency of Kassovitz's script and direction make this a very special movie indeed. Its full of action, detail, unexpected incidents and quirky humour. For instance, the boys have a bizarre encounter in a public lavatory in central Paris with a diminutive survivor of the Gulag that is as puzzling to them as it is to us.  Does the story the Gulag survivor tells them have a deeper meaning than on the surface? Of course it does, and importantly this film makes you think as to what the metaphor means. Throughout violence is always on the point of erupting. There are constant confrontations with a brutal, racist police force, and Vince has a 44 Magnum revolver that a plainclothes cop lost during the riots, which we know will eventually be used on someone. However none of this ever descends into mere gratuitous violence like so many Hollywood films\n\nLa Haine presents a state of affairs of the alienation faced by many young people in the \x91projects' in France, and all over the world. It doesn't offer any solutions, though the point is forcibly made that in France, as elsewhere, parts of the police force are part of the problem rather than the solution. Of course, much of what we are shown is familiar to us from British and American films .\n\nThe strength of the film is that it neither glamorises nor patronises its characters. They hate their life because it's boring, and they despise the society that's created it for them, together with parks, football fields and a few mod cons with which to comfort them. In particular, they hate the police, who hate them right back. The film's other major achievement is to show in a tangible and very expressive way how a cycle of distrust and anger is created on both sides of this awful divide, so that there is very little anyone can do about it. In other words violence and hate breeds more violence and hate.\n\nA criticism that could be levelled is that in the US / UK versions the sub-titles don't help, pushing what is very authentic dialogue into something more like clich\xe9, as well as pointless miss-translations that occur. However this is just a minor thing, and does not and should not reflect at all on the film itself.\n\nThis certainly is one of the greatest films of the 1990s. Its one of those rare films that you will think about for the days and weeks after \x96 not solely about the film itself, but on wider issues such as society, poverty and racism.\n\n", u'-0.134324', u'When the riots broke out last autumn in Paris..the first thing I thought about was this movie. I put on the TV and all the scenes reminded me off the best movie ever made in Europe, and the best on the subject...La Haine The first time I saw the movie in 2003, we was gonna watch it for school. At first I thought it was gonna be another french movie about a young french girl that got pregnant(we watched a lot of those in French lessons)...but what followed was probably the most defining 90 minutes in my life.\n\nWhen the movie started with the images of riots (real riots, old news footage) combined with Bob Marley\'s "Burning and Looting" I was getting fascinated about this movie, this had to be good. A lot of things were very recognizable, everyone knows a "Said", everyone knows a "Hubert" and at the time I was feeling like "Vinz". All the scenes influenced me and were very recognizable, the hanging around with friends, the way of talking, the arguments they used for their deeds...everything. The end shocked me and I couldn\'t really think anything else then "I got to watch this movie again", and the day after I bought a DVD of it.\n\nThe movie tells the story of a black, Arab and Jewish guy who live in a housing project near Paris, the kind of neighborhood where most of the people don\'t have a job, where the youth bores itself and flirts with criminal behavior, where drugs are being sold and where an occasional riot starts (this happened from the 80\'s until recently from time to time). The movie follows them 24 hours after their friend Adbel got beat up by the police during the riots, where a cop lost his gun. Vinz (the Jewish guy) found the gun and swears that when Abdel dies he\'s gonna take vengeance by killing a police. With Vinz - not being the most stable nor the most smart and relaxed person - having a gun on him the three come in some hard situations, but also without the police gun they have enough problems during the 24 hours....I ain\'t gonna spoil anything, but this should be enough to make you wanting to watch this movie.\n\nAfter watching it a couple of times I realized that this was a story, I always thought it was a documentary, which is a big compliment to the whole crew I think. But still that didn\'t made the movie less strong, the greatest thing about it is that it isn\'t easy made, no clich\xe9s...when you watch an American movie on the subject there always is some form of exit for the main character or he dies in a way that makes you think he deserves it. So either way a character is portrayed as a nice guy or a total bad guy, who both have girl who want to get them out of troubles. This is where La Haine sets itself apart from other movies, it doesn\'t try to portray the characters as nice people, although you do feel sympathies for them. The best thing is the end, which sets the movie mostly apart and makes it more recognizable for the European crowd (I\'m not gonna spoil it, but if it ended differently the movie wouldn\'t been so great) The way it is shot in black and white makes it look realer, makes it grimier, it portrays the banlieues as a place without an exit. That\'s what maybe sets the movie also apart, the black and white makes it look arty and grimy at the same time. Maybe the best is that it still doesn\'t look dated because of that.\n\nAnother great thing is the soundtrack, all the songs that are used in the movie have a great effect on the images and visa versa. Bob Marley perfectly fits the riots, Isaac Hayes fits the hashish packing and smoking scenes, Zapp and Roger fits the break dance song perfectly and the Expression Direct fits the haunted car scene in inner city Paris perfect (if you can understand the lyrics). But what really sets this movie apart is the Cutkiller scene, this scene only made me wanted to get a set of SL1200\'s...\n\nThe way the tension is build in the movie is great, most of the time the characters don\'t do anything, but you still feel the tension building, the hate growing, and when you maybe bored watching some scenes the first time (the "candit-camera" scene for instance and the "eiffeltower" scene), but afterwards they\'re like pieces of a puzzle falling into it\'s place. Some shots are brilliantly, the Taxi Driver imitation of Vinz at the beginning (when you already see that Vinz is losing it), the police interview shot with Said and Hubert, the discussion at the toilets, the way the characters are introduced, the subway shot...it\'s all eye candy.\n\nTo make a conclusion, if you love hip hop and don\'t think the police as necessarily the representation of the good in society. of course when you love cinema it is also a good movie, but it really is a movie which has it own public: the youth. If your Dutch try to get hold of the 7 euro Freerecord shop version, but I can recommend the English 10 year anniversary more...the directors commentary, trailers and bonus material make this a really nice DVD. But I can understand why a lot of people don\'t like it, it doesn\'t offer solutions, it doesn\'t give an opinion on anything except the police, and of course you have to have a certain frame of mind to like the movie.', u'0.0559884', u'In 1995, Mathieu Kassovitz wrote and directed a film that showed the controversial truth; "La Haine", which translates to "Hate", a film deemed so important the then-prime minister Alain Jupp\xe9 arranged a special screening and ordered his entire cabinet to watch the film. Kassovitz rightfully won the Best Director award at the Cannes festival for his film that had and still has a huge impact on French society. La Haine mixes ethnics to emphasise the overriding importance of solidarity against the police. In my opinion, the greatest film ever made. A cinematic phenomenon so close to my heart.\n\nIt is the day after the riots on an underclass French estate (the film opens with real footage of riots with the suitable soundtrack of Bob Marley\'s Burnin\' and Lootin\'). A youth named Abdel had been caught and beaten by the police and is now in critical condition. One of his very best friends, Vinz (Jewish), had found a cop\'s weapon. He swears that if Abdel dies he will kill a cop. The majority of the film revolves around Vinz and his two other friends Hubert (Afro-Caribbean) and Sa\xefd (North African) roaming around their ghetto and suburbs of Paris. Set just within 24 hours, this is just a glimpse of the chaos.\n\nThere is an image in La Haine where Vinz (Vincent Cassel) imitates Travis Bickle (Taxi Driver) in the mirror; "You talking\' to me?" and then points his fingers like a gun and fires. This is not an action he only does once as he repeats it twice during the film. But why? He has a gun. Is this preparation? Yes. Vinz has to prepare because he is scared. And he has to see what it looks like, to make sure it looks "cool", as when he does kill a cop, he will get an undeserved respect by his peers. There is another scene in which Vinz and Hubert bump into a cop while trying to run from this. Vinz\' first instinct is to pull the gun on him, this shows that the first instinct has now become violence. The reaction to violence is fear (which is apparent in the cops face until Hubert knocks him out). Fear creates hate; or, the thought and idea of hate. Like the youths feel they are supposed to hate the cops. Vinz is the angriest central character, but when he had his chance, he hesitates; consequences are not forgotten. Cassel performs Vinz with brute force, not failing to portray his character for a second.\n\nHubert (Hubert Kound\xe9), the most subtle character in the film, remains quiet and gentle, although he is a boxer; or a fighter; for the majority of the film. He has a longing to escape. He has no idea who to trust. Everyone is a thug. This is the stereotype that has been created. But not even a thug wants this thought about them. He is always watching the hatred breed around him but never takes part. But when it comes to the cut, the action and reaction is always the same and he proves himself wrong. Kound\xe9 put a lot of effort into his role and earns his praise.\n\nSa\xefd (Sa\xefd Taghmaoui); possibly the most vibrant character of the three, feels as if he has to be something, he hates change but he follows the crowd, he wants to be accepted. He appears to be everybody\'s friend as he constantly makes jokes. This is because his family is dead so Vinz and Hubert; and possibly Abdel but we don\'t know since we only ever hear about Abdel, so they are basically his family. But if they get into trouble they wouldn\'t hesitate to leave each other. It\'s every man for himself. Cassel, Kound\xe9 and Taghmaoui work so well together its as if they have known each other for years.\n\nThe youths are stuck on the idea that the cops are there to stop them, and they refuse the idea that the cops are there in fact to protect them. And the youths express hatred with violence. Sexual intercourse is not an issue in this society as it is too dangerous to have a girlfriend, as it will spawn more violence, thus more hatred. La Haine does not offer solutions to all the racism but in fact, shows you in a detailed and mature manner.\n\nStarkly shot in black and white; La Haine has one of my favourite cinematography works. Kassovitz directional style is so inspirational, using rocketing zooms and smooth swerves to get the full view of the destruction. Popular hip hop music is used and heard throughout the film, none of it I would listen to unless I was watching La Haine. The film shows a side of France you can not find on a tourist map. Passion, dedication and effort was well put forward to La Haine. It punches you in the face with its sheer, raw intensity.\n\nThe films most important quote is the one it opens and shuts with: - "Heard about the guy who fell off a skyscraper? On his way down past each floor, he kept saying to reassure himself: So far so good... so far so good... so far so good. How you fall doesn\'t matter. It\'s how you land!". This directly reflects the films content, structure and result. La Haine proves that hatred is in fact the strongest emotion. One of the greatest films of the 90s and of all-time; if there was one perfect film; it would be La Haine.\n\n10/10', u'-0.0620711', u'\nOut of nowhere this film came along, blew me away, and left me begging for more.  A totally original and brilliant piece of work by writer/director Mathieu Kassovitz -- Hate is one of the best films I have ever seen.  Vincent Cassel gives a draw dropping performance, but the real star of this film is the dangerous screenplay.  Few films have left me in as much awe as Hate.  A must see.', u'-0.206765', u'"La Haine", probably one of the most momentous French movies of the nineties caused a stir when it opened in 1995 so much so that it became a big social phenomenon. It heralded a genre: the "film De Banlieue" whose backdrop is high-risk French suburbs and in its wake, other movies emerged like "Bye-Bye" (1995) or "ma 6-T Va Crack-Er" (1997). "La Haine" remains Mathieu Kassovitz\'s best moment. Afterwards, he didn\'t cease to disappoint me. "Assassin(s)" (1997) left me uncomfortable and queasy and "les Rivi\xe8res Pourpres" (2000) was an absolute turkey. I haven\'t seen "Gothika" (2003) but he shot it with the Hollywood presence on his back and I fear the worst.\n\nTo better be immersed in his plan, Kassovitz shot his film in one of these high-risk French suburbs (I can\'t remember its name but you can check it in the "filming locations" rubric when you arrive on the page of the film on this site). This gives his movie an ultra-realist sensation which rings true. In the space of a day, his camera follows a threesome of ruffians. There\'s Vinz (Vincent Cassel) who acts the tough guy. He is proud of having stolen the gun of a cop and hopes to make good use of it. When he is asked to make an effort of reflection, he loses his temper. Hubert (Hubert Kound\xe9) a pacifist who craves to get out of this daily hell but where to go? He also knows that hate breeds hate. It\'s both the catalyst of the riots and adds fuel to the fire in the incessant conflicts. And also Sa\xefd (Sa\xefd Thagmaou\xef), a brazen teenager. The three of them wander in their neighborhood and in Paris between visiting of friends, relationships with the riffraff, the police, arguments, reconciliations and foolish things. An ordinary day during which the trio appears as prisoners of their suburbs and have a life with no horizon. A day which will lead to the inevitable, marked out by the time which often appears on a black screen.\n\nKassovitz did his best to create a stylish film and it paid off well. It was a good idea to have shot his film in a black and white cinematography because it bestows it with a very gritty aura; sometimes there\'s a documentary whiff which pervades the film. His camera work which commands admiration makes juxtapose travelings, static shots and circular movements according to the vibe a sequence could convey. It also helps to enhance the scenery which is perhaps the fourth main actor of the film after the trio. Overrall, his film is a hard-hitting assessment of a faltering universe (the high-risk suburbs) in which latent tensions and hate reign and it can awake at any time in violence. This hate in question which the inhabitants of these suburbs feel towards the cops is also smoldered in the cops and I wonder if Kassovitz indicts their sometimes intolerable demeanor, especially when some ruffians are kept in police custody. In the beginning of the film, the audience learns that a suspect, Abdel is in a coma at hospital because he was badly injured by the cops during questioning. When they learned this, the toughest guys of these suburbs sparked off a riot. In a way, the attitude of the police helps to fuel the hate and to separate farther the gap and the incomprehension between the inhabitants of these suburbs and the police. That said, Kassovitz doesn\'t generalize. Not all the cops are monstrous. Check the two sequences when in the first one, a policeman tries to make the riffraff understand in a sensible manner that they can\'t stay on the roof of a building and the second sequence when Vinz, Hubert and Sa\xefd are in Paris and they ask their way to a policeman who guides them in a polite way.\n\nThe actors were discerningly chosen and perfectly directed. It seems that Kassovitz fostered improvisation. It was the right method to confer his film with an authentic feeling. They deliver dialogs full of slang, coarse lines and sometimes they\'re inaudible so you\'ll have to be very attentive to catch what they say. However, this drawback isn\'t really irritating and was surely wanted by the director to reinforce the unique spontaneity of the film. With his build and his face of ruffian, Vincent Cassel was ideally cast as the stubborn Vinz while his two main partners are amazingly true to life. And there are some famous French actors who have cameos and who weren\'t afraid of having demeaning parts like Vincent Lindon, a drunkard or Zinedine Soualem, a sadistic cop.\n\nKassovitz remains as objective as possible and doesn\'t offer solutions to solve these problems. More than ten years after it reached the streets, his films is still a topical one and the riots and violent incidents which broke out in high-risk suburbs in many French cities the last fall alas show that these tensions aren\'t alas ready to subside.', u'-0.134909', u"Rather like Haneke's Code Inconnu, we follow a principle trio of destitute urban teenagers through 24 hours in episodes, punctuated with screen splits showing the time - and, invariably, their boredom. There is no romanticism or squalor in squalid drug dens (unlike in the contemporary Trainspotting) or any carousel of murder. The boys want to do their own thing, perhaps collect the pettiest of debts and get along. Instead their every encounter breaks down into goading and aggression, however constructively instigated by the boys.\n\nKassowitz paints bleak sequences, but without a sense of hopelessness. Instead we are left with frustration that there is no intervention to manipulate the intelligence and good intentions of the boys at each chapter of their day. The episode in the private gallery is the perfect example of this; the imaginary cul-de-sac of self-worth that eventually leads them to behave with defensive antagonism is a painful scene.\n\nVincent Cassel is the money name leading the melodrama. Said Tagmaouhi is a good foil for Cassel's occasionally self-regarding virtuosity, but I was most impressed with Hubert Koundeas, the introspective, middle class manqu\xe9 third of the three. The film stays true throughout, incorporating Paris as a metropolitan backdrop, rather than a beautiful juxtaposition for pity's sake. A troubling, even angry but positive film. A real benchmark. 7.5/10", u'-0.118589', u"This movie nicely presents great elements one can find in a movie. The cinematography proves to be a great treat for the eyes, displaying nice plays of pan and zoom at time and also genius camera angles, especially at the long shots. The scenes also prove to be really strong, although in essence they actually depict only simple and everyday life activities. Yet as a whole I feel that the movie didn't present a solid story. Yes the theme, proclaimed vividly in the title, gets to be ever present all throughout the movie. But between each scenes there seem to be less coherence and lack a bigger picture to connect them as a whole. Furthermore, the ending comes very much abruptly with the subject being stretched just prior to it coming. The acting overall feels very nice. The trio of Vincent Cassel, Hubert Kounde and Said Taghmaoui presented a very nice acting work. Their relationship seems very natural and fluid, especially with those long dialogs. Also their interactions with the surrounding look convincing.", u'0.236503', u"I find it interesting that the film uses the names of most the actors as their character names. Perhaps by doing so, it adds more of an authentic feel to the film. The trio (Vincent, Hubert and Said) have good chemistry on screen, and what really ties them together is Said, as Vincent and Hubert are constantly butting heads; one the angel and the other the devil. Said plays the cheerful innocent young boy without much of a care and does not take sides with either, trying to maintain the peace. Vincent's expressions are really intense and though he does talk of violent acts, he does not engage in many. Hubert thinks of the bigger picture and with his calm demeanour is the image of morality in the film. The trio can be seen as gangsters by the way they walk and talk and the influence of American hood films is apparent here.\n\nThis film is in black and white and that makes the atmosphere constant throughout. It has this bleak tone to it, and can even be seen as Expressionistic for both its visual style and narrative. The film expresses social issues in France at the time, and this film greatly portrays that. Set in a time when the citizens were conditioned to fear and despise the police, Kassovitz impressively shows both police brutality and sympathy.\n\nThe cinematography is noticeably appreciable as well. There is this one scene, where I had to rewind to appreciate it some more. This is when Vinz is in the bathroom acting all macho, and testing out his toughness in front of the mirror. We are led to believe that we see him through the mirror, but then the camera should be in the reflection too, and it is not. That is truly ingenious.\n\nThough the film did keep me quite engaged, I just felt that it was a bit heavy for me, and that it wasn't leading anywhere. Then the ending came and it was just so unexpected that it left me feeling empty. Not sure how I feel about that.\n\nRead more movie reviews at: championangels.wordpress.com", u'0.292384', u"Admittedly, I watched the badly subtitled American version of this film, and so couldn't possibly comprehend the resonance of what they were saying, but at least I got something out of it. Though I feel the characters are a little lacking, this being a film they made up as they went along, the cinematography is just brilliant if you take the time to think about it. This film gets such mixed reviews, some people love it, some people hate it. It's all just a matter of what you want to get out of a film. Some people watch films for the entertainment value, in which case you're better off watching something else, but others watch for more unique reasons. If you like to ponder the metaphorical resonances of a film, this is the one for you. If not, and you'd rather watch something for pure entertainment, maybe give La Haine a miss. You need to actually care about this film to enjoy it, which is a shame, as the first time around, this film often goes over people's heads (It certainly went over mine!)", u'-0.00517062', u'French director Mathieu Kassovitz directs "La Haine" (Hate), an "angry urban youths movie" which centres on three young men \x96 one Jewish, one Arabic, one African - living in a Parisian housing project. The film unfolds over the course of one day, and uses its impoverished youths to represent any and all minorities currently ostracised from France\'s social majority. They are those whom society prefers to keep out on the fringes, a separation which the very tenets of multiculturalism makes difficult. \n\nAlienated and belittled, the kids spend all their time drawn into constant confrontations with the police. The police, being the only visible signs of the boys\' subjugation, understandably become all that the boys can lash out at. But their violence is wasted. They should be seeking other avenues, but don\'t know how. \n\nOne day, one of our heroes\' buddies dies in police custody. Like the LA Riots, anger arcs across the housing estates. One of the boys, who owns a pistol, fires the first shot. Tensions then escalate into outright war. In this regard, the film plays like Spike Lee\'s "Do The Right Thing", Scorsese\'s "Taxi Driver", and the many Angry Young Men movies of the British new wave ("Look Back In Anger", "The Loneliness of the Long Distance Runner", "If", "Kes", "This Sporting Life"), though like most of those films, "Hate" eventually engages in ideological displacement. Anger is quickly misdirected, straw-men are scapegoated and both the violence and the cause are forgotten. \n\nIn terms of flaws, the film doesn\'t go far enough, refuses to place any blame on the kids (Kassovitz rightfully sees them as victims, but refuses to examine their complicity in the events), and possesses two very pretentious scenes, filled with some didactic moralising. Other than this, the film is fast, punchy, and reasonably stylish.\n\nToday in France, relations between the French and local Arabs are still tense. The film\'s plot is loosely based on the actual police beatings, during a 1986 student protest, of Malik Oussekine, a young Arab who died from his wounds. Two decades later, riots again flared up in the streets of Paris, again due to accidental deaths caused by police. "You are not responsible, you are irresponsible!" Kassovitz would tell then Minister of the Interior Nicholas Sarkozy, who handled the whole fiasco like an idiot. Sarkozy became President of France two years later. Months later, Kassovitz\'s "Babylon AD" bombed at the box office.\n\n8/10 \x96 Worth one viewing.', u'-0.332287'], u'tt0050613': [u'\nWashizu is a brave samurai who helps his lord to fight off a violent rebellion.  Washizu and his friend Miki are riding through Cobweb Forest when a spirit appears to them and makes predictions which fire their ambitions.  When Washizu explains this vision to his wife Asaji, she urges him to murder his lord and rule in his stead.  Thus the tragedy begins.\n\nKurosawa\'s interpretation of Macbeth is visually fascinating. Swirling mist, colossal trees dripping with rain, rich black volcanic soil and bulky fortress architecture provide the imposing, dread-laden backdrop against which the humans move in superbly stylized patterns.  The director chose to shoot the action on Mount Fuji precisely because of the volcanic soil - and even had truckloads brought to the studio for pickup shots.\n\nWesterners unfamiliar with Noh are missing a huge part of the film\'s meaning.  This thousand-year-old theatrical tradition corresponds broadly to our Elizabethan Tragedy, and Kurosawa shows how the two cultural strains, eastern and western, interlock and interact.  The one illumines the other.\n\nThe Noh stage must have on it three pine branches and a symbolic Shinto temple-arch.  In the film, shots are carefully composed to include tangles of branches in the foreground, and the vast entrance gate of Washizu\'s fortress serves for the temple arch.  And yet Kurosawa is not including these details redundantly, for mere form\'s sake - the ubiquitous branches, framing the human action, remind us all the time of the forest nemesis awaiting Washizu.  The arch is Washizu\'s interface with the world - open in the early stages, but gradually less so as the protagonist retreats into his own diseased inner self.\n\nA Noh play features a "doer" (Shite) and a "companion" (Waku) who plays a subordinate role.  Washizu and Asaji are the Shite and Waku respectively. Elements in the Noh include a battle-drama (we get one here) and a so-called "wig drama", in which a female character dominates the action.  This is the central portion of the film, in the quiet of the fortress quarters, when Asaji ruthlessly manipulates her husband\'s ambition.  Every Noh play has a ghost which appears to the Shite, and the spirit in the forest fulfils that function.  Noh plays are never original works, in that (by a venerable convention) they are re-workings of ancient legends.  Kurosawa follows tradition by quarrying his tale from Shakespeare\'s play.\n\nThere is no western term to describe the stylized striking of poses so important in Noh.  Our word "dance" is a crude word which approximates to, but does not convey, the grace of the Japanese art-form.  Asaji, alone with the blood-stain, gives us a glimpse of this delightful ritual.\n\nFinally, Noh contains an aural richness almost totally absent from western tragedy - the complex rhythms of stamping and percussion which accompany the spoken word.  In the film, the rhythmic patterns of horses\' hooves on soil, and Washizu\'s bare feet on the boards of the banquet hall, are meant to reinforce the mood as they creep into our emotions by subliminal insistence.\n\nIsuzu Yamada is terrific as Asaji.  Her stillness absolutely oozes determination, contrasting strongly with her husband\'s hollow bluster.\n\n\nIt seems that Kurosawa cherished the concept of a Noh Macbeth for some years before committing it to celluloid.  Apparently the project had to be scrapped in 1952 because Welles\' Macbeth was nearing completion, and Kurosawa did not want the two films to suffer by being endlessly compared. This version, then, had to wait until 1957 to be realised.\n\nThe director is not afraid to add his own flourishes to the well-known story.  We hear of the notorious traitor Fujimaki who disembowelled himself in a room of the fortress.  The exact spot is now known as the Forbidden Room, a place of evil omen with its indelible bloodstain on the floor.  It is a symbol which encapsulates the spirit of the film, interweaving the related themes of treachery, blood and guilt.  In a brilliant transition, we are taken to a change of scene by the ripping down of a banner by galloping horsemen.  Washizu at the pinnacle of his arrogance is filmed from below with severe foreshortening, conveying his vainglory more effectively than words ever could.  The death scene, with its railing, hysterical protagonist and relentless volleys of arrows (their grouped shafts recalling the fateful forest) has enormous power and lives long in the viewer\'s memory.', u'0.241311', u'\nAs most people know, this is Shakespeare\'s Macbeth rendered by Kurosawa into Noh format for cinema. Not for nothing is Akira Kurosawa regarded as Japan\'s greatest director, for this is the best cinematic version of any Shakespeare play (and also one of Kurosawa\'s best films). Kurosawa had the advantage of working in a different language (Japanese), so he didn\'t have to agonize over the usual dilemma - whether to use Shakespeare\'s rotund oratory and blank verse (which is glorious, but goes badly on screen). Kurosawa essentially translates Shakespeare\'s poetry into visual images, while keeping dialogue to a minimum. He also had the good fortune of accessing two great cultures - European literature and Japanese visual art (he was originally a painter before entering cinema as a set-designer). There are many painterly images reminiscent of Ukiyo-e (e.g. Washizu full of arrows).\n\nThe Noh style of acting (like Kabuki, but more refined) seems stilted and exaggerated for the first few minutes; then you realize that is ideally suited to a story like this - more natural acting would seem out of place, as other Macbeth-movies go to prove. \n\nThe Japanese title of this film translates as "Cobweb Castle" (or Spider City) and this really should have been the title in English. The film is full of the notion of spiders spinning webs (and plots) in secret. It is worth noting that the witch (or "monster") is first seen with a ghostly spinning-wheel. This symbolizes the thread of fate, but also reflects the cobweb theme.\n\nThe story is sometimes slow-moving, but you have to realize that this is a story of insidious slow rot (hence the references to spiders and cobwebs). The decay is punctured by occasional bursts of violent action, as befits the story. The black-and-white picture adds to the creepiness, and the atmosphere is so thick that the movie works more effectively than "Ran" (Kurosawa\'s more polished Shakespeare-adaptation).\n\nMacbeth is the great-granddaddy of the entire horror genre, and Kurosawa is a worthy descendant.', u'0.363941', u"\nIn my opinion 'Throne Of Blood' is almost as brilliant as Kurosawa's more celebrated 'Rashomon'. It's almost impossible to fault this brilliant adaptation of Shakespeare's 'Macbeth'. It's the most compelling version of the story I have seen, even better than Polanski's outstanding film of the early 1970s, which until seeing 'Throne Of Blood' was my favourite. Kurosawa is without doubt one of the greatest film makers of all time, and watching this movie is experiencing a master at work. Toshiro Mifune gives another brilliant performance and Isuzu Yamada, who plays his wife (the equivalent of the Lady Macbeth character) is absolutely chilling. The stylized acting combined with the superb cinematography gives this movie a frightening nightmarish feel, yet the characters are always human. This makes it a very powerful and haunting movie. I don't seem to see 'Throne Of Blood' mentioned a lot as one of Kurosawa's best, but I was incredibly impressed by it, and it comes with my highest recommendation. This is a brilliant movie and to call it a masterpiece is no exaggeration.", u'0.644741', u"\nAs much as I praise Mifune, it may well be Yamada who stands out in Kurosawa's version of Macbeth. Her Lady Macbeth is one of the most terrifying things I have ever seen, a forerunner to Sadako. Dressed in Noh make-up, slow moving like the world's most effective predator, unblinking, she is, without a doubt, the true lady Macbeth. She turns Mifune towards murder, and, although she is seen going mad at the end, we do not see her die. The tragedy of the tale is heightened by the fact that we are told at the start what will happen. Every shot Kurosawa composes is memorable. The arrow through the neck, the thread spinning witch in the forest, Mifune turning his back on his master, all are haunting and unforgettable. This film cannot be praised enough, and although it is not a horror movie, it puts all modern horror movies to shame with its deadly atmosphere. Great Quotes: Asaji. \x91Every samurai longs to be the master of a castle'. 10 out of ten.\n", u'0.322166', u"The Scottish Play gets a very Oriental makeover in this combination of samurai film and Noh theater from master filmmaker Akira Kurosawa. As a fan of both AK and Shakespeare I owed it to myself to give this a go, particularly as this play has drawn many gifted filmmakers over the years, always to interesting results.\n\nIf you know Kurosawa's Seven Samurai or Yojombo, your expectations going into Throne of Blood will probably let you down at first. The energy and visual flair are there, but expressed very differently: a suffocating formality and simmering rage replaces the vitality and dynamism of those other films. Lost in a thick, perpetual fog, Kurosawa's characters stumble around like broken puppets, heavily made up in Noh theater makeup that is at first hard to adjust to. it creates a useful distance, and underlines the power of the cruel hand of Fate, moving its victims across an apocalyptic landscape to a shockingly violent conclusion, one you would do well not to preview online before viewing the film.\n\nOf his three adaptations - Ran being a masterful retelling of King Lear and The Bad Sleep Well using elements of Hamlet - this is the least accessible, but also the most visionary and unique. Oddly enough, it has similarities to Orson Welles' earlier adaptation made half a world away. Both films focus on tribal symbolism, are doused in fog and could never conceivably have had the same impact in color.\n\nIf you're interested in either Japanese cinema or Shakespeare, this should definitely be near the top of your list. As an entry-point to Kurosawa's catalog, you'd probably be better off with some less weighty fare.", u'0.47077', u"A great deal has been made of the fact that THRONE OF BLOOD (also known as SPIDER'S WEB CASTLE) is drawn from one of Shakespeare's most celebrated plays. This is both a blessing and a curse, for while it gives western audiences a point of reference, it also invites all sorts of comparisons that viewers familiar with the Shakespeare play feel honor-bound to make--and that can get in the way of seeing the film as it is rather than what we expect it to be. And that would be a great pity, because what it is in and of itself is quite fine indeed.\n\nThe cast is a very strong ensemble, with frequent Kurosawa star Torshiro Mifune leading the film with a remarkably fine performance as the ambitious warrior Taketori Washizu. To my mind, however, the most memorable performance is offered by Isuzu Yamada as Lady Washizu--who plays the role with a demonic stillness that cracks into physical action only when she is completely sure of herself or in utter desperation. It is one of the most disturbing characterizations I have ever encountered.\n\nAs usual in any Kurosawa film, the imagery involved is extremely powerful, and the moody tone of the film quickly draws viewers in--and once ensnared there is no escape; the film holds your attention with considerable ease throughout. Even so, I would not recommend THRONE OF BLOOD to western audiences who have never seen a Kurosawa film, for it is so completely Japanese in aesthetic that some may find it hard to grasp. It is best seen after you are already familiar with both Kurosawa's work and Japanese cinema in general.\n\nThe film is available via Criterion DVD, which is quite good, with a nicely restored transfer and bonus features that include the original trailer, a choice of subtitle translations (I prefer the Hoagland translation), and a somewhat awkward but ultimately rewarding commentary track by Michael Jeck. If you're a Kurosawa fan and you've never seen THRONE OF BLOOD, this is your opportunity; if you're looking to replace an existing video with a DVD, this one is likely as good as it gets. Strongly recommended.\n\nGary F. Taylor aka GFT, Amazon Reviewer", u'0.412925', u"\nThrone of Blood is, in fact, ambitious as a film as well as in its meaning. It suggests that ambition, when based on whimsical motivation, can sometimes lead to the destruction of very close relationships, and even one's own ruination. Throne of Blood begins with a series of messengers bringing news to their daimyo about an invasion of North Castle by the Fujimaki, which is led by an enemy samurai named Inui. The invasion is broken and then bravely retaliated against by two armies which are led by two samurai, Washizu and Miki. As they are returning to the daimyo, they come across a ghostly spirit in the woods, who predicts leadership positions to be attained by each of them that very day. These predictions come true to the last detail, which sets off a destructive chain of events.\n\nMiki becomes the leader of Fort One, as predicted, and Washizu becomes the leader of the North Castle, as predicted, but it is also predicted that Miki's son will rule North Castle after Washizu, which causes problems later in the film. Despite their good fortune, Miki and especially Washizu must keep their encounter with the fortune-telling spirit in the woods a secret because, if word gets out, Washizu is likely to become endangered because people will want him dead out of suspicion that he will try to kill Yoshiteru, Miki's son, to keep him from taking over Washizu's position. In an effort to prevent any of this, Washizu decides to name Yoshiteru as his heir, but Asaji, his wife, forbids this, saying that she is pregnant. It is Asaji who pressures Washizu into having Miki killed so that he can be the sole ruler of all of the provinces, but when this happens, the other castles turn against him and seek to avenge the leaders who have been killed under his orders. In the end, he is killed by his own army, which has lost all faith in him and has also turned against him.\n\nThere was a very interesting use of symbolism in Throne of Blood that is worth pointing out here. From literally the beginning to the end of the film, the setting is covered in thick fog. One scene that comes to mind that quite clearly communicates the meaning of this fog is early in the film, just after Washizu and Miki saw the spirit in the woods, and had their futures revealed to them. As they are riding out of the woods and back to the castle, they begin to cross large, flat plains that are covered in this stiflingly thick fog. There is literally a couple of minutes of footage of them riding their horses into the fog, then back toward the camera, then into the fog in another direction, and then back toward the camera, and so on. This fog seems to symbolize a natural inability to see ahead, or to see the future, as it were. This technique is especially effective this early in the film because much of the two men's decisions later in the film are founded on what the spirit told them, yet the fog symbolizes a type of foreshadowing that suggests that this premonition cannot be correct.\n\n\nThrone of Blood is also structured in a very unique way. The film starts off showing a desolated castle, as well as its surroundings, in which there is a\nsizeable gravestone marking a burial site. While this is being shown, there is a song being sung by an unseen choir about a brave warrior who once ruled this now-deserted castle, but who was `murdered by ambition.' At the end of the film, we see this same montage, and the same song is heard, and this is where we learn that the gravestone marks Washizu's burial site.\n\n\nKurosawa used different camera techniques to communicate parts of the story or to emphasize it in various ways much more than he did in other films, like Ran, Kagemusha, and High and Low. One particularly noteworthy example occurred late in the film, as Washizu is standing over his army. Washizu stands on an elevated walkway, and his army is crowded on the ground below, looking up at him. There is a low angle shot from amidst the men, and while Washizu is small in the shot itself, he is high above the other men, looking down at them, and they are all looking up at him in unison. However, it would seem that, rather than use this shot to convey a sense of superiority or of dominance, Kurosawa probably meant to emphasize his position of power, because this is the scene in which his army turns against him and he is shot with dozens of their arrows. The low angle shot would contradict Washizu's descent into madness if it was meant to show superiority, but to emphasize his position of power at this point in the film, it makes his downfall much more dramatic.\n\nThis is usually not the case with Akira Kurosawa, but Throne of Blood reflects more of a formalistic style of direction. For example, his use of high and low angle shots, as well as the extensive symbolic use of the fog, suggest more formalism here than realism. Besides that, and probably more obviously, is the way that the strange spirit in the woods was presented. She was in a radiantly lit hut in the middle of the dark woods, and Washizu's encounter with several other spirits later in the film was presented among an extensive use of cutting and editing. The extensive use of very long takes and slow action seen in Ran and Kagemusha is definitely seen here, but not nearly as much. There are scenes in which these long takes are seen, but in addition to them there can be found many more short takes and highly edited sequences, which were largely absent from the previous films. But having done this with the same skill, Kurosawa has fashioned another samurai masterpiece. ", u'-0.156108', u'\nDirectors don\'t come much better than Kurosawa, writers don\'t come much better than Shakespeare, and movies don\'t come much better than this excellent combination of the two.  Add Mifune\'s acting, plus a good supporting cast (including a really good performance by Isuzu Yamada), and you have a top-quality, classic film.  In retelling the story of "Macbeth" with characters from medieval Japan, Kurosawa does honor to the original and creates a fine achievement in its own right.\n\nMuch of the time, when Shakespeare plots are transferred to different settings, what results is only a shadow of the original, because too many directors have only a limited grasp of what Shakespeare\'s deep masterpieces are all about.  That is not at all the case here - Kurosawa shows a great appreciation for the themes and potential of the Macbeth story, and adds plenty of masterful touches of his own, creating a distinctive, memorable atmosphere and characters that come to life in their own right in addition to serving as worthy parallels to the Macbeth characters.  There are many fine details that enhance both the medieval Japanese setting and also the important themes of the story itself.\n\nWhether you like Shakespeare, Kurosawa, or both, "Throne of Blood" is an excellent movie that should not disappoint.\n', u'0.81627', u'In the Sixteenth Century in Japan, the brave generals Taketori Washizu (Toshir\xf4 Mifune) and Yoshiaki Miki (Minoru Chiaki) are invited to visit their lord in his castle after a battle wined by them against a traitor general. In the way to the castle, they meet in the forest an evil spirit that foresees their future from the bottom of their hearts, with Washizu being the lord of an important mansion in the fields of their lord, Miki the commander of the First Fortress and Miki\'s son the successor of Washizu. When they meet their master, the first part of the prophecy comes true for Washizu and Miki. However, the wife of Washizu poisons his heart with calumnies and malicious feelings against the lord and Miki. Washizu kills them both, becoming the new lord of the Spider\'s Web Castle, but tormented by his guilty and afraid of his future.\n\n"Kumonosu J\xf4" is another masterpiece of Akira Kurosawa, indeed a version of Shakespeare\'s Macbeth play brilliantly transposed to the scenario of the feudalistic Japan of the Sixteenth Century. The shootings and the cinematography are very impressive even in the present days, and the performances are outstanding, highlighting Toshir\xf4 Mifune in the role of a strong warrior in the battlefields, but weak in front of his venomous and ambitious wife. The sequence with the arrows in the end of the story is amazingly perfect. My vote is ten.\n\nTitle (Brazil): "Trono Manchado de Sangue" ("Throne Stained by Blood")', u'-0.00559592', u"\nAkira Kurosawa would end up using Shakespearean influence on two of his films. Throne of Blood is Kurosawa's adaptation of Shakespeare's play, Macbeth, but in a feudal Japanese setting.\n\nThe film begins with Taketoki Washizu (Toshiro Mifune) and Yoshaki Miki (Minoru Chiaki) winning a fierce battle for their lord. Afterwards, they are invited to the lord's castle. On their way there, they come across a spirit in the forest. the spirit tells Washizu that he will soon become in command of a castle but that he will not rule long, and Yoshaki's son will soon takeover. Washizu is soon convinced that these predictions will come true, and becomes consumed with greed and evil in order to make sure that they do indeed come true.\n\nIn this film Kurosawa uses a more still and quiet filming style than was used in his previous films (with the exception of Ikiru). A style that he continued to use for the rest of his career. The Shakespearean influence is obviously there, not only in story, but the film itself has a very theatre-esque feeling to it.", u'0.0396839', u'Akira Kurosawa is one of the most celebrated and renowned of all filmmakers not only because he created some of the world\'s greatest visionary masterpieces such "Seven Samurai" (1954), "Rashomon" (1950), and "Yojimbo" (1961) but because he had the nerve to draw in on formulas and elements from all around the world and not just those of his native Japan. He is considered the most Western of all Japanese filmmakers, having owed a lot of his influence to men such as John Ford. But there also came times when Kurosawa would tend to the realm of William Shakespeare and the influential plays that he created so many years before.\n\nThe Shakespearian play "Macbeth" is considered one of the playwright\'s classics, so it wasn\'t a surprise when Akira Kurosawa decided to film his own adaptation of the story and blend it with his own shocking twists and ideas. His 1957 film "Throne of Blood", while not entirely faithful to Shakespeare\'s play and not alluding to any of the original dialogue is ranked one of the greatest "Macbeth" adaptations of all time. And remember, this is a story that has been modified and reconstructed over and over again through the centuries.\n\nThe basic plot remains the same. Toshiro Mifune stars as the Japanese equivalent to Macbeth: a war hero-turned-ruler who, upon being egged by his vindictive and cynical wife (Isuzu Yamada) and being told a strange prophecy about his future, plots to murder his own master and anybody who stands in his way. Once the murder is committed, peace does not follow, but rather a long chain of bloody killings until the position Mifune holds is exactly what the title personifies.\n\nAlthough I strongly feel that Kurosawa did a better treatment of the Shakespeare play "King Lear" with "Ran" (1985) and that this film does not rank on top with some of his others, "Throne of Blood" is still a very good and very visionary and creative opus. And part of the reason why I like it is because of its inherently dark nature. Unlike "Yojimbo" (1961) which made a sort of glory out of violence, "Throne of Blood" has an atmosphere of terror and intensity around it. Right from the beginning, when we hear Masaru Sato\'s chilling opening score, we know this is going to be a dark film. Toshiro Mifune was perfect casting as the bloodthirsty Washizu. Although he is far less evil that Macbeth from the play, Washizu is in his own way, more intimidating due to his viciousness and again, those eyes. Mifune maintains the impression of a madman throughout the course of the film and gives us the impression of a wild animal hungry for human flesh and blood. I was also very fond of the performance by Isuzu Yamada as Lady Macbeth\'s equivalent. Although her performance is mainly a one-note ordeal, it still works out well and there was something about her that reminded me not of a snake like one would expect, but a rat. I do not know if Kurosawa did this intentionally, but when she walks, the lower garments of her robe rubs against the floor with a kind of squeal-like wisp. And like a rat, she spreads her disease: the thirst for blood.\n\n"Throne of Blood" is not a perfect film, however. The music score by Masaru Sato, save for the opening theme and a few cues here and there, is rather forgettable. Some of the supporting cast members, such as those by Akira Kubo and Takashi Shimura seem very underdeveloped. However, any weaknesses that become noticeable are soon forgiven when Kurosawa\'s original and terrific ending scene comes into frame which was a major improvement over the disappointing climax from the play.\n\nSo overall, Kurosawa\'s "Throne of Blood" is again, not his best film, but certainly a very unique and entertaining one and a great vision of the Japanese perception of Shakespeare\'s classic.', u'-0.300258', u"In feudal Japan, Washizu and Miki are warriors and friends. When riding to their Lord's castle to be decorated, a strange woman in the forest predicts future glories for them. When her predictions come true, it is the beginning of an ignominious tragedy that will ultimately end in death for both men ...\n\nMade during his dynamic fifties period, this powerful retelling of William Shakespeare's Macbeth is the best movie version of the classic play (although the Orson Welles and Roman Polanski films are both good too). It sticks pretty close to the original text; the Washizus are the Macbeths, the Mikis are Banquo and Fleance, Tsuzuki is Duncan and Odagura is Siward. Some characters are missing - notably Macduff - and there are some new elements - such as Lady Washizu's pregnancy - but Kurosawa has captured the feel and the atmosphere of the story perfectly, whilst still making his movie visually powerful and arresting. He does this by making it almost a horror movie (the Japanese title translates as Cobweb Castle, a horror film title if ever I heard one); it's packed full of creepy scenes, startling sounds and moments (for example, when Yamada gasps at the murderer's sudden appearance), and is embedded with dread. It's also drenched in grim weather - the ever-present fog is a stunning metaphor for the moral dilemmas which constantly confront Washizu, almost as if the cloudiness of his thoughts have seeped out to surround him. Immediately after meeting the ghost, Kurosawa uses an amazing ten wordless shots - count them, ten - of Mifune and Chiaki riding around lost in the fog. Anyone else would have used one or two, but the ten are astonishing; this director loved bad weather. His use of camera is also brilliant in its simple, powerful elegance with so many clever shots to mention; the ghost's sudden dramatic disappearance, Lady Washizu swallowed by blackness as she fetches the poisoned saki, the famous Banquo's Ghost dinner scene, not to mention the incredible finale as the treasonable Mifune is tortured by a rain of arrows from his own men. This movie isn't as much fun as some of Kurosawa's others - it is Macbeth, after all - but it is stunning throughout, and one of the best screen adaptations of Shakespeare. English title - Throne Of Blood.", u'0.143257', u"Secondary school dissection of Romeo & Juliet aside I've never read anything by Shakespeare, and I'm shamefully unfamiliar with much of Kurosawa's work, so it's no surprise, perhaps, that I wasn't as impressed by this as its reputation suggest I should be. This adaptation of the bard's Macbeth is one of Kurosawa's classics but I have to say I found it hard going at times. Definitely a film you have to be in the mood to watch, it's without doubt a technically superb piece of work with some undeniably effective moments (the spooky witch in the woods, the famous rain of arrows, Isuzu Yamada's wonderfully manipulative Lady Asaji) and some overt symbolism that even I could grasp. So, on that level, the film works wonderfully. And yet \x96 I don't know, it just seems so emotionally detached from its characters that Washizu's inexorable descent into madness as he realises the ambitions fired by an encounter with the aforementioned witch in the Cobweb Forest failed to engage me. Assured direction, and superb cinematography make this a film that always has something to occupy the attentive viewer's mind, but the slow, by-the-numbers treatment left me feeling as if I had done a duty rather than indulged in a pleasure.", u'-0.0311622', u'Criterion DVD. Another supposed masterpiece from Japan, another film on both the IMDb top 250 and the TSPDT Top 1000, this is one I\'ve known about for years and just never gotten around to. For those who don\'t know, it\'s Kurosawa\'s "Macbeth" and unlike much of his later epic film-making, this one attempts to distill the complex storyline down to its most basic elements...it\'s as close to horror as it is to an epic.\n\nAnd it works, but only to me on a rather superficial level. The development and motivations of both Lord and Lady Washizu (Toshir\xf4 Mifune and Isuzu Yamada) is only thinly sketched -- true it isn\'t the most significant part of the Shakepeare original either, but here events move so quickly that I felt the madness was taking hold with no alternating moments of sanity, which I do remember from the play. Washizu gets the prophecy -- is promoted -- takes the Lordship -- pays the penalty -- it\'s all done in a breathless manner, with many striking scenes including the great final execution -- but to me at least it rang a bit hollow; I felt more of an understanding for the Macbeth of Welles and even Polanski than I did for Kurosawa\'s warlord. Great music and photography, as always, and the Criterion print is beautiful.', u'0.0596951', u"Director Kurosawa is a Visual Master. The Images in His Films remind of Kubrick. Its no wonder that Stills from Their Movies look like Great Photographs, because that's what they are. They just Move on the Movie Screen, but when Isolated they alone are Masterpieces.\n\nHere is a Japanese retelling of Macbeth. There is quite a Haunt to this Movie and in its Creepiness manages to Embody the Horror Tale. Striking in its Simplicity, yet it Gloms on to the Imagination and won't let go. The Dialog here is Sparse and that does not bode well for the Shakespeare Play but this is Cinema, Magnificently Pure and Simple.\n\nDo not expect Epic Battles, so well Associated with the Director or Samurai Sword Fights. This is all Mood and Character, with the Cinematography Proudly Portraying one of the most Important Characters. Even Kurosawa Fans must admit this is not his most Inspiring Film and not as easily accepted by a Wide Audience like some of His other Great Movies (The Seven Samurai (1954) or Ran (1985).", u'0.462398'], u'tt1504320': [u'This is a biopic about how King George VI, the father of Queen Elizabeth II, overcame his stuttering problem. Widely considered by all but his father unfit to be king, George is reluctantly thrust unto the throne and into the spotlight after his brother is forced to abdicate. Overshadowed on the global stage by powerful orators like Adolph Hitler and Benito Mussolini, the King relies on the help of a little-known Australian speech therapist named Lionel Logue to find his voice and courageously lead his people into the most devastating war humanity has ever faced.\n\nThis is a powerful, hilarious and deeply moving story, told against the backdrop of a critical juncture in modern history, of the emergence of a deep friendship out of a professional relationship between two men who would otherwise never have socially interacted. The screenplay, written by David Seidler (who also wrote Tucker: The Man and his Dream), is excellent. The dry British wit is hilarious. I was literally slapping my knee during some of the scenes. Tom Hooper (Elizabeth I) does a superb job directing this movie. The buildup to the climactic finale is skillfully executed and prompted the audience to erupt into spontaneous applause. (Apparently, this also happened at the Roy Thomson Hall premiere.) Geoffrey Rush (Elizabeth: The Golden Age) does a fantastic job as Lionel Logue and Colin Firth (A Single Man) is excellent as King George VI.\n\nI saw the second public screening of this movie at the Ryerson Theater during the Toronto International Film Festival (TIFF). Tom Hooper was present to introduce the movie. He was joined by Colin Firth and Geoffrey Rush after the movie ended for a brief Q&A.\n\nIt turns out that David Seidler also had a stuttering problem as a child and drew inspiration from the king\'s struggle. Early in his career he wanted to write a screenplay about it. He dutifully asked the Queen Mother for permission. She agreed but told him "not in my lifetime". Little did he know she would live to be 101 and he would have to wait another 30 years.\n\nAnother interesting tidbit we learned was that near the end of the shoot, the crew finally located one of Lionel Logue\'s grandsons, who just so happened to live about 10 minutes away from the director. They got access to Lionel\'s diaries and correspondence and managed to incorporate some of it into the script.\n\nThis movie is an unqualified must see.', u'-0.0543316', u'I think I must have seen a different film from the previous two reviewers at Leeds on Friday. It is now two days ago and I am still feeling overwhelmed by what I saw. It is a very touching, and quite inspiring story about a man, psychologically scarred, and trapped in a situation from which he could have no escape and facing it with immense courage. It so happens that he was royal, and that was a large part of his problem- but the film isn\'t so much about royalty as a human story. The film conveyed very powerfully in the opening scene, the enormity of what was required of him. As the film develops, the complexities of the character are revealed. The acting is superb, especially from the three principals, and the development of the troubled and sparky relationship at the heart of the film is a joy to watch. The film is very funny and the characters have warmth and humanity. The film is well paced, and carries you along to the emotional climax, so that, even though I knew the story, it had me holding my breath. If you don\'t need lots of action or special effects in your film, and enjoy seeing top-notch actors at the very peak of their craft, this will be for you. You might also, as I did, gain a bit more insight into the human drama behind a significant, but relatively unexplored period of British history.\n\nIf CF and GR both win Oscars they will be more than worthy winners and if they don\'t then "best" has no meaning. \n\nOne further thought- anyone who thinks that this film is unsuitable for teenage viewers needs to have a long hard look at their priorities. It could prove inspirational to anyone with communication difficulties.', u'0.252262', u"There were a lot of elderly folks in the theatre when I saw The King's Speech. It occurred to me that some of them may have been alive when George VI gave the actual speech to the British Nation which had just declared war with Hitler.\n\nThe King's Speech is a feel good movie, but a very adult one, and while it tells a good story, well scripted, absorbing and believable (except for an odd line or two), Tom Hooper's film is far more driven by character than by plot.\n\nYou may need to see it to believe it but, Colin Firth has no obvious competition for the best actor awards which are coming his way. He is absorbed in the role of the stammering king who is timid, low in self-confidence, and frustrated but perfectly warm-hearted. The only time he doesn't stammer is oddly enough when he curses. This is something which his new speech therapist suggests he use as a practise tool in the one scene which earned the film an R rating. The King's Speech is arguably a proud moment for Geoffrey Rush as well. This is him at his best, and he and Firth together almost make the movie. Their exchange of dialogue is flawless. \n\nThe King's Speech boasts an exceptional British cast, which includes Helena Bonham Carter, Michael Gambon, Derek Jacobi and Guy Pearce, all of whom help contribute to the picture with the smallest amount of screen time.\n\nThe King's Speech says a mouthful, and it warms the heart without question. There is also no question is arguing that it is among the very best of the year.", u'0.606855', u'No spoilers here. I would like to let everyone know that this is an excellent film. I enjoyed it this week at the Mill Valley Film Festival in Marin County, CA. Given the outstanding cast and director, and my fascination with historical figures, I had high hopes for this film, though mixed with a certain resignation that I might be disappointed. There was no way I could have imagined how wonderful "The King\'s Speech" would be. There was abundant humor without the film ever becoming a comedy, drama without dreariness, and many deeply moving moments. I can\'t praise this film enough. It boosted my appreciation of the human capacity to become our best selves, and rise to meet even the most daunting challenges.', u'0.125513', u'I could write for hours about this film. I only just heard about it last night at a New Year\'s Eve party. Saw it today. To use the vernacular, OMG. Director Tom Hooper has a masterpiece on his hands. Geoffrey Rush, Helena Bonham Carter, Derek Jacobi, and Timothy Spall as Winston Churchill, all turn in excellent performances. Not to forget Guy Pearce as King Edward who abdicated his throne for an American divorc\xe9e. David Seidler\'s script is brilliant. The story is laid out cleverly. The pace and rhythm are PERFECT.\n\nI think this is one of the best films ever made. It will tear at your guts. And that is where Collin Firth comes in. Mr. Firth gives one of the most poignant and affective performances ever by a male movie star. Where, inside himself, an actor goes for a performance like this, is beyond my comprehension. \n\nIn the movie, "A Single Man", Colin Firth served notice that he was an actor of depth and subtlety, the surface of which he had only just begun to scratch. Now, he\'s more than scratched that surface. He\'s gouged a chasm through it. He plays the tormented, soon to be King of England, George VI, and does so in a way that very early in the movie buries his hooks in you and doesn\'t let go. I can not ever recall, while watching a film, having to choke back tears for over an hour and a half. The suffering portrayed by Firth as George VI is subtle at times. In your face at others. But painfully present always. When Firth bellows, "I am a King" I nearly lost it in a very quiet, and stunned, theater. If you\'ve already seen this film you know what this refers to. \n\nAs an American I find the concept of a monarchy bewildering. Why is one person more privileged than another just because of the womb he or she sprang from? That being said, I do find the stories of those trapped in this anachronistic time warp fascinating at times. This would be one of those times. This film is the intersection of great personal pain, international upheaval, and a family that is ceremoniously dysfunctional to it\'s core. \n\nAbove this chaos, confusion, and unrest, rises a weak shell of a man to greatness. Colin Firth is the vessel for that transformation and if he doesn\'t win an Oscar for this performance it will tarnish the Academy forever in my humble opinion. This is the kind of performance, and film overall, that you leave thinking to yourself that you\'ve just seen the greatest movie ever. Maybe later you\'ll see another brilliant film and think that "this one" is the best ever, but for now "The King\'s Speech" has no equal.', u'0.0203575', u'I rarely rate a movie a "10" but in this case, it is well deserved. Truly, there is no way to improve upon the achievement that this film represents, whether in casting, direction, writing, artistic value, you name it.\n\nThe story gives us a fascinating look into the struggles faced by George VI on his way to becoming king of England. The story line is all about his stuttering, but underneath all that are suppressed memories from childhood, growing up in the shadow of an elder brother, perpetual negative reinforcement from a domineering father, etc. It\'s a psychoanalytical look at a well-known royal family, and while I can\'t vouch for its absolute veracity, it gives a rare glimpse into the lives of people we wouldn\'t otherwise observe at this level of intimacy (much like "Queen" did a few years ago).\n\nThe contrast between George and Edward VIII is most fruitful. It\'s the clash between duty and hedonism, fulfilling one\'s personal quest for happiness vs. overcoming one\'s worst fears on behalf of your people and country. Edward is typically romanticized and lionized, but here we see him as more of a spoiled, selfish lout.\n\nBut the heart of the movie is the relationship between George and Lionel Logue (Geoffrey Rush), who is helping him overcome his speech problems. Both actors are at the absolute top of their form. Firth is brilliant as the aloof, initially reluctant and distrustful monarch, while Rush shows the same wink-of-the-eye humor and irony that he did as Barbossa, relishing the sheer inequality of their positions yet knowing the extent to which George is dependent on him. Ultimately a true friendship develops between the men, and since they are both such endearing characters, it\'s a joy to watch.\n\nI should add that Helena Bonham-Carter is also spot-on as the haughty yet practical queen consort. Other more minor roles are effectively played (e.g., Winston Churchill, George V). The entire movie is a perfect blend of history, personal and familial drama, with broader themes of perseverance and overcoming adversity which give it a timeless application.\n\nLastly, in this movie\'s case, the "R" rating is for "Ridiculous." The only potentially offensive material is some over-the-top language (including the F-word) which plays a part in one scene, and is clearly used for comic purpose and with great effect. I unhesitatingly took my 13 year old daughter and (depending on the child) might be okay for even younger ones. Don\'t let that stop you from seeing this gem.', u'0.24529', u"You heard it from me: Not even James Franco with his boffo performance in 127 Hours can beat Colin Firth for the Oscar in King's Speech, a docudrama about the Duke of York (Firth) becoming King George VI while overcoming a crushing stutter. Not only does the actor get pitch perfect the stutter, but he also invests a kindness, courage, and vulnerability in the character that work in harmony to create an unforgettable George in an exquisite period peace.\n\nNot to forget how generously Geoffrey Rush underplays Lionel, the speech therapist who is instrumental in making the king a speaker and a friend. That low-key acting allows Firth the room to expand his king's personality without interference from an Oscar-winning co-star. This is history as I like to learn it\x97honest and engaging with palaces and minor characters well-appointed and underplayed themselves as part of a mosaic of challenges facing a handicapped king and a nation on the brink of WWII. The pace is close to languid, better to allow us to settle in for the painful transformation of a man unused to public speaking but used to family mocking his disability.\n\nGeorge's bravery is the film's heartbeat, not flamboyant courage, mind you, but rather the kind that wakes us up to the character as complex and lovable. But valor is not his exclusively, Guy Pearce's Edward, who abdicates for his love, Wallace Simpson, can be seen as a courageous man giving up a crown for love or a fool falling for a twice-divorced socialite.\n\nSuch an ambivalence is fitting for a film that gently introduces you to a period in British history when alliances are not clear and allegiances dangerous. One thing is patently clear, however\x97this is going to be on most critics' best film of the year list with a sure Oscar winner for its star. If Firth missed the brass ring last year in A Single Man, he'll grab it this year in King's Speech.", u'0.215221', u"I saw this movie at Ryerson Theater during the Toronto International Film Festival among many other movie's this one really acquired my attention , wonder if it was for Colin Firth or Tom Hooper's writing. This is a moving tale about a king's obligation and deep friendship toward the nation he loved. The screenplay by David Seidler is genuine and clever... Colin Firth as the king is utterly dazzling and doesn't stop to amaze us movie by movie , like last year's A Single Man his performance has good chance to end at the Oscar race this year. Geoffrey Rush had one of the movie's well written role as the Australian speech therapist Lionel Logue , his acting is splendid! Tom Hooper did an remarkable work , every detail of the movie is memorable On the whole this movie is a bright , smart and impressive picture.", u'0.745818', u"The title of the film wouldn't necessarily have caught my eye, but am I glad I went to see this film, courtesy of an advance screening. It was bound to be good with Colin Firth playing the Duke of York who went on to become George VI, and he didn't let the audience down. Let's not forget also the other main characters, Lionel Logue played by Geoffrey Rush, Helena Bonham Carter as the Duchess of York, Michael Gambon as George V and Timothy Spall as Winston Churchill - all absolutely perfect for their respective roles. Whilst the dates in the film might not have been completely accurate, the film tells the story perfectly, sometimes humorously and and certainly sensitively, and I would like to think in such a way that doesn't cause any embarrassment to any surviving members of our Royal Family or indeed people who suffer from what must be a very difficult condition to live with. Certainly a film I would recommend to my friends.", u'0.290958', u'A longtime Colin Firth fan, I saw this wonderful film twice at the Toronto Film Festival.\n\nThe film opens with Bertie, Duke of York (Firth), the younger son of King George V, making a speech and becoming embarrassingly tongue-tied. Hearing the echo of his words in the outdoor stadium is enough to thwart his efforts. He looks desperately unhappy as the audience watches, some with expressions ranging from sympathy to impatience - clearly this has happened before.\n\nLionel Logue (Geoffrey Rush), is an Australian speech therapist known for unorthodox methods. The moment we see his home, its eclectic decor tells us he is an unusual character. Logue has a happy and active family. He and his wife (Jennifer Ehle)have 3 sons, ranging in age from early adolescence to late teens. Evidence of the boys\' activities is seen around the somewhat messy house - schoolbooks, model planes, etc. \n\nInto this home comes the Duchess of York (Helena Bonham Carter), clearly out of her element. Presenting herself as "Mrs. Johnson," she tells Logue her husband stutters and is called upon to speak in public in his line of work. Logue replies that perhaps he should find a new job! She says that would be impossible, to which Logue inquires if he is an indentured servant. "Yes, sort of," she replies. After she reveals his true identify, Logue only agrees to take him on as a patient if the therapy is conducted in his own office (no house calls, even for royalty) and tells her it is "my castle, my rules."\n\nA reluctant Bertie is coaxed into a first appointment, which ends badly. Logue records him reading the "to be or not to be" soliloquy from Hamlet while wearing headphones blasting Beethoven so that he can\'t hear himself speaking. Bertie has little patience for these "tricks" and ultimately rips off the headphones and storms out, but not before Logue presents him with the recording as a "souvenir." Some time later, Bertie plays the recording, in which he perfectly enunciates the Shakespearean passage , as Elizabeth, unseen, stands in the doorway listening.\n\nSo back to Logue he goes.\n\nTheir sessions are filled with pathos and humor. An unlikely friendship begins between two men from vastly different worlds - Logue insists on equality, calling the duke "Bertie." Logue knows that in most cases, stammering results from traumatic childhood experiences, although Bertie scoffs at this assertion. "I was always like this," he insists, Logue replying that no infant begins talking in a stammer. Gradually, his harsh treatment as a child - what we would consider child abuse today - is revealed, sometimes in song at Logue\'s insistence, when it is too painful to relate in speech. This breakthrough is one of the most powerful scenes in the film, and made me cry both times I saw it. At one point, the two men have a nasty argument and a disruption of their relationship. Bertie makes some cruel comments, mocking Logue\'s background and questioning his motivation. You can clearly see the hurt on Logue\'s face as Bertie walks away. \n\nWe all know what is going on in the background: the abdication crisis. Edward VI (David) and Wallis Simpson are unsympathetically portrayed. In one scene, David mockingly mimics Bertie\'s stammer, accusing him of wanting to steal his throne. In truth, Bertie dreads becoming King, breaking down in tears when he realizes his fear is about to become reality. When GeorgeV dies, making David the King, David abdicates when not allowed to marry the twice-divorced Wallis.\n\nBertie rekindles his relationship with Logue, trying to apologize without saying the words. Logue understands that royalty does not apologize, and begins readying Bertie to speak at the coronation.\n\nThe Archbishop of Canterbury does not approve of Logue\'s influence on the King, and questions his credentials. In a pivotal scene at a Westminster Abbey "rehearsal," the King supports Logue, who admits he is not a doctor and does not have impressive credentials, but never misrepresented himself to clients. After the Archbishop leaves, an amusing "rehearsal" scene takes place at the Abbey.\n\nThe film takes a serious turn as Hitler comes into power. Bertie, Elizabeth and their daughters (Margaret and Elizabeth, the current queen) watch a coronation newsreel, followed by footage of Hitler inciting the German people. Bertie\'s comment? "I don\'t know what he is saying, but he says it well," envying Hitler\'s oratory power.\n\nBertie is an affectionate, hands-on father, in contrast to his own childhood when he and his brother were brought to their parents for a "daily viewing." After he becomes king, the princesses hesitate, then curtsy, upon seeing him. Bertie\'s face changes as he realizes how completely his life will change, but immediately gathers them into his arms. \n\nAs WWII approaches, preparation begins for "The King\'s Speech" to the nation. The end of the film is brilliant as Bertie speaks live on radio, with Logue there to coach him. We see shots of his subjects - soldiers, people in pubs, his mother, even David and Wallis - listening to the stirring speech. It is a resounding success, but realistically portrayed, as Bertie hesitates several times, following Logue\'s non-verbal cues to get through it. Afterwards, Logue tells him "you still stammered on the W\'s" to which Bertie replies, "I had to throw in a few of those so they \'d know it was me." Director Tom Hooper revealed at the Q&A, that that response was taken from the king\'s own diary.\n\nThe film ends with the royal family on the balcony, waving to their subjects as Logue watches, having, for the first time, addressed Bertie as "Your Majesty." It is noted on screen that Bertie and Lionel remained friends for the rest of their lives and that Lionel was awarded a CVO for "personal service to the sovereign." I highly recommend this absorbing drama with masterful characterizations by its two principal actors.', u'-0.0289178', u'What a wonderful performance! Compassion and clarity of vision, side by side. Colin Firth has been a favourite of mine since the e4xtraordinary "Apartment Zero\' (1989) His maturity as an actor reflects his maturity as a person and how many times are we able to say that? Very few I\'m afraid. What I thought I saw in him as an actor playing the zero of the title in "Apartment Zero" is here in spades. Wow! How rewarding! Here he\'s not alone. Goeffrey Rush, Helena Bonham Carter and Guy Pearce are all standouts and the stutter is just a device to show a whole picture. How strange we knew so little about this man. I guess Hitler got all the headlines. So from a historical perspective is also a feast of sorts. Bravo indeed!', u'0.17764', u'Wow! I just saw this at the Roy Thompson Hall (TIFF) World premiere of The King\'s Speech with director Tom Hooper (great job), Colin Firth (great), Geoffrey Rush (outstanding), and the writer (excellent job!) present. Front row seating was actually really good.\n\nLet me frame this for you: this is a biopic of shy and stuttering King George VI in the years leading up to WWII. I didn\'t know he stuttered. And had a speech therapist. Interestingly, the screenplay writer wasn\'t allowed to put this on until the former Queen passed. "Not in my lifetime," she said. And so he waited 30 years to pass until he could. He was a former stutterer who said to himself, if King George VI could get over his stuttering, then so could I. And hence goes the story of overcoming this major issue (which has emotional and not merely physical roots) while connecting with his speech helper.\n\nThe movie zones in on not only the stutter and magnifies the power and lack of power that the spoken word communicates (all subtext), but makes the story very human, and interesting as the film focuses on the King and Lionel Logue, his \'speech defects\' therapist, for lack of a better and more accurate term.\n\nThe movie flowed well with good story and excellent acting throughout that captured my attention and rewarded it with some funny and very honest moments sprinkled throughout.\n\nGeoffrey Rush was outstanding in playing a common man using his mind and full creative abilities to solve a man\'s stutter enough to deliver powerful speeches to resist during WWII.\n\nThe funniest moment, I shall not reveal, but it has to do with how speech anti-stutter techniques were used. So creative. And honest. AND so funny.\n\nAfter one key speech, the audience in Roy Thompson Hall spontaneously started clapping. WOW! This was a nice movie. It could have pushed the emotional bar just a bit higher, but nonetheless stuck to its guns and gave an honest and good time. A strong 9/10.', u'0.355752', u'The award season brouhaha seems focused on Firth\'s performance, and excellent though it is, I find it less characteristic and affecting than his turn in Ford\'s \'A Single Man.\' Like \'The Queen\' from four years ago, the British royal family is again the boat on which Britain attempts to take Hollywood. But \'The Queen\' was a far more affecting film. Perhaps this is because \'The Queen\' was so much more enigmatic, while \'The King\'s Speech\' obvious: the king\'s doll-like daughters greeting him with "Your Majesty." Need a more obvious way to communicate the king\'s entrapment? The cruelty of the Duke of York\'s brother. The footage of "ordinary people" wincing at the king\'s stuttering. The cheap suspense created by Bertie not listening to his recording of "To be or not to be" until much later. All these are formulaic, and Hollywood formulaic, employed because the the filmmakers seem afraid that we would not be able to empathize with the character\'s speech impediment problem. But by overdoing it, they achieve the opposite.\n\nThis isn\'t to say that there are quite excellent moments. The fog-drenched streets when Helena Bonham-Carter, as "Mrs. Johnson," seeks out Lionel. The amplification of the stutter in the very first scene. The dinner during which the previous king dies.\n\nThe standout for me in this film, however, is Geoffrey Rush. The camera doesn\'t lavish nearly as much attention on him as it does on Firth, and Rush doesn\'t get a breakdown scene late in the movie to show off his acting chops, as does Firth. But Rush embodies all the contradiction in the film\'s supposed theme of an "unlikely friendship" between men of drastically unequal ranks. Whereas Firth ultimately seems energized and, indeed, two-dimensionally happy with his kingship, Rush\'s last address to his one-time patient is an enigmatic "Your Majesty." Does he admire what he\'s made, or does he now feel more than ever the disparity in their power? I think also to the expression Rush gives us when his oldest son announces news of WWII - how does Rush think of his "friend" who has the power to send his son to death in war? It is Rush\'s quiet performance that leaves the maximum dramatic impact, which Helen Mirren had done four years ago by walking down a hallway in Buckingham Palace with a five year old\'s confusion on her royal face.', u'-0.230571', u"I really do not get the Hollywood's weakness for everything royal and British. It is enough for a British actor to play an English queen or king to get nominated, it seems. For example Helena Bonham getting nominated here is just ridiculous, she is good of course but nothing deserving an Oscar nomination. The film is well made and acted, but is basically a lie, sentimental and simplistic one at that. King Edward VIII, the older brother here, was a known supporter of Hitler but the film does not mention it here. King George's speech impediment was not really so important, because the king's role was pretty limited at the time and his importance was little compared to prime minister's Churchill in preparing the country for war. Big deal that he was stuttering, he could have been mute and it still would not have changed much! The film also conveniently ignores that king George was NOT Churchill's supporter and thought his politics of clearly opposing Hitler was incorrect, instead he showed strong support for Neville Chamberlain's politics of appeasement, even after Chamberlain had cynically approved in Munich Hitler's invasion of Czechoslovakia! If it were up to king George, Churchill would not have been appointed PM, Halifax would have. And Halifax was just another Chamberlain. So the film is a sentimental lie for naive, sentimental public.", u'-0.366228', u"While his ascension to the throne of England seems imminent, future King George VI struggles with a speech impediment that won't allow him to speak in public without a fair amount of embarrassment to himself and his audience. He seeks and finds help by approaching speech therapist Lionel Logue who offers him his services. This Oscar nominee showcases some very entertaining and witty writing accompanied by excellent cinematography and acting. I don't however think the film is all that it is made out to be with the exceptionally high score it currently presents itself with on this website and roaring Oscar buzz. The story itself is quite thin and there aren't many memorable scenes that warrant a second viewing any time soon.\n\n74/100", u'0.140035'], u'tt2084970': [u'As the film announces at the start, it based on a true story. The essentials are true, and to get so much history into a film things have to be condensed. Unfortunately unnecessarily inaccurate things were portrayed which didn\'t save any time. For example, Turing mutters under his breath so most audiences will not notice, that the Poles made the first crucial breakthrough. By the start of the war, the Poles led by Marian Rejewski had been breaking Enigma for over six years and built the first machine, called a "bomba" in 1938.\n\nIn July 1939 the Poles passed on all the information to the French and British including details of the bomba and their successes at a meeting which included Denniston. The problem started to mount for the Poles and later the British when other rotors could be swapped in and the indicator method was changed by the Germans. The film is correct in showing that Turing\'s genius was using known words from the coded messages to reduce the myriad of possibilities. This idea happened in 1939 and so he started from the outset to design the British "bombes" to use this method, not after they had been running for months.\n\nFour senior code-breakers, not just Alan Turing, but also Gordon Welchman, Stuart Milner-Barry and Hugh Alexander wrote to Churchill in 1941 over Denniston\'s head about the shortage of staff and praising Edward Travis. In February 1942, Denniston was demoted and transferred elsewhere. His successor, Edward Travis, transformed the procedures.\n\nCairncross, played by Downton\'s ex-chauffeur, never appeared at Bletchley until 1942 and the alleged blackmail is an unnecessary red-herring.\n\nThe idea that there would be a chart on the wall in Hut 8 showing the latest positions of all Atlantic convoys is laughable. This chart was in a secure bunker in Liverpool that was as closely guarded as Bletchley Park.\n\nTuring\'s team had no input into how the information was to be used, but it is true that Ultra intelligence had to be supported by other information and so patrols were sent out to find what was known to be already there.\n\nLastly Turing would never, ever, have disclosed even the existence of Bletchley Park to a detective he had just met.\n\nThe performance of Benedict Comberbatch is exceptional, and the rest of the cast good. Keira Knightley is pretty enough to have turned even Turing, but, despite the lines that told us, she never gave the impression she had a double first in mathematics from Cambridge.\n\nGood film, though it could have be closer to reality without making it longer or more complex.', u'0.123286', u'It took a little over 24 hours before I weighed in on my official thoughts on Morten Tyldum\'s The Imitation Game from The Weinstein Company. My initial reaction upon leaving the screening room was it was astonishing, a magnificent achievement that stands tall as one of the year\'s best movies. As the film continues to settle within my cinematic soul, this very well could be the best film of the year, anchored by a career best performance from the amazing Benedict Cumberbatch. \n\nFull disclosure, I\'m fairly oblivious to European history and the heroes that had a hand in one of the deadliest wars in history. I\'ve heard the name Alan Turing from high school and college but either didn\'t care enough to learn or have no recollection of his contributions. Minutes following the screening, Amazon.com got $15.82 from my bank account in order to read "Alan Turing: The Enigma," the book in which screenwriter Graham Moore based the story upon. Telling the story of Alan Turing, a mathematician who in 1939 led a pioneer in cracking one of the most difficult codes in history. His contributions paved the way for essentially the way we exist now. However, Turing, who is a homosexual, has to wrestle with his secret in order to keep his status and his work years later.\n\nMasterfully told and encompassing an emotional complexity, Tyldum\'s film is both engrossing and disturbing. It has genius aspirations in which it wants to exist in the cinematic world. It\'s an impeccable thriller, taut and brilliant, exploring the horrors of war along with the choices that doom mankind for all eternity. Tyldum is methodical and precise in which he decides to unravel the story, Turing is one of the fallen heroes of our history and his story stands as one of the most tragic. Screenwriter Moore crafts a murky, dark, yet totally enjoyable spy film that stands taller than any James Bond film ever released. It\'s a sure-fire Oscar contender for several Academy Awards including Best Picture. They should feel so lucky to have the gumption to choose something this methodical and majestic.\n\nBenedict Cumberbatch continues to climb the ladder as one of the best actors working today. After impressive performances August: Osage County, 12 Years a Slave, and TV\'s "Sherlock," this is the role that will make him a bonafide movie star. Oscar-winner or not, this will be looked upon like the greats such as Gene Hackman in The French Connection or any legendary 70\'s movie that you love today. Cumberbatch hones in on all of Turing\'s character flaws and good qualities that make him a real person. He constructs him from the toes up, inflicting mannerisms and behaviors that all ring true. He stimulates all the sensual beats that keep us fixated on a performance. I can\'t help but go back to someone like Joaquin Phoenix in The Master, who delivered a construction of epic proportions. Though based on a real person, the talented Cumberbatch ignites his own masterpiece performance. He follows the demons of Turing down to his bones. Unsure, arrogant, and dismissive to the world around him, Turing shows only what he must, what he chooses, and every once in a while, we get a front seat to his soul. Thank you Cumberbatch.\n\nThe rest of the cast is completely on their game. It\'s probably a contender for the SAG Ensemble prize. Academy Award nominee Keira Knightley, as the feisty and fiery Joan Clark, is as loose and comfortable as I\'ve ever seen her. She wears Joan like an old coat from the back of the closet. Remembering it fondly and seeing that it fits just perfect. She has all the things that make up an Oscar nominee; a scene that will likely bring you to tears, plenty of scenes that play as the comic relief in a dark tale, and being simply charming in every part of the film. \n\nI don\'t know when it\'s going to happen but the world needs to make Matthew Goode a mega-star. In his brief time on-screen, Goode makes his mark, becoming essentially a co-anchor with Knightley of the supporting players, showcasing a reason to give this guy his own leading role sooner rather than later. As our resident sleazy authority figure, Charles Dance shows that he\'s still got it. Mark Strong and Allen Leech also deliver memorable, fascinating scenes, both getting an opportunity to shine.\n\nTechnical merits are no shortage of excellence on display. Oscar- winning Editor William Goldenberg (Argo) shows that tension is his second language. Cutting the film to perfection, and forcing your heart into throat, this espionage thriller succeeds for general audiences because of Goldenberg\'s efforts. It\'s something that anyone can seek out and get fully immersed into. Alexandre Desplat tacks another impressive composition to his already thick resume. With films like The Grand Budapest Hotel already in his arsenal, I assume this to be another Oscar citation in his future. Shot by the talented Oscar Faura, responsible for painting the canvas that was J.A. Bayona\'s The Impossible, he utilizes the standard brilliance of capturing a moment. Knows when to pull back and get close. Let\'s not forget the Production and Costume Design by Maria Djurkovic and Sammy Sheldon Differ. Those two will surely be mentioned for the rest of the film year.\n\nThe Imitation Game is assertive and makes a serious claim as one of the best spy thrillers ever made. There are sub plots that all resonate and never feel forced. This will not only keep your tension level at a fever pitch but could leave you in tears to walk home with. It\'s a complete realistic view at the spy game that stands as one of the best films of the year and a performance for the ages from Benedict Cumberbatch. A captivating achievement that I\'ll likely remember for some time.', u'0.421374', u'Truly excellent film and definitely Ocsar worthy material for both the film and the actors. The entire cast are amazing.\n\nAs Cumberbatch says near the start of the film "are you paying attention". You should pay attention, Alan Turing deserves your attention, his story deserves to be told.\n\nI went to see this at the London Film Festival last week and I am going to be one of the first ones in the cue to see it when it comes out next month. It is an excellently paced and executed script that has you gripped from beginning to end. The whole audience were laughing and applauding and crying in places, including the man next to me who had to borrow a hankie from his wife.\n\nThe film switches between the drive of the team of code breakers to solve the Enigma code, young Alan Turing and the events after the war that destroyed his life. \n\nIt is truly heartbreaking in places, and Benedict Cumberbatch\'s performance as Alan Turing is outstanding. He really deserves an Oscar nomination for his performance.\n\nIt has been a very, VERY long time since I enjoyed a film so much, that when I came out of the Cinema I wanted to turn right round and go back in and watch it again. A lovely script that had you switching back and forwards between tears and laughter.\n\nI know some wanted a more in depth and in detail look at Alan Turing\'s life and have commented frequently that this does no focus enough on his sexuality or the events after the war.\n\nIn this case I think less is more, this film highlights the man and the mind. It shows us the genius that was destroyed by a society that was seriously homophobic. It brings to life the man behind the facts and we laugh at his interactions with his fellow code breakers and cheer as he proves his theories and our hearts break as we watch him try to cope after his court case.\n\nOne of the best films I have seen in a long time. Go and see judge for yourself.', u'0.329035', u"Brilliant adaptation of the story of Bletchley Park and the cryptanalysis team, ran by Alan Turing, that cracked the code of the German Enigma Machine during World War II. Featuring an outstanding starring performance from Benedict Cumberbatch as war hero Turning and supporting acts from a brilliant cast including Keira Knightley, Charles Dance and Mark Strong, 'The Imitation Game' is a powerful and eminently well-made biopic that illuminates the facts whilst respecting the story it is based upon. The English-language debut of 'Headhunters' director Morten Tyldum, this British World War II thriller is a highly conventional story about humanity that creates a fascinating character, anchored by a hypnotically complex performance.", u'0.769895', u'Alan Turing, Mathematician, Logician, Wartime Codebreaker and father of Computer Science. A great British Hero. A great hero in the fight against prejudice.\n\nThis film tackles themes of prejudice against the feminine, against homosexuality and more generally against anyone who is different. How? By simply pointing out, using the example of Alan Turing and his colossal achievements, that it takes someone different to do something amazing.\n\nAnd an amazing story it is, packaged in a beautifully tight screenplay without a wasted scene, that keeps the audience fully engaged throughout. All the cast are on top form, in orbit around a stellar performance by Benedict Cumberbatch that layers humour, complexity, sexuality and the palpable frustration of a brilliant mind not quite able to communicate with his fellow humans.\n\nA film that depicts a man who perhaps fails the test he invented, that is now named after him. The Turing Test. Can he fool you that he is a real human being and not a super intelligent machine? The stress of playing that Imitation Game is set into every micro twitch of the central character.\n\nShould you go see it? No special effects. No interstellar spaceships. Why not wait for the download?\n\nGo see it! Because otherwise you would be missing the chance to see a most remarkable film, performed to perfection. A film about a story that matters, about events that changed history and simply about a man without whom you might not even be able to read this review on your Turing machine.', u'0.355645', u"I'll make my review short. Go see this. It has all the elements of a great movie from the acting to the score by Alexandre Desplat. Excellent script and delivery. It was well received at TIFF 14 where it was named People's Choice. The cast members really gelled on screen. It was well edited because the pace of the movie did not lag at any time. When watching this you will quickly realize that these actors (Benedict Cumberbatch, Keira Knightley, Matthew Goode, Mark Strong, Allen Leech) will be around for a long time entertaining us. If you like A Beautiful Mind or even Good Will Hunting, you will enjoy this. It comes out in November 2014. Don't miss it. This one is Oscar worthy.", u'0.422961', u'I am astonished at the rave reviews this film is getting and depressed at how many people will now go through life with their impression of Alan Turing and code breaking at Bletchley "informed" by this film.\n\nThe plot is drivel. If you take this film at face value you will leave believing that Turing was single-handedly responsible for just about everything at Bletchley including the original idea for the Bombe machine not to mention constructing it on his own in a barn, recruitment of staff, the first breaking of any Enigma traffic, the idea of using known words to crack messages, making strategic decisions about whether or not to save trans-Atlantic convoys and countless other things.\n\nMost of the film is just nonsense. There is no way that Turing would have been in a position to decide not to save the convoy (or even know that there was one to save). He wasn\'t responsible for the idea of using standard text in messages as ways into the Enigma settings (which had been done since before the war). The construction of the Bombe machines was a huge exercise involving a team of technicians and parts supplied by external manufacturers, not Turing wiring it up alone in a barn in his shirt-sleeves. It wasn\'t actually even his idea; the idea of using a machine was brought to him by Dilly Knox from pre-war ideas worked up by a Polish team. Nor could the machine spit out deciphered messages after a couple of minutes. Turing wasn\'t in charge either, he didn\'t come up with ideas of using crosswords to find recruits and he wasn\'t alone in writing to Churchill; several of them signed the letter. Oh yes, and there were several women code-breakers at Bletchley.\n\nThe screenplay is also riddled with anachronisms, which just add to the sense of "Oh this is ridiculous" throughout the film. No way would a well brought up young lady in the 1940s say "Oh my God!" three times in as many minutes. There are too many others to recall or mention.\n\nBenedict Cumberbatch and the rest of the cast are excellent in their roles with the material they are given (hence two stars rather than one) but that cannot save what is ultimately a very disappointing film.\n\nThis is not a biopic of Turing, which is how it is presented, but a nonsensical made up story tacked on to a heavy-handed political point about homosexuality, which we all got without the banner at the end.\n\nTwo hours I won\'t get back.', u'-0.612269', u'I went to see this movie at a screening. I have to admit, I went into this movie not knowing anything about Alan Turing and Enigma, but I love movies based on true events; especially those about the history of our country. \n\nDespite not knowing anything about Mr. Turing or the events of his life, as soon as I left the movie theater, I went home and looked him up and spent the next few hours learning of his life, everything he did for this country and the invention of what we now call \'the computer\'.\n\nI want to start by saying that Benedict Cumberbatch in this movie is outstanding. He plays Alan Turing perfectly; his accent, his movements and just the way he plays the character on screen is beautiful. I can honestly say that this is the performance of his career! \n\nThe movie focuses on different aspects of his life: it shows him and his team trying to break Enigma, it shows Young Turing during his time at boarding school, and the events after the war. \n\nThere\'s a quote at the beginning of the movie: "are you paying attention?". Throughout the movie, that\'s what I did. It\'s all that I could do because the story and the acting kept my eyes glued to the screen and I couldn\'t take them away. It\'s emotional, it\'s exciting and it is truly heartbreaking in some moments. It was a very comedic movie, too. There were some scenes that had me in fits of laughter and that\'s what makes it a beautiful script; despite the movie being based on the darkest days of World War 2, they added comedy into it which brought the movie alive. \n\nI remember getting home and after researching Alan\'s life, I wanted to go back to the cinema and watch the movie again. It\'s rarely that happens to me but when this comes out in November, I will be straight to the cinema and purchasing a ticket to watch it. \n\nI\'ve heard reviewers mentioning that this film doesn\'t focus enough on Turing\'s homosexuality. Now, be that as it may, it focus\' enough on the subject. Remember: this movie is about his mind, about the man himself. He was a genius! \n\nThis is the best British movie that I\'ve saw in a long time, and it\'s probably one of the best movies that I\'ve ever had the pleasure of watching, period. \n\nI would recommend going to watch this movie when it comes out because it will take you into the world of Mr. Turing and the struggles and successes he made in his short life.', u'0.266895', u"There is something appropriately mechanical about The Imitation Game. It has a theatrical rhythm and attention to detail that ticks like a clock. That's not to say that it's necessarily overly dry and hard to connect to, this biopic of the extraordinary and tragic mathematician and inventor of the digital computer, Alan Turing, played by Benedict Cumberbatch, is emotionally engaging and utterly endearing. With a slick exquisite script and an eclectic ensemble strong enough to deliver, it's an accessible film that although may feel familiar, is thoroughly refreshing, bringing laughter, tears and thrills. It will undeniably be a huge contender at the big awards this season, perhaps going all the way.\n\nDirector Morten Tyldum's film follows Turing's journey to break the Enigma Code, the form in which the Germans communicated during WWII to conduct surprise attacks. He attempts it by building the first computer, a passion project of his that was frequently criticized for devoting so much Government time and money. He deals with a social ineptitude while also accepting his own homosexuality, which lead to unforgivable persecution and depression that caused Turing to take his own life. The film focuses on his life achievements rather than his demise, though it does explore that part of his life, if not illustrate it as much as it could have done.\n\nIt's easy to root for Turing, even if his arrogance and standoffishness repel the other characters. Benedict Cumberbatch is a real crowd pleaser here. I've only seen him in short supporting roles such as last year's August: Osage County and 12 Years A Slave and I'm certainly quite impressed, if not quite as astounded. There's a very rehearsed quality about his performance, similar to Anne Hathaway's Oscar winning turn in Les Miserables. Every stutter and nuance feels perfectly placed rather than organic. But this isn't necessarily a turn off, it fits the tone of the film. He could go all the way to the Oscar but it depends on buzz and the competition.\n\nThe highlight of the film is the writing by Graham Moore, adapted from Andrew Hodges novel 'Alan Turing: The Enigma.' It's not groundbreaking, but it has the right ingredients and the perfect recipe. Even if somehow it's the only film's nomination, it's still a frontrunner for the win in Adapted Screenplay. This will be a film known for 'ticking boxes,' but it does it in a way that all films should. It's economical without ever feeling like it's rushing or only scratching the surface. It constantly pummels the characters with adversity, presenting heart-wrenching moral dilemmas, particularly for Keira Knightley's Joan Clarke. It turns something complicated and bleak quite lighthearted, especially with the casual approach to war outside of moments of justified despair.\n\nKnightley will certainly get awards attention for her fine supporting role as Turing's counterpart. Her role may not be as meaty, lacking the highs and lows Cumberbatch has, but she makes the most of her relative sparing use, becoming the heart of the film. Thanks to her, their relationship is completely believable, given that Turing is a man who struggles with connecting to people, and the way she manages the choices her character is set upon is dealt with deft conviction. Charles Dance, Mark Strong and especially Matthew Goode are commanding side presences who bolster the film's charm. The titular 'imitation game' is essentially the Replicant test from Blade Runner, something Turing has practiced on himself. However, all the characters are human here, if with a confidence you only find in the movies.\n\nInstead of a linear structure, the film chooses flashbacks to flesh out the full story of Turing. It does seem a little extraneous to go back to school with him, but fortunately the focus of their objectives and the performances of the young actors make them worthwhile, as well as showing the origin of something that changed the world as we know it. The scale is further expanded with newsreel footage and scenes of the world at war, even if the special effects are relatively primitive compared to what can be achieved these days though that doesn't hold the film back as such. It's very easy to get suckered into films that convince you that you're watching one man change the world and The Imitation Game achieves that effortlessly.\n\nAlthough it's dense in character and plot, The Imitation Game flashes more on the surface than it has to offer beneath. Kinetic energy in the editing brings an instant gratification, especially in the edge of your seat sequences. There are liberties with the tone for such a somber event and protagonist that most likely doesn't reflect the honest emotions involved, but obviously it's easier to digest for audience. I was unsure at first, but then it had me under its spell. This also may be Alexandre Desplat's best bet at finally winning an Oscar. It adds to that whimsical cinematic tone, almost reminiscent on his work on Harry Potter sans the magic. It will certainly be warmly embraced in the mainstream. The film is poignant, but not powerful. Entertaining, but not enlightening.\n\nI'm content calling this the Best Picture frontrunner until further notice. The film feels like a combination of Argo, with the secrets and the camaraderie of the unit, and The King's Speech, with its Britishness and charming partnerships. It depends whether the Academy fall for the ambition of Christopher Nolan's Interstellar or the Chariots of Fire + The Bridge on the River Kwai formula of Angelina Jolie's Unbroken. Either way, The Imitation Game will belong amongst the most deserving winners, but the test of time remains to be seen. It's not like it'll be alone in that group. Nevertheless, with Queen Elizabeth II's pardon for Turing last year, there's never been a better time to educate the masses on his legacy that we use everyday.\n\n8/10\n\nedit: guess it isn't. Oh well. Boyhood and Birdman are better anyway.", u'0.401358', u"A movie which oozes Britishness from every frame, The Imitation Game is an instant classic. Wartime Britain is depicted vividly, if a little caricatured, with an autumnal palette and a jaunty air.\n\nA true story, sympathetically told, with good performances all round and a stand-out Turing from the indefatigable Mr Cumberbatch. The young Turing is also extremely well realised by Alex Lawther.\n\nMeandering through Alan Turing's life since school until shortly before his death, the script demands your attention and regularly makes you smile.\n\nHighly recommended.", u'0.708014', u"Although well crafted and paced by good professionals in almost every sphere of film making, The Imitation Game is sadly reduced to a piece of populist pulp by the dominance of formulaic 'Hollywood' principles that entirely distort the key events and personnel involved.\n\nAlan Turing did not alone invent the code breaking machine seen in the film. He worked in a team headed by Dilly Knox, not even depicted in the film, who succeeded in breaking the code on 23 January 1940. Gordon Welchman, again not depicted in the film, later headed the military section that developed the 'Bombe' machine (called 'Christopher' in the film) albeit with Turing's help but not under his total dominance as suggested in this fiction.\n\nMoreover the 'Bombe' was not a computer as the film states. It was a mere calculator rather than a programmable digital machine. The first computer at Bletchly was developed years later under Max Newman when Tommy Flowers designed 'Collossus'. This film intensely distorts these events and is a disgraceful insult to those who actually did the work.\n\nWorse still the film completely misrepresents Joan Clarke who is depicted as a rather attractive crossword enthusiast recruited by Turing because she can solve puzzles faster than him. This was utter rubbish. Clarke, a 'plain Jane' type mathematician, was already employed at Bletchly when Turing arrived.\n\nEven Alan Turing himself is misrepresented in character. Eccentric he certainly was but the arrogance shown in the film has no real foundation. Moreover he was not uncomfortable with his sexuality or even the hormonal treatment he received as depicted at the end of the film. His friends report that he laughed about developing breasts that would increase his attractiveness to other men.\n\nBut the film, funded by the powers that are today, cannot even suggest the dreadful possibility that Turing's death was not the suicide so adamantly stated at the end. Turing was devoted to his mother (also never depicted in the film) and the concept of his suicide without leaving her a letter is inconceivable. He had been warned by MI6 only months before his death not to continue his homosexual lifestyle (they were paranoid after the Burgess-Maclean saga) but he continued to visit Greece where he openly took up with gay men. Entirely happy only a few days before we are told that he then took his own life whilst eating an apple. His family and friends maintain the real chance that he was expediently removed by MI6 as a security risk. And poisoning food with cyanide was then a well used technique in security circles for such requirements.\n\nWhen a film depicts a Cambridge Professor of Mathematics attacking a machine with a heavy spanner because it is not working fast enough, when a film repeats the single memorable line about unimaginable people doing the unimaginable three times in 30 minutes, when a film states that the central character had the power to decide 'who was to live and who was to die' (again a total nonsense because how the code was used was decided at top Cabinet level and not by the code breakers at all) when such rubbish is presented alongside a string of historical distortions you will know that is essentially rubbish and a waste of time to watch.\n\nAnd Benedict Cumberbatch's performance, though competent, was too reminiscent of Derek Jacobi's famous BBC2 portrayal in places to be thought of as original. Timothy Spall as Mr. Turner was not even Oscar nominated for his excellent portrayal but Cumberbatch has been included to expand the Turing myth. Thank God Eddy Redmayne is there to take the prize for his staggering performance as Steven Hawking.", u'-0.227957', u"It is a shame this movie is a stack of lies.First time polish broke enigma it was in 1932, 1933 they created first working example of Enigma, and first anti-enigma device, narrowing settings combination to 105 456. In 1936 Germans changed the design, and Polish answered with Rejewsky bomb, machine with 6 enigma connected together,breaking new daily code in 2 hours.Another German changes required building 54 different machine designs, and Poland didn't have enough money so they asked allies to help.July 1939 Uk and French representatives visited Warsaw and got all documentation how to break ENIGMA.After beginning of the war, polish encoders moved to Paris, and British started Bletchley Park operation. Unfortunately, Polish people are always forgotten, because they are not part of US/UK/France/Germany nation.Shame on you Britain.", u'-0.475873', u"This is THE movie for anyone who wants to learn about the birth of all modern computing and cryptography. It also provides a deep commentary on the ignorance of people who hate those who do not fit in. I wish the film could have gone into more detail about Alan Turing after the war when his deepest personal struggles were in full force. However, for a theatrical film it would have been far too long. This film illustrates how far we have come as a society in terms of accepting gay and lesbians and their contributions to society. I will not spoil the film but for the cypherpunks out there you will be a little uneasy if you compare the MI-6 tactics to those of today's NSA and other three letter agencies that spy on our every digital move. All in all a brilliant film with great actors that will move your hearts and minds.", u'-0.137492', u"While it is a moderately decent film on a noble subject matter, I never felt thrilled, moved or otherwise captivated in a way that deserves over the top praise from other reviewers in my humble opinion.\n\nI felt that many opportunities to create dramatic tension and stunning photography were thrown away as a result of the insertion of ill-fitting material (black and white footage of Hitler? really?) and poor script and acting (Keira is bland as vanilla I am afraid to say).\n\nIt wasn't all bad. Translating the challenge of cryptanalysis into film is a challenge which I think was valiantly attempted, though excessively dumbed down.\n\nA number of sub-plots are introduced in different time frames, one in Turing's childhood and one after the war. Sadly they fail to deliver any meaningful drama, again as a result of mediocre writing. If anything they are distracting and defuse any tension that might have built up in the scenes that precede them. As such, the editing did feel amateurish. The ending was extremely disappointing: why use lines of text to depict that which can be shown instead? \n\nFinally there is a rather out of place scene with a barely disguised and hypocritical feminist agenda. I say that because that particular scene was fictional and never happened in reality, so its existence can only be justified by such an agenda. I refer to the moment Keira Knightly attempts to sit an exam to join Turing's code breakers' team. An incredulous usher, convinced she is present for a job interview as a secretary instead (because the evil patriarchy couldn't possibly contemplate she is as capable as men - see how subtle that was? wow) refuses her entry until our hero Turing intervenes and allows her in. \n\nWe are also told this female character has a double first in mathematics from Cambridge. If wartime Britain was so sexist, why does she hold such a distinguished degree? And if sexism is so evil, then why fall does the script fall in the trap of using her as an emotional element in the story but glosses over the contribution her brilliant mind made to Turing's efforts? Now THAT my friends, is sexist and the film could have done without this ridiculous and off-topic political manifesto. It was the final nail in the coffin as far as I was concerned.\n\nI shall not watch this again, however I do fancy reading a biography of Alan Turing, maybe something the film can take credit for.", u'-0.467491', u"This is a good enough movie, but skirts around the true story in order to make a clunky point about a genius hounded to death for his homosexuality. The plot is simple. Britain is losing the war and desperately needs something to have a chance of survival. Cracking Nazi codes to stop attacks at sea and in the air might just tip the balance. Step forward the secret decoding establishment at Bletchley Park, where expert mathematicians and linguists are recruited to try and break the famous codes sent via the German Enigma machines. And step forward one Alan Turing of Cambridge University, resident if gay genius played by Benedict Cumberbatch. To break the codes apparently Turing invents a machine to do this. Of course, this is all nonsense -the Poles had built machines previously to do this work and had broken Enigma, but with increasing sophistication they no longer had the resources so handed over their work to the British, along with a captured Enigma machine from the Wehrmacht. So tension mounts as Turing uses tons of money on a new (sic) totally innovative machine which does not seem to be quick enough. On the way an overly attractive Joan Clark (played by Keira Knightley), a double first, helps out and gets engaged to Turing, while silly old Commander Dennison played by Charles Dance tries to close down the machine!!!!! Eventually a chance remark and a realisation of something bleedin' obvious puts Turing and co on the right track. Just time for - we must not use all information or Jerry will know we have broken his codes, so little chat about who is saved and who isn't, which is pretty peripheral, before getting to the climax where Turing is chemically castrated by an unfeeling and totally ungrateful country. The thriller elements are okay, but Turing can do no wrong except tell Clark to leave Bletchley, which gets short feminist shrift! Oh dear, the script cannot help itself from being so terribly 21st century liberal in its preachy parts. A pity some other unsung heroes like Tommy Flowers and the Poles do not get a mention! The acting is fine all round, the direction serviceable, and it works at its own level, but the one man band tub thumping with Cumberbatch twitching and not looking directly at people (obvious Oscar material like 'Rain Man') really does a disservice to the great team effort of the wartime code breakers. Remember, an even more advanced, valve-based machine for breaking codes was developed with little participation from Turing by a working class GPO man - Tommy Flowers, who used his own money to finance it. Hope his story is not overlooked just because he was straightforwardly normal!", u'-0.413349'], u'tt1220719': [u"Donnie Yen is a long time favorite of mine, although this is mainly due to his martial arts skills and screen presence rather than his acting skills. In Ip Man (or Ye Wen, as they were shouting in the seats next to mine) he delivers a truly solid performance on the acting side, carrying the burden of a nation on his shoulders with gravitas, at least that's what he conveyed to the audience at the cinema. They were actually applauding at times. Then again, moviegoers might be more absorbed over here on a regular basis. I digress.\n\nI'm not going to delve deeper into plot details. The basic stuff is already outlined above, and I also feel the historical accuracy of certain events depicted can be debated. That's a bit of a moot point, though, since most people will watch this for the action scenes. Nobody will be disappointed. Donnie kicks twelve kinds of ass in this movie, and it is all accompanied by some of the meanest sound design I've ever heard. Every one of his rapid punches can be felt as he pummels the poor bastards in his way with the Ip Man-style of martial arts (imdb won't let me spell out the name for some reason). The final bout is epic,but for me it was one scene about halfway through that got my heart beating faster. It involves Donnie, ten Japanese karate practitioners and some of the most furious fighting I've ever seen on screen. You can really sense the anger of his character in this scene. Great stuff.\n\nThe film moves forward at a brisk pace and contains a surprisingly large amount of fight scenes. It totally lacks the vintage over-the-top-aesthetics of Donnie Yen's films of the 80's and 90's, but for some people that's a good thing. I personally think this is his finest performance to date. \n\nHighly recommended for fans of martial arts cinema!", u'0.133155', u'No wonder Ip Chun (Ip Man\'s son, consultant to this movie) was so pleased-- from the twinkle in his eyes to the lifting of his feet, Donnie Yen inhabits this movie like he is possessed by Ip Man. And as Ip Man himself explains early in the movie: "the key is the person."\n\nRevolving around the central (true) event of Ip Man rejecting the Japanese\'s "request" to train their soldiers when they occupied China and eventually sparring with them, this is essentially a genre movie built around the martial arts set-piece (Wing Chun vs Karate, see the trailer) "exploding" mid-way through.\n\nAnd what a movie they have built up around their central show-piece! Taking on the common martial arts/Kung Fu Movie theme of "what can one martial artist do against a turbulent world/time?" (one of the movie\'s promotional tag-lines), the story "hook" is not whether Ip Man will win-- but rather when he will be forced to fight and what would happen when he does. And the notable level of acting, scripting, production, etc. --highlighting not only Ip Man but also the plight of his family, friends and townsmen-- really ramps up the drama and "heart" for audiences who might not care for the genre. One evidence for this is how "Ip Man" garnered 12 nominations for the 2009 HK Film Awards in both the acting/directing and technical categories-- though it really stands out as a killer Kung-Fu Film, and consequently won for Best Action Director and Best Film.\n\nIn short, "Ip Man" is quite a good ("mainstream") movie-- but a great martial arts/Kung Fu (not "action", as Donnie Yen points out during interviews) movie. And some telling numbers explain why:\n\nThere are around 12 fights or so (depending on how you count them) evenly spaced throughout the film, with Donnie Yen in almost half of them-- with 3 or so weapon fights (not counting guns) and 5 or so group fights (anything with more than 2 people)-- which is why this is a martial arts movie, and not an "action" movie (no explosions, chases, shoot-outs, etc.). The shortest fight takes about 10 seconds and his longest runs around 2 minutes-- which gels with Donnie Yen\'s belief that real people fight to win and don\'t "pose, talk, fight, run, and... pose, talk, fight, run and...". Together with the miscellaneous violence (guns, etc.), the audience is virtually given an "adrenaline shot" every 5 minutes or so to give audiences something to laugh, cry or even cheer about.\n\nOf course, it also inspired in me a new-found respect for Wing Chun (Ip Man\'s school of martial arts)-- as well as action director Sammo Hung\'s "tight" choreography and camera-work (in China/HK, action directors control the camera as well as direct the actors). The close-to-mid range shots make it easier to "catch" the stunt doubles... but just like everything else in the movie-- blink and you\'ll miss it!\n\nFor much like Wing Chun, everything in this movie get to the point quickly-- so that at over 100 minutes, the movie feels much too short.... But thank you, Wilson Yip (the director), for respecting the audience and not belaboring the "message"-- for a movie that is basically a war/ nationalist melodrama, it manages to unfold as elegantly as Ip Man\'s character (& Donnie Yen\'s acting).\n\nBut for those who care about the "downside": this movie is only loosely "based on" Ip Man\'s life-- in that the earlier parts is a dramatization of various accounts, the middle section is highly exaggerated (1-to-1 vs many-to-1 sparring), and the end is completely fictional (read: lead to an end-fight). And as a "World War II side-story" about a simple people in a small place (Foshan, China), there are only a few lines of text and transitional scenes depicting the Japanese invasion/occupation of Foshan (the director didn\'t have the budget to show how Foshan lost 3/4 of its population)-- though it manages to be quite effective, especially for those already familiar with the history. But those craving more creativity, complexity or completeness in this movie will be disappointed-- especially by the rather haphazard way the movie "wraps up" Ip Man\'s life at the end (when it wasn\'t certain whether/how a sequel would be made).\n\nWhatever the quibble, "Ip Man" heralds a break-though in realism for "grounded" martial arts/ Wushu movies; the way "Crouching Tiger, Hidden Dragon" heralded a break-through in surrealism for "floating" martial arts/Wuxia movies. It is clearly made for fans of Wing Chun and Kung Fu Movies-- and it makes no apologies for that (thank goodness for no "foreign" investors-- though it means that this movie is unlikely to get foreign distribution).', u'-0.157444', u"I shall now proclaim unabashedly that I absolutely love this movie! It's been some time since we last saw a biopic on one of the Chinese's martial arts folk heroes, with Jet Li's Fearless being the last memorable one to hit the big screen. While Li lays claim to three of such roles in the iconic Wong Fei Hung (in the Tsui Hark movies), Fong Sai Yuk and Huo Yuan Jia in Fearless, after which he felt he had to hang up his martial arts roles because he thought that he had communicated all that he wanted about martial arts through these films. And thank goodness for Donnie Yen still being around to pick up from where the genre left off, and presenting a memorable role which he truly owned, with Ip Man being the first cinematic rendition of the Wing Chun martial arts grandmaster.\n\nIn this bio-pic, Ip Man, one of the earliest Wing Chun martial arts exponents credited to have propagated its popularity, gets portrayed as the best of the best in 1930s Fo Shan, China, where the bustling city has its own Martial Arts Street where countless of martial arts schools have set up shop to fuel the craze of kung fu training. With each new school, the master will pay their respects to Ip Man and to challenge him to a duel. Ip Man, an aristocrat who spends most of his quality time developing and perfecting his brand of martial arts, will take them on behind closed doors, so as not to damage his opponents' reputation nor embarrass them in public. His humility is his virtue, and his style is never violent or aggressive, which often gets assumed and mistaken for being effeminate, since Wing Chun after all was founded by a woman.\n\nThe bulk of the story gets set in the outbreak of the Sino-Japanese war, and it's not all fight and no story. Witth this historical setting, at times it does seem that there is an air of familiarity with the type of stories told, with how the Japanese Imperial Army had made life really miserable for the Chinese, and how the Chinese being fragmented in spirit, fail to unite during dire straits. More often than note, martial arts become a unifying force, and this aspect of the narrative might seem to be a walk in the usual territory. \n\nBut with its array of charismatic supporting cast with the likes of Simon Yam as Ip Man's best friend and industrialist Quan, and Lam Ka Tung as a cop turned translator, there are little nicely put sub plots which seek to expand the air of respect that Ip Man commands amongst his community. The story by Edmond Wong did not demonize all the villains, often adding a dash of empathy and sympathy to the likes of the Japanese General Miura (Hiroyuki Ikeuchi), a highly skilled exponent from the North called Zhao (Fan Siu Wong) as well as Lam's translator character who is deemed as a traitor for being in the service of the Japanese. Ip Man the family man also gets put under the spotlight, where his passion could sometimes leave him neglecting his wife and kid, and through the course of the story this focus often leaves one quite exasperated for his family's safety as he puts his countrymen above self and family when going up against the oppressive Japanese forces.\n\nSo what's the verdict on the action? Action junkies won't have to wait too long before watching Ip Man in action, and to Sammo Hung and Tony Leung Siu Hung's credit, they have intricately designed some of the most varied martial arts sequences in the movie, such as private fights in his home, a factory m\xeal\xe9e, a Japanese dojo battle as seen in the trailer, (which I know has actually sent some positive vibes amongst moviegoers, mouth agape at that incredible scene of Yen continuously beating down a karateka) being somewhat of a throwback and reminiscent of Bruce Lee in Fists of Fury, and a ringside duel amongst others. And it's not just Ip Man who gets in on the action, but specialized martial arts moves designed for the various practitioners as well. It's so difficult to name any particular one as a personal favorite, though I must add that you definitely won't feel short changed by the time the inevitable final battle comes rolling along and gets delivered with aplomb.\n\nI'm no Wing Chun practitioner, but Donnie Yen has this marvelous calm and zen like approach with his Ip Man taking out his opponents quite effectively with the minimal of moves. Like Huo Yuan Jia, he doesn't deliver the killing blows to friendly opponents, but rather simulates the various hit points, which actually calls for some astonishing control of strength and precision. This approach will change of course as the opponents become anything but friendly. And unlike the usual martial arts stance of crouching low, here we see him standing tall and striking with such precision and efficiency, it's like poetry in motion with some astounding closed quarter combat utilizing plenty of upper limb strength. \n\nWith Wong Kar-wai at one point also declaring interest in making a Ip Man movie, I thought that this effort will be hard to beat, just like how Tsui Hark has crafted some of the more definitive movies in modern times about Wong Fei Hung and Jet Li benefiting from a major career boost, I'd say Ip Man just about cements Yen's reputation as a martial arts leading man, which I guess the cinematic world these days severely lacks. This has to go down in my books as one of my favorite movies of the year, and I'm already setting some money aside to get the best available edition of the DVD when it gets released. Highly recommended, so make a beeline for the box office now!", u'0.322095', u"This is Donnie Yen's best acting piece for awhile now, and he still delivers the action sequences brilliantly. At 44 years of age, he looks so energetic, confident and charismatic. I believe the combination of Yen, Sammo Hung and Wilson Yip is the right choice for this particular film and fighting style. Wing Chun is best depicted without the flamboyant ballet of acrobatics often seen in other wushu films.\n\nThe movie doesn't dwell on historical accuracy, but rather use that settings to set the mood, deliver the message and simply tells you the life journey of a Grandmaster in an fun and entertaining way.\n\nI remember that Richard Attenborough said (regarding Gandhi) that there was no way a director/movie maker could encompass and depict a person's life journey in only a 2 or 3-hour movie. But rather one should aim to emulate the spirit of that person, and the message/lesson of his story. I think this movie does that, with a quality production that raised the bar for period drama.\n\nMy rating is missing 1 point because I feel that there were plot devices that had been done-to-death before in other movies like: Fists of Fury, Fearless, Kill Bill, etc. However, Yip Man simply turns the notch to a higher sound-beating level.\n\nDon't miss this on the big screen!", u'0.357486', u"Excellent direction, photography and set design enliven this account of Wing Chun instructor Yip Man's life before he moved to Hong Kong. Every Wing Chun instructor today tries to make a lineage connection to Yip Man to legitimize their teaching so he is a very important figure in Kung Fu. Donnie Yen portrays the master with intense reserve and is possibly the best acting in his career. It surprised me for sure.\n\nThe story line of this film is invented as historical accounts show Yip Man to have been a police officer in the time frame this film covers, not staying at home and only practicing kung fu as depicted here. Also the film claims that he refused to teach anybody but that is also not true. He left for Hong Kong a few years after WW2 not in the middle of it as this film presents. The plot with the Japanese army seems invented although they did ask him to teach the troops which he refused. \n\nHowever the film muddies up the historical record, that is not to say it isn't a great film. Sammo Hung's choreography is exceptional and a throwback to his great kung fu films of the early 1980's. The martial arts are done with great respect to traditional styles although some wire work is used to assist the actors with the difficult acrobatic moves. No flying across the room in this film. \n\nAlthough the ending is a little abrupt, this is one kung fu film that can be recommended to people who don't like these films. Highly recommended.", u'0.36761', u"Ip Man has quenched our thirst of a real good martial art movie where we don't just watch man kicking asses but where we can appreciate the man's moral and virtues.\n\nThe movie flows well, from the view of the kungfu street of Fo Shan, to the introduction of Ip Man, and so on. Scene by scene are there in a well done play, and when someone had to display martial art act, they don't just throw bunch of minions out from nowhere to have him beating them all over. I think the scenario is well written.\n\nFight choreography is great. Different approach from what we usually see, people doing flashy flying kicks and sorts; since it is about wing chun, feet hardly ever leave the ground but it doesn't decrease the beauty and flashiness of the fights.\n\nPeople may complain about bits that might not fit the real condition of those era. Well, I think producers have to make sure they made entertaining movies, not documentaries.\n\nLast words, Donnie Yuen has always been a good martial art actor, he just never get the spotlight. And finally as Ip Man he gets to stand on where he deserves.", u'0.201389', u"Ip Man is very touching and full of mildness,considering it's an action movie. Wisedom, courage, elegance, humour...all the mixed elements you surely will feel from Ip man and they will definitely move you. All actors have done a great job. I believe this is the best movie that Zhen Zidan has ever contributed. This time he is not only a warrior, but also a wise, gentle, and conscientious man, a good husband. People clapped hands and weeped from time to time. I have watched it for two times,and longing for the third time when the DVD is coming. You know, Ip Man did not ballyhoo before it is shown, but it undoubtedly becomes a huge dark horse. It is really worthy of watching it.", u'0.448461', u'Forget "Flashpoint". "Ip Man" shows Donnie Yen at his brutal best. Telling the story of Yip Man, the man believed to have popularized the martial art of Wing Chun, before and mostly during the Sino-Japanese war.\n\nYen caught my attention after seeing him in "SPL". Then in "Flashpoint", I was stunned by his moves, and thought he was the next Jet Li. Well, after this I think he may very well be the next Bruce Lee. I mean it! Not only injecting humanity and superb characterization, Yen also demonstrates his brutality when it comes to fighting. And boy, it does not get more brutal than this! Seriously, Yen\'s fists move like machine gun bullets. And he makes sure that his opponents are down for the count... at their expense, and our enjoyment. Definitely Yen at his bruising best.\n\nOther actors worth mentioning, Simon Yam and Hiroyuki Ikeuchi as Ip Man\'s business partner/friend and the Japanese General respectively. The former portrays Ip Man\'s comrade with heart, while the latter performs with steely resolve and honor. This is a film that is not just made with action, but a good story as well.\n\nThe fight scenes here are arguably Yen\'s best so far, and the best in over a decade. People are getting beaten, martial arts duels are taking place, and blood is spilled. This is not an action movie, it\'s a kung fu movie. And it shows. Legendary kung fu star Sammo Hung brilliantly choreographs the fight scenes to perfection, and it looks like he\'s not going to slow down any time soon. The direction by Wilson Yip is slick and gripping as always, and he also gives the film a nice sepia tone to give feeling to the film.\n\nIn short, great. This is a must-see for kung fu film fans to get their adrenal glands pumping. It\'s one of the best kung fu films of the decade. See it if you have the chance.\n\nOverall: 7/10', u'0.355459', u"Ip Man (1893-1972) is the expert in the Wushu fighting style of Wing Chun, and is the master of the famous Bruce Lee. As there has never been any previous film record of Ip Man, this film produced by Raymond Wong and directed by Wilson Yip will be the very first.\n\nThe movie opens and dates back to 1935 Foshan, with the city bustling with activities and various schools of martial arts are seen busy with the practice of their craft. In the people's mind however there would be only one martial artist who is the best. He however would have no interest in opening a school to teach his art. He is Ip Man, played by Hong Kong action star Donnie Yen.\n\nOur introduction to Ip Man began on the day when Master Liu (Chen Zhi-Hui) visits Ip Man at his residence when the latter is having dinner with his wife and son. Being the typical martial arts enthusiast that Master Liu is, he declined to leave when advised by Ip Man to come back at another time, choosing instead to stay and wait until Ip Man have finished his dinner. He is eager to test his skills against Master Ip Man. The mood here is not of hostility but of a light hearted and humorous fashion. Ip Man even invited Master Liu to sit and have dinner with his family when he spots him restlessly waiting by the living room. We see here the humble and modest character of the protagonist.\n\nWhen the sparring finally got underway, it ended as swiftly as Ip Man's strokes suggest. Because in three strokes and a set of quick fists, he had Master Liu at his peril, well defeated yet without injury, as this was all but a friendly exchange in the spirit of martial arts. The essence of Ip Man's fighting style, Wing Chun, is characterized by its tall narrow stance with effectiveness demonstrated through speed and power. It reminds of the time when Bruce Lee had to slow his punches down during filming, as they were just too fast for the cameras back then to capture.\n\nIn the world of martial arts, with all its attractiveness, it also brings with it the competitive nature of those who practice them. With competitiveness taken the wrong way, things can go awfully wrong when all one wants to achieve is to have the other beaten so as to prove who the superior fighter is. A thug in Kam Shan-chau (Fan Sui-Wong) later arrives and challenges the various schools, defeating their masters ruthlessly, until he came face to face with Ip Man. Kam lost to Ip Man with a lesson he ought to have learn, only that he did not and left Foshan with only disgrace in his mind. The people celebrate as they hail Ip Man the savior who brought glory to Foshan by sending the thug away.\n\nThe fight ends but the story have only just began, and with it a change of mood from lightness to heavy because war has broken. The Japanese have seized Foshan.\n\nWhat follows will be Ip Man's struggles and challenges as he has to make ends meet for his family in the dreadful time of adversity. It is here we see the true character of Ip Man, who has captured the hearts of the people of Foshan and their respect. This is most notable among his friends in Chow Ching-chuen (Simon Yam), his son Chow Kong-yiu (Calvin Cheng), and Crazy Lam (Xing Yu).\n\nTo mistake this film, as one of just good versus evil is easy because in a movie that has a hero, there must be a villain. There are a few characters here befitting of the role. We have the Japanese general, Miura (Hiroyuki Ikeuchi). We have the aforementioned thug, Kam Shan-chau. We also have police officer turned interpreter, Li Chiu (Lam Ka-tung) who appears to be a traitor. The film here however should not to be seen as a fight against evil but rather of the depiction of humanistic values that Ip Man himself would possess.\n\nThere are many meaningful messages encrypted in the various plots and subplots in this wonderful film that really is about virtues more than anything else. As producer Raymond Wong would suggest on why the production team had chosen to make this film, it is that of really making a kung fu movie that is authentic and real, moving away from past attempts at glorifying and stylizing violence on screen. The intention is to make a film that would reflect the spirit of Chinese kung fu, and what better than to portray it through the virtuous character of Master Ip Man.\n\nI would have like to compare this film to Fearless aka Huo Yuan Jia (2006), starring Jet Li, which strings from a similar root, but at the very core, the approach is different. While Fearless is written in a more dramatic nature, with a more compelling story and edited with a creative dimension, Ip Man is honest and direct because that is who our protagonist is.\n\nWhat stood out for me in Ip Man is when he ponders in introspection about what use his training and expertise in Wing Chun all his years would come to. It would appear that there is destiny waiting to be fulfilled. And he would also influence those around him with what he has and even lead those who have been wrong to do right despite the pressure of circumstances, because to the very basis, it is the right thing to do in humanity.\n\nHistory means nothing if its lessons are not learned.\n\nThe film also stars the stunning Xiong Dai Lin as Cheung Wing-sing, Ip Man's wife, and I must also not forget to mention that the acclaimed Sammo Hung directs the action.", u'0.299219', u"I had a choice of watching The Spirit or Ip Man. It is a tough decision and after a long while, I finally makes the choice of watching Ip Man. The director of Dragon Tiger Gate makes his comeback with his usual star, Donnie Yen. As expected, the martial arts fighting scenes are amazing. This director is amazing, he knows how to direct realistic martial arts fighting features in Dragon Tiger Gate. This guy can create, I can say, some of best martial arts movies.\n\nThe story: It tells about Ip Man's life, the soon-to-be master of the famous Bruce Lee. I can't say much about the plot but the fighting and the music are great. The Japanese soon attacks China which affects Ip Man and his family. Soon, he goes for a fight, organised by the Japanese, which can earn him rice. The Japanese General is impressed by his ability which leads to the final battle of all. It is fast paced with amazing fights in between and humour.\n\nOverall: If you are a martial arts movie fan, this is definitely stunning and not to be missed. If you get entertained by any form of action and want to know the facts of Bruce Lee's master, this should also not be missed. Another good martial arts movie.", u'0.328306', u"Even without knowing too much about the historical Yip Man who was Bruce Lee's master, it's quite evident that we see Donnie Yen more in the role of a conventional Chinese hero here than in the one of a historical person. At the very beginning he is introduced as the noble saver of the honor of the city who is neither interested in money nor profit. Why should he - he owns the largest crib in town. But how he can afford it is a bit nebulous, if the only thing he really masters is Wing Chun. A powerful fighting style which he refuses to teach anybody by the way. So where does the money come from? We'll never know. Anyway it's no wonder that later when the Japanese army invades China and everybody suffers from hunger and desperation, he prefers to work in a coal mine than in his friend's wool factory which he, involuntary, owns to 10%.\n\nThe circle closes with him as the altruistic saver of the Chinese people's honor and the honor of Chinese fighting skills which are much better than the Japanese ones, of course. This integrity is drawn through the hole movie and leads to a very boring character and a pretty black and white good guys/bad guys scheme. Our hero never really has to struggle with himself and most of the time Donnie Yen looks like he doesn't know what to do with himself. Except for the fighting sequences which are well edited and pleasingly violent.\n\nWell, the Japanese are stupidly and exaggerated portrayed as ruthless killers and omnipresent threat, but still Ip Man contains some really nice martial arts sequences and Sing-Pui O did solid work as cinematographer. If you've liked the fighting styles of Ong Bak and Unleashed, go for it, but don't expect too see the story of Bruce Lee's master. This one borrows just his name and turns it into a", u'-0.0579407', u"IP MAN is one of those patriotic - jingoistic even - films about historical Chinese defeats which create a fictional tournament in which an underdog Chinese can symbolically defeat foreigners using martial arts, thereby restoring Chinese honour. This time it's Ip Man, the trainer of Bruce Lee, who takes on northern bandits and the invading Japanese in 1930s China. The story is predictable but that's the norm for martial arts flicks. What sinks this one is just how perfect Ip Man is. He's so great that even though the fights feature admirable technique by Donnie Yen, they're drama free because the outcome is never in doubt. Similarly, nothing shakes the man, leading to the glorious moment when he announces to his wife, who is dying of starvation after the Japanese stole their house, that he will get a job -- did this not occur to him earlier? To add insult to injury, it ends with a text crawl which tries to claim that the Japanese defeat in 1945 was due to the Chinese (because Ip Man inspired them) which is as shameless as it is ahistorical.", u'-0.346727', u'I\'ll start with the martial art aspect. The Wing Chun style is not the best material for popular action movies. Its characteristic is motion efficiency: lighting fast movements and direct strikes, an approach that inspired Bruce Lee in the creation of his own style. While deadly effective, Wing Chun is not very exciting to watch. Furthermore, its kicks are low profile (both literally and figuratively), not the flying kicks that have become almost mandatory for today\'s popular kung-fu flicks. "Ip Man"\'s portrayal of this martial art style is quite authentic, granting a certain creative liberty for cinematic effects, understandably. Immensely satisfying for someone whose has some experience (albeit modest) with this style, such as this IMDb user, this movie may not satisfy those who are used to the usual Jet Li, Wu Jing (or indeed Donnie Yen) stuff.\n\n"Ip Man", however, is much more than an action movie. Like "Fearless" (2006), it is the biopic of a great martial art master. Interestingly (and this parallel has just occurred to me as I write), its riches-to-rags plot line has some similarity to "Cinderella Man" (2005). But it has a loftier backdrop \x96 survival with pride, compassion and dignity under the atrocities of Japan\'s occupation of Southern China during WW II.\n\nThe action scenes can be grouped into three segments which also serve to outline the story. The first group occurs during a time when Master Ip, bathing in affluence, leads a low-profile life with his family (lovely wife and little boy), basically doing nothing other than perfecting the love of his life, the Wing Chun style martial art. The fights, fuelled by challengers (both local and outsiders), take place behind closed doors in his plush house so that the invariably beaten challengers are not embarrassed. The second arena is the factory of a life-long friend (Simon Yam), when he trains the workers to defend themselves against bullies, and later gets involved himself in helping them to beat off harassing goons. By this time, he has been reduced to abject poverty (house and possession confiscated by the occupying Japanese), working as a coal miner. The last group of fights is set at the barracks of a Japanese general who, being a martial art fanatic, offers sacks of rice to lure coal miners who are ex-martial-art experts to duels with his people and himself. As expected, the climatic final duel is between Master Ip and this general.\n\nUnlike in many other good-against-evil movies, "Ip Man" does not succumb to handing out one-dimensional villains. Policeman-turned-interpreter Li Chiu\'s (Lam Ka Tung) agonized scream that he is not a traitor but just an interpreter struggling to survive does get a degree of sympathy. A bullying goon\'s outburst that he does not want to go hungry virtually echoes Scarlet O\'Hara. Even the Japanese general is portrayed more as a martial arts fanatic than a blood-thirty villain.\n\nIn "Ip Man" is a Donnie Yen that you have never seen before and it is not surprising that many consider this to be Yen\'s best cinematic performance to-date. From the quietly confident, gentle man who wants to avoid trouble, to the impoverished husband-and-father finding himself suddenly quite useless but rising to the occasion, to the fighter enraged by the senseless death of his martial art friends \x96 Yen is right on pitch. In an interview ("bc Magazine" of Hong Kong), 85-year-old Ip Chun, who is Master Ip\'s little son in the movie, asserts that Yen\'s performance finds the essence of his father. Yen\'s portrayal of Master Ip is indeed a source of pride to Wing Chun students all over the world.', u'0.123682', u'Oh man what a great movie, Just seen it and im stunned. This moves up to my number 5 top list of greatest Martial Arts movies ever. Ip Man was a great man in Chinese history and i can see why. This movie is so well directed and Donnie Yen suits great as a young Ip Man. Its so dramatic at times, you start sniffing your nose and gets sad and angry at the same time. Awesome movie which will be a true classic instantly. I Bought the two disc HK Special Edition and i will see the extras later today cause i will go to sleep now, if i can sleep. Cant wait for part 2. See this film in theaters or on DVD as soon as you can, you will not be disappointed. Kung Fu cinema is back and what a comeback. WOW!!', u'0.330044', u'I\'ve never been a huge fan of martial art movies, mostly because they rarely combine the good story with good fighting. I did however like "Crouching Tiger, Hidden Dragon" back when it came despite it\'s aerial theme and fairytale ways, because it told a great story in a good way true to it\'s universe.\n\n"Ip Man" is a great story with the more realistic and human fights, and serves as a counter to "Crouching Tiger, Hidden Dragon". The one common thing is both tell their story with heart and delivers a cinematic experience you\'ll remember.\n\nHighly recommended and a must watch movie in my book.', u'0.693513'], u'tt0101414': [u'Beauty and the Beast is without a doubt one of Disney\'s finest classics. The first animated film to ever be nominated for best picture and after you see it, you could understand and agree with it\'s nomination. Beauty and the Beast is going to be one of those films that will always be remembered, I know that it\'s a movie that I will show my children one day. It has unbelievably terrific animation, a beautiful story, lovable characters, and is just over all a perfect movie. I really love this film so much, I don\'t think anyone couldn\'t fall in love with it.\n\nBell is just a simple girl in her town in France, she reads books constantly and her father is an inventor. They are sort of the outcasts of their town due to their "oddness". But Bell is being pursued by the town hunk, Gueston, simply because she\'s the one girl he cannot have. One day when her father\'s inventions are about to be displayed at the fair, he gets lost in the woods and stumbles across a castle and is held prisoner. Bell goes after him and comes to the castle; it turns out that her father is being held by a beast who is cursed with this hideousness unless he finds a true love before a rose he has welts. Bell trades places with her father; the house also has living objects, a candle holder, a clock, a tea pot, all who are also cursed until the curse is broken. They look at Bell as the perfect opportunity for the beast to find a true love, but he must learn to be a gentleman, but Bell brings out the best in him and it turns out that this might be a happy ending after all.\n\nThis was actually the first movie that I ever cried in, the ending was just so beautiful and heart felt, you\'ll have to see what I mean. The songs are just so lovely and perfect for the scenes that they are performed for. Beauty and the Beast, the song, was just one of the most touching songs ever. This films is a major recommendation for me, it\'s one of my favorite Disney films of all time, it\'s a timeless classic that is just perfect and reached a new level of great animation.\n\n10/10', u'0.368173', u'\nThe only animated movie to receive a Best Picture Oscar nomination, and it deserved it.\n\nMagic from the opening prologue to the final credit, "Beauty and the Beast" is the last real classic to come from the Disney crew before John Lasseter came along. This was one of the few movies I happily paid to see twice in the cinema, and sitting in a sparsely-populated Friday night audience (I was living in Barbados at the time, and it was hardly the most artistic place on Earth... it was a crying shame that there was hardly anyone there while "Home Alone 2" went through the roof) the second time, the magic remained.\n\nYou all know the story, so apart from pointing out the movie\'s one flaw (the prince\'s spell had to be broken before he turned 21 or he would remain a beast forever; so if it was cast ten years before the events of the movie, wouldn\'t that mean he was 11 when the spell was cast...?), let\'s look at how well the movie works. You have a monster who\'s more human than the movie\'s medallion-man villain; you have a heroine who\'s PC but engaging with it; you have a supporting cast of magic utensils who wisely never upstage the couple at the centre of this love story (and despite the Disney animated trappings, it IS a love story); and you have a captivating story, beautifully told.\n\nThe movie\'s also got wonderful design of its French setting and characters, with the ballroom scene a standout (the tiny but appreciative audience were impressed by the sight of the Beast and Belle in their evening wear - the only time I\'ve ever seen cartoon characters get wolf-whistled in a cinema); and Alan Menken\'s score is his finest work for the Mouse, with matchless lyrics from the late and much lamented Howard Ashman - how many musicals can you name where ALL the songs are brilliant? But ultimately it\'s the movie\'s very real heart that makes it a keeper; the cliche "You\'ll laugh, you\'ll cry" is all too true in this case. A lot of movies called \'classic\' don\'t deserve that appellation, but this one does.\n\nI\'ll be slaughtered by anime fans, but what the hell... one "Beauty and the Beast" is worth a thousand "Akira"s. And "Shrek"s. And, I\'m willing to bet, "Treasure Planet"s. This is a truly adult animated feature that\'s also one for the entire family. Forget "The Silence of the Lambs" - this is the real best picture of 1991.', u'0.597967', u'\na great movie story done with wondrous animation and lovely music.  the pacing was perfect, the music blended extremely well with the action, and each character was developed charmingly.  the contrast between the mean but insecure beast plays very well against the lovely but bright and secure belle.  the animation was top notch: even now, after disney has had time to develop better computer animation techniques, it still has beautiful color and flow.  except for pinocchio, I don\'t know any disney movie more lovely. It\'s a movie that appeals to children of all ages, especially adults : )\n\nenough of the "technical stuff"  let\'s get on to my emotional attachment to the movie.\n\nI remember the first time I saw B&tB so vividly; I was completely enthralled by the movie that all I could do on the way home was smile and cry.  I\'ve seen it many, many times, yet the ballroom scene still gives me goose bumps. Angela Landsbury as Mrs. Potts sings the title song with so much feeling that every time I hear the song, I\'m swept away back to that ballroom.\n\n\nI was also moved by Belle\'s strength of self worth and generosity.  She is a\nheroine I\'d love girls to emulate.  She knows what she wants, but yet is sensitive to others in trying to achieve that goal.  She also learns to apologize and to forgive, no small task.\n\nI\'ve loved this movie from the start, and it has grown into an obsession. I\ncollect everything I can now, and watch it when I need a lift.  So I know my opinion is strongly biased : )  but I hope you get a chance to see this film and judge for yourself.  I realize it is difficult to get access to the videos or laser discs (check out the spanish version cover imdb is using in B&tB\'s page) but it is well worth the search.  The first time is most magical.  I envy you.\n\n', u'0.496235', u'\nI\'ve not seen the newly added song sequence (Human Again) featured in the latest IMAX version so my comments are based entirely on the original theatrical and VHS release.\n\nBEAUTY AND THE BEAST is Disney at its peak. From the stained glass window at the opening and the beautiful narration, the viewer is drawn into the story by the appealing music and clever lyrics ("Belle\'s Song") which gets the picture off to a bouncy start. The opening sequence showing Belle and the townspeople in song is masterfully handled and choreographed for maximum effect, setting the tone for the entire story.\n\nThe plot becomes thicker once Belle\'s father enters the castle grounds where the Beast resides. The castle interiors are brilliantly Baroque and the odd characters inhabiting the grounds are delightfully rendered by a perfect blending of art and voice talent. Cogsworth, Lumiere and Mrs. Potts are delightful creations, each with strong, consistent personalities. David Ogden Stiers, Jerry Orbach and Angela Lansbury cannot be praised enough for their contributions. \n\nTwo of the musical highlights are Orbach\'s dazzling job on "Be My Guest" (with French accent) and Angela\'s tender rendering of the title song, "Beauty and the Beast". Unforgettable movie moments. As Gaston, Richard White\'s robust baritone voice adds greatly to the effectiveness of his villainy.\n\nIt\'s no wonder the film was the first to receive recognition by the Academy with a Best Picture nomination. Outstanding in every department, including the end title song sung by Celine Dion and Peabo Bryson in a more "modern" style. \n\nAlong with SNOW WHITE and SLEEPING BEAUTY, a top-notch fairy tale with its appeal evenly divided between adults and children--as well as the child in all of us.\n\n', u'0.826647', u"Beauty and the Beast is an engaging movie with so much care and beauty fused into its core. Beauty is much more than just an influential animated classic. It is a grand and powerful fable, sugar coated with the best animation effort in a time where CGI was becoming a movie mainstay. In its finest moments, Beauty is a rousing musical, making your head move and getting caught up right in the mix. The score is unforgettable and the characters are so easy to get into. A movie that children and adults alike will love, Disney deserved its Academy Award nominations for creating such a joy.\n\nSmall town Belle longs for more than a local life, maintaining her imagination through books and taking care of her kind, yet eccentric father. But when their horse returns without papa, Belle sets out to find the awful truth in an enchanted castle.\n\nYou can see that so much time and care was spent in drawing this masterpiece. I cannot think of many other movies that show such meticulous background and animation. That such effort is woven effortlessly into its songs that make Beauty and the Beast the timeless classic Disney rightfully lauds itself over. 'Be Our Guest,' 'Beauty and the Beast,' 'Gaston,' you will be humming these songs at one point in your your life! Kudos to Disney for creating a charismatic, attractive villain in Gaston. He would not be a villain if he was not such a jerk. You must watch this movie at least once in your life, in a comfortable sofa and with the sound turned right up for the Broadway scores. You will enjoy it!", u'0.649695', u"\n\tIndeed, it's a tale as old as time, with a complex message that is as ageless as it is universal; but beneath all the layers it can be summed up very simply:  love one another, and refrain from judging others who `seem' to be `different.'  And leave it to Disney to present it in such a way that it can be embraced and understood by young and old alike as they have here, in one of their best animated features ever, `Beauty and the Beast,' directed by Gary Trousdale.  When a young Prince fails the test of an enchantress disguised as an old hag, she transforms him into a hideous beast, as he is destined to remain until he opens his heart and learns how to love and be loved in return.  And so that he'll know where he stands as time goes by, she gives him an enchanted rose, which will bloom until his twenty-first birthday, and he has only until the last petal falls from the flower to effect the change within himself that will be his salvation. \n\n\n\tThe beast, however, seems doomed, as he shuts himself away, alone in his castle, taking up a reclusive existence far from everyone and everything.  Until, one day, a beautiful young woman named Belle shows up at his doorstep.  Belle is searching for her inventor father, Maurice, who disappeared while taking one of his latest inventions to the fair; and his trail leads Belle to the castle of the Beast, where she discovers he is being held prisoner, having run afoul of the Beast by trespassing while lost during the night of his journey.  Repulsed by the appearance of the Beast, Belle nevertheless strikes a bargain with him:  If he will release her father, she will stay in his place.  The Beast agrees, with the stipulation that she must remain with him forever.  And as the Beast casts Belle's father from the castle and sends him on his way, Belle's fate seems sealed.  The only hope now for either Belle or the Beast lies in the remote possibility that true love may somehow prevail before the last petal of the enchanted rose falls.\n\n\tWith the help of a richly textured screenplay (by Linda Woolverton) that invests the characters with a depth of humanity that is often lacking even in `non' animated films, and an Oscar winning score by Alan Menken, director Trousdale provides some real insights into human nature in this retelling of the familiar story of how true love can change even the darkest and coldest of hearts.  There's magic in this film, which holds an enchantment of it's own, and the message is presented ever so subtly and with a sensitivity that draws you in gradually until you are so caught up in the story that you become immersed and totally involved without being consciously aware of it.  It's a film that enfolds you and takes you where it will, and you go willingly.  A beautifully rendered and realized film that successfully transcends it's genre, it is the first animated feature ever to be recognized and rewarded with an Oscar nomination for Best Movie (quite a feat in itself, as it received the nod over such films as `The Fisher King,' `Fried Green Tomatoes,' `Thelma and Louise' and John Singleton's `Boyz N the Hood' that year).  \n\n\tThe talented cast supplying the voices of the characters includes Paige O'Hara (Belle), Robby Benson (The Beast), Richard White (Gaston), Jerry Orbach (Lumiere), David Ogden Stiers (Cogsworth), Angela Lansbury (Mrs. Potts), Bradley Pierce (Chip), Rex Everhart (Maurice), Jesse Corti (LeFou), Hal Smith (Phillipe), Jo Ann Worley (Wardrobe), Brian Cummings (Stove), Alvin Epstein (Bookseller) and Kimmy Robertson (Featherduster).  There's a scene in this film that is so entrancing and so emotionally involving that it stands up against the best from any drama ever made:  As Angela Lansbury (as Mrs. Potts) sings the Oscar winning title song, Belle begins to perceive the true nature of the man within the Beast; and it's no longer the cold-hearted Prince upon whom the enchantress cast her spell, because he has changed.  And as they come together and the Beast takes Belle in his arms, sweeping her in dance across the elegant ballroom floor, it becomes one of those rare cinematic `moments' that are entirely transporting, and it does, indeed, take you away.  It's a memorable scene that exemplifies the quality and craftsmanship of this film, as does the scene in which the Beast is at last transformed; that such emotion can be captured and expressed in an animated film is an exemplary accomplishment, and it's all a part of why `Beauty and the Beast' is one of Disney's all time greatest films. \n\n\n\tOne final note:  Stay for the credits to hear Alan Menken and Howard Ashman's title song once again, this time performed by Celine Dion and Peabo Bryson.  Hypnotically beautiful, this version has a magic all it's own and makes the perfect ending to an enchanting experience.  It's all a part of the magic of the movies.  I rate this one 9/10.                 \n", u'0.437901', u"This is a classic movie. We have breakthrough films like Snow White and Fantasia, and we have other greats like Aladdin and The Lion King, but this definitely tops them all. There is so much here that is missing in other Disney classics. This film has emotion, incredible music and animation, characters that you admire, laugh at, and despise. This movie is a fun ride from beginning to end. We can all relate with the suffering of the Beast (being an outsider), and we all know a Gaston in our lives. The way we can identify with the characters sucks us into the story. Don't miss this classic...the only animated film to be nominated for a Best Picture Oscar.", u'0.248774', u"\nWho can resist this beautiful story? I love the fact that even though Belle hated Beast at first, she saw underneath that he was a kind and gentle soul, and didn't care what he looked like on the outside! And what girl hasn't known a Gaston in their lives? I thought it was so great how he was put in his place! All the voiceovers are amazing, especially Robby Benson as Beast. Another Disney masterpiece.", u'0.735413', u"When an arrogant Prince turns away an old woman looking for shelter with only a rose for a gift, she warns him not to just take the surface appearance as being the all of a person; however he rejects her a second time \x96 only for her to reveal herself as a beautiful enchantress. She casts a spell on him, turning him into a beast with the only hope of return being to fall in love with a woman and have her fall in love with him before the rose wilts and dies. Resembling a carpet stuffed with walnuts, the prince figures he has no chance and withdraws into his castle. When an elderly man wanders into the castle, the Beast holds him prisoner and only lets him go when his daughter, Belle, offers to replace him in the Beast's castle. With time running out, the Beast's staff hope that Belle will be the one to break the curse but the Beast cannot remember how.\n\nBeing quite a cynical, acerbic person I must admit that I prefer modern animated films that deliver lots of adult humour along with a good emotional story and often I struggle to enjoy films that take the more traditional Disney route. However with this film I was quite taken by how classy the whole affair was, with great effort being shown in every area from the animation, to the songs through to the emotionally involving story whose telling is touched with a nice sense of wonder throughout. The story doesn't really hit many bum notes (I thought Gaston's sidekick was a bit too obvious and half cooked) and it is interesting and enjoyable for the vast majority of the time. The story and comedy is aimed at both adults and children \x96 but the stuff for kids is not basic pratfalls, nor is the adult material just a load of references or suggestive jokes. Instead the two are quite well blended with good physical comedy and plenty of wit. Again, it is the sense of spectacle and wonder that came through that I really appreciated.\n\nThe animation feels more impressive for the reliance on mostly traditional animation rather than computer effects \x96 in fact the computer effects look a bit dated now, even if they do still produce the goods in some key scenes. Mainly it is the feeling that every frame has had a lot of effort and love put into it that makes the whole affair feel classy. The songs are also great and feature quite a few memorable songs that stick in the mind; meanwhile the choreography of these scenes is generally very imaginative (Be Our Guest was my favourite). The cast don't feature many big stars and perhaps this is good because the real people don't distract from their characters. That said, I thought that Benson, O'Hara, White and a few others were quite unremarkable even if they were good enough for the film. Orbach, Stiers, Lansbury and others provided comic work in the support characters and everything worked well.\n\nOverall this is a really classy animated film that shows the effort and care put into it in many different regards. It does suffer a bit from cuteness and sentimentality but I didn't think this was a massive problem or something that was not to be expected from Disney and generally I really enjoyed the film and see it as one of the films that define Disney for people of my generation.", u'0.345851', u"The first and possibly last animated movie to be nominated for best picture, and it should have won. This is an absolutely beautiful movie, and it makes me miss the art of hand drawn animation. Don't get me wrong Scilence of the Lambs was great movie and its really a tough choice but i think this one should have won. I hate to admit it but it brings a tear to my eye every time I watch it. If only Disney could get back to the likes of this film, and stop dicking around with the boring cgi movies. I hope someday we will see an animated movie win best picture, but sadly i think it will not happen, the only one in my opinion that came close was spirited away, and thats still no Beauty and the Beast.", u'-0.165281', u'I still remember watching this movie when I was very little. I did not appreciate it as much then, but now because I am older, I can cherish this blessed masterpiece. The music in this movie is one of the best film scores ever and contains the catchiest Disney tunes. Who could ever forget the ever-popular ballroom scene? This movie, in my opinion was Alan Menken and Howard Ashman\'s best! I also think that this is the best Disney movie made after the great Walt Disney passed away.\n\nI had the opportunity of seeing the Special Edition on IMAX. What an experience! The scenes were breathtaking to see on such a large screen. I even found the new song "Human Again" very entertaining.\n\nIt\'s such a shame that Disney hasn\'t made a movie like this since "Mulan". "Beauty and the Beast" will be forever remembered as the epitome of modern-day Disney movies (and should have won the Best Picture Oscar instead of "The Silence of the Lambs"). Bravo to Disney!', u'0.496398', u'This movie is without doubt the best animated movie of all time. The artistry was perfect. I was spellbound at the animated sequences to the songs "Be Our Guest" and "Beauty and the Beast" especially. The characters were very well drawn, and because of the dark and colourful backgrounds, the film looked beautiful. The songs are fantastic. Another movie with great songs is "The Hunchback of Notre Dame"(which has the best beginning to a Disney movie). In fact, all the Alan Menken scores are brilliant, with the exception of Home On The Range, which is one of the weaker Disney efforts. My personal favourites, were the songs I just mentioned, and "Gaston" was great fun too. The incidental music was the best in any Disney movie, and that is the same with the other Menken scores. The music in the transformation of the Beast was phenomenal, as well as the animation, and reminded me of the last movement of Berlioz\'s Symphonie Fantastique, which is really frightening. Another Disney with great incidental music is "The Lion King". The story is quite simply one of the best love stories ever, and the characters are wonderful. Belle was voiced beautifully by Paige O\'Hara, who has a beautiful singing voice. I love Belle, she is beautiful, clever and strong, and is one of the best Disney characters for those reasons. Gaston was made into a complex villain, and quite narcissistic(great idea Disney). When he was nasty he was quite frightening, and Richard White can really sing. Jerry Orbach and David Ogden Stiers were really entertaining as Lumiere and Cogsworth,(I just love how witty, elegant and debonair Lumiere is) and Angela Lansbury gives a brilliant rendition of the title song. The best voice over was that of the Beast, who was very frightening, and there were some parts that were truly sensitive. Why are some people fussed about him as a human? Remember, true beauty comes from within. In conclusion, an essential to your Disney collection with a very poignant ending. 10/10. Bethany Cox', u'0.685518', u'This movie is pure magic. I love Disney films, especially the traditionally animated ones. I sincerely hope that does not become a lost art form.\n\nSo, first point for the movie: it\'s French. I adore the language and the culture, so getting a smattering is a delight.\n\nSecondly, it\'s a classic fairytale that is also quite dark. There is much tragedy woven into to castle and its surroundings. I like best the tales that aren\'t overly bubbly, and this one keeps the goofiness down pretty well.\n\nNext, the heroine actually possesses some intelligence! She reads and has her own mind, and, unlike many, is flawed. It\'s nice that the film was taken seriously enough to have some dimension, even if it was "only" an animated movie. Plus, I really want to have her library someday.\n\nLastly- the movie is just so beautiful! The castle and the woods were gorgeous, the ballroom was beautiful, but the best was the breathtaking scene right after Belle dumps Gaston and runs out to the field behind her house. Sheer perfection. No wonder this movie was nominated for best picture. My only wish- I would have liked to have seen some more of the Beast as Adam. He was pretty cute!\n\nQuote of the Film:\n\n- Well YOU shouldn\'t have been in the West Wing!', u'0.383199', u"BEAUTY AND THE BEAST is one of the greatest Disney films to ever grace audiences. A personal favorite, the story of Beauty and her growing love for the Beast is one that people have enjoyed through the years, from the theater to Broadway.\n\nI first saw Beauty and the Beast when I was a little girl, around the time that I watched the other Disney classics. And, like I did with the others, I fell in love. The stunning animation and soundtrack coupled with the captivating story kept me in my seat till the very end.\n\nThis movie is thrilling, with it's message of how love can happen even if the people in question aren't incredibly beautiful. Although the idea of the Beast changing to a prince doesn't sit well with me-- Beauty fell in love with the animal, not the man-- the film is a treasure from Disney.", u'0.72795', u"\nThis timeless fairy tale has been reworked to respond to specific gender preoccupations of the day. Disney's Beauty and the Beast addresses the contest between two types of masculinity, aggressive and gentle, targeting young boys to socialize into the new sensitive male of the 90s. The representation of femininity plays a minor part in the story.\n\nBecause Disney films are targeted to a younger audience, the sexual implication of the `Beast' is replaced with a coarse, boorish and unrefined type of masculinity. This film is about the socialization of young boys, and the audience learns through textual analysis what behavior the film deems appropriate. The Beast is 11 when he is put under the spell and 21 by the time it is broken, which covers the formative years of the transition from boyhood to manhood. The most obvious lesson he has to learn is to love, and to be good enough to have that love returned. Heterosexual love sets everything right and is the definition of the manhood he has to attain. The rest of the film reads as a transcript of proper behavior, and Lumiere, the dating etiquette expert, is his teacher. The Beast is expected to find more suitable accommodations than the dungeon, walk Belle to her door, say something to fill the awkward space on the trip to her room, and invite her to dinner. As a man, he is expected to control his temper, eat in a civilized manner, and learn gentleness with the birds. In the scene depicting his table manners, Belle switches from the role of date to that of nurturing, instructive mother. Belle recognizes his effort with the spoon and compromises with him by sipping her broth from the bowl. All of the characters have a part in his instruction. Especially informative is the scene when Belle sings about how he was course and unrefined, and now he is dear to her because he is unsure. It is the self consciousness and insecurity, in eating and getting dressed in bows, that sets the Beast apart from Gaston and makes him the ideal 90s (less masculine) man. In fact he has physical prowess but he represses it, and appeals instead to Belle's mind with the library. The film reassures boys that one can be both gentle and manly. The key to winning the girl lays in his evolution; he overcomes his selfishness. The Disney film leaves no room for competing versions of masculinity. Only one would survive; the bad guy dies.\n\nGaston and the Beast are quite similar rivals, analogous in their social worlds. Either the entire town or all of the appliances cheer their respective protagonist. Gaston is beastly as shown by his shadows, bestial shape, and pride that every last inch of him is `covered in hair.' Their fight in the tower marks the emotional high point of the film and is essentially a rivalry between two types of masculinity. The sensitive male that the audience has witnessed evolving, or the 100% pure testosterone laden Gaston who is aggressive, has a thick neck, eats to excess, is not an intellectual (he knocks over a chess table) and is a model to which all those in the village aspire to. Belle drops out of the equation entirely, as the major lesson of the film is the contest between two versions of manhood, with the sensitive male of the 90s the victor.\n\nTo a lesser degree, the film is also about the new woman of the 90s. Belle is the new heroine that Disney produced, though she is just as skinny and wide eyed as the heroines before her. She does read books, but they are fairy tales and her idea of `something more than this provincial life' is prince charming. She is really not all that intellectual. She does have two physical saving scenes, when the Beast is attacked by wolves, and before he falls off the tower and she catches him. However, overshadowing Disney's attempt to create a modern, liberated woman, Belle ends up faced with a choice that is really no choice at all. She has to get married in the end whether it is to one man or another.\n\nBelle simply settles for the best type of masculinity, what she a `new woman' is looking for in a `new man.' She has little choice, since she doesn't like Gaston and she does want to get married. The lesson is that one type of masculinity not only triumphs and survives, but it also gets the girl. It is surprising that a more recent film, after the women's movement, and one self-consciously trying to create a new heroine, actually takes more power out of the female's hands then older versions of the tale. Animations oftentimes reinforces stereotypes, and the `happily ever after' genre conflicts with any real independence Belle could have shown, resulting in no choice other than marriage.\n", u'0.137158'], u'tt1392214': [u"This was one intense movie-going experience. Throughout the entire running time of the movie, the suspense never lets up.\n\nThe director masterfully weaves the haunting atmosphere, and I was at the edge of my seat. The plot is a wonderful puzzle, unraveling slowly to reveal hidden layers of depth and complexity. The acting was wonderful, emotional and nuanced, with some unforgettable moments (The two leads - Gyllenhaal and Jackman - give their career best performances, but the biggest achievement in my opinion is Paul Dano's). The musical score contributes to a sense of dread, as well as the rich sound design and the chilly color palette of the breathtaking cinematography.\n\nAll those parts add up to a rare, gut-wrenching, dark and fascinating masterpiece - the kind that lingers with you long after the credits roll.", u'0.694048', u'There is a sensitivity that Director Denis Villenueve and writer Aaron Guzikowski inhabit in bringing their newest film "Prisoners" from Warner Bros. to the screen. Starring an Academy Award nominated cast that includes Hugh Jackman, Jake Gyllenhaal, Terence Howard, Maria Bello, Viola Davis, Oscar-winner Melissa Leo, and Paul Dano, this is a smartly constructed and emotionally resound mystery thriller that is thoroughly enjoyable.\n\nThe synopsis is fully in the trailer. When two young girls go missing, one belonging to Keller and Grace (Jackman and Bello), the other to Franklin and Nancy (Howard and Davis), a hot-shot detective (Gyllenhaal) is assigned to the case and relentlessly tries to find the clues that could lead to the whereabouts of the missing. When a mentally handicapped Alex Jones (Dano) is found near the scene of the disappearance with no hard evidence, Keller takes matters into his own hands.\n\nI have to say that I\'ve never been this hypnotized with the works of Hugh Jackman and Jake Gyllenhaal. Jackman, who is fresh of his inaugural nomination for Tom Hooper\'s "Les Miserables" has capitalized in a massive way. Approaching his character with the ferocity that made him a star in the "X-Men" franchises, he hammers his way into every scene, keeping the audience guessing about their own moral complexities. He tears into scenes in a way we\'ve never seen him and layers his character with plenty of affection, empathy, grief, and rage. It\'s his best dramatic endeavor he\'s ever done.\n\nWhen it comes to Jake Gyllenhaal, many, and probably for the right reasons, gravitate towards his work in Ang Lee\'s "Brokeback Mountain" as his shining moment in film history. I believe he\'s gone deeper in works like "Jarhead" and "Zodiac" but those were just the surface of what he can do as an actor. As Detective Loki, Gyllenhaal stands firm and tall in one of the year\'s finest performances. Terrifically executed as a man disconnected from real emotion, he finds himself enamored by the mystery surrounding two missing girls. He also orchestrates character beats and ticks that\'s reminiscent of Joaquin Phoenix\'s towering work in "The Master" last year.\n\nWhat is very refreshing in the film is it offers a great reminder of how brilliant an actor Terence Howard is. The Oscar-nominated actor seemed to fall by the wayside following his nomination for "Hustle and Flow" in 2006, coincidentally the same year Gyllenhaal snagged his first, and now has realized his capabilities when he chooses more dynamic and passionate characters. In a film that centers around his involvement, Paul Dano doesn\'t have too much to offer but is completely adequate in form.\n\nThe film however is not entirely perfect. Aaron Guzikowski\'s depth screenplay offers a great mystery story, full of twists and turns, all the bit a tad predictable, but that\'s not where he falters so much. His construction of the female counterparts, Maria Bello, Viola Davis, and Melissa Leo, are not as crisply or smoothly put together as I\'d like them to be. They each have one "scene" that gives us their character\'s motivation and the look into their cinematic psyche however, some are thrown in quite lazily and manages to halt the story in spots.\n\nThe film\'s technical merits all rise to the abilities of its cast. Roger Deakins, the most overdue Cinematographer in the business, captures stunning portraits of conversations, weather, and scenes that continue to prove his brilliance in the film world. The film\'s score is masterfully placed by J\xf3hann J\xf3hannsson while Joel Cox and Gary Roach edit the film to an impeccable pace. \n\nAt 153 minutes, the film is detailed, precise, and engaging nearly throughout. I feel there\'s a shorter cut of the film that would surely be a Best Picture nominee for this year\'s Academy Awards if it existed. The film could still garner that support with what they have now, but I think there are aspects of the film members won\'t be able to get around. A high level of violence and torture scenes infused with a longer run time could keep people at a distance. One thing that can\'t be denied is the towering works of Hugh Jackman and Jake Gyllenhaal. The two have offered plenty of memorable performances in their filmography, but their work in "Prisoners" is cut and clear their best they\'ve offered.\n\n"Prisoners" is a magnificent achievement for the film year. Thorough, enigmatic, and purely amazing. A must-see for the movie lovers.\n\nThe film opens in theaters this Friday, September 20.', u'0.281309', u"Prisoners is a gritty, incredibly well-acted, suspenseful, thought-provoking crime drama thriller. The film mainly focus on the choices taken and the consequences faced by the characters when worst things happen to them.\n\nIt simply raises the question: When your kid's life is at stake, how far are you willing to do to protect your family? It explores the likelihood of human behaviour when such crime is happening to us, blurring the lines between good and bad people.\n\nFor a 153 minute movie, the story does unfolds at a slow and solemn pace (which hurts the film and might bore some audiences) but the dramatic scenes performed by the main cast members in the film will keep you engaged. Hugh Jackman and Jack Gyllenhaal both giving intense, Oscar-worthy performances here, defining and developing their characters with various layers of emotions: affection, anger, grief, empathy, guilt...throughout the film.\n\nThe film's atmosphere, heavy rains, stormy days and icy cold winter managed to create a dark, dreadful environment to make up the dreary and haunting mood in the film. Every violent action taken by the characters are acts of desperation given that they are running out of time.\n\nHowever, the film is not perfect. Despite some plot problems from the various twists and turns shown in the film, the superb performances from the casts was sufficient enough to make the story succeed and believable.\n\nHighly recommended for those who wanted to watch a serious drama thriller with powerful, engaging acting performances from its talented casts.\n\nhttp://yjcool.blogspot.com/2013/09/movie-review-prisoners.html", u'0.169969', u'Hugh Jackman takes you on a trip through the intense emotions a family is put through during its darkest hour. This may be his best role to date. From the trailers you know that his character will be out for blood as their daughter was kidnapped, but throughout the film you feel his pain, anger and moral struggles as he deals with this situation. The director does an excellent job of keeping you invested in the film emotionally even through some intensely violent scenes. Its dreary setting provides no comfort, but goes hand and hand with the narrative. This film may not be for those faint of heart but should be a must see for most viewers.', u'0.159328', u'Wow, what an intensely suspenseful film Prisoners was. The film commences with a naturalistic and peaceful look of a suburban neighborhood, leafless trees calmly swaying along with the cool air that encompass them. All is fine, and a perfectly normal family visits their friends/neighbors for a delightful dinner and some music. Everything is fine and dandy until both family\'s two kids run off to retrieve a toy they left outside. After pleasant conversation, the two families begin to realize that their kids haven\'t gotten back yet. The noiseless environment around them feels incredibly unusual, and once they realize that their kids have officially gone missing, chaos breaks loose. We are suddenly presented with a ruthless father (played by Hugh Jackman) who loves his daughter so much that he\'s willing to transcend any morally difficult obstacles to hopefully locate her. \n\nA spectacular cast, ranging from the likes of Hugh Jackman to Jake Gyllenhaal to Viola Davis and Terrence Howard, create such a chilling atmosphere that everyone in the audience immediately notices the discomforting subject matter as they prepare for a disturbing viewing. One should know prior to visiting the movie theater that this film doesn\'t feature morally perfect individuals. They are all human beings cast into an unbelievably frightening situation, and this is where larges amounts of debate will stir. There\'s one side of the audience that will persistently detest the characters\' actions and the characters themselves, and there\'s the other side (which I am proudly a part of) that will essentially understand that people can\'t possibly (always) be the "goody-two-shoes" heroes, perceived in Hollywood blockbusters, in reality- that, by god, I will partake morally and ethically questionable activities to save a precious, loved one, absolutely! Such conversation/argument is healthy for it proves the memorability factor of the film itself. After you witness the terrifically-crafted picture, you will find enjoyment in discussing the movie\'s events with friends and family with- eventually- two sides forming over the talk. \n\nAnd holy crap is Hugh Jackman entirely convincing in his performance. You can see the longing to find his sweet, innocent daughter through his miserable eyes, filled with redness, desperation, and anger. Then, there\'s Jake Gyllenhaal as the second lead, playing an ambitious cop who holds a very impressive resume: no unsolved cases left under his plate. Can that mean his skill will greatly help in this predicament? On a similar note, Paul Dano takes the prize after Hugh Jackman for another wonderful performance. No offense or anything, but he completely fits into these immensely creepy and eerie roles. \n\nSpeaking of, the soundtrack will definitely remain in that shocked mind of yours long after you\'ve left the theater because it fills us with a sense of hopelessness and discomfort. At times, it sounds exceptionally ominous with the disconcerting sound of those violins in play. At others, it sounds like the music weeps for all those involved. The pace never seems to drag even though it clocks in at around 150 minutes as you remain at the edge of seat the entire time, utterly perplexed by everything that\'s transpiring and wholly befuddled by the choices that these people are making. The film will make you cringe and question the humanity of the participants or the competence of our law (that word could mean two things). Although I was slightly disappointed with the end result, the majority of the film strongly intrigued me. And, oh, how could I forget, the cinematography is simply amazing. Roger Deakins, the brilliant cinematographer behind last year\'s Skyfall, manages the camera-work of this film as well. As one wise critic said, a drive in the rain never felt so disquieting- a moment of foreboding. \n\nFurthermore, I would not recommend skipping out on Prisoners unless you\'re of the type that prefers more lighthearted and fun movies like The Avengers. If you love films that explore more than just entertainment and "fun," such as important themes and moral ambiguity as a whole, you cannot go wrong with Prisoners. With a mix of top-notch cinematography, remarkably unsettling music, superb performances, and a thrilling/powerful story, Prisoners will definitely be one of this year\'s features that I\'ll surely be remembering. The true cinema season has started; now, let\'s hope every film from here on out delivers like this one did.', u'0.552899', u"I just came back from the theater and to be honest I went into this movie with very low expectation! But WOW did it prove me wrong. The film left me on the edge of my seat all the time, one could argue things were slow sometimes but it only adds to the beauty of the big picture.\n\nPerformance are top notch and if it was for me I would give Jackman his very deserved Oscar for this amazing performance, of course all the other performances were really great also but Hugh's stands out for me.\n\nThis movie is worth your time, and I'm sure by the end of it you'll keep talking about it with your friends, for me that is a success stamp if the movie can keep my mind busy all the time.\n\nThis is not your feel-good movie. This is a perfectly paced thriller which I haven't seen anything like it in a very long time. For me this was a totally new experience as I usually go for lighter movies in the cinema, but after this movie I will go out of my comfort-zone in movies more often to find masterpieces like this one.", u'0.201074', u"Prisoners, the new film from Canadian director Denis Villeneuve (Polytechnique), is a top notch nail-biting crime-drama that is as good a theatre as modern Hollywood has the ability to produce. \n\nHugh Jackman and Maria Bello play the parental figures of the Dover family. They are your average hard-working blue-collar family who begin their story by visiting neighbours Franklin and Nancy Birch (Terrence Howard and Viola Davis) for a Thanksgiving dinner. The Franklins and the Dover's each have two children, the youngest of which (Anna and Joy) head out from their home on a November afternoon to play only to mysteriously disappear. \n\nUpon a frantic search, the Franklins and the Dover's suspect the worse. Especially when their elder children tell them of a mysterious camper that was parked just down the street. Police soon find the camper with Alex Jones (Paul Dano) behind the wheel. Alex has the mentality of a 10-year-old and tries fleeing when surrounded by authorities. But when Detective Loki (Jake Gyllenhaal) begins to interrogate Alex, he is less convinced that Alex was a part of the abduction. As days pass, Loki and Keller Doller work in opposite directions on the investigation. Keller is convinced that Alex Jones was a part of the abduction and kidnaps the frail and challenged Jones and tortures him for days in an attempt to extract answers. Meanwhile, Detective Loki follows leads that open up possibilities of a crime where multiple persons may be involved. And Oscar nominee Melissa Leo appears in a supporting but pivotal role that will assist in the closure.\n\nThe trailer for Prisoners may have audiences hearkening back to Ron Howard's Ransom, but this is hardly the cookie-cutter kidnapping film that Mel Gibson lead back in 1996. Prisoners instead is an engulfing drama. One with a superb performance by lead Hugh Jackman that challenges how far someone would/should go in an effort to locate their stolen child. \n\nThe script, from writer Aaron Guzikowski (Contrband) takes audiences down many different paths and emotional rides and Jackman's performance will have you rooting for his quest for answers even though his methods are unorthodox and highly illegal.\n\nThe film is gritty and full of realistic characters and situations culminating in a perfect ending that goes 9/10ths of the way in giving its audience full closure. Not as much an edge-of-your seat thriller as it is a Zodiac type of crime drama where the stakes are the lives of two small children. \n\nDenis Villeneuve's last effort, Incendies, was nominated for an Academy Award for Best Foreign Film in 2011. Prisoners shows that he can move solidly into big star larger scaled films with the ease of a well worn slipper. And Prisoners catapults Villeneuve into not just a director to watch, but a director whose work should be awaited with palpable excitement.\n\nwww.killerreviews.com", u'0.0793043', u"Prisoners is extremely suspenseful and equally disturbing. Canadian director Denis Villeneuve, whose last film was the equally spellbinding and disturbing Incendies, builds up the tension from the first frame and does not let up for the full 153 minutes of the movie. Aaron Guzikowski's script, though on the surface a child kidnapping thriller, bucks all Hollywood trends and, as well as being a taut thriller, poses serious moral issues. It also helps that the film has a first rate cast doing outstanding work: Hugh Jackman, Jake Gyllenhaal, Paul Dano, Terence Howard, Melissa Leo, Maria Bello and Viola Davis. Prisoners is not for the faint heated but is likely to feature strongly at next year's Oscars.", u'0.859912', u'I had no expectations of this movie, as I was dragged along to see it by a mate with a Jake Gyllenhaal fixation, but was pleasantly surprised to find it was a bleak-seeming action/drama with Hugh Jackman too, who\'s generally excellent in everything he\'s in. The first 30 minutes or so of the movie were really promising. I liked the set-up of the 2 cozy families in their suburban idyll sharing a thanksgiving meal and discovering, to their horror, their kids had somehow gone missing. That part felt very real, very "based on a true story" and had me on the edge of my seat. As the film went on though, the clunky writing and flabby storytelling started to lose my interest.\n\n#1. My first big problem came with the utterly implausible discovery of the body in the pedophile priest\'s basement. First of all, Gyllenhaal\'s decision to move the freezer based on the flex being dangerously stretched, just seemed...dumb. Why would he care if the guy stretches his flex? It didn\'t seem from his reaction ("drunks!") that he thought the freezer was hiding something, and yet he opts to shove the big heavy thing closer to the socket because presumably it bothers him. Then - whoa - there\'s a door there, and whoa it\'s a big cellar (which is not that weird really), and now - whoa - look a body!\n\n#2. And next came a great big WHY? He\'s a pedophile catholic priest so why was he SO outraged that a man might kill kids. He abuses children but is still so horrified by a killer that he opts to kill the guy who\'s (again...utterly improbably) has come to him for confession, but not so horrified that he tells ANYONE the guy\'s story? Or attempts to find out if it\'s true before he offs him? Instead he just stuffs the body in the basement and drinks a lot. Hmm.\n\n#3. My next problem was the biggest and clumsiest of the plot points. Gyllenhaal finds a body and hears a weird-ass tale about child murders (and presumably there\'s a not a lot of those locally), but despite his incredible intellect and ability to make connections, he doesn\'t spot the REALLY ODD MAZE NECKLACE on the body until the drawing falls conveniently from his desk alongside it, and make the connection between the two. \n\n#4. Why is escaped and presumably traumatized kidnap victim Bob stealing children\'s clothes, covering them in pig\'s blood and putting them in boxes full of snakes? It would make sense if he was somehow part of the cover-up, or working for Alex\'s aunt, but he\'s not. So for some reason known only to himself he\'s stealing clothes and making it seem like Anna and Joy are dead when they\'re not. Presumably because he\'s traumatized. Or just mental. But either way, it\'s not really explained, it\'s just a great big red herring that confuses everything.\n\n#5. What is the significance of Keller\'s dad\'s suicide? Because if there is no significance, why show Loki reading about it as if it\'s important? Presumably (again) it\'s so he can find out that the building that Keller\'s going to is where his dad died - but so what? Why is it important, other than to cloud the waters and confuse the audience even more. Was Keller connected to his father\'s suicide, why was no note found...all questions we have no need to ask.\n\n#6. WTF is this all maze rubbish? Right from the poster we\'re led to expect some kind of maze to appear. The serial killer wears a necklace with a maze on it, Alex says "they\'re in the maze", Bob is obsessed with drawing mazes, so where\'s the freaking maze man? When Holly gets Keller to back the car up we think "FINALLY! HERE\'S THE MAZE!!! But there\'s no maze down there, just a big deep hole full of old sneakers and dead snakes. No maze, not even a sniff of one. The only maze-related thing as it turns out, is a puzzle book that Leo forces the kids to do while they\'re kidnapped, presumably traumatizing them with their inability to solve simple puzzles. It might just as well have been Sudoku really, but that might have looked weird on a necklace...\n\n#7. And finally, the pointless sub-plot. Just WHAT is the purpose and meaning behind Keller\'s kidnap and torture of Alex? It has no real purpose other than to provide a weirdly amoral counterpoint to the other story (which would have been so much better emphasized if we\'d seen anything of the girls\' captivity), and leaves us confused and kind of weirdly angry with the guy. Alex is an innocent child and Keller has tortured him almost to death, so what does that make him? A villain? An anti-hero? A misguided vigilante? No-one seems to care if we know, so we end up drawing no conclusion at all and Keller ends up as a shapeless figure that we ultimately care little about.\n\nUltimately my feeling was that this could have been a good film, if only someone with experience and a keen eye had been brought in to work on the script and iron out the many flaws. The cinematography and the score was great, and it\'s a testament to the director and actors that the movie was still highly watchable despite the glaring plot holes and confusing storytelling, but on the whole it was a disappointing and frustrating experience and not one I\'d recommend.', u'-0.458949', u'Prisoners movie review\n\nPrisoners is a Mystery/Thriller film starring Hugh Jackman, Jake Gyllenhaal, Terrence Howard, and Paul Dano. Prisoners is a film about two families who both of their daughters get kidnapped and both of the families with the help of the police, investigate and look for their daughters. This is a very dark, grim, and at times is a hard film to sit through. That being said, I have created a PainOmeter scale out of five (five being the worst) to inform you guys if you simply cannot take very violent and painful scenes. This will be addressed along will the film\'s final score. I loved this film! Hugh Jackman plays Anna\'s father and is the protagonist of the film. You can see how Jackman really loses his rag and does a great job as Keller Dover. There is one scene that involves Jackman doing something that I won\'t spoil but you will notice it and go WOW! The story is also very thought provoking and will keep you on the edge of your seat because of the direction and character building involved with this movie. Also Paul Dano who plays Alex Jones, is this weird adult with the IQ of a ten year old and is the main suspect of the investigation. I thought he nailed just the right tone of the character and was hard to "look at" at times. My favorite part of the film was surprisingly Jake Gyllenhaal\'s performance as the detective looking for the missing girls. Gyllenhaal still plays the role of a cop very well after all of that training for End Of Watch. Another great part of the film is that it manages to never take a rest on character building and story development. I hate when films give you time to take a break then start all over again and this film really avoids that entirely. I really have no problems with the film except for the runtime. Even though this was a great movie I just couldn\'t go for a perfect grade of an A+. I will give Prisoners an A solid.', u'0.108534', u"Why You Might Like It: I can go on and on about the good things in this film and why most viewers will enjoy it. It has an outstanding cast that play their parts well, the directing and cinematography are gripping, and the story is something to marvel. This is an excellent film that I highly recommend.\n\nWhy You Might Not Like It: I don't know why anyone wouldn't enjoy the movie. It does run over 2 hours, so some movie-goers might think that is a bit too long, but I don't think this movie will lose anyone's interest.\n\nActing/Casting: 9.5* - As mentioned, the casting and acting is outstanding. Hugh Jackman gives the best performance of his career in my opinion. Paul Dano is downright creepy and plays his part to a tee. Jake Gyllenhaal, Terrence Howard, Maria Bello and the rest of the cast do great work as well.\n\nDirecting/Cinematography/Technical: 8.5* - Let me just say that Denis Villeneuve has made his mark in the US after this one. The directing in this movie is gripping and pulls the viewer in from start to finish. I can't say enough about all of the small things that go into making the atmosphere in the movie amazing (the weather, the buildings, music, etc.) \n\nPlot/Characters: 8.5* - This is arguably one of the better abduction/kidnapping stories that I have seen. The plot is deep and has many layers that keep the viewer guessing all the way up until the very end. There is no doubt that the story plays a huge role in the final product that you see on the screen.\n\nEntertainment Value: 9* - It keeps you guessing throughout and on the edge of your seat from start to finish. Movies like this are why we go to the movies. Get out and see it.\n\nMy Score: 9.5+8.5+8.5+9 = 35.5/4 = 8.875 Email your thoughts to filmwatchinfool@gmail.com", u'0.369391', u'Just watched it. Acting great.\n\nBut this is so badly written ---> \n\n1 - HOW did the black girl escape! Her & her friend were drugged all the time? Oh, she just "managed" to get away -- she\'s in a locked room! Drugged! But she "manages" to get away . . . and another oh! her captor couldn\'t catch her! But the captor managed to get them the first time in broad daylight -- which is never explained! \n\n2 - the captor knows one of her captives has escaped yet makes NO EFFORT to leave, clean up evidence, DO ANYTHING AT ALL, just stays there.\n\n3 - and when girl says in hospital "you were there" Hugh Jackman runs away to make him look like the suspect; he doesn\'t bother to tell anyone - like the cops - I KNOW WHERE SHE\'S TALKING ABOUT! LET\'S GO NOW, IT\'S THE CRAZY AUNT!\n\n4 - why did the aunt not kill them after capture? Why do they need to stay alive? \n\n5 - guy gets beaten & imprisoned in a cube of pain for a week, yet can\'t manage to articulate "my aunt did it." He was coherent enough to say "They only cried when I left them" to Hugh Jackman when Hugh Jackman grabs him by the throat in public; but he can\'t manage "after my aunt took them away" when Hugh Jackman beats him nearly to death? \n\n6 - cop is angry, goes to his desk, throws things around, by CHANCE things fall on the floor & he sees a new CRUCIAL clue.\n\nIt\'s a movie of bad red herrings, and coincidence. \n\nPS. Cop goes into a room of trunks and RUSHES to open one! It\'s full of SNAKES! Now if I opened up the first trunk in a room full of trunks and the first trunk was full of snakes, I don\'t think I would open all the other trunks, yet Cop wants to open more!', u'-0.444364', u"The most complex thing to think about the film Prisoners is why any of the Oscar nominated or recognisably 'serious' actors agreed to be in it in the first place. While it is clearly meant to be, judging by the blind critical reaction, a tense, thought provoking, violent and difficult film, I found it to be too dreary, too melodramatic, too obvious and, most importantly, too long.\n\nThere are few films that can, successfully, keep me gripped for 2hrs35min. JFK is one and that other Gyllenhaal detective drama Zodiac is another but what they had, that Prisoners forgot, was a complex, gripping detective narrative with possibly many solutions and actual characters. It is in these two areas that Prisoners woefully falls short.\n\nFocussing, for the moment, on the little good in the film, Prisoners is very well shot by seasoned director of photography, Roger Deakins and not badly played by the starry, Oscar grabby cast, not that they're given a whole lot to work with.\n\nThat being said, my first problem with the kidnapping plot is that it was obvious. If you, like my wife and I, indulge your silly brain cells every week by watching 45min detective procedurals like The Mentalist, Castle, Elementary, White Collar or whatever, then you will see the ending of the film coming a mile away. This is because, the way it was set up and as it continued to play out, there was only a handful of ways it could play out. Now, I'm sure, for those not so used to the simple twists and turns of evening TV, Prisoners may have been a gripping whodunit but, I am sorry, if you've read any, even mildly, detective orientated books or watched a Murder She Wrote then you'll know the plot, like I did, 45mins in and will have to sit there for another 1hr and 45mins waiting for surly, grumpy, tattooed Jake Gyllenhaal to work it out too. Which he eventually does but even his, supposedly brilliant, 'never lost a case' detective is beaten to the punch by 'very angry indeed' Hugh Jackman.\n\nGyllenhaal's detective is supposed, I am guessing, to be a tortured, dogged genius but we never see any evidence of him really doing anything insightful or perceptive, he's not a fantastic puzzle solver, good with people particularly and there doesn't appear to be a great intellect pounding away inside his furrow browed, slicked back haired head. It struck me as one of those characters him and the director talked endlessly about but forgot to put any of the motivations into the actual script. We are told in dialogue he is brilliant and we are just meant to take it as read, despite the fact that all he does is mundane and routine investigation. Yes he has tattoos, a grumpy face and spends thanksgiving alone in Chinese restaurants but apart from that, we have no idea what makes him tick, oh and his superiors and the police around him are also woefully inept.\n\nJackman is a survivalist, all American, possible religious nut who is also an alcoholic with an atrociously bad temper bubbling underneath a, not very interesting, surface. I was never sure if we were meant to side with him so that, we the audience, were complicit in his violent actions later on but seeing as I didn't really like him from the get go and seeing as I suspected that probably Paul Dano's massively red herring probably wasn't the bad guy (just by watching the trailer) that didn't really work for me. I actually found his reaction a little unrealistic and over the top but then I also found Paul Dano's character as annoyingly, idiotically stubborn as Jackman found him. Mind of a 10 year old or not, traumatised or not, I didn't buy for one second he'd stay silent for as long as he does, when he had no problem talking to Gyllenhaal's character for an apparent 10hr interrogation (we're told and see on video).\n\nMaria Bello, Viola Davis & Terrence Howard are all shockingly underused and irrelevant (mostly) and poor Melissa Leo is left playing, what slides very close to being, a comical old grandma part. Complete with bad clothes, huge glasses and a terrible wig. \n\nI am, personally, amazed that this film got made the way it did at all and, secondly, amazed that people love it so much. It's not that it's a bad film. It's fine. It just felt very obvious, mundane, grim and too long.", u'-0.392861', u'Let\'s make a crime caper where we have an excuse to show a mentally disabled man get tortured beyond reason. Even if he might be the suspect we are subjected to the overzealous rage filled attacks carried out by the kidnapped child\'s father. Let\'s also throw in some religious rhetoric to situate villainy in Christians , elderly widows, depraved sickos and handicapped people.\n\nWhy were all of these vile charges crammed in just one movie? It leaves me to respond with affirmation that this movie intended to anger, upset and disgust any unsuspecting movie goer. But along with making a crime caper that involves a kidnapping, we are also given a slow moving plot filled with misleading clues, uneven continuity, numerous twists and red-herrings that don\'t make much sense. Many questions will be asked as you labor through this torturous drama and it only gets more aggravating and confusing. Why would a police department be so incompetent as to have the parents be committing vigilantism without any surveillance? This is highly unlikely in America, even in rural Midwestern towns. Did the writers bother to consult Law authorities on investigative and forensic procedures? Because they seem non-existent in this unbelievable tale.\n\nThe most unforgiving and unsympathetic performance is Hugh Jackman\'s character who completely absconds any sense of responsibility and regard for law, humanity and common sense. As we see him emerging into madness and sadistic rage we quickly lose any empathy for him. How is it that any person can enjoy or be fascinated with the brutal torture of a feeble and mentally incapable simpleton? It\'s just an exercise in ugliness and perpetuates into the extreme. It was overdone. It would have been more believable if the torture was attempted and later foregone, realizing the method of debriefing wasn\'t working. Jackman\'s acting is way over the top and fails to draw any sympathy. Perhaps it was bad acting or a faulty script. It\'s as if the director was pushing him in a weekly actor\'s workshop to go the limit with unconstrained rage. It doesn\'t work.\n\nI also was annoyed at Gyllenhall\'s sleepy performance. For a detective who is supposed to have a stellar record, he sure missed much of the insanity going on with the people involved. This movie is also anti-authority and rebellious in its stance. Showing cops get maligned and disrespected is commonplace as the parents just freely go about their neurotic business of vigilantism.\n\nMany times I asked myself, \'Why is this happening? What did that mean? How is this guy involved? How did this old lady ever orchestrate such a kidnapping spree without getting caught? She seems a wee bit too old and frail to be carrying out such a demonic feat with grown men. Why did the other suspect break into the house while the mother was there? What exactly was he after? Why would he show up at a Candlelight vigil and make a spectacle of himself? Lame and stupid plot making. Why wasn\'t the priest ever a suspect before the kidnapping? You would think the police would be led to clues as to the dead man\'s whereabouts. Why would the old lady wait for Dover\'s second visit to constrain him? Was she so certain her demonic plan could rebound after losing one hostage? \n\nMost reprehensible is this movie\'s conviction of wallowing in its own depravity. It fails to make a distinction between what we can assert as truthful and moral behavior and what is incomprehensible behavior. This cheesy tag-line, "How far would you go?" only ushers in a weak excuse for someone to go ballistic on anyone they suspect. Even if the person in question has the wrong look in his eye. The question is so bad that it doesn\'t even deserve to be dignified with an intelligent answer. The question that should be asked is "How much effort does a caring father need to put forth in order to assure the safety of his family, himself and his daughter?" By committing abduction and torture he puts himself in jeopardy and his family.\n\nI could go on with more questions, but Prisoners doesn\'t have any redeeming qualities. A plethora of weird clues such as snakes stuffed in crates, the numerous scenes featuring a maze, weird wall paper, bloody clothes add up to nothing in this labyrinth of trash. It\'s all shock material that is poorly crafted and handled. And it isn\'t even believable.', u'-0.585009', u"I sometimes wonder if I live on the same planet as critics on IMDb. This is easily the very worst movie of the year and one of the ten worst of all time. Poorly written way way way way too long and so filled with lies clich\xe9s and stupidity it boggles the mind. I admit as a lawyer I am biased against these kind of movies where suspects are tortured beaten senseless and arrested with zero probable cause. That Jackman would make this movie after his magnificent performance in Lez Miz could only have been for the money. His role is a one-dimensional idiot without intelligence who gets it wrong from the beginning. Jake G has the worst role as stupid numbskull cop who hasn't a clue as to what is going on. I didn't give a fig about the parents, or their kids. There was zero background on what kin of parents and kids they were. This was not even a bad TV movie, it was a waste of time. Its length is inexcusable, its plot beyond idiotic and its actors were like very bad run of the mill nobodies. They all should be ashamed of themselves--the writer, director actors and everyone else. Don't see this film. Boycott it, and if not tell your friends to forget it, God it was awful!!", u'-0.64969'], u'tt0374546': [u"This film left me speechless, and I still have a hard time putting how I feel about this movie into words. After seeing it the first time in the theater, my friend and I couldn't bring ourselves to say a word to each other...not even in the car on the ride back. The second time I saw it, after purchasing it, another friend and I walked around the campus for half an hour in silence. The third time, a friend and I sat in silence in her room for an hour after the movie was over. This film is that profound, touching, and moving.\n\nSpring, Summer, Fall, Winter...Spring is the most beautiful movie I have ever seen. Visually it is fantastic, though several films surpass it in this aspect. However, the film manages to speak directly to the soul (or...failing to believe in the soul...something deep inside anyone watching it), and this is where it's beauty lies. Parts are so affecting that a painful nostalgia for a place you never knew overwhelms you.\n\nI am sorry I cannot be more helpful...the quality that makes this movie so wonderful is well beyond words for me.", u'0.281087', u"Perfect Simplicity\n\nMy review of this film should end with those two words. However, the 10 line minimum requirement that IMDb requires of all reviews belies the differences between my world and the world shown to me in Spring, Summer, Fall, Winter\x85and Spring. I understand why IMDb does not want 1000's of (apparently) useless two-word reviews in their database. However, I would hope that they could make an exception for this film.\n\nPerfect: The film is as close to perfect as a film could get. No shot is presented to us, nor a line of dialog uttered that does not make us ponder and understand at the same time. The film is also beautiful. (Like the previous reviewer, I am a fan of Asian cinema and never tire of the stunning ability of Asian directors to capture beauty on film.) This film exceeds most other Asian films I have seen in the cinematography regard. However, its beauty is surprisingly deceptive. Like most great films, it surpasses the 'cinematography' level of beauty and delves into the beauty of existence through its story. For example, the Old Monk has a different pet during each 'season' of his life. This is not discussed by the characters nor shoved in our face by the director \x96 as would have been done if Hollywood had done this film. It is merely background we experience and come to understand. Two days after viewing the film, I am still finding new reflections in my mind that encompass the cinematography, the literal story and the underlying context of the film.\n\nSimplicity: This film approaches a level of cinematic Haiku. While I don't recall the entire dialog with any specificity, I am sure you could print the script on one page of paper. The amazing part is that while you are watching the film, you don't notice this. Every shot moves the story along. The simplicity of life as shown by the story is reflected in the simplicity of the film. After the film ended, I had a strong urge to move away from civilization and live \x96 or die \x96 in peace with nature. I enjoy (and have come to be too dependent upon) modern inventions, so I will stay at home. However, this film will remain in my heart. It does exactly what good story-telling is supposed to do: Take us completely out of our world and put us in another. There is no wonder that this film was selected for so many film festivals.", u'0.287975', u"\nThe circle of life is everlasting. We, as busy humans, sometimes miss the opportunity to see it in full effect. The modern day conveniences of life and the hustle and bustle of work sometimes fog our eyes to the constantly moving world. Thankfully we have films like Spring, Summer, Fall, Winter \x85 and Spring, to help guide us back to our roots. Through each season, director Ki-duk Kim shows us the journey of one young boy as he learns life through the hands and mind of an older monk. Through events that are beyond his control, this young boy learns about love, lust, jealousy, hatred, and eventually rage. He makes choices that ultimately effect his life causing turmoil and distress, yet somehow continually finds his way back to the floating house on the lake where his journey began. It is during his final visit home he learns of his final journey in life. As a new soul is handed to him, he embarks on a final journey using his master's lesson, to pay homage to the life he has lead. \n\nWhen I watched this film the first story that came to mind was that told by Trina Paulus in 'Hope for the Flowers'. It is the story of two caterpillars that embark on a journey into butterflies. Along the way they experience a full range of emotions that are attached to life and death. In the end, they become two of the most beautiful creatures in the world. This is how I viewed this entire film. I felt as if I was watching a young caterpillar (the young boy) experience life and journey along the path to become the beautiful butterfly. The beauty of the scenes and the simplicity of this story not drenched in words only kept this image vibrant. The spiritual themes of this film are present, but not bold. They are not hitting you in the face and forcing you to understand, but instead showing you and demonstrating the power of those willing to believe. This is a quiet film that leaves much up to our imagination. We never leave the valley that surrounds the lake, we never know what year is currently going on outside of the forest, and we are meant to understand that this story could take place anytime. Kim gives us themes that can be used to express any period of time and is especially poignant in today's terror filled world.\n\nI loved everything about this film. From the simplicity of the opening doors to introduce each scene to the stunning and hypnotic ending that makes you believe in the human spirit. If you walk away with anything from this film, I hope it is hope. Hope for everything on this planet, and especially a hope for our fellow man. Mistakes are made to learn by. Take these errors and accept them to move closer to the world you have always dreamed about. Be that young boy that is able to transform into the man he desires.\n\nSee this movie, and feel a warmth like no other. This is quite possibly one of the best films of the year. Amazing!\n\nGrade: **** out of ****\n", u'0.351744', u'\nIn "Spring, Summer, Fall, Winter ... and Spring," Kim Ki-duk, a South Korean director whose past films were often fueled by violence, does a complete about-face. \n\nThis film is a pastoral poem about the changing seasons and a meditation on the cycle of life. In a tranquil and timeless setting of a temple floating atop a man-made lake in a forest, surrounded by mountain spires that cut the monastery off from worldly concerns, an old monk teaches his young disciple the wisdom of Buddha over the many seasons of their lives.\n\nBut don\'t let the movie\'s mysticism fool you: This South Korean/German production has created festival buzz here. Sony Pictures Classics snapped up the picture in the second week. As it is chosen to be South Korea\'s entry into the foreign-language film Oscar competition, "Spring" should become an art house hit in North America. \n\nSet against the background of this floating monastery, the picture\'s only set, the film follows the lives of a child monk and his master through four different seasons of their lives. Kim infuses these episodes with Buddhist principles, which teach kindness toward all forms of life and the goal of inner peace. Yet the world does intrude into the serene hermitage, bringing with it life\'s pleasures and sufferings. \n\nUnder the watchful gaze of an old monk (Oh Young-su), a little boy (Seo Jae-kyung) learns what sorrows his own cruelty can cause. As a teen, the boy (Kim Young-min) experiences the power of love and of lust when a young woman (Ha Yeo-jin) enters his life. Turning his back on the hermitage, he joins the world of man only to return years later, in anger and terror, when his desperate need for possession has turned to murder. Before police can arrest him, his master sees that penitence has cleared his heart and soul of all hatred. \n\nIn winter, the old monk makes his funeral pyre. Then his disciple, now a mature man (played by the director himself), returns to the sanctuary of his youth. He seeks peace and quiet so he might fulfill his destiny. When a woman brings a male baby to the temple, the monk undertakes a journey of atonement to place a holy statue on a frozen mountaintop. Now he is ready to raise and instruct a new monk. \n\nMuch of the movie is steeped in Buddhist mysticism. Each of the five episodes features a different animal -- a dog, a rooster, a cat, a snake and finally a turtle. For each season, Kim Ki-duk observes the change of weather and the relationship of man with nature. The film emphasizes the power of meditation and, in the episode concerning the murderer who seeks enlightenment, the need to perform a sutra to cleanse the heart of all jealousy and anger. \n\nKim Ki-duk keeps dialogue to a minimum and actions simple in what is virtually a two-character piece. Humor arrives organically, often resulting in hearty laughs. Backed by a terrific South Korean/German production crew, Kim Ki-duk is in total control of his material, its rhythms and its tone.\n\nSpring - Child Monk takes life of animals out of innocence\n\nA child monk ties a stone to a back of fish. Same plight awaits a frog and a snake. The child monk roams the brook in search of the fish and the frog as his punishment allotted by the old monk. \n\nSummer - Boy Monk in love learns obsession The monk is now 17 years old. To the lonely hermitage, a girl comes to convalesce. Before long, warm feelings towards the girl sprouts in the boy\'s heart. Their ripple in the water turns into an act of love.\n\nFall - Young Monk in agony of malice The boy returns to the hermitage in the mountains as a young man in his thirties after committing a murder. The old monk whips him finding the young man attempting suicide in front of the statue of Buddha. Old monk order him to etch the Pranja-parpamitasutra, meanwhile he finds peace in his heart.\n\nWinter - Mature Monk in days of enlightenment The monk, now in his full maturity retraces his steps to the abandoned hermitage in the mountains. A woman wearing a veil visits the hermitage with a baby. She leaves her baby behind and runs away. \n\nAnd then spring - Another child monk : cycle of four seasons The old monk living with another child monk is having a peaceful time in the hermitage...the circle of life keeps on. \n\nKim Gi-deok(b) has been known for making films that are involving but often difficult to watch. In his eight previous works, which include \'\'Som (The Isle),\' \'\'Nappun Namja (Bad Guy)\' and most recently \'\'Haeanson (The Coast Guard),\' Kim has taken on such controversial and agonizing topics as the life of a prostitute, the love-hate relationship of a woman and a pimp who kidnaps her, and a soldier slowly going insane. \n\nFor his new film \'\'Bom Yorum Kaul Kyoul Kurigo Bom (Spring Summer Fall Winter... and Spring),\' Kim says he tried to change the pace and outlook of his films and show a different side of himself. \n\n\'\'I feel like I\'ve been living my life in a rush, so I wanted to slow down a little and make a movie like this,\' Kim said after a press screening.\n\nThe film traces the life of a Buddhist monk as he goes from being a young orphan to an adult monk. Kim uses the passing of the seasons to parallel the monk\'s development and his experiences of desire, jealousy and rage.\n\nWith a small cast, all of \'\'Spring\' takes place in and around a temple on Chusanji Lake located in Mt. Chuwang National Park, North Kyongsang Province. A 30-ton set built specifically for the film, the temple floats like a wayward raft on the lake, accessible only by a small boat.\n\nWith the construction of the temple and the logistics of filming on water, Kim says there were a lot of people behind the film that made it possible. \'\'They made something that it seemed could not be done work,\' he says.\n\nThe floating temple was used to show \'\'the speed in which life can change, the way that one can wake up and find that East has become West and West has become East, that irony of life,\' Kim said. \n\n\'\'Spring\' also shows Kim making his debut as an actor. Kim portrays the older monk in the film\'s winter scenes, a role he originally conceived for the veteran actor Ahn Sung-ki or renowned scholar and philosopher Kim Yong-OK. Both were unavailable due to schedule conflicts.\n\nAfter deciding to take on the part himself, Kim made the already physically demanding role, which included meditating in freezing temperatures, even more so. In one scene Kim climbs up a steep mountain with a large stone tied to his waist while carrying a stone statue of a Buddha with both arms, something he admits he wouldn\'t have asked another actor to do.\n\nA devout Catholic _ Kim at one point in his life seriously considered priesthood _ the director says the film in part was driven by his relationship between his own religious values and the culture around him.\n\n\'\'All Koreans have lived surrounded by Buddhism and Buddhist culture is the foundation, which we acknowledge and accept,\' he says.\n\nAnd though the changing of the seasons in the film is to show the life of one monk, Kim says it reflects the cycle of life in general.\n\n\'\'If we were able to remember life\'s lesson from spring we wouldn\'t repeat them,\' Kim says, \'\'but like winter which rots away the leaves and freezes over everything, like the seasons\' patterns, our patterns in life will make us forget and repeat our past mistakes. \n\n\'\'This is not only a Buddhist idea but one of the facts of life.\'\n', u'0.0473847', u'This film is a good example why cinema is called an art - this is not just another movie, but a real piece of art. The pleasure of seeing it belongs to the aesthetics, and it transcends beyond the action and beyond what only happens on screen, or what the characters say and do.\n\nIt is both a simple and complex story - the story of a life, catching all seasons of development of man: innocence of childhood - so quickly lost unfortunately, mistakes of the young age, tragedies of maturity , and wisdom coming with the old age.\n\nThe film is filmed at one location of a cut-breathing beauty. Beauty of nature is being maximized by the art of the camera. The soundtrack has little dialog, but the expressiveness of the actors makes the dialog useless. You feel the drama, you do not need to hear the words, and the music says more than words.\n\nThere are a lot of symbols in this movie, and I probably lost most of them because they belong to the Budhist culture. There are however many other symbols that speak to the European spectator - the cycles of life, the rhythms of nature, the magic figure 4, like the number of seasons of the year, or like the number of parts in classic symphony, the unity of space as in Greek tragedy, and time - one life instead of one day, all give to this creation a wonderful symmetry and equilibrium.\n\nWorth seeing, this is a film that will make the delight of anybody who believes like I do that cinema is an art.', u'0.460366', u'\nAt the risk of boring you all senseless here are some observations off the top of my head. \n\nTHE HUT Representing the self. All the possessions and shelter needed is on the floating hut. When the young man can no longer live at peace and comfort in the hut then bad things transpire. He never commits lustful acts in the hut. When we seek happiness outside ourselves, we are never truly content.\n\n\nTHE DOORS The doors by the lakeside and in the hut are symbolic rather than prescriptive. The fact there are no walls means their use is not forced but elected. They represent morality and discipline. Morality is not defined by a higher power but by society and the self. By adopting the constraints the doors engender, self-discipline is attained. As soon as the young man transgresses these self-imposed boundaries, to sneak across to the young woman, then disaster follows. \n\nTHE DEAD ANIMALS The Master allows the young boy to let the animals die. He does not become an all powerful father figure, cleaning up after him, but allows him to make mistakes and suffer the consequences. Buddhism does not have a higher power but rather promotes self-awareness. \n\nTHE MILLSTONE AND BUDDHA Represent the twin stones of regret for killing the fish and the snake. What you do unto others, you do unto yourself. He has carried that karma around with him all his life until he transcends them both, carrying them to the top of the hill, near heaven. Here he cuts himself free and attains redemption through struggle. \n\nTHE MASTER Is a great teacher, but does not lecture. Hardly a word is spoken, but lessons are learned. A good teacher points the way for a student to discover self-evident knowledge for themselves. \n\nTHE MOTHER The veil, representing guilt and shame are ultimately the cause of her downfall. Hiding from the outside world can bring about ruin.\n\n\nTHE YOUNG BOY Both at the beginning and the end, represents us. A good life is attained not by the absence of bad thoughts, but rather by their mastery, so they have no hold over us. We choose our behaviour rather than it choose us. The new boy is not born without sin, but rather must walk his own path to divinity. The same actor playing the young boy show the eternal cycle of the human soul. \n\nTHE SEASONS The endless cycle of birth, growth and death. ', u'-0.136438', u'\na film of about the cycles of life, about solitude and love, innocence, corruption and redemption. stunning cinematography. lots of allusions and metaphors, as you might expect from Korean cinema. contemplative.\n\nthe story appears to centre on the life of buddhist monks living on a floating house, but as the film progresses, one sees that this is a film about the constancy within change and renewal. The female characters are not the most positive roles, representing corruption and temptation, tho also providing the means for renewal.\n\nThere are some memorable scenes not least the house in winter and the knife writing scene, this is not for those seeking martial arts action,\n\npersonally i found it slipped into one of favourite films list.\n', u'0.256435', u"\nI'm constantly amazed by the appearance of some seemingly off-the-wall piece of art that when you view it evokes a stunning effect. The simplicity of this film, its low-key action and pace, its visual surrealistic beauty, all interact to create an emotional impression that is long-lasting and thought-provoking. Korea has been somewhat slower to enter the international cinematic world and here is a film with actors whose names stir little or no recognition. For myself, who has enjoyed the Korean films I've seen before, it was a delightful surprise. The film itself is a wonderful tapestry of Korean Buddhist culture, with quiet visual beauty, simple moral themes and human passions put into a simple, homespun perspective. The remarkable natural setting which reflects the wide spectrum of Korea's seasons, which range from hot, sticky humid-fraught summers to icy, cold snow-bound winters, become a metaphor of life with unadorned figures, completely human in form. The old monk becomes a witness to the interplay of human qualities, without judgment yet with a complete and quiet moral presence. The foibles of child cruelty is met with a simple retribution which imparts a lasting lesson. Judgment is always withheld and warnings are given simply. The effect of all of this rings long and lasting, much like the impression of a delicate Korean silk print: simple in design with plain brush strokes and stylized representations of nature-- yet, lasting in impression, often to the point of being unforgettable. I buy few videos and DVDs, preferring to see things I really enjoyed again and again. But, I've ordered this one.\n", u'0.580722', u'My review after seeing it a second time follows this first one (WARNING: SECOND REVIEW HAS SPOILERS)\n\nThis beautiful film is one to see more than once -- either in the theater (or in your mind\'s eye). \n\nI found the discussion group on this film (see IMDb\'s Message Board for this film title) VERY helpful in illuminating the symbolism which I partially grasped the first time I saw it and in decoding some Buddhist principles.\n\nThe setting and the photography that captures it are strikingly beautiful and satisfying. The issues are so universally human that the Buddhist flavor provides an accent and not a barrier.\n\nThe story recounts the growth of a child into his adulthood and his eventual reclaiming of his roots and meaning. While the film deals with other Buddhist principles and symbolic elements, a central part of it very much reminds me of lines from T.S. Eliot\'s "Four Quartets" which reads (loosely remembered) \'...and the aim of all our wandering is to arrive again at the place from which we started ---- and know it for the first time...\'\n\nAs one sees one cycle end and another begin, it made me wonder about how the old monk first got there and what his life was like.\n\nSymbolic. Complex. \n\nElegantly simple. \n\nBeautiful. Evocative. \n\nHaunting. Provocative. \n\nGently touching the universal religious and the profound.\n\n10/10 \n\n=============\n\n(SPOILERS AHEAD) After 2nd time (03Mar2011):\n\nBuddhists are against hurting animals. SO why wouldn\'t a wise monk intervene when the young boy in his care was tying stones to the animals? --BEFORE they died? \n\nAnd be aware that teenagers have hormones that often steer them? \n\nThe recurring gratuitous punitiveness and pain bothered me: the monk beating the young man\'s back, the demand to carve all night 100s of characters into the wooden deck, the self-immolation, the pulling the weight up the mountain, the nude torso in winter, etc.\n\nAs if enduring pain for pain\'s sake helps anything but masochism or sadism?\n\nThe film\'s photography did remain very beautiful to me on the 2nd view.\n\n6/10', u'0.338406', u'Spring, Summer, Winter, Autumn \x85and Spring is something of a self conscious art-house film. Possibly Kim Ki-duk is trying to work off his reputation for making movies replete with violent sexual imagery, but he\'s not fooling anyone. Spring\x85 contains \x96 admittedly in a much more restrained form \x96 most of the themes from his earlier works, The Isle and Bad Guy. Onto this, however, is pasted a hefty dose of Buddhist teaching. Or, from another perspective, an interesting juxtaposition of old and new.\n\nBeginning in the Spring of an undefined year close to the present, the film is set on (and I mean, on) an isolated lake. A child acolyte lives out a life of quiet contemplation, punctuated by occasional acts of petty animal cruelty. His master, a monk, observes his young charge with increasing disapproval and orders him to undo his evil or face the consequences in his own life. It soon becomes apparent that he means this in anything but the figurative sense.\n\nMoving through the seasons, Kim explores the "cycle of life"; with his acolyte experiencing youthful love (or lust), anger, violence and finally acceptance, contrition and peace. The film ends with a new acolyte and a new cycle: implying an endless repetition with subtle variation.\n\nSpring\x85 is not exactly a subtle film, but it is beautifully done. Kim uses silence like few other filmmakers, matching Kurosawa or Bergman at their best. He punctuates these long slow movements with abrupt changes in tempo \x96 such as the arrival of Yeo. The pace quickens and the mood changes. The courtship of the adolescent boy and girl are some of the gentlest scenes in cinema (though culminating in a suitably Kim-like, energetic coupling).\n\nWith popular Buddhist and Confucian ideas now so firmly established in cinema (thanks in part to their bastardisation by George Lucas), the ideas in this film aren\'t exactly going to leave its audience in need of a large glass of perspective and soda (to quote Douglas Adams). Lust leads to possessive urges, which lead to violence; ones violent actions lead on to violence against oneself; peace (and redemption) is found not through approbation, but understanding oneself.\n\nI can\'t quite dispel the notion that The Isle, with its sly humour and darker plot is a better film, or that Spring\x85 is, if not completely then at least partially, up the bottom of its own artiness. That said, it is a very, very pretty film. Its story is intelligent, if not awe-inspiring, and it is a delightful change of pace from most modern cinema. Most of all, it is probably one of Kim\'s most accessible films, and I shall certainly be watching it again \x96 if only to see Oh Yeong-su practising his calligraphic art with the tail of a live cat. 7/10.', u'0.228394', u"I remember when I saw this film on screen last year, I was struck by the rhythm director Kim Ki-Duk used in the film. It's deliberate, too deliberate for most I'd suppose. But like a reading good piece of philosophy, the filmmaker allows the viewer to get as much as they may find in the work. The story is more of a fable than a really conventional narrative- a baby is delivered to the steps of a Buddhist house on a lake, where the boy is raised by a master. He grows up, and falls temptation to the desires of the world. He decides to leave, only to return and find himself again. In the end, as winter comes, things come full circle. Each of the 'seasons' of the film are handled delicately, with the kind of simplicity that may appeal even more to children (the segment of the first 'spring' with the child transcends religion and goes into the basic stance of nature). The scenes of finding lust in 'summer' is not terribly graphic, but it puts the point on what is right and wrong in the customs and traditions of the religion. Then in 'Autumn', there are harsher lessons to be learned, and this also contains the best acting from the old master and the young, angry pupil. And 'Winter' becomes the most meditative of them all, with next to no dialog. Indeed that may be the turn off to most viewers- to say that the film isn't supported by dialog is an under-statement. And its not necessarily documentary realism. What I sensed from the film, and what stuck with me for a few days afterward, was the spiritual attitude behind the style, the confidence that the rhythm had a connection with the subject matter. It's one of the most soulful films to come out of the Eastern world in some time. It's less a traditional drama than a unique experience, for better or worse, really more for the better.", u'0.0481501', u'\n"While the film deals with Buddhist themes and elements, I made this film without having studied anything about it at all." - Kim Ki-duk\n\nFilms that leave me feeling spiritually uplifted are often subtle and understated in their evocation of the transcendence of the human spirit. On the other hand, those that "try" to impress us about how spiritual they are often fail to achieve their desired goal. Such is the case for Spring, Summer, Fall, Winter\x85and Spring, a South Korean film by Kim Ki-duk that works hard at conveying a spiritual experience but comes across as labored and self-conscious. While the shots are beautifully composed, the film offers little more than pre-packaged enlightenment, reiterating the accepted clich\xe9s about the long and painful process, the uphill battle full of struggle and effort, and so forth.\n\nSet in monastery on Jason Pond, an artificial lake in North Kyungsang Province in Korea surrounded by a forest of ancient trees, each season represents a chapter of life and the achievement of a hard-earned lesson. An old monk (Oh Young-Soo) teaches his young charge (Kim Jong-ho) about the value of all sentient beings. After the boy playfully ties a rock to a frog, a snake, and a fish, the old master shows him what it feels like by tying a huge rock to the boy\'s back while he is sleeping. In the morning, he is told to find the animals and free them or he will have to carry a rock in his heart the rest of his life. Unable to do so, the boy grows up with a burdensome guilt.\n\nBy the following season, the young monk has become a 17-year old adolescent and is mesmerized when a beautiful teenage girl dressed in blue jeans shows up in his floating paradise, She has been brought by her mother because she is "sick" and wants the monks to "cure" her. After some time spent in prayer, the old monk tells the mother, "When she finds peace in her soul, her body will return to health." The soul cure is found pretty quickly when the young monk undoes his robe, letting us know that all women need to do to achieve health is to find a man. The old man confuses love with lust and utters such strange teaching as "lust awakens the desire to possess, and that awakens the intent to murder". When the girl is sent away following her cure, the boy also leaves the monastery and the film takes a non-Buddhist turn toward obsession and revenge until the cycle comes full circle.\n\n\nSpring, Summer, Fall, Winter\x85and Spring cultivates a mood of serenity but, from the opening moment to the final credits, it struck me as inauthentic. Buddhism is a disciplined system of mental and spiritual development designed to develop compassion and loving-kindness for all beings. Its practices include daily meditation that calms and clears the mind and allows us to gain a clearer sense of who we really are. This does not guarantee that we will never make mistakes but it is not credible to me that a boy raised from birth in the Buddhist tradition would be capable not only of cruelty to animals but to other human beings as well. At the end of the film I felt neither moved, uplifted, or even involved. If enlightenment means to lighten up, the best medicine for this sort of hokum is to laugh gently. After all, this too will pass. There is a cycle to everything -- even bad movies about spirituality.\n', u'-0.047388', u'This story of the life cycle of a Buddhist monk and an apprentice living in near isolation on a floating pagoda in the middle of a lake is beautifully filmed. The images and music create a distinct mood - the scenes of the apprentice doing T\'ai Chi (?) on the snow and ice are poetic. But I had some real problems with the story.\n\nFirst, some technical concerns. Many scenes seemed contrived or not believable. For example, when the old monk ties the stone on the sleeping child, can it be believed that the kid would not wake? Or that he would not notice his new burden sometime during the night? The interior of the pagoda was exceedingly sparse, but no end of things kept coming out of it: ropes, stones, ice chisels, clothes, paints, and so forth. The doorway in the middle of the empty room irritated me every time someone felt obligated to walk through it when walking around it would have been much easier. How did these people earn their living? In thinking about the scene where the apprentice is hanging from the ceiling in a sling on the end of a rope with a candle burning under the support, I wondered just what the mechanics were of arranging that. The old monk seemed pretty weak, too weak to tie the apprentice up and hoist him several feet into the air. And what was supporting the rope from the ceiling? Was there a pulley up there? How was the rope affixed to its ceiling support? Where did that aluminum can come from that the police were shooting at? It was the only item ever to mar the pristine beauty of the lake, and at just the appropriate time. And the old monk was able to flick a stone and hit it on the first try? And he just happened to have a small pebble in his hand right then? Painting all those carved characters with a cat\'s tail would require a mighty patient cat. And where did all those colored paints come from? The hole that the apprentice chipped into the ice was nowhere big enough for the woman to fall through. And so on.\n\nNow that I have run through some of the petty concerns of a literalist, I can move on to what really bothered me about this story. The overall message appears to be that isolating yourself from society is the path to some higher state. Even if that were true, it seems like a selfish goal. Much more challenging and useful is to attain balance in the midst of the chaos that is living in the world. The old monk utters the words, "Lust awakes the desire to possess. And that awakens the intent to murder," as if to express some deep insight. However, it is the rare person who has not experienced lust, but only a tiny percentage of those ever have an intent to kill. These words from the wise man seem patently false. But, in the context of this film the words have a more potentially worrisome significance. Perhaps the import of the words carried such weight for the apprentice that the intimation planted in the mind effected the deed. The lessons meted out by the master seemed exceedingly harsh. If tying a stone to a snake were to kill the snake and the snake were to die, then the kid would have to carry that burden with him for life? What a traumatic thing to say to an innocent kid. If as a kid I had had a super moralist following my every move, as this kid did, I would have gone nuts. I found the sadomasochistic beating to be disturbing and repellent. And what is the deal with the worshiping of icons? I though the sacred was in the mind and not in physical objects? If everybody were to absorb the teachings of the master, then our race would soon die out since sex seems to be avoided at all cost. I have found that an intense day of tedious activity indeed produces exhaustion, as did the apprentice, but it never seemed to be a path to the catharsis and peace that the apprentice experienced after his ordeal. And the master could beckon an empty boat to him or impede the rowing of two vigorous men by force of mind? Give me a break.\n\nThere is too much Eastern philosophy and mysticism here for this Western viewer.', u'-0.213491', u"'Spring, Summer, Autumn - (or Fall, if you will)- Winter\x85and Spring' is, as the title should imply, a fable very much in the 'cycle of life' cache, so simply crafted and yet so flowing with gentle complexity at the same time. It works wonders both as an episodic coming of age saga concerning one man's life-long quest for inner peace and balance, and a refreshing type of character study where actions and physical mannerisms are thrust more attention than words; the dialogue here is minimal, yet the two key characters still display a surprising amount of depth - every subtle tear and drop of sweat adds up - and I found myself completely drawn in by it. The background settings are as delightfully picturesque as background settings come, and the movie's pacing is both gradual and thoughtful, while still leaving room for some slight drizzles of drama, and a handful of haunting, even harrowing, moments which capture the rougher side of living, but nothing to detract from the overall calming sensation you're left with. The result is a seriously unique slice of life and inspiration, and hats off to Ki-duk Kim for it.\n\nOverall, things are left ambiguous enough for us viewers to draw our own merry conclusions, and so rich in all those little minor details which build up the bigger picture that you could spend hours assessing them right down to the very last shade of blue, and dissecting each and everything for all the symbolism and abstract concepts they might embody. It's one of those flicks that has different meanings to different people, I guess. Personally, I'd be happy enough taking it on its direct face value level - things are what they are, they're there because they're there, and what you're seeing is exactly what you get. Cast all possible symbolism aside and it's still a perfectly effective offering about the trials and triumphs of one man's life. And yes, this particular life's complicated enough without all those itty-bitty extra meanings.\n\nThe Holy Man's ever-changing assortment of animal companions are probably the best example. We go through the various seasons always with a puppy, chicken, cat, snake or tortoise successively at our sides, and viewers are liable fill up an entire message board debating whether it's the positive or negative aspects of our protagonist they're meant to symbolize - the chicken being lust and brashness, and the puppy being youthful ignorance, the cat being idleness, etc.\n\nBut really, their exact species, in most cases, is pretty incidental - their reason for being there doesn't need to be anything more complicated than simply to emphasize time and the changes it entails. A different animal with every new 'season' further marks the shift in time since our last visit to the temple. Note also that the snake arrives on the scene exactly as the older man departs (you don't really need to be familiar with Buddhist practices to follow this one, although it might be helpful to know that apparently that is actually an established self-cremating ritual which comes of knowing the exact moment of your death in advance, and not a suicide by any means), and you can take it as a hint that it may well be his reincarnated self (it's lovely BTW to finally find a flick where snakes are represented in a positive frame). In light of that, isn't it also kinda tempting to subscribe to the possibility that the remaining four could also be the reincarnated souls of the temple's former residents, whoever they might be? That notion satisfies me a lot more than that of the chicken just standing in for some hot burning passion, or whatever.\n\nThen there's the mysterious woman who arrives at the temple with a cloth covering her face. And that's all she really is - a mysterious woman who arrives at the temple with a cloth covering her face. Her exact identity isn't revealed, and nor does it have to be. And we don't really have any means of working it out either, so why worry about that? It is clear though that she's a desperate person in such dire straits that she's forced to conceal her real identity and depart ways with her son, and we can still feel for her on that.\n\nIn short, this film is what you make of it, and it more or less goes without saying that it only becomes a complicated puzzle if you make it one.\n\nMy own personal quest for inner peace still continues but, needless to say, this movie provided me with 103 beautiful minutes of escapism and bliss.", u'0.29683', u'After watching the movie a second time, I was determined to find out what the Old Monk had drawn on the deck of the hermitage. The only clue I had was the scene\'s subtitle: "Prajnaparamita Sutra \x96 it helps restore inner peace." Those were the words the Old Monk used to describe the sacred teachings that the Young Monk had to carve out as penance for his crime of passion. When I looked up the Prajnaparamita Sutra on the internet, I found out it was known as the Diamond Sutra of the Buddha. \n\nThe Buddha spoke the wise words in a monastery near Sravasti, saying that "this sutra should be called the Diamond that cuts through illusion because it has the capacity to cut through illusions and afflictions and bring us to the shore of liberation." There are 32 sutras or sections, and the 32 sections are also "marks" that are used to meditate on "the Tathagata" \x96 which means "the suchness of all things (dharmas)." The meaning of Tathagata is "does not come from anywhere and does not go anywhere." The insight into the truth of the sutras consists in a realization that "the idea of a self is not an idea, and the ideas of a person, a living being, and a life span are not ideas either." A self-realized or awakened "Buddha" is called a Buddha because he/she is free of ideas.\n\nThe "Buddha" in the Diamond Sutra is also called the World-Honored One, and his message can be summarized by two axioms: (1) "Someone who looks for me in form or seeks me in sound is on a mistaken path and cannot see the Tathagata." (2) "All composed things are like a dream, a phantom, a drop of dew, a flash of lightning. That is how to meditate on them, that is how to observe them." \n\nNow I will have to watch the movie a third time and meditate on the 32 marks that the Old Monk draws with the cat\'s tail on the floor of the ashram. I will also feel the urge to count and see if there are really 32 marks.', u'-0.0471849'], u'tt0440963': [u"I don't hand out ten star ratings easily. A movie really has to impress me, and The Bourne Ultimatum has gone far beyond that. Furthermore, this trilogy has come together so nicely, that I believe it to be one of the greatest motion picture trilogies of our time. Though all three films could not be any more different from the Ludlum novels, they still stand as a powerful landmark in cinematic achievement. The Bourne Ultimatum made me want to cry that the series was complete, yet I could not even attempt to stop smiling for hours.\n\nFrom the moment that the opening title appeared, I knew we were in for a ride. Paul Greengrass has done it again. Everything we love from the previous Bourne films is here once again: the action, the dialogue, and of course the shaky camera. However for me, that last one was never a problem. I think it adds to the suspense.\n\nI will be back to see this film several times before it is released on DVD, simply because it is genius. It is a perfectly satisfying conclusion, and should stand the test of time as a fantastic movie, and altogether, an unforgettable trilogy.", u'0.266421', u"The Bourne Ultimatum (2007) Review: After a thrilling set of two, we get the final installment. Here's my take:\n\nThe Bourne Ultimatum has it all. We have Jason Bourne(Matt Damon) on the coattails of the ones who know everything. He has been running for too long. This time, it ends.\n\nThe Bourne Ultimatum has a great plot, awesome writing, fantastic direction, suspense, and some of the best action of the summer. Matt Damon delivers possibly his best performance to date. He has the conviction and swelling desire of the troubled assassin.\n\nThere are some intelligent humor here and some fine suspense. The reactions to certain events will have you either laughing(in a good way) or cheering on. (or both) I heard a lot of intelligent laughter in the theater and lots of clapping. The audience was loving it.\n\nThe Bourne Ultimatum delivers all in a nicely gift-wrapped package. All of the goods and then some. This is, in my opinion the best movie this summer.\n\nThe Last Word: Excellent conclusion. The best of the trilogy. This is how summer movie thrillers should be done. I love the Bourne trilogy.", u'0.503178', u"This is the first 10 out of 10 that I've given any movie. What made this movie so good for me? Constant action - there isn't any slow parts, great acting, smart writing. I also liked the filming style where the shakiness and different angles just made it feel like you are a part of the scene. Finally, I get to see an action movie that doesn't try to please all sectors of the public (i.e. there's no forced romance).\n\nI liked the first two Bourne movies, but I loved this one.\n\nWarning - after watching this movie, you will be full of adrenaline and you may want to calm down a bit before driving your car!", u'0.640605', u'Jason Bourne sits in a dusty room in with blood on his hands, trying to make sense of what he\'s just done. Meanwhile, a CIA chief in NYC outlines the agency\'s response to what\'s just happened on screen. An American flag stands proudly on the centre of his desk in the foreground of the shot, but as he speaks, it slips out of focus as his plan veers into morally dubious territory, as if it doesn\'t want to be associated with the course of action the government man decides is necessary in the interests of national security.\n\nThis shot effectively captures the mood of the film. As well as portraying Bourne\'s quest to find out how he became Jason Bourne, Ultimatum is also an examination of the human costs of the measures taken to protect us in the interests of stability and security.\n\nIt is also probably the best film you\'ll see in the cinema this year. \n\nIt\'s just so intense. Bourne says to Simon Ross (Considine) "This isn\'t some newspaper story, this is real" and in the audience you almost believe him. The camera shakes, but remains steady enough for you to see everything and feel like you\'re there with Bourne as he tries to elude his pursuers, and the performances are so good that these guys seem as though they are the characters they\'re portraying, instead of just being actors performing well-written roles. The action scenes are so brutally fast-paced and well choreographed that they seem instinctive instead of planned to the minutest movement; the stunt-work is nothing short of amazing.\n\nThe pacing is just incredible. It keeps driving forward towards its conclusion, but not so fast that it leaves you struggling to piece together the plot; the script delivers the information you need as quickly and clearly as possible before moving on to the next tense action set-piece. While they\'re often simple (the Waterloo sequence is essentially just a man on a phone being watched by a man on a phone) they\'re charged with such dramatic intensity that you can\'t take your eyes off them. The film is just so focused on powering forwards that you can\'t help being swept along by it.\n\nWith its intense action set-pieces, brilliantly paced storyline, and intelligent examination of the decisions made in the name of national security, the Bourne series is one that accurately captures the ambiguities of our age. Ultimatum is its peak.', u'0.239242', u"I have never been one to shy away from saying that most action films just plain do nothing for me. Most times they are blatant vehicles to blow stuff up, show off sexy models, and throw any semblance of reality or intelligence out the window. With that said, the Bourne series has been fantastic. Doug Liman ushered in a new take on action by using a more cinema verite style, showing the fights in full force and making our super spy someone we can relate to emotionally as well as humanly. This is not the sci-fi absurdity that was Bond (before they did an overhaul in the style of this series no less). There was a lot to worry for when the Bourne Supremacy came out. With director Paul Greengrass taking over, what could have been a second-hand copy of the original ended up being an improvement in style and flair. The stakes were raised and the story was enhanced because of it. Greengrass needs to be given a ton of credit for being able to keep up appearances with the latest installment, The Bourne Ultimatum. In what is an amazing conclusion to a top-notch trilogy, the action is brought to a new level and story and performance are never compromised.\n\nOnce again, Bourne is brought into the minds of the CIA by false pretenses. Someone has leaked information about the Treadstone upgrade called Blackbriar and once Bourne is located trying to converse with the newswriter who broke the story, he is assumed to be the mole. Only Pamela Landy, she who was on the case to find him in Supremacy, knows that he can't be the one. Bourne's motive has always been to stay clear of the government and live his life in peace. It has been the CIA who keeps bringing him back into the open to wreak havoc on them. What ends up transpiring is that Bourne wants to know the source as well to finally find out the truth of who he is and what made him into a killer. The film, then, becomes a chase against time and each other to find the source and see if the government can close the breach and tie off all loose ends, or if Bourne can get his revenge on those who took his life from him.\n\nIn what is probably the simplest storyline of the series, with only one chase lasting the entirety of the story, it has possibly the biggest cast of characters and turning over of loyalties to expose the corruption that has been behind the full story progression. This is not a detriment at all, however, as it allows for more fights and car chases that work in full context to the plot. Admission to this film is worth it for the apartment fight, between Bourne and the CIA's second asset, alone. The chase jumping through windows in Madrid is cool on its own, but when they finally meet up, we get a ten minute or so fight that is as invigorating to watch as any scene you'll see. Also, rather than using a massive car chase as a climatic set piece like in the first two films, we instead get around three small scale road races, just as intense, but staggered enough to never bog the action down into monotony.\n\nAfter five years of waiting, we also find out the origin of our favorite operative with heart and feeling. By the end of the film we will find out what has been the cause of all the espionage and destruction that has taken place around him. No one could have done it better than Matt Damon. He has the physique and attitude to be believable in the action sequences, but also the range to pull off the moments of intelligence and cat and mouse correspondence with those against him. Joan Allen reprises her role with the same amount of dedication to her job, but also a bit more disenchantment for what is going on around her after how Brian Cox's character, from the first two films, took matters into his own hands. Needing a role in that mold, we are given a nice turn from David Strathairn. Like Cox, he is working at the top of the food chain and answers to no one when making a decision. With as much trying to cover up any connections to his bosses of the Blackbriar program as he is trying to do his duty to his country, you can never quite gauge what he will be capable of doing. Even the little guys do a wonderful job, like Paddy Considine as the reporter who starts the leak at the center of everything, Albert Finney as a man from Bourne's past and possibly key to his origin, and Edgar Ramirez as one of the CIA's operatives sent to take Bourne out. Ramirez is a nice addition to the role that has been successfully played by Clive Owen (Identity), Karl Urban, and Martin Csokas (Supremacy). He doesn't talk much, if at all, but he has the look and robotic efficiency down pat and hopefully will get more roles to show what he can do post a nice turn in Domino.\n\nIn the end, one has to applaud Paul Greengrass for continuing to exceed expectations and bring this series to a conclusion that builds on the success of its predecessors rather than destroy them. His skill at the close-up hand-held look is astonishing and has the same kinetic energy as Tony Scott, but without quite the seizure-inducing cuts. Rather than feel like over- production, his use of hand-held enhances the environment and puts you directly into the action. Let's also credit cinematographer Oliver Wood, who shot all three Bourne films. He was able to work with both directors and work his style into a nice harmony with them.", u'0.0446332', u"When the Bourne Identity arrived five years ago I have to confess that I didn't think much of it. At the time I was eleven years old, so perhaps I was too young to really get into the storyline and understand the whole scenario. Two years ago when the Bourne Supremacy arrived I thought it was a better movie than Identity but still didn't think it was as good as I expected it to be judging by the trailers. Over the past two years I had been told numerous times that the Bourne movies were amazing, many a time I had to bite my tongue and not say what I really thought about the movies. Until two months ago I couldn't have given a damn about the Bourne Ultimatum, I really had no intentions of watching it. But then I decided to go back and re-watch the first two before I came to any abrupt decisions. So I went out and bought both the original movies. And what a surprise it was to me when I was gripped by them. Identity I found the superior of the two, but Supremacy isn't far behind. They're both slick, action packed and thrilling pieces of cinema that I have watched numerous times since I bought them. Because of this I was first in line today to see the Bourne Ultimatum. And boy did Bourne Ultimatum not disappoint! \n\nMatt Damon was never one of my favourite actors until he appeared in the Bourne movies, I'd seen him in the Talented Mr Ripley, but I never thought much of him in general. However, it appears he was born to play Bourne (pardon the pun). Throughout this series we have seen the character change before our very eyes, in this movie we see Matt Damon at his very best, even better than he was in The Departed and I thought he was one of the best things in The Departed. You really do find yourself caring for the character and hoping that he finds out everything. Matt Damon plays the role with a quiet intensity and you always find his character extremely believable. The supporting cast of the movie were also absolutely outstanding. Joan Allen was one of my favourite things in Bourne Supremacy, here she excels herself. Her character is also very believable and she has some superbly acted moments towards the end of the movie. Julia Stiles turns up again as Nicky and finally we learn a bit about her character. Julia Stiles is a very underrated actress and I think she deserves a lot more roles, well decent roles, than she gets. David Strathairn is a newcomer to this series as Noah Vosen, he's definitely the bad guy of the movie and he really excels. He's definitely the nastiest character we've met, and some of the decisions he makes are truly nasty. Strathairn relishes the role and he too gets some superb scenes in the movie. Special mention must also go to Albert Finney who makes the most of his all too brief screen time, I will not say anything about the character, that's best left as a surprise, but trust me his scenes are some of the highlights of the movie.\n\nThe Bourne movies have always had a strict focus on the storyline more than the action sequences, this isn't to say the trilogy lacks action sequences, good god no there's loads of them dotted all throughout the movies. But running throughout the movie is a very well written and well acted storyline. This storyline concludes in the best way imaginable in this movie. As I watched Supremacy the night before I saw Ultimatum it was nice because I could notice certain little parts. That very final scene in Supremacy, in New York, a lot more important that I ever imagined at the time. Won't spoil it for people but I recommend checking up on Supremacy before you see Ultimatum. Unfortunately though for a lot of people they will go to see Ultimatum purely because of the action sequences. This is the part where I should condemn such people and say they should see it for the storyline, but I'd be lying if I didn't say that my favourite parts of the Bourne series as a whole are the car chases. The mini car chase in Identity is one of my favourite car chases of all time. Well the action in Ultimatum has to be the best of the Bourne series. In fact the movie kicks off with an action sequence in Moscow. So in the duration of the movie we get numerous punch ups, all very violent and shockingly brutal. A bike chase that is absolutely amazing, many foot chases which are even more amazing, a thrilling car chase that is unforgettable, and oh so much more! But the highlight for me has to be the scene in Waterloo station, won't ruin it but for some reason had me gripped.\n\nSo any flaws for the movie? In my eyes no, but if you are not a fan of the Bourne series or have not seen the previous two then I wouldn't recommend Ultimatum for you. The movie doesn't try to win over any new fans as it sticks to what the franchise does best and just adds a nice bit more storyline and action sequences on top. The Bourne Ultimatum is undoubtedly the best of the series and the best blockbuster of 2007. As a James Bond fanatic it is a great honour for me to say that Ultimatum is a lot better than a majority of the Bond movies, and trust me it takes a lot for me to say that. While Bourne as a whole might not be a better franchise than the Bond series, it is definitely nearly its equal.", u'0.205101', u'"The Bourne Ultimatum" begins recklessly mid-chase and in pulse-pounding fashion explodes from there as Jason Bourne (Matt Damon, absolutely superb) tracks down the masterminds behind the CIA black-ops that turned him into the perfect killer in a final attempt to learn his true identity. A devastatingly icy David Strathairn as the "man behind the curtain" is added to the returning cast of regulars including Joan Allen (excellent) and Julia Stiles (non-existent).\n\nLike the second entry in the series, I wished Paul Greengrass\' shaky hand-held camera would go static at least for the few minutes of downtime. However, that being said, it\'s a perfect way to capture the tense, claustrophobic feel of the intimate hand-to-hand-combat scenes and works equally well in the chase scenes which are mostly on foot and across rooftops with the occasional big car pile-up. Part of the fun of the Bourne series is the constant globe-hopping and manipulation of technology and communications that seem to defy the laws of physics and current capabilities. The Bourne films seem to exist in some sort of gritty hyper-reality that is full of technological-based magic. It makes no sense that everyone seems to be just in the right place at the right time, but I\'ll be damned if it isn\'t a blast to watch them get there.\n\nWith the absence of the emotive and involving Franka Potente, the writers attempt to create some emotional connection between Damon and Stiles, but she is so blank-faced an actress it never really leads to anything. Still, this can be forgiven, for unlike the "Identity" and the "Supremacy", this "Ultimatum" reveals all and we finally learn the truth about Bourne\'s past. It\'s an entertaining and satisfying conclusion to the series, and if they have any good sense, and Damon gets his wish, this will be the perfect end to it.', u'0.298052', u"Having not seen the previous two in the trilogy of Bourne movies, I was a little reluctant to watch The Bourne Ultimatum.\n\nHowever it was a very thrilling experience and I didn't have the problem of not understanding what was happening due to not seeing the first two films. Each part of the story was easy to understand and I fell in love with The Bourne Ultimatum before it had reached the interval! I don't think I have ever watched such an exquisitely made, and gripping film, especially an action film. Since I usually shy away from action and thriller type movies, this was such great news to me. Ultimatum is one of the most enthralling films, it grabs your attention from the first second till the last minute before the credits roll.\n\nMatt Damon was simply fantastic as his role as Jason Bourne. I've heard a lot about his great performances in the Bourne 1+2, and now, this fabulous actor has one more to add to his list. I look forward to seeing more of his movies in the future.\n\nThe stunts were handled with style - each one was done brilliantly and I was just shocked by the impressiveness of this movie. Well done.", u'0.330981', u"Paul Greengrass definitely saved the best Bourne for last! I've heard a lot of people complain about they way he filmed this movie, and some have even compared the camera style to the Blair Witch Project. All I have to say to that is...are you kidding me? Come on it was not that bad at all. I think it helps the action scenes to feel more realistic, which I would prefer over highly stylized stunt choreography. As for the rest of the movie I really didn't even notice it.\n\nYou can tell that Damon has really gotten comfortable with the role of Jason Bourne. Sometimes that can be a bad thing, but in this case its a really good thing. He really becomes Jason Bourne in this installment. Damon also has a great supporting cast in Joan Allen, Ezra Kramer, and Julia Stiles. David Strathairn was a great addition to the cast, as he added more depth to the secret CIA organization.\n\nEven though the movie is filled with great car chases and nonstop action, they managed to stick a fair amount of character development in their with all of that going on. This film stands far above the other two Bourne movies, and is definitely one of the best movies of the 2007 summer season!", u'0.307361', u"I will begin by saying I am very pleased with this climax of the Bourne trilogy. Please, oh please don't ruin it by doing a sequel years from now or a prequel. Just leave it alone. Right..moving on.As talented and versatile as Matt Damon is...it seems as though he was just meant to play Jason Bourne.\n\nIf you are a fan of the first two Bourne movies, you will not be disappointed by the third installment. It sticks to what works and adds a little more. I was very pleased to see how well all the information we obtain in 'Identity' and 'Supremacy' all mesh in 'Ultimatum' to finally paint the full picture of Jason Bourne's troubled past. The action sequences are fast paced and keeps you on the edge of your seat. The fights between Bourne and the assassins are always fun to watch. I have always been a fan of movies surrounding CIA agents and how the CIA gather their Intel and this movie is right up that street, making it even more exciting for me.\n\nIf you choose to watch The Bourne Ultimatum without watching the previous 2 installments..you will still thoroughly enjoy the movie but I would still recommend you watch them first. This would allow you to fully understand the character Jason Bourne and become attached and be a part of his world. This allows you to appreciate and enjoy the movie even more. I'm not sure which is the better of the first 2 but I personally think 'Ultimatum' might, just MIGHT, have the edge when comparing the trilogy.", u'0.354802', u"The final installment in the action thriller franchise is just that probably the hardest hitting of the three films. It goes further to play the anti-Bond theme. Bourne doesn't like what he is doing and wants to know about his blurry past. Everything about this film hits it on the nail from the cinematography to choreography/stunt work to the script to acting.\n\nThe film starts out in a flurry as Bourne is running from the Moscow police. The story seems to pick up right where the first film left off. Or does it? The time is a little muddled here, but we get the fact that Bourne is remembering things. A sudden flashback while trying to clean himself up nearly gets him caught, but he makes it and doesn't kill anyone. They aren't his target. From there we get more of the intrigue of his past with a new player, Noah Vosen, who seems to know everything about Bourne and will protect it at all costs. Pamela Landy is back as well as Nicky Parsons who seems to have a past with Bourne as well.\n\nThe cinematography is in your face following tight on practically everything. The car chase is even more intense if that seems possible than the ones from the first two. And the veteran cast chasing Bourne is superb with a nice part by Albert Finney. It also has slight political overtones in relationship to rendition and other government policies, but that is minor and integrated very well within the plot. All in all this is the best of the trilogy conclusions this year, if not the best action trilogy ever.", u'-0.193438', u'How sheep-like the movie going public so often proves to be. As soon as a few critics say something new is good (ie - "Shake-Cam"), everyone jumps on the bandwagon, as if they are devoid of independent thought. This was not a good movie, it was a dreadful movie. 1) Plot? - What plot? Bourne was chased from here to there, from beginning to end. That\'s the plot. Don\'t look for anything deeper than this. 2) Cinematography? - Do me a favor! Any 7 year old armed with an old and battered 8mm movie camera would do a far better job (I am not exaggerating here). This film is a tour-de-force of astonishingly amateurish camera-work. The ridiculous shaking of EVERY (I really do mean every) scene will cause dizziness and nausea. 3) Believable? - Oh yes definitely. This is a masterpiece of credibility. I loved scenes about Bourne being chased by (local) police through the winding market streets of Tangier. - I\'ve BEEN to Tangier. Even the guides can\'t navigate their way through those streets but Bourne shook off 100 police with speed and finesse. Greengrass must be laughing his head off at the gullibility of his film disciples. 4) Editing? - I don\'t know what the editor was on when he did this film but I want some! - Every scene is between 0.5 and 2 seconds. I felt nauseous at the end of the film from the strobe effect of the "scenes" flashing by. 5) Directing? - Hmmm. This is an interesting aspect. The film appears to have actually NOT had any directing. More a case of Greengrass throwing a copy of the script (all two pages) at the cameramen and told to "shoot a few scenes whilst drunk". - "Don\'t worry boys, we\'ll tie the scenes together in the editing room". The editor should be tarred, feathered and put in the stocks for allowing this monstrosity to hit the silver screen 6) Not one but TWO senior CIA operatives giving the tender feminine treatment to the mistreated and misunderstood Jason Bourne. - Putting their lives on the line for someone they couldn\'t even be sure wasn\'t a traitor. Talk about stupid nincompoops. (Whilst the evil male CIA members plot to terminate any operative who so much as drops a paper-clip on the floor). (well, all men are evil, aren\'t they? - Except for SNAGS of course). Yes, this really is a modern and politically correct film that shows the females to be the heroes of the day and the oppressive males as the real threat to humanity. 7) When the you-know-what finally hits the fan, good triumphs over evil (just like it always does, eh?) and the would-be assassin gets the drop on Jason Bourne - he suddenly undergoes a guilt trip and refrains from pulling the trigger (Yeah - right...) - at that very moment, the evil deputy director just happens to turn up - gun in hand and he does pull the trigger. - How did this 60 year old man run so fast and not even be out of breath? Wonders will never cease 8) Don\'t worry, there\'s a senate hearing and the baddies get pulled up before the courts. Well, we can\'t have nasty, politically incorrect, CIA operatives going round shooting people, can we? How lovely to see a true to life P.C. film of the Noughties. -------------The Bourne Ultimatum is utter rubbish.', u'-0.236347', u'First and foremost, speaking as no fan of the genre, "The Bourne Ultimatum" is a breathtaking, virtuoso, superb action movie.\n\nSecondly, it is a silly malarky of cartoonish super-hero stuff.\n\nThirdly, the film carries a complex, important point, about crime-fighters turning into criminals themselves. No reference is made to Abu Ghraib or the Executive Branch\'s outrageous domestic assaults on constitutional rights, none is necessary.\n\nSo, the latest in the "Bourne" series, in the hands of Paul Greengrass (of the 2004 "Bourne Supremacy" and last year\'s "United 93"), is a significant achievement, perhaps held back but not actually diminished by the unavoidable excesses of the genre.\n\n"Breathtaking" above is meant both as a complimentary adjective and a description of the physical sensation: for more than an hour from the first frame, the viewer seemingly holds his breath, pushed back against the chair by the force of relentless, globe-trotting, utterly suspenseful action. There is no letup, no variation in the rhythm and pull of the film, and yet it never becomes monotonous and tiresome the way some kindred music videos do after just a couple of minutes.\n\nOliver Wood\'s in-your-face cinematography is making the best of Tony Gilroy\'s screenplay from Robert Ludlum\'s 1990 novel (which doesn\'t stack up well against the "Bourne Identity," written a decade earlier).\n\nMatt Damon is once again the inevitable, irreplaceable Bourne, the deadliest of fantasy CIA agents, this time taking on the entire agency in search of his identity, his past, and the mysterious agency program that has turned him into a killing machine. Nothing like his quietly heroic Edward R. Murrow, the always-marvelous David Strathairn is the nasty top agency official, pitched against Bourne in trying to hide some illegal "take-no-prisoners" policies and brutal procedures.\n\nJoan Allen plays what appears to be the Good Cop against Strathairn\'s Bad One. And, there is Julia Stiles as the agent once again coming to Bourne\'s aid; a combination of Greengrass\' direction and Stiles acting results in a surprising impact by a mostly silent character, her lack of communication and blank expression more intriguing than miles of dialogue.\n\nSo good is "The Bourne Ultimatum" that it gets away with the old one-man-against-the-world bit, this time stretched to ridiculous excesses, as Bourne defies constraints of geography, time, gravity... and physics in general. (Can you fly backwards with a car from the top of a building? Why not - it looks great.) \n\nAll this "real-world" magic - leaping from country to country in seconds, to arrive at some unknown location exactly as, when, and how needed - outdoes special-effect and superhero cartoon improbabilities. And yet, only a clueless pedant would allow "facts" interfere with the entertainment-based ecstasy of the Bourne fantasy.', u'-0.17893', u'The Bourne Ultimatum - Jason Bourne (Matt Damon in his best role ever), the newest spy kid on the block, brings his quest for his identity to a close as he also seeks to end the CIA\'s latest program "Blackbriar" to make super assassins like himself.\n\nI was so psyched for this one that I watched it\'s predecessors yesterday and today. Identity was as brilliant as I recall and Supremacy remains the weak (but still enjoyable) link in the chain for the weakest plot and, aside from a car chase which this film\'s chase easily tops, slight lacking in action and suspense.\n\nHoo boy, does Ultimatum have suspense! Even when you know Bourne will escape the authorities (and boy do these films spotlight the police as inept), it\'s still brilliant watching him do it. It\'s mind-boggling to think that two guys with handguns and mopeds can create 10x more suspense than anything those $150 million giant robots did in Transformers.\n\nChalk it up to Paul Greengrass, who has this idiosyncratic style of shooting stedicam a la documentary, even though he\'s filming characters that are far from ordinary, in places like CIA headquarters where no one within 10 miles would be allowed with a camcorder. He seemed to listen to my various complaints with Supremacy, as the action in Ultimatum is nothing less than awe-inspiring, with various implements used as weapons being a candlestick, a hardcover book (I\'ll never look at those the same way again) and an electric fan (Don\'t ask). The music also helped generate much suspense, and there was hardly ever a moment to not nail-bite over.\n\nThe acting is good, and the evolution of Julia Stiles\' character "Nicky" put her situation into a new highly sympathetic light. Damon plays his signature role with reserve but competency (which sounds minor but that it genuinely looks like Matt Damon could evade the CIA and Interpol is something), but noticeable moments of poignancy as he still struggles to find his humanity. This longing of his for a real life could get boring, and almost did in Supremacy, but just works better in Ultimatum (better script). \n\nI am reminded of a scene in "Goldeneye" (the only good Pierce Brosnan Bond film) in which Sean Bean\'s character asks James if the martinis ever silence the screams of all the men he\'s killed. Bourne regrets all the people he killed, and he considers (or at least made me consider) the meaning of action without purpose, life without meaning, and how the government has transformed men into resources. Albeit, resources that know Krav Maga and can make weapons out of anything.\n\nSidenote: it\'s always bothered me that, despite being a superspy and hunted by the CIA, Interpol, and the police nearly ANYWHERE he goes, that Bourne never thought to make even the smallest attempts to disguise his features or forge some new passports. Sunglasses maybe? \n\nIf you have a pulse and love action movies, than Bourne Ultimatum is for you. Hell, it\'s probably the best action film to come out this year. Of course, you\'d be a fool to see it without watching the others first. It kind of drags a touch near the end, but I almost feel tempted to overlook that. This is the first "3" movie this summer to at least match, if not exceed, the original and that is saying something.\n\nA-', u'-0.0779452', u'Im going to keep this fairly brief as to not spoil anything for you. This movie is awesome. From beginning to end, it is filled with genuine thrills. The fight scenes are fantastic, the chase scenes are enthralling, and it moves at such a pace that it really only felt slow toward the end when things are explained, but that is only because everything that preceded it. Damon shines and really has proved a very solid actor, daring you not to believe him in this role. He is this role. A welcome addition to the series in David Straithrain (hope i spelled that close to right) as a seedy CIA agent out to kill Bourne. This is non stop and will truly leave you on the edge of your seat for most of the way. Some things toward the end are just a smidgeon preposterous, thus negating a 10 rating. The ending is left open for sequels and I sure hope that they consider doing more of these, for none have been bad. Excellent film all in all and a fantastic ending to an amazing trilogy.\n\nP.S. The shaky cam did not hurt any of the action, but I still think we could do without it. The good news is, you only really notice it when people are talking and not so much the action.', u'0.0985835'], u'tt0112471': [u"\nWhat an incredibly brave and honest look at relationships. I've have never seen a film so precisely and brilliantly capture this kind of emotion and transfer it to the screen the way Before Sunrise does. What a crime that neither Ethan Hawke or Julie Delpy was nominated for any major acting awards, actually screw that! What a crime it was that they didn't both sweep every major acting award altogether and that Richard Linklater didn't get any recognition for the screenwriting or brilliant directing of his wonderful actors! Loved the ending (as much as it pained me at the same time), loved how after it all they go back and show every location that the couple shared together. Loved how the dialogue never wavers, never addressing the relationship directly but allows us to indirectly see a geniune bond forming through the body language, facial expressions, and the dialogue, ooooohhh the dialogue. Every bit of it plucked right from those top ten late night conversations we've all had with close friends whether it was serious or in jest. And respect to Linklater for keepin it real, the movie was rated R cause of a couple minor swear words? Could of easily been removed without really desecrating the film but he keeps it in anyways. Screw you hollywood, your 'romantic comedies', your Freddie Prinze Jr.'s, your 'take the glasses off the girl and now she's pretty' movies. This is real romance! This is what I come to the movies for, to think, to be provoked and to be swept away by the magic that only cinema can provide. Before Sunrise has single-handedly reminded me about why I goto the movies......\n", u'0.386137', u'\n   This has to be one of the most sincere and touching boy-meets-girl movies  ever made. While "Rebel Without a Cause" and "Say Anything" deliver nice  portrayals, this movies strips down useless subplots and Hollywood  divergences. This movie focuses purely on watching the budding of a  beautiful romance. You never doubt for a second that the film will lead  towards the romantic pairing of these two people. You almost immediately  sense the synergy and the chemistry between Jesse and Celine, and it is  simply pure joy to watch them find it. This movie is mostly all dialogue -based. But, every conversation between these too is greatly intriguing.  What makes this pairing so romantic is how real it is. How in all that  conversation, while often having no real bearing on anything critical, you  can sense the nuances as these two become more fond and trusting of each  other. This is exactly they way you would dream that you meet that special  someone. And what makes it so true is that it is not even too fantastic to  believe. This could be what would happen if you had been confident enough  to strike up a conversation with that person you noticed somewhere random.  And what puts the icing on this film is the magnificent backdrop of Vienna  in which this film takes place. It just adds to the feeling of romantic  nirvana that the film suggests. And no matter how many times I watch this  film, I don\'t think I will ever tire of that.', u'0.438631', u"\n'Before Sunrise' is not a film to be scrutinised, nor studied. The absolute beauty of it lies in its perfection as a simple love story - of two lives suddenly thrown together in the midst of reality, and the ensuing night of simple love that follows. Every individual at some time in life dreams of the connection that is portrayed in this film between Jesse and Celine, and few ever find it. 'Before Sunrise' simply and elegantly demonstrates how the most fundamental passions of human emotion can envelope two complete strangers.  The beauty of this film is that the story is the most important element. The ending is both provocative and emotional - scenes of the night previously seen in darkness are now portrayed in lonely daylight as the sun rises and the story closes on these two characters.\n\nI saw this film by accident one night late on television. I have never forgotten it. So well is it made that the audience never question if this could ever really happen in life, reality being so absolutely characterised in it.\n\n'Before Sunrise' is simply the story of two strangers bound in Vienna's lonely night splendour - one night of love in all its glory, one superb piece of film making.", u'0.489828', u"Before Sunrise is romance for the slacker generation. Richard Linklater's romantic drama is an offbeat telling of a dream come true for most people. The film depicts romance in all it's glory, but without any of the pitfalls that befall most couples; and in short the film is about two people that have a relationship that's as close to perfection as relationships will ever come to - with just one problem, the problem of time. While most relationships wind down with time, this one keeps going strong throughout and time itself is the only thing that wears out. Before Sunrise is certainly not the typical sentimental 'Hollywood romance', which is another aspect that puts this film leagues ahead of the pretenders. The story follows two people, Jesse; an American and Celine; a French girl that meet on a train into Vienna. They instantly connect, and after telling her his awful idea for a television show and almost getting off the train, Jesse asks Celine to join him for the day in the picturesque city of Vienna...\n\nBefore Sunrise works principally for two reasons - realistic acting and an immense script that builds the characters through their thoughts and feelings and thus allows us to get to know them as we do the people in real life. This allows the characters to be free, and it's easy to believe that these are real people and not just actors working from a script. This also allows us to feel for the characters for who they are, and not merely because they're the protagonists. This kind of realism is hard to capture as, at the end of the day, we as the audience know that they're watching a film and not observing real life; but Before Sunrise represents one of the truest to life exhibitions of realism ever to be seen on screen. A truly great script cannot work on it's own, and needs great actors to deliver it to an extent that does it justice, and although I'm not a fan of either Julie Deply or Ethan Hawke; on viewing this film, there is nothing you can do but give them both respect. I don't know whether they were in character or just playing themselves, but when a film is this good; it hardly matters.\n\nIn a film like this, it is the writing that's the most important thing, and contained within the script are several observations about life, most of which I personally could relate to. This represents what Richard Linklater has achieved with this script as not only does it create and build the characters, but it also manages to expose what true love is, along with several other aspects of life. The fact that not all the anecdotes are relatable to me personally again represents the brilliance of writing. Everyone is different, and so different parts of the script will appeal to different people. There could be certain aspects about one person that one person loves and another hates; and that's the case with the musings in this script. Adding to the beauty of the film is the city of Vienna. The city itself isn't really important to the film as this is a story that could have taken place just about anywhere - but it makes for some lovely visuals and the upbeat, energetic romance that blossoms throughout the movie is matched by the beauty of the location.\n\nBefore Sunrise is simultaneously beautiful and captivating. Richard Linklater has created something that is rare in the world of cinema; a film that captures the beauty of life without ever going over the top or being overly sentimental. Before Sunrise is what it is. And what it is, is pure cinematic brilliance.", u'0.627002', u'I want C\xe9line and Jessie go further in their relationship, I want to tell them that they were made for each other, that in a lot of moment in the film we want they to die for each other. Their story is what we ever wanted and probably most of us never reached. This is about love but not stupid things like in "notting hills" or those kind of movie. This is life and i did believe in them, i did believe they were falling... This was so clever and touching. I have just finished to view it a minute ago and i m still there... I want to go to Vienna. I want to see them as soon as possible again.\n\nI have to say i was now becoming misanthropist and felt like if love was just a fake, a concept, but with this movie i realized that maybe somewhere, somehow and some when, something could really happen.\n\nI\'m french and didn\'t know very well July Delpy despite Kieslowski "three colors : white"... Now i have to see her other works because she looks like an angel and got a perfect acting.\n\ni saw "before sunset" (the sequel in Paris) a few days before i saw "before sunrise" and their is no matter. They are both masterpieces. proof that you don\'t need to impress the eyes with technology to get pure feelings. I\'m sorry for my English which i m trying to best.\n\nFranck in France', u'-0.269139', u'While traveling by train through Europe, the American Jesse (Ethan Hawke) and the French Celine (Julie Delpy) meet each other and decide to spend the night together in Austria. On the next morning, Jesse returns to United States of America, and Celine to Paris. \n\n"Before Sunrise" is one of my favorite romances, indeed one of the most beautiful love stories I have ever seen. It is a low budget movie with a very simple and real storyline, but the chemistry between Ethan Hawke and Julie Delpy is perfect, and the dialogs are stunning. The direction is amazing, transmitting the feelings of Celine and Jesse to the viewer. I have just completed my review number 1,000 in IMDb, and I choose "Before Sunrise" for this significant number because it is a very special film for me. I cannot understand why this movie was not nominated to the Oscar, with such a magnificent screenplay, direction and performances. Yesterday I have probably watched this movie for the third or fourth time, and I still love it. My vote is ten.\n\nTitle (Brazil): "Antes do Amanhecer" ("Before Sunrise")', u'0.760234', u'\n"Before Sunrise" is a wonderful love story and has to be among my Top 5 favorite movies ever. Dialog and acting are great. I love the characters and their ideas and thoughts. Of course, the romantic Vienna, introduced in the movie does not exist (you won\'t find a poet sitting by the river in the middle of the night) and it isn\'t possible to get to all the places in only one night, either (especially if you\'re a stranger and it\'s your first night in Vienna). But that\'s not the point. The relationship of the two characters is much more important and this part of the story is not at all unrealistic. Although, nothing ever really happens, the movie never gets boring. The ending is genuinely sad without being "Titanic" or something. Even if you don\'t like love stories you should watch this film! I\'m a little skeptic about the sequel that is going to be released in summer. The first part is perfect as it is, in my opinion.\n', u'-0.00453479', u"I had never heard of this film before a couple of weeks ago, but its concept interested me when I heard it: an American man meets a European woman on his last night in Europe and they spend the night together talking. It sparked my interest, but I never expected it to be this great. Before Sunrise is a masterpiece, and it's also one of the most romantic films on record. To my surprise, it completely lacked the cynicism of the 1990s. It's impossible to really talk too much about it, since there is no real plot, so to speak (although there are plenty of thoroughly interesting things you could talk about; it is sort of like My Dinner With Andre, where there is a conversation, but it's not JUST the conversation that matters), but let me just say, see it. SEE IT!", u'0.305904', u'\n                 It was by accident that I was scanning the TV channels and found this wonderful film about two beautiful human beings who become attracted to each other in a very innocent and virgin like approach to each other.   Ethan Hawke (Jesse) "Tape" \'01 and Julie Delpy (Celine) "ER" 94 TV Series (Nicole).  This gal and guy, will warm your very heart and soul and make you think deeply into your past relationships and how you really wish you had followed your hearts strings with a guy or gal you deep down loved and lost track of over the years.  Jesse and Celine have great conversation, and deep eye contact with a great magnetic explosion between the two of them.  I am looking forward to the SEQUEL to this film in 2004 and if you have viewed this film, you will feel the same way.', u'0.826881', u'\nIf you are a traveller, if there is a fire burning into your heart, if you\'d call "home" every place on earth, but none of them can give you enough, if you are always looking for the next thing and if you believe the other part of your soul is somewhere out there, see this movie and you\'ll find out a little, but wonderful, piece of life sitting next to you.', u'0.828385', u'Let me give you a quick synopsis of this movie. Ethan Hawke: "Blah blah blah blah blah." Judy Delpy (with French accent): "Blah blah blah blah blah." Actually, thats a little more interesting and doesn\'t take an hour and a half of your life, which you will wish you had spent doing something more interesting, like staring at the floor! Some of the shots of Vienna are nice, though it is too bad that the two self-involved, dull people keep getting in the way of them. If you like really boring vague conversations and listening to pretentious people try to be profound about life, love, etc., then you might like this movie. Otherwise you\'ll vomit on yourself (and maybe your girlfriend next to you, who is forcing you to watch it, and after you clean that up you\'ll break up with her, because you realize that she is also long-winded, vague, and pretentious, so the movie actually did some good by opening your eyes to that.) I kept waiting for the ax murderer to chop them up or aliens to kidnap them, anything to get them to shut up, but alas it never happened. Too bad.', u'-0.570228', u'\nAm I the only person that found this movie incredibly tedious, pretentious and badly acted?  Did I mention boring?  It took me 3 installments to get through this.  My mind kept wandering to thoughts like "Why is Ethan Hawke\'s hair so greasy" and Julie Delpy\'s teeth being disturbing.  Not good signs.\n\nWhoever said Ethan Hawke (was it Mrskunk?) had 2 expressions was exactly right.  Most of the time he smirked.  And the dialogue!  Were we supposed to find it interesting?  Amusing?  To me, it was the musings of immature adults, and why were their musings any more interesting than yours or mine? Maybe that was the point - maybe the director was parodying the self-importance of teenagers and those slightly older.  Was there any insight at all in all that talking?  I couldn\'t find any.  Not one single insight.  Did you happen to notice that the whole time they talked about themselves?  I include their philosophical comments, because they are about their own philosophy, not anyone else\'s.  As far as they (and those of us who were trapped in their universe) were concerned  the world did not exist. They wouldn\'t notice anything happening outside themselves.  Could you ask for a better example of solipsism?\n\nI can\'t believe people think this is one of the greatest films ever made, a great romance, etc.  If you want to see a great romance, rent "Notorious" or "Live Flesh" or, I could go on and on.  Just like the movie.  But I won\'t.\n\nI fear that this is a case of the "Emperor\'s New Clothes."  Some critics called it a great film, so others jump on the bandwagon to show that they too have good taste.\n\nBelieve me, this is not great filmmaking and this is not a great film. It\'s just an extremely boring film.\n\nYou were warned.', u'-0.257727', u'Annoying frat boy hits on French girl. For 12 hours. But the worst part is that the French girl goes along with it. For 12 hours. And we are forced to go along with it. For 2 hours. This is the kind of movie that makes you want to smack someone.\n\nPerhaps it wouldn\'t have been so bad if there had been some sort of chemistry between Ethan Hawke and Julie Delpy. I mean, after all, even annoying frat boys can fall in love. But no. The two are so incompatibly different that, despite what the script says, none of the flirtations are believable. I imagine the minute the director yelled "cut", Julie would spin around and head straight for her trailer. Ethan would go soak his head. The problem is that the director never yells "cut". Instead we are subjected to watching the awkward, contrived and stiff ramblings of these two people who have nothing in common except for the script.\n\nI saw what the director was trying to do. He was trying to capture the poetry of life through long, continuous shots and mundane dialogue. He was trying to show us how wonderful the simplicity of everyday life can be. But there is nothing artistic or poetic about the shots, the dialogue or the emotion on screen. The whole thing feels like an awkward date you just cant wait to ditch.\n\n"Before Sunrise" is like "When Harry Met Sally", except without the humour, the charm, the witty style, the plot or the music. In essence, there is no reason to watch this movie. If you do watch this movie, make sure you\'re not sitting near anyone or you might get smacked.\n\nBefore sunrise? Heh, I think I\'ll sleep in.', u'-0.364452', u"It seems I am in the minority here but I found this movie over-calmingly tedious. It's starts well, the meeting on the train and the intriguing possibility of what may happen when two strangers meet by chance is alluring but once they start wandering around Vienna it's when it starts to get boring. The dialogue is just the kind of naive, wistful, cod-philosophical nonsense that young couples on their first date come up with to impress the other partner. Fine if you are trying to get laid but it makes for rather irritating viewing. After a while I was more interested in the scenery than what was going on with the main characters. By the end I just wished they'd shut up and get on the damn train! It's not that I don't have a romantic streak or appreciate dialogue based movies, there are many good examples of this type of film, it's just that I expect not to almost fall asleep during it.", u'-0.616829', u"There are many people in our lives that we meet only once in our lifetime, but for some reason or another we remember those persons for the rest of our lives. These once in a lifetime friendships occur between people with long distances between and there are always some natural reasons for why we don't meet these people anymore. We don't always even know their names, as we are never presented to each other, and sometimes we even forget to ask what their names are. It's funny how common humanity makes occasional friends and we like to keep it as such, because reuniting might spoil fond memories, or we don't know do they. We are too afraid to check that out.\n\nThe movie 'Before Sunrise' just caught me watching it. I never had intention to watch it through, but because the discussion between the couple seemed interesting, I gave a look for the rest of the film. I didn't know what to expect from it, but nor did the young couple. They had time to discuss with each other until the sunrise and anything could happen before they had to separate. I believe this film has had good reviews because the situation is something that everybody on this planet has at least once or twice lived through. It makes us all think about all those people we have met only once in our lives.", u'-0.0507335'], u'tt0088247': [u'Rarely has a film so frightened an audience as "The Terminator." After its release in 1984, the extremely low-budget sci-fi actioner broke box office records, and gave audiences something more to fear. Through the years, there have been stories of nature\'s beasts, of creatures from another world, and so on and so forth. "Jaws" was terrifying because it seemed so possible. And if "Jaws" is terrifying, "The Terminator" is horrific. The realization of this hit-man machine dawned on everyone watching the film. In a time of exceeding technology, how long will it be before man is overtaken by the very things he created? And that is what is particularly scary about a film like "The Terminator." \n\nIn "The Terminator," Arnold plays a cyborg, Cyberdyne system model 101, a T800, whatever that means. He has been sent back in time to assassinate the soon-to-be-mother of the future world leader, John Connor (who battles the machines in the future and leads an uprising). If Connor is killed, then there will be no one to oppose the machines of the future, and they will triumph. This would be pretty bad. So the future John Connor has sent a protector back in time, to help save his mother. Kyle Reese (Michael Biehn) tells Sarah Connor (Linda Hamilton) about the machine that is trying to kill her. "It can\'t be bargained with, it can\'t feel pain or mercy, and it will stop at absolutely nothing until you are dead!" Talk about a bad day.\n\nThe Terminator hunts them down time after time, including the famous police station scene, where Arnie says, "I\'ll be back," and returns moments later, crashing through the wall in a car. He then takes on a whole squad of cops, but don\'t worry, Sarah and Reese escape slightly unscathed.\n\nThere are countless classic scenes in "The Terminator." You will see them spoofed your entire life. From the image of the Terminator, to the lines they speak, to the scenes they act out. Everything is spoofed. And the film is worthy of its fame.\n\nOn the special edition "T2" DVD (the second one), there is an on-set documentary for the making of the "Terminator 2" 3-D ride at Universal Studios. As the camera moves around, it shows Cameron detailing what he wants in this scene. Some guy suggests something else, and Cameron gets a tone. "No, no, that won\'t work. You do it like this - we come off here, he walks around..." etc. The point is, he\'s a perfectionist, and a demanding director. Some directors are a bit too easy, and don\'t really care where their films are going. But James Cameron seems to have a clear vision of what he wants, and he goes around making sure it gets done exactly the way he wants it to be done. And it shows in his work. It\'s hard to find any mistakes in a James Cameron film. And it\'s even harder to find plot holes.\n\nSome people say "Terminator 2 - Judgment Day" is better than the original. It\'s hard to choose, because the two films are very different. I view "The Terminator" as more of a deep, intellectually-consuming, dark thriller. I view "Judgment Day" as an action film, with a more or less recycled plot. (The plot is still good, but it\'s still the same, too.) It\'s hard to choose a favorite because they are so different. On "T2" the budget is ten times larger, probably even more than that. But if you want a horror/thriller, "The Terminator" is better for you. If you want special-effects and a really fun time, see "T2." They\'re both excellent films.\n\n"The Terminator" is a great movie. It is one of my favorites; it is terrifying, horrifying, and 100 % entertaining. And unlike a lot of other cheap actioners out there, "The Terminator" has some thought put into its plot, and that is what separates it from the rest of its kind.', u'-0.0658188', u'The Terminator is one of those films that no matter if you\'ve seen it or not, you\'ve heard of it, heck you know at least one or two lines without seeing it! This is the movie that blasted then new comer\'s Arnold Schwartzeneggerr\'s career, made James Cameron a name in Hollywood, and gave new meaning to a possible dark future that gave us nightmares. I remember the first time I saw this movie, I was just 8 years old and my dad of course walks in saying to cover my eyes at every "bad" scene with violence or nudity, needless to say about 70% of the movie he covered my eyes. Finally I got to see it with my mom and I was in love, this wasn\'t just an action movie, though it is one of the best, it had a story. To think this was all based upon just a quick nightmare that James Cameron had, he didn\'t have much money, but he had a good script, a great crew on his side to make one of cinema\'s greatest movies of all time.\n\nTwo men appear in Los Angeles in separate locations, manifesting in sudden, blinding flash-storms of electricity. One is heavily muscular; the other man, slim and wiry. The mysterious muscular man obtains weapons and begins hunting down all women named "Sarah Connor", using a phone book to track his targets. He successfully kills the first two of the three listed women. When he attempts to kill the last Sarah Connor, he is stopped by the other man, Kyle Reese who has been sent back in time to protect her. While hiding in a parking garage, Reese explains that the man hunting Sarah is actually a cyborg assassin called a "Terminator", built by Skynet, an artificial intelligence network created by Cyberdyne Systems. In the near future, Reese explains, Skynet gained self-awareness, initiated a global takeover of military hardware, and launched a nuclear war against humanity. Skynet ordered that a scant number of humans were to be kept alive in order to be used as slave labor. John Connor, Sarah\'s son, rallied the few remaining humans and led a resistance movement against the machines. After a grinding campaign, the human resistance was on the verge of victory; in a last-ditch effort, Skynet sent the Terminator back in time to kill Sarah before John was born, preventing the resistance from ever being founded and allowing the machines to win by default. Reese volunteered to follow the Terminator back in time to protect Sarah; after his use of the time transportation equipment, it was to be destroyed by the resistance in order to prevent further Terminators from going back in time. The Terminator feels no pain, has no emotions, and will stop at nothing to accomplish its mission.\n\nThe Terminator is personally one of my favorite movies of all time, I think because this movie really is something special. Yeah, the effects are very 80\'s, but for the time and even to this day, I think the special effects are much better than the CGI crud we get in today\'s cinema. This has everything: action, romance, horror, sci-fi, and even some dark humor. The reason why Arnold\'s "I\'ll be back" is so famous is not just because of his accent, but because you knew that something bad was coming. Kyle Reese\'s "Come with me if you want to live" is classic as well. If you haven\'t seen The Terminator, I highly recommend this movie, it\'s an incredible one that is sure to deliver entertainment to the fullest. This is one of the greatest movies of all time and I\'m sure that you will not be disappointed, if you are, get a CAT scan.\n\n10/10', u'0.10662', u'\nIs there a better person to play a cyborg than Arnold?  For this movie he was a massively built oak tree of a man.  His strange accent makes for a perfect callous robotic sounding killing machine.  It\'s almost like his voice is a computer read out ( which I guess it is in one sense ). Terminator is one of those films that started something huge.  People didn\'t realize it at the time, but the careers of Arnold, Cameron and perhaps even guys like Micahel Biehn, Lance Henriksen and even Bill Paxton were substantially started because of this film.  And Cameron must have liked working with them so much that he gave all of them substantial roles in his next film ( Aliens ).\n\nAs we all know what the story is, I\'ll just tell you a bit about what is so fascinating about it.  First I have to mention Michael Biehn.  He has the real starring role.  He is the character that has to explain everything to the audience.  He has to explain this complicated story so that we know what is happening and why.  It is not an easy job to do something like that and still come off looking all right.  But Biehn is simply awesome in this film. A microcosm of his performance can be seen when Sara bites him.  Biehn ( Kyle Reese ) replies " Terminator\'s don\'t feel pain.  I do.  Don\'t do that again. "  That is such a great line delivered with the perfect expression, the perfect tone and the perfect timing.  Biehn is perfect for the role.\n\nThis is also the first film that I saw as a youngster that ever warned me of the dangers of nuclear war and of the rapid advancements of machinery. Perhaps I was too young and naive to fully understand all that James Cameron was trying to say, but now that I am older, I can honestly say that the two Terminators are perfect anti nuke films.  And they are so passionate with what they have to say.  I like it when a film has something to say.  I enjoy being entertained in the process but if you can manage both then you have a\nmasterpiece.  This is a masterpiece.\n\nFinally. there are two other reasons to enjoy this film.  One, this is the first film where "I\'ll be back" was spoken.  Now it is part of Arnolds vernacular.  Secondly, Bill Paxton is in it.  And he adds spark to any film that he\'s in.  Especially here, as the idiot punk leader that really gets the hell beat out of him, he has some great lines.\n\nA great film. ', u'0.200108', u'\nI just saw a horrifying, touching, very good movie again; it\'s The Terminator.  Now to talk of it as great film, to compare it with American Beauty might seem idiotic--it\'s an almost unrelentingly dark, violent, frightening action movie, after all--but strip away the relentless action, strip away the technophobia, strip away the blatant dislike of cops and modern youth, strip away the poignant love story and, at its core, it\'s about an immature, essentially mindless girl becoming a strong, determined woman.  That\'s a theme more movies should have if we want girls to have strong role models.\n\nIn the course of a few hours during which Sarah Connor realises that she is running for her life from a soul-less machine in human flesh that is implacably and violently determined to kill her, she transforms from a girl who can\'t balance her cheque book to a woman who can order a wounded, beaten man to "get on your feet, soldier."  She is clear-headed, not panicky, focused in crisis and incredibly courageous.  And it\'s not that she has lost her essential femaleness but that she\'s grown up.\n\nIt\'s relentless, heartless violence appals and fascinates me.  It\'s gritty depiction of our society as a prelude to an even more horrific one in 2023 darkens my heart.  It\'s quickly developing love story touches me.  Its humor makes the dark places in me smile.  But most of all I am touched and fascinated by Sarah\'s precipitous transformation. As a good life exercise, ask yourself this: Would you have the courage to do what she does?\n\n9.5 out of 10.', u'0.348594', u"\nFor the gift of `Aliens' and `The Terminator' I am willing to forgive Cameron's `Titanic'. The key plot concept is beautifully simple - machines take over the earth in the future. Machines are eventually over thrown by one man. Machines travel back in time to kill man's mother, thus preventing him being born and stopping their own defeat.  One human also travels back to stop the machines from killing his leader's mother.\n\n`The Terminator' is a classic good versus evil struggle, with little in the way of greys clouding the issue. The terminator is an unstoppable brutal remorseless killer, and it perfectly suits Arnold Schwarzenegger's limited acting abilities. His few lines, including the infamous `I'll be back' are all well judged and timed, and give a great feeling of precision and inhumanity to his character. Coupled with his chiselled features, he's the best choice for the role. Michael Biehn is playing a character type that he'd reprise two years later in Cameron's `Aliens' - the human tough guy: he's got the fight, but still the ability to love and care for people. His features are well chosen for this and although his delivery of lines is hardly exceptional - they tend to come out in the same tone of voice - he's able to carry his part. Linda Hamilton is the woman-thrown-into-chaos, somewhat reminiscent of Sigourney Weaver's Ripley character in `Alien', although Hamilton doesn't have Weaver's strength of presence. All the actors are, for an action science fiction, above average and so never distract.\n\nIt's the script, with Cameron's force behind it that lifts the movie from mediocrity. Yes, there's a certain amount of corniness - the `we loved a life time' element for example - but the movie has a real sense of conviction present. The movie believes in itself and, through its passion, will make you believe too. There's a general sense of darkness in the movie - rarely do we see daylight, and, when we do, it's often the soft light of dawn. There's a nice sense of tension in the action scenes, helped not only by Cameron's camera work but also by an excellent electronic score (including a fantastic brooding credit sequence). Sure some of the SFX look clunky in these days of `Attack of the Clones' and `The Fellowship of the Ring', but they still work. There's a certain sense of inevitability, intertwined with hope, permeating the picture that creates a mood I particularly enjoyed and that's harder to find in the current crop of science fiction movies.\n\n`The Terminator' is not a perfect picture. The movie lags in some parts, and the romance element is fairly contrived. Despite all that the movie brims with energy and promise, a script that mostly delivers, characters you can enjoy, and the ultimate Arnie role. Well worth catching. 8/10.\n", u'0.182451', u'In one of the most intelligent and unhesitating science fiction films of the 1950s, Robert Wise equipped "The Day the Earth Stood Still" with technical marvels, chief among them the huge robot Gort\x97the prototype, Michael Rennie suggests, for a global police force... Similar mechanical giants have been lumbering out of space-ships ever since...\n\nIn "Devil Girl from Mars," the giant refrigerator robot Chai hunts for virile Scotsmen and find John Laurie, while in \'Target Earth,\' the Venusian robots imitate Gort in projecting rays from their heads but take the idea a step further and make the rays lethal... \n\nIn Stanley Kubrick\'s \'mythological documentary,\' HAL 9000 computer is the most human character in the movie... But in James Cameron\'s breakthrough feature, there is, indeed, \'a storm coming in.\' His \'Terminator\' is a systematic metal, \'surrounded by living tissue,\' an invulnerable cyborg, part man, part machine, with whom \'it can\'t be bargained with, it can\'t be reasoned with.\' \n\nThe film opens with two naked men appearing in two different parts of Los Angeles\' darkened streets... One is tall and powerfully built, the other is compact and muscular... Both men seek the same person, a small and delicate blond woman by the name of Sarah Connor...\n\nArnold Schwarzenegger is terrifying as the \'killer cyborg\' who \'looks like Death rendered in steel.\' He has searched the phone book and brutally shot to death other unfortunate women who bear the same name... He is sent back from the future to present-day (1984) to kill the mother of an unborn enemy... \n\nSchwarzenegger moves with inhuman speed bounding like a panther, scanning methodically with dominated blue eyes his surroundings, and in a perfect simulation of voice, he is on the track of his victim... He examines his weapons with precise movements, drives expressionlessly, and kills without pity, or remorse, or fear... It is a role that suits his talent perfectly... \n\nMichael Biehn seems scared by traumas of others wars... His face outlines a long burn scar... He tries to stop Schwarzenegger\'s attempts to be carried out... He is sinister in his long coat... His whole life has been combat... He identifies himself as Reese, a soldier from the future, assigned to protect Sarah at all costs... For him it is an honor, a chance to meet the legend... We feel his pain and anguish when he said: \'That terminator is out there. And it absolutely will not stop, ever, until you are dead!\' \n\nLinda Hamilton is quiet convincing as the strong innocent prey, targeted for termination, momentarily disoriented, vaguely disturbed... She feels a blind panic boiling up within her, a lightning blot of terror greater than she could ever imagine... She is in a daze, paralyzed, shivering silently, uncontrollably... Her fragile personality disguises a hidden force she did\'t know she had...\n\nCameron makes a successful move behind the lens in one of the most breathtaking modern action science fiction films...', u'-0.141519', u'The Terminator is one of the best action movies of all time in my opinion. It doesn\'t set a single foot wrong and it also kicked off a wonderful saga. Without this, there would be no Terminator 2. Think about that. As such, this movie is fondly remembered by many people and it has been the subject of many quotes and spoofs over the years. Why doesn\'t it set a foot wrong? It is thrilling, almost always entertaining and filled with insane explosions, which more or less makes a good action movie. But \'The Terminator\' stands head and shoulders above the rest of it\'s genre, because of it\'s well thought-out plot, splendid acting and an eerily memorable music score which gives you a reason to watch the credits at the end.\n\nNow to analysing why the plot is so well-thought out. Well, for one thing, the concept of preventing or setting in stone the future by going back in time was one which wasn\'t really explored in those days. By exploring it, the Terminator was offering something different, something which has inspired films such as Back to the Future (read the plot synopsis for that film, there are a few similarities). The notion of the final battle of a future war being fought in \'our present\', not in the future, between one member of opposing sides, in this case a man and a machine, is also an intriguing one and sets the stage for an exciting battle royale.\n\nI\'ll run down the plot while I\'m here. Sarah Connor, a young woman in her 20\'s, is the protagonist of the film and our two from the future, Kyle Reese and the Terminator, revolve around her. Reese, who is a battle-hardened soldier who has led a hard life in the wasteland which is the future, must protect Sarah, while the Terminator, an unstoppable cyborg, must kill her, in order to kill her unborn son, the leader of the future resistance.\n\nAll of this leads to some thrilling action scenes and insane explosions, topped off by music scores which add to the tension and excitement. The movie purrs into action quickly, but really kicks off at a disco, where Reese and the Terminator have a shootout, resulting in a city-wide drive-by chase involving the police which doesn\'t really let up until Reese and Sarah are arrested. During the lull in the chase scene, Reese tells Sarah about himself, the Terminator and their general predicament, which is fairly realistic. \n\nThe next action scene is the infamous police station massacre which everyone seems to talk about whenever they discuss this movie. I can understand why, too. The Terminator pretty much kills every cop in his path with the greatest of ease, either with the AK-47, his shotgun, or both. He also ends up cutting the power and setting the station on fire, again adding to the tension and excitement. \n\nThe last action scene which, like the one in T2, is a chase which leads to a final showdown in a building. It is a slight letdown, but it is still an intense scene. I will refrain from spoiling the ending, as this is too good a movie to be spoiled.\n\nAll of the acting fits the bill perfectly. As in T2, there is not a single bad performance to be found. Michael Biehn delivers a remarkably intense performance as Kyle Reese, acting like a typical human would in his situation. He displays his range of emotions at the right times, from passionate to worried to unyielding. It is a wonder that his only other major movie is \'Aliens\' and that he is starring in stuff like \'Clockstoppers\' these days. Linda Hamilton again does well as Sarah Connor, displaying an innocent woman who shows over the course of the film why she is John Connor\'s mother, displaying previously unheralded steel at the crunch. The support cast isn\'t too bad either (Dr. Silberman makes his first appearance). But again, the best performance in the film belongs to the bad guy, in this case, Arnold Schwarzenegger. He acts like a killing machine should; incredibly cold, sterile, soulless and unyielding. His facial expression never changes throughout the film and his physical appearance makes him slightly more imposing and intimidating than the Liquid Terminator. He also commences his famous one-liners which have been the subject of many a spoof, including (no, especially) "I\'ll be back." This is undoubtedly his best performance, even though it is not his only good one.\n\nI will compliment all involved on making a movie which still manages to look good despite having a low budget. I\'ve seen pretty bad-looking movies with fairly high budgets (read: Scooby-Doo), but never good-looking movies with low budgets.\n\nIn the end, The Terminator is a masterful action movie which laid the groundwork for the equally brilliant Terminator 2. If you asked me whether I preferred The Terminator or T2, I would say T2 because I am more familiar with it, otherwise, these two would be on a level footing. If you haven\'t seen this movie and are an action movie fan, then see it immediately. You won\'t be disappointed. Trust me.\n\n5/5 stars', u'0.113125', u"It was funny to read that this film nearly avoided coming to our screens. With many number of studios rejecting the script and story, Terminator was nearly terminated before getting of the ground. However, one company, ORION pictures, the last resort for this movie, loved the premise of a robot running around as a man, trying to kill the mother of the savior of planet earth. Thank goodness they saw that it was a good script, because it become one of the great films of the 1980's.\n\nIn 2029, giant super computers dominate the planet, hell bent on exterminating the human race! And to destroy man's future by changing the past they send an indestructible cyborg \x96 a terminator \x96 back in time to kill Sarah Connor, the woman who's unborn son will become mankind's only hope. Can Sarah protect herself from this unstoppable menace to save the life of her unborn child? Or will the human race be extinguished by one mean hunk of mutant metal?\n\nWell this film is a real blast. The cast is extraordinary. This is probably Arnold Schwarzenegger's most popular role. I cannot see why it isn't. He was great as the Cyborg that was walking around, as a killing machine. His facial expressions are sketched in my memory for life. I love the scene where see a close of his face in the police car, it was brilliant. Schwarzenegger, originally a body builder, he has had a wonderful career in the movie industry. His other great films include Predator, End Of Days, Total Recall, Eraser and was impressive in his role as Mr. Freeze in Batman and Robin. His career was on hold for sometime a while back, due to injury, but he is back and I hope we get to see more of his acting talents.\n\nThen you have the others in the cast. The other stand out in this film for me is Linda Hamilton. She was suited perfectly to the role of the feeble Sarah Connor, who is going to be the mother of the child who is going to save the world. Hamilton has had a mixed career, with her filmography including the enjoyable Dante's Peak. The good guy in Terminator was Michael Biehn, who played out the role of Sarah Connor's protector, Reese Kyle. He was very good in his role. His other movies include Aliens, The Rock, Crash and an uncredited role in the great musical, Grease. \n\nThe director of Terminator, namely James Cameron, did a great job with this film. Considering he thought up the idea from a sick bed, had it rejected that many times, it is a great credit to him. Most directors would have given up on it, but he stuck with it till he got to our screens. Thank goodness he did. The story of the Terminator is an interesting one. It has a very biblical feel to it. One man sent to help save the world, with the initials J.C., fascinated me immensely. Cameron and Co writer Gale Anne Hurd did a fantastic script for this film. \n\nThere are some unbelievable scenes in this movie. None more so then the vision we see of the metal Cyborg walking from the truck fire. The vision we see from this scene is one of the main reasons why we have the Terminator. James Cameron explained that he wanted a scene in a movie that has a machine walking from a fire in menacing fashion. He got this spot on, if you ask me. Then there are some other great scenes such as the tense stand offs that the evil cyborg has with all the humans he comes into contact with, including the first confrontation with Sarah, in addition to the meeting he has with Reese. I also enjoyed the scene where he goes through the police station. Of course this scene has one of Hollywood's most famous lines in it, that of Arnie's 'I'll be back', a classic. The final confrontation between Sarah and the Cyborg is another tension filled scene of this great movie.\n\nSo, what more can I say about this movie? It is simply brilliant. I have asked many people their opinion on this film. One such response about it was, that is too 'eightish', and that comment is fair enough. If you have the chance, grab a copy of Terminator on DVD, as it is a great 2 disc set. I must admit the first time I saw it, I did not appreciate Terminator like I do now. Perhaps I found it a tad violent, but that is to be expected of a film that is called Terminator. This movie was a great success and deserved to be with all the great work that was put into it. However more was to come, a film that was to become one of the greatest sequels in movie history. Arnie was to deliver on his promise of 'I'll be back'!\n\nRating: 4.5 stars or 9/10", u'0.185889', u'Terminator is an extremely low budget movie. In fact, just about everything used in it didn\'t cost much at all, but it is a very effective movie. Back in the \'70\'s and 80\'s, movies could be very low budget, but still be great(think of John Carpenter\'s Halloween).\n\nThe Terminator is a story about how nuclear war causes the end to mankind and the end result could be the start of an even greater tragedy than the war its self. The entire message of The Terminator is an anti nuclear war message.\n\nMany people think that a few parts in the beginning of the movie are just some random things thrown in. I can understand why, but these seemingly random scenes actually do have a lot to do with the story.\n\nArnold does a great job as the cyborg who is programmed to kill without mercy or remorse. For those who don\'t know, this is the movie where the line "I\'ll be back" was spoken. The other actors do a good job in this. Linda Hamilton made a great choice doing this movie and she really improved her career through it(the movie she made before this was the horrible Children Of The Corn).\n\nThis is better than Terminator 2(which is still great by the way), because this movie has more of a story and is more involved. I would recommend watching this movie at any time, it is very well paced and never gets boring, and if you have the time, watch T2 right after this.', u'0.0198935', u'\nThere are actors,and there are movie stars.Arnold Schwarzenegger is without question a movie star,because every time he is on screen, he is,well,Arnold.There is a different Arnold in this film,and this     is what I like about it.He,for once,is playing the villain,and to perfection,I might add.He makes for one of the best screen villains ever in cinema history.It\'s a pity that his "good guy" image won\'t allow him to play the bad seed more often,but that\'s Hollywood, I guess.Aside from the thrilling sequel,this is perhaps Arnold\'s best work.', u'\nI\'ve reviewed this classic movie before, but now I\'m gonna review the DVD. To start, I must say that although they had their rationale for deleting the "terminated" scenes, as they were called, I think they definitely should have left that one scene in where Sarah Connor calls her mom and tells her to hide in the cabin, and where she finds the listing of Cyberdyne Corp. in the phone book. This scene established Sarah as one who is willing to try to take matters into her hands to stop a nuclear war and a horrible future. She talks to Reese about getting rid of Cyberdyne and they get into an arguement about whether or not that is a mission objective and Reese ends up chasing Sarah into a wooded area. I think the beauty of the woods, flowers and waterfalls was important too, because Reese starts crying and saying how all of this is destroyed, and the future is nothing but blackened, charred ruins littered with the skulls of attempted human genocide. What a terrific, powerful scene. I adore Michael Biehn, and I didn\'t realize what a great actor (and crier) he is!!! Maybe the other "terminated" scenes were okay to delete, although they were all delightful. The one where Sarah practices her "wholesome waitress" routine was cute. The one where she talks about Disneyland and hot dogs might have seemed silly, but it really brought home how foreign our world is to Reese, as did the crying scene. The tickling scene might have seemed silly to the editor, but I thought it really made a\npoint: after all the violence and bleakness Reese lived through, to be with the woman he\'s always loved and idolized, to lay in a cozy warm bed with her experiencing the simple joys of life for the first time (I still wonder if Sarah devirginized him, since he said he\'d "never" had any special someone in his life) seemed to bring everything into perspective. The scene where you discover that the factory was Cyberdyne Systems was important too, but I\'ll let these scenes slide. I really think they should consider releasing a\nTERMINATOR with the scene in the wooded area included. Nevertheless, I still consider this film as one of my favorite sci-fi films, and my favorite James Cameron film. I still admire who he infuses humanity with action and adrenaline, and the missing scenes were wonderful.', u'0.0643514', u"Many people look back at the films of James Cameron and suggest that the smaller, the budget, the tighter the limitations, the better the end product. Films like Avatar, Titanic and True Lies had huge budgets and drew in even bigger box office but many still yearn for the Cameron that gave us The Terminator and Aliens which were huge movies but packed a far bigger punch artistically. My feelings all these years on are that Cameron has earned the right to make those huge movies but i have to admit to preferring his earlier body of work. The Terminator is a nightmarish, time travelling science fiction film told at a breakneck pace and delivered with confidence and style. The film has a very gritty, underground look to it and does a great job of telling its story amid the frenetic action. There is also a huge slice of horror and suspense thrown in, an impression that has diminished in the years since it's release due to inferior sequels. Viewed as a standalone piece however, The Terminator is fine piece of work from a director with a very clear vision.Everyone knows that The Terminator is the film that gave us Arnold Schwarzenegger but when i look back at the film, it has heart and its the Michael Biehn character, Kyle Reese, that provides it Artistically speaking,Cameron might be well advised that less is more.", u'0.29047', u"This is one of the great movies of the 80s in MY collection that I think about all the time.\n\nThis is the one that started it all! Arnold is excellent in it! Linda Hamilton was great! Michael Biehn was very good as the good guy! Paul Winfield was good! Lance Hendrickson played a different character! In their short roles Bill Paxton and Brian Thompson were cool! Look for Dick Miller! The acting by the cast is very good! The action scenes are very exciting with lots of gun fire and the special effects are awesome! The music is great! Out of the three Terminator films it is hard to decide which is the best but this one is damn good! In fact its one of the best movies ever! I strongly recommend anyone who loves Arnold and the other cast members I mentioned and especially if you love action, sci-fi, or even horror movies to not rent but buy this classic! I recommend The Terminator!\n\nMovie Nuttball's NOTES:\n\nThere is one scene that I really like in the Terminator! It is when Sarah Connor is at the dance club. What I love about it is the song and the excellent slow motion camera. Its when Sarah drops something, she goes to pick it up and while she is bending over The Terminator comes walking through the dance floor! Its a classic moment!\n\nBill Paxton has been a part of three huge franchises! Being The Terminator as The Punk Leader, Aliens as Pvt. W. Hudson, and Predator 2 as Jerry Lambert! Lance Hendrickson has had a similar way of being in epics like Paxton being in The Terminator as Detective Vukovich, in Aliens as Bishop, Alien 3 as Bishop II, and as Charles Weyland in the upcoming 2004 movie Alien vs. Predator! Hendrickson, believe it or not was the original choice to play The Terminator! It is so amazing about this!\n\nBy Paxton and Hendrickson being in these films and that Alien Vs. Predator is finally going to invade the theaters in 2004 could it be that this has happened for a reason? The reason possibly being this: In the great Dark Horse comic books there are many editions of Alien Vs. Predator and a edition of Alien vs. Predator vs. The Terminator! What I am saying is could this mean that Alien vs. Predator vs. The Terminator will be made into a huge motion picture or a Alien vs. The Terminator or even a Predator vs. The Terminator movie in the future? Its just a thought but what if? I am sure some writers and/or directors have talked about these subjects! I am also sure big fans of these films and of The Terminator would love to watch these icons battle it out!", u'0.294763', u'Even in this post-Matrix era, this movie is still the ultimate blend of Orwell and action. If the definition of a classic is a movie that\'s often imitated but never equaled, then The Terminator is definitely a classic, because the increasing redundancy of its sequels and imitations merely demonstrates how good the original is.\n\nI wasn\'t fortunate enough to see this movie in the year of its release, the year predicted by Orwell\'s classic novel as a time when technology would be used to enslave people, but I did see it in about 1992, when the blockbuster success of the first sequel made me curious to watch the first film. At that time I preferred the second Terminator movie for being technically superior, but after all these years I now prefer the first film\'s raw intensity and kinetic energy.\n\nThe Terminator was of course the breakthrough movie for James Cameron, and even after Aliens and Titanic it\'s still arguably his best-directed film. I challenge anybody to watch this movie and point out one single shot that needs improvement, because the direction of this movie is so fluid and precise that I can\'t think of one moment in the whole 100-minute running time that I would want to change.\n\nCameron was and of course still is a notorious perfectionist who\'s very difficult to work with, but his perfectionism really paid off with this movie because it can be watched again and again without losing its entertainment value. He\'s a master of the small touch, as when the cop at the desk is filling out his paperwork with a small pencil and pauses in mid-sentence to look up and see the headlights coming towards him through the doors.\n\nCameron also co-wrote the story, so this movie meant even more to him personally than merely a directing triumph. Supposedly he drew his inspiration from a nightmare in which he was being chased by a humanoid with one glowing red eye, and indeed the whole film has the urgent, oppressive atmosphere and calm logic characteristic of a nightmare. But of course he was probably also remembering subconsciously a couple episodes of The Outer Limits that he saw as a kid, which explains why he had to acknowledge the writer Ellison in the credits.\n\nBesides Cameron, this movie really belongs to the three lead actors. Arnold of course gives the performance of his career in this movie, but then so do Linda and Michael. Arnold\'s physical presence and harsh accent have never been put to better use in a movie, while Linda never had another role that required her to run through such a full range of emotions--sweetness and vulnerability, toughness and despair, etc.\n\nMichael has always been a B actor, but since The Terminator is essentially a B movie he fits in perfectly. His performance proves that an action hero is much more compelling when he\'s vulnerable not only to physical pain but emotional difficulties, to which his big, haunted eyes are put to good use. Watch him in this movie, as a man thrown out of his time but with a mission, and you\'ll see a perfect match of actor and character.\n\nIn a typical action film, the amount of violence and bloodshed in The Terminator would be excessive, but in a movie about an unstoppable killing machine the envelope can be pushed. In one of the more memorable set-pieces, the Terminator takes on an entire police station full of thirty cops, and although I didn\'t exactly count them the viewer gets the sense of watching every single cop being gunned down.\n\nOrdinarily I wouldn\'t describe such a scene of slaughter as "cool," and yet there is some-thing undeniably cool about Arnold, with his sunglasses and leather jacket, going through the station with a shotgun and assault rifle and taking on everybody. Arnold\'s charisma helps the audience stomach the cold-blooded determination of the Terminator, but also the character\'s single-mindedness invites admiration: even as we\'re appalled by all the killing, we have to admit he does it rather well.\n\nThis movie has more than enough gunfire, explosions and stunt-work (including some especially good stunt driving) to work purely as an action picture, but it\'s the film\'s anti-technology paranoia that makes it more than just an exciting ride. Notice, for example, the subtle role that Sarah\'s answering machine plays in the story: the cops can\'t get into touch with her because of it, while the message she leaves on it brings the Terminator right to her.\n\nIn one memorable shot, the tracks of a construction crane become those of a killing machine in the future, crushing an endless row of skulls, which you can interpret any number of ways (is it a crack against urban renewal?). Also note that the criminal psychologist is enslaved by his beeper, and that even in the post-apocalyptic future in which machines have destroyed the world children still huddle around a television set in a desperate effort to be entertained.\n\nSome viewers may be turned off by this movie\'s preaching, but one quality that distinguishes The Terminator from its countless imitations is the strength of its convictions. Too many science-fiction/action movies fail under the weight of their own camp, but The Terminator is an exception because it actually has the nerve to take itself seriously. The bickering between seasoned cops Paul and Lance provides some levity, but at no point does the film make fun of itself.\n\nThe only reason I\'m not giving this movie a perfect 10 is because it is, after all, The Terminator, and not Casablanca. If people still remember it in forty years, then I\'ll give it a 10.', u'0.170091', u'\nThe machines rose from the ashes of the nuclear fire. Their war to exterminate mankind had raged for decades, but the final battle would not be fought in the future. It would be fought here, in our present.\n\nTonight...\n\nWith those words, the legend was born.\n\nThen the words fade. There are bright flashes. Out of the smoke rises what looks like a human being. But this is no normal human. Before long he yanks the heart out of a punk who refuses to give him his clothes. He feels no pain, no fear, no pity or remorse. He exists for one purpose only. He is THE TERMINATOR.\n\nA few miles away there are more flashes. From the smoke emerges Kyle Reese (Michael Biehn), a human warrior from the future sent to stop the Terminator from accomplishing his mission. \n\nWhat is his mission? For forty minutes we are left in suspense, until the full story is told. In the future, an artificial intelligence is facing imminent defeat at the hands the humans, who it nearly drove to extinction. In a last ditch move, it sent the Terminator back to the year 1984.\n\nIts Mission: Kill the future mother of John Connor, the leader of the human resistance. Wipe out his existence entirely so there will be no resistance.\n\nHer name is Sarah Connor (Linda Hamilton). She is not rich, nor a genius. "I can\'t even balance my checkbook!" she says, "Do I look like the mother of the future?" But she is. And she is in great danger. Reese has to protect her at all costs, but he could not bring any weapons through the time warp. Nothing dead will travel back through time. How can you stop something that is indestructible?\n\nThat, my friends, is the crux of what makes this so great. Bits and pieces of information about the future of mankind are dropped in the film\'s first half. Eventually we can piece them together. Director James Cameron helps us out with flashbacks, as we see the horrifying battleground of 2029 through the eyes of Kyle Reese.\n\nOnce the exposition is done, the story refocuses on the troubles presently facing Connor and Reese. They can only hide so long before the tenacious machine tracks them down...and kills them.\n\nThe main element, besides the story, which makes the movie so effective is the way it is directed. Cameron is one of the most gifted directors in the industry, that much is certain, and one of his fortes is pacing. He also co-wrote the script, allowing him to mold the step-by-step action to his directing. The result is a tight, gripping atmosphere with air of mystery and horror mixed in. The story is sound, and builds carefully, with the audience staying involved for both the exposition and the action. There is never a dull moment.\n\nThe special effects are not very good, even for that day. The visions of the future are not too slick, and most shots of the Terminator\'s metal structure look fake at best. Still, Cameron finds a way to give his imagery impact and depth. The musical score is percussion heavy and synthesized, but what makes it work so well is that it\'s tenacious, subtly embodying the personality of the title character.\n\nAs for the acting...well, Cameron is a great director there, too. Arnold Schwarzenegger is perfectly cast as the Terminator. His most haunting quality is the straight face he keeps while slaughtering anyone who stands in his way. Linda Hamilton and Michael Biehn are wholly convincing, making us feel for their plight. The always likable Paul Winfield also gets in on the act as a police lieutenant.\n\nIn the end, this is Cameron\'s movie to win or lose, and he uses all of skills to the fullest. Despite its shortcomings, "The Terminator" is a winner. Perhaps I can finally forgive Cameron for "Titanic."\n', u'-0.0509033'], u'tt3659388': [u'I am a bit of nerd of this kind of realistic science fiction movies and therefore I had high expectations of this movie. I regret to say I was disappointed.\n\nThe movie tells the story of how the main character struggles to survive on Mars and how the space agencies work to get them back. But I was missing the emotions, the human touch. The main character never displays any signs of loneliness, despair or fear. He is more like "oh, looks like I\'m stuck on Mars, let\'s grow potatoes". He makes a one- off reference to his parents in an electronic communication, but nowhere in the movie is it made clear what his main drive is to want to return to Earth. It appears as nothing ties him there. Maybe the directors wanted to avoid the clich\xe9 of the eight months pregnant and terminally ill wife eagerly awaiting her husband\'s return from a dangerous mission, but even a clich\xe9 had been better than nothing. His character is also too flat. The only character trait that is highlighted slightly in the movie is that he may be a bit too smug about himself. Nothing else to make me identify or sympathize with him. To be honest, I couldn\'t have cared less if he had not survived.\n\nThe Mars landscape is beautifully rendered en very credible with dust clouds and all. This is the main attraction of the movie.\n\nThe main problem that there is nothing novel about this movie. There have been better movies for every aspect of the film:\n\nHuman aspect/psychology of being marooned in a strange place: Cast Away did it so much better; set in space: Matt Damon\'s role in Interstellar was more credible than his performance here. Space action scenes: Gravity had me on the edge of my seat Ground control scenes: Apollo 13 already set the standard\n\nIn summary, the movie is a beautiful, but hollow shell.', u'-0.302894', u"The crew of an American base on Mars are forced to make an emergency departure leaving one crew-member behind presumed dead. But he is alive! Can the stranded astronaut find a way of communicating his plight to those on Earth and survive while he awaits rescue? \n\nA fairly standard 'castaway' plot but one which offers many dramatic possibilities. Unfortunately few of these are realised in this pedestrian movie which fails to generate any significant dramatic tension. This is partly because the characterisation is thin but also because the challenges the stranded astronaut faces seem to be so easily overcome. Starvation? Grow potatoes. Punctured space-helmet? Sticky tape. Mars rover vehicle lacking power? Wire up a few solar cells. Communications equipment destroyed? Motor over to a handy Mars lander. We never sense that the 'Martian' (Matt Damon) is in a desperate, mind- and body-sapping struggle against the odds (conveniently he is a botanist).\n\nDamon effectively portrays the 'Martian' as a likable guy but the problem is how to fill the two hours of the movie that remain after he is stranded? When a character is alone and unable to communicate it needs something exceptional to keep us glued to the screen. Maybe what's going on back home will do it. Not really because the cast of characters there are verging on cardboard cut-outs. The returning crew? Likewise. And the script is written on the assumption that the audience is a little dumb, e.g. A: It will be 500 Sols (Martian days) before we can rescue him. B: But his food will run out in 300 sols. C: So he'll die before we get there. Indeed! And so may we. \n\nThe movie has some good FX and the Martian landscape looks convincing. But there's nothing exceptional here to compensate for the lack of an effectively told story.\n\nIn essence this is an American feel-good fantasy film, celebrating ideals of technical omnipotence, racial harmony, gender equality and international collaboration (with those cool Chinese guys and gals). If only it were so. No wonder the credits rolled to the tune of The O' Jays singing 'Love Train'. School-kids will probably join in! But, to quote Sam Goldwyn, 'Include me out!'\n\n(Viewed at the Odeon, Warrington, 06 October 2015)", u'-0.293214', u'I can\'t really believe that I just finished watching a Ridley Scott science fiction movie and feeling this low, this one never felt like anywhere close to any of his classics. This is just nothing but a typical Hollywood s***. Matt did a poor performance as a character who is caught in a life and death situation. He is not scared or emotional but instead he keeps throwing Hollywood typical punch dialogues on your face like an Avenger hero when you are expecting Science. A make-up artist or a sound engineer from the set of "Big bang theory" would have written better science script and dialogues. For me there are plenty of "WTF" or "Seriously?" moments in this movie and I wonder what happened to one of the favorite directors of all time. Also repetitive high five/triumph scenes where we don\'t feel anything. To brief: Drag, bad drama, insensitive emotional scenes, poor acting, very less science, predictable and not at all funny punch dialogues! Just YIFY it, don\'t buy!', u'-0.573432', u'I don\'t usually like to give movie reviews - but it was a hot weekend and I figured maybe I\'d venture out and see what the culture had to offer. So just how bad was "The Martian?" So bad that after an hour I realized I would rather be back in the sweltering 97 degree heat than sitting in an air conditioned theater listening to anymore inane dialog (lines like "F**k you Mars!" and "I\'m going to science the S**T out of it!") In fact it would appear that a prerequisite for going into the space program is at least six months of doing stand up. (BAD stand up.) Why does everyone (and I mean EVERYONE) in the movie sound like one of those guys on "The Big Bang Theory?" Snarky and idiotic and always cracking wise. Also: Why did every character, while typing, READ what he\'s typing out loud? Has anyone ever done this EVER? And what was with all the expository dialog, (the whole script was expository as far as I\'m concerned) Throughout the movie Matt Damon talks into a video camera, making a diary and yet he only says things that everyone who would potentially WATCH the video would of course already know, things like: "Oh yeah, did I tell you? I\'m a botanist." It\'s clear he was attempting to speak directly to the viewer and NOT the imaginary audience in the movie itself. This is the laziest kind of writing there is. They don\'t know how to deliver plot anymore except to dump bowling balls of ham fisted information in your lap; telling you things you\'ve already figured out in the most obvious way possible. That meant that there was absolutely ZERO tension. It was like reading an instruction manual for a microwave oven. "How do I grow potatoes? Oh look there\'s some poo." (cue the laugh track) And Ridley Scott\'s direction was as slack as an industrial film. False stakes, false resolutions, false falseness. Now,I know I only managed to make it through the first hour or so; maybe it got really good after that, but I was starting to feel my brain cells beginning to atrophy so it was from a sense of self- preservation that I skedaddled out of there when I did. (And don\'t get me started on the disco songs and requisite jokes about \'bad musical taste.\' It was just more target-market reconstituted nostalgia-bait.) If there is a more unoriginal, un-involving, unbelievable waste of time out there, I haven\'t seen it. So of course: Line up the Oscars!', u'-0.382555', u"I wish I liked this movie more like a lot of moviegoers who are giving it good to even great reviews, but I left the theater with a bitter taste in my mouth I had to write this review to reconcile my feelings.\n\nImagine a movie that takes from the glory of Gravity, Cast Away and Apollo 13 which also tries to be as hilarious and groovy as Guardians of The Galaxy at times but fails? You've got The Martian. The first 1/3 of the movie was quite engaging: An astronaut on Mars expedition team gets left behind after a huge storm because he was assumed dead. But he was alive and we watch him try and utilize every cell of his brains and science savvy to survive until help comes. But once he gets out of initial danger things get all too predictable and over-wrought. Couple of annoyances: 141 mins. About 30 mins too long for the storyline. There were too many mentions of Disco music the commander of the mission left behind to ill effect, unconvincing supporting characters on the Earth who seem to be just reciting a script, and some characters the movie shouldn't have had whatsoever (such as Kristen Wiig). \n\nDid Matt Damon do a good job ? I thought so until they showed a body double that didn't even resemble him and from there nothing he did was believable unfortunately. Had Damon actually lost weight without using a body double, I might have gotten more into the movie. But then again, he is no Christian Bale. So I wasn't expecting it but a little weight loss would have made him more convincing. \n\nA few good acting jobs came from Michael Pena and Benedict Wong whose characters added to the storytelling instead of subtracting it in the midst of too many unnecessary characters reciting an already weak script.", u'-0.466115', u"I generally don't give out ten stars lightly when it comes to rating films, but my God, 'The Martian' more than deserves this. The science fiction survival genre has become a big hit recently with 2013's 'Gravity' and last years 'Interstellar', and now the Mars-set tale 'The Martian'. From the hands of sci-fi connoisseur Ridley Scott, the mastermind behind 'Alien' and 'Blade Runner' comes the thrilling screen adaptation of Andy Weir's novel. Within the first few minutes, the audience are already on the edge of their seats as Matt Damon fights for survival in an Oscar-worthy performance. Playing an astronaut abandoned on the desolate surface of Mars after being presumed dead, Damon must do all he can to endure the martian environment, supported by some stunning cinematography and fantastic visual effects, 'The Martian' is able to blend humour and emotion within it's dramatic plot of survival. Jessica Chastain, Jeff Daniels, Kate Mara, Sean Bean, Chiwetel Ejiofor, just a few big names that support Damon wonderfully. If you are a fan of 'Interstellar' or any other science fiction survival tale or even some of Scott's previous sci-fi adventures, then this is one to definitely add to your watch list. Best viewed on the big screen!", u'0.61444', u'It\'s so frustrating when so many people like and praise a movie that really doesn\'t deserve it. The Martian is such a movie. I had such high hopes for it after all the hype, and after reading reviews by smart critics I usually agree with, but it was such a disappointment. Here\'s why: \n\nPlausibility. Just like Gravity, there are so many non-sensical depictions of the physics of space travel, it makes my head hurt, and I\'m not even a physicist. The characters and their actions are pretty implausible too, starting with Damon\'s chipper attitude about being left alone on a planet 100 million miles from Earth, but certainly not ending there. After realizing he is alone and will be for so long that he will run out of food, he gets the brilliant idea to try to grow his own, which we are supposed to take as a mark of his plucky brilliance. But he\'s a botanist! What would a botanist be doing on a space mission *except* studying how things grow? And then when an accident causes all his potato plants to die, the brains at NASA (who can\'t believe he figured a way to grow potatoes in the first place) instantly conclude (and tell us) that since the accident froze all the bacteria in the soil, he won\'t be able to grow any more. Why not? He still has potatoes to eat, and he still, presumably, shits occasionally, so he has all the ingredients he used the first time. Ugh! My brain hurts! \n\nWriting. The script seems written more by market researchers than a screenwriter. Corny little one-liners ("My balls are frozen!") appeal to the lowest common denominator in the audience, and the relentlessly happy tone makes being stranded on Mars seem like a big party, complete with disco music (literally). And the dialog!! There\'s a moment when Jeff Daniels, the head of NASA (whom it is hard to imagine has ever ever taken a science class or piloted anything) talks to the heads of the Chinese Space agency who offer (presumedly--we only hear his end of the conversation) to lend one of their ships to the rescue effort. He says, "Mmm Hmm. Okay. I see. Thank you." (That\'s what a discussion about loaning spacecraft between two space agencies sounds like.) Then he hangs up the phone, clenches his fists, and says, "Yes!" It\'s like Homer Simpson finding out there is still one donut left. That someone wrote that line is astounding. That the director and actor saw fit to actually shoot it is bewildering. That it survived the editing process and made it into the final cut--well, there should be an investigation. \n\nPacing. It\'s a movie about being stranded on Mars for months and months. Why does it feel like a comedy by Woody Allen or Edgar Wright? There is never a pause, never a prolonged quiet moment that might begin to capture something of the unbelievable space and loneliness this movie is supposed to be about. Instead, it is a constant rapid fire of dialog and action. Even the scenes where he is communicating with Earth via text happens faster than I usually get with my iPhone and 4G. (NASA technicians mention, at one point, that there is a 25 minute delay between all communications, but the filmmakers hope we forget this two minutes later when all the subsequent conversations happen instantly). Then there is the rest of the crew and their additional unplanned two years of extra time stuck in the spaceship, going all the way BACK to Mars to pick up what they left there. If I have to run back home to get something I forgot, the trip always seems infuriatingly long. But not these cheery space travelers! Another two years in space! No problem! And it takes only two minutes of screen time. Piece of cake! \n\nAGH! What a frustrating experience. If you want a sugar-coated popcorn movie that will make you think that if being on stranded on Mars isn\'t really so bad, why complain about our petty little problems here on Earth? then this movie might be for you. It does for being stranded in space what The Shawshank Redemption does for being in prison. It tries to tell us that it\'s really not THAT bad after all. It\'s such a lie, and such a disappointment, all the more so because there are so many serious issues and exciting psychological and scientific aspects about space that could have been explored here.', u'-0.279587', u"This movie can be summed up with one word... vapid. As if Matt Damon's inherently vapid acting weren't bad enough, the makers of this film were so overtly focused on presenting an idyllic reality where no character behaves in any offensive way, to anybody, they produced an un-suspenseful, uninteresting, boring, vapid turd of a story. They fall over themselves to be so certain that no minority demographic is stereotyped that all characters have the sane vapid personality. And in what seems to be some sort of perverse effort to recompense reality, a very transparent hierarchy is followed to be certain that: the Black people are the most clever; the Hispanic people are next most clever; the Asian people are next most clever(carefully not portrayed as exceptionally smart), and of course the women are more clever than the men. Of course the only flawed demographic were older white male authority figures. To me this liberal, philosophical portrayal of what an ideal reality is reveals that they are the true bigots, the haters. They hate the differences that make people interesting. Ethnicity, femininity / masculinity, and their different traits should be loved and celebrated, not shamed, muted, or eliminated. It is the interaction of those differences that create an interesting story, not a vapid one.", u'-0.344075', u"The Martian is a new Ridley Scott classic, featuring his best work in years, the best performance I've ever seen from Matt Damon, an outstanding supporting cast, a surprisingly funny screenplay from Daredevil creator Drew Goddard, and a great narrative that ties the film together beautifully. \n\nAs expected with Ridley Scott films, the film itself is visually stunning. The landscape of Mars looks absolutely breathtaking, and the scenes aboard the Hermes and back on Earth are just as sharp in detail and scope. The way he chose to make this film made it almost seem like an exceptionally made biopic. Many times during this film, I legitimately believed that Mark Watney was a real, living person that was actually stranded on Mars for many months alone. It's Cast Away meets Apollo 13, and this marriage is crafted beautifully. \n\nMatt Damon is absolutely brilliant in this film. He plays Watney with so much optimism that it actually makes the depressing aspect of the film not as depressing for me. However, when he has to put on his dramatic chops in certain scenes, he truly commits to the drama of the situation, and that right there is true Ridley Scott suspense for you. The supporting cast, everyone involved, all do great work as well. Jeff Daniels, Jessica Chastain, particularly Chiwetel Ejiofor. He is one of the best actors working today, and this movie and 12 Years a Slave shows how far he's come. \n\nThe most surprisingly element about this movie though was the screenplay. The film is hilarious in some parts, in fact I'd argue that it's funnier than most comedies that have come out this year. What makes to movie unique to me was Watney's optimistic point of view. He believes that he isn't going to die on Mars, and this transforms this rather depressing situation into something comical instead. But when you really think about it, this is a very personal film about some people coming together to save somebody. That's it. And in today's world, it's nice to hear an story about people coming together to save one of their own. \n\nI have nothing bad to say about The Martian. It's the best film I've seen all year.", u'0.410685', u'"The Martian" and "Red Planet" \n\nI\'m kind of surprised that no one has noticed the similarities "The Martian" has to "Red Planet" with Val Kilmer, released in 2000. Here\'s a few noteworthy(?) plot devices that were first seen in "Red Planet" that seem to have coincidental reappearances in "The Martian". \n\n1. \n\nRP - Val Kilmer, by accident marooned on Mars (with other guys who get killed off, leaving him alone),and a female commander of the mission up in space (who eventually saves him). \n\nTM - Matt Damon, by accident marooned on Mars, alone, and a female commander of the mission up in space (who eventually saves him).\n\n2. \n\nRP - Val finds the Sojourner rover (which luckily just happens to be nearby) and modifies it to call for help. \n\nTM - Matt finds the Sojourner rover (which luckily just happens to be nearby) and modifies it to call for help.\n\n3. \n\nRP - The female mission commander makes the decision to stay in orbit and try to save Val. \n\nTM - The female mission commander makes the decision to go back and try to save Matt. (as cold blooded as this sounds, this is the least likelier of the two scenarios that would have the possibility to actually happen, in reality they\'d let him \'fend for himself\'.) \n\n4. \n\nRP - Val must make a long arduous journey to get to a Russian sample return launcher. \n\nTM - Matt must make a long arduous journey to get to a NASA mission return launcher.\n\n5. \n\nRP - Val has to modify the sample return launcher to make it work, leaving him exposed to space when it launches.\n\nTM - Matt has to modify the mission return launcher to make it work, he ends up being exposed to space when it launches.\n\n6. \n\nRP - The return launcher fouls up as it goes into space with Val aboard, requiring his mission commander to go out on a tether and retrieve him. \n\nTM - The return launcher fouls up as it goes into space with Matt aboard, requiring one of the crew to go out on a tether and retrieve him.\n\n** Of course Matt didn\'t have the inconvenience of the robot dog who was trying to kill him as Val had to contend with; but Val discovered he could breathe the Martian air that was generated by the seeded algae. So things even out pretty well. \n\nNo one else noticed these because likely no one saw "Red Planet", which while not a big hit is not without its own goofy personality charms.', u'0.0547124', u'Do not trust any review above 2 stars. I think such users are payed reviewers.\n\nI went to watch this "movie" not expecting much, but what i get was a total frustration. \n\nI\'d like to get a refund for the ticked i payed because i felt cheated. The movie is insulting to human intelligence. Totally pointless, superficial and from a scientific point of view, is an insult to every scientist. In addition i hope the NASA will call the production to a courtyard for how they have been represented in the movie. \n\nActing is quite often terrible too, no psychological immersion, all is a joke and with a little montage everything become possible... this movie is a waste of money and time, i want my money back!!!\n\nDo not waste money and time over this one!\n\nTHE SPOILER PART REAT AT YOUR OWN DISCRECTION: \n\nThink about : 1- growing potato over a soil not tested fertilized with astronauts "poo"... what about bacteria ? What about soil minerals and PH ? ... why he had potatoes in a martian station? (that\'s a joke)\n\n2- why there is no scientific team studying and calculating ? Just a bunch of guys wandering around saying "yes" to the big boss or the minor actor acting like the "genius" ?? \n\n3- No information control at the NASA center??? Are you kidding me ??? An astronauts left alone over mars, does a real-time chatting with a "guy" (not even a psychologist) and such conversations are real-time public shared !!!! ARE YOU F*****G KIDDIN ME????? \n\n4- sorry i forgot to mention that in such movie radiation are totally ignored, as you will never see the reflecting visor down even in "free space" while glancing at sun\n\nThere are tons of those nonsenses in the movie... i just have time to write down 4, but all the movie is 2 hours of such nonsenses.\n\nTO CONCLUDE: this "movie" is an insult to the viewer, who liked it does ignore even the basic concepts of science, a terrible superficial plot. This "movie" is a scam, a fraud to steal our money. I\'ve been cheated, listen to me and don\'t be fooled keep you time and money for something better.', u'-0.595881', u"Spoilers below. \n\nThe worst thing about about this movie was that everything is so hard to believe because it's such nonsense. It doesn't follow basic physic laws. It doesn't take much to get me invested in a movie as a viewer, but this just goes too far. The absolute worst flaw is not even all the fake science, nor I'd it the overuse of disco music or the fact that the astronaut doesn't really get desperate and only makes cheesy jokes... No, it's the fact that China's space program has some secret spaceship which they want to reveal and give up for the eyes of the world to save one unknown American dude. That just doesn't make any sense. First of all, China could care less, also, why give up a rocket on which you've been apparently working in secret, just to send food up to space? And if all this would happen for some strange reason... America responds with 'ok. I see. Thank you'. Hangs up and goes ' yessssssss.' Idiotic.", u'-0.239952', u"I was waiting for this movie for a few weeks and was greatly disappointed when I finally watched it.\n\nIt doesn't matter if the number of potatoes to survive is accurate, if you are using toxic rocket fuel to make water, you do not feel lonely and isolated, and you are not worried about oxygen - you are just having fun - isolated for 300-500 days without anyone or anything else around - the guy seems pretty comfortable and not worried.\n\nImpossible to connect with characters. Too many stereotypes. Blatant sales and marketing, actor and story picks for the sake of selling more tickets.\n\nI hope I will save my money and time, next movie like this comes out.", u'-0.277613', u'Wow this was a bad one, I thought Interstellar was painful but this was even worse (I know hard to believe!) My favourite part in the whole movie was when Matt points out that an explosion which occurred in a particular room during an experiment he was conducting was due to (you\'ll love this!) him exhaling too much oxygen into the room! Correct me if I\'m wrong but I\'m pretty sure we exhale CO2 and inhale O2. I think even a fifth grader would be able to tell me that. I nearly cried with laughter when I heard him say that line and how he kept a straight face is beyond me, unless he thinks its true of course.\n\nThis was just the beginning of the lack of believable science in this movie and it was so painful to watch after more and more random unbelievable events started popping up. His one line killed the movie for me, from that point on I was looking for more "errors" and they just kept on coming.\n\nAnyway to cover the opening sequence with how poor Matt ends up left on Mars to die, well there\'s a big storm that no one seems coming, they all rush to their landing vehicle to hot tail it back up to their orbiting mothership. Matt gets a whack in the gut with something (which we later find out pierced his suit completely but yet somehow the suit manages to stay pressurised with a hole in it) and decides to pass out. The rest of the crew fly back up to the mothership and, get this, immediately set course for home! They don\'t stay in orbit for say another 24 hours and recover Matt\'s body they just leg it back home asap. Odd I thought for a NASA mission to just abandon him and not say bring the body back for his family to bury.\n\nWhen poor Matt wakes up he finds all the communications are down and all his friends gone. And by communications I mean the one satellite dish that was stuck to the habitat roof has blown down in the storm and been completely demolished, but not one of the solar panels outside is damaged, just a bit sandy. Seeing how comms back to Earth would be one of the critical systems would there not be 3 or 4 other methods of calling home, redundancies in case of a disaster? NASA didn\'t see the point in having any of those backups on this mission to Mars, what could possibly go wrong? Another good one is when he is told to drill and cut a whole in the roof of a perfectly airtight rover and sticky tape a big plastic balloon to the top of it. No reason is given for this yet it happens, I think it\'s so he can take some more plastic painting sheets with him but I cant be certain. Also wouldn\'t this drilling and cutting a big hole compromise the pressurisation integrity rendering the vehicle unsafe to drive around in without a space suite on, oh but not for Matt, he happily drives around Mars with no suit on at all with his new plastic sticky taped sunroof fitted trying to work out how far he can get on his batteries while whinging about how he\'ll never make it to the RV due to lack of power all the while singing along to the stereo with more flood lights turned on than at a football stadium. Um turn some crap off Matt that\'ll save you some juice.\n\nAgain another scene in the movie, an airlock somehow gets blown to bits and a big gaping whole is left in the side of the habitat Matt lives in. The solution, a big piece of plastic sheet and more sticky tape, he then repressurises the habitat and somehow his sticky taped plastic painting sheet is able to hold up fine, outside there are wild storms going on (which are visible through a few of the more believable looking pressurised windows) raging away and not one single piece of debris punches through his plastic painting drop sheet or does any damage to his rover or solar panels.\n\nThe mission to get him home is to send back the craft which ran away and left him in the beginning. NASA didn\'t tell the crew of the ship for months that he was still alive as they didn\'t want to hurt their feelings! So the plan to get him back is drive the mothership all the way back to Earth, do some gravity sling shot thing around Earth (sounds like Apollo 13?) rendezvous with a supplies pod (food and movies onboard probably) and fly all the way back to Mars and pick him up as he fires himself into space from a lander (after stripping out all the gear inside, removing the roof and covering it with another plastic painting sheet held on with sticky tape to save weight) already there for the next disastrous mission to Mars NASA has already cooked up.\n\nFor me this movie just went too far, way beyond what any normal person with a even a tiny grasp of science can cope with. I cannot believe Ridley, NASA and JPL were happy to have their names mentioned let alone their relevant ground breaking departments portrayed with such a lack of any real science.\n\nI know it\'s a SciFi movie but you have to get the basics right and have some kind of explanation for the viewer to be able to buy into the ludicrous things which take place in the movie. Otherwise it just becomes a complete bore to watch and the viewer spends their time looking for more flaws.\n\nMy opinion, save yourself the money, stay home, get a pizza in & watch Blade Runner on BluRay again :-)', u'-0.488086', u'because I care about the future, I looked forward to this movie. But while i watched it, it was a struggle to make it to the end. I\'m very disappointed. Easily i blame the director, but there is a bigger production team who failed. They created a film of shallow, lame, clich\xe9 stereotypes with bad developed characters.\n\nIt\'s all about the hero. It\'s not about "Matt Damon in his best role". When he\'s suppose to be funny, it\'s the worst. Jessica Chastain was brilliant in Interstellar, so now she lights up another successful chapter of imaginary human spaceflight ? Sorry, I much more think of a massive loss of image.\n\nIf you wish to make future NASA look smart, cute and sexy, do not pick Jeff Daniels as it\'s director ! Every time \'Teddy\' shows up, I expected Jim Carrey dancing to the disco sound. It wasn\'t even funny once to blame Lewis for her taste of music, and it wasn\'t funny to blame her again and again. \n\nPlease, Mister Scott, if you grab one more time into the box of stereotypes and transform actors like Sean Bean, Chiwetel Ejiofor, Jeff Daniels Matt Damon, Jessica Chastain and Michael Pe\xf1a into fools: retire ! Thank you.\n\nP. S. Hold on, you didn\'t fail on Mackenzie Davis, she made NASA look cute.', u'-0.234975'], u'tt0046250': [u'\nThis charming comedy is justly famous as the film that made the whole world fall in love with Audrey Hepburn and half the world want to run out and buy a Vespa scooter. Hepburn was always beguiling, but in some of her later roles she tended to overplay the winsomeness. Here every note she hits is just about perfect.\n\nAnd speaking of notes, pay special attention to the score by the great Georges Auric. If the film had been produced in the manner of modern romantic comedies, the sound track would have been larded with pop hits by Perry Como, Dinah Shore, and Frankie Laine, which would have done an awful lot to destroy the magic. Instead Auric\'s complex, vibrant, evocative music complements the story\'s inherent lyricism without upstaging it. In an era of bombastic film scoring, this seems a miracle.\n\nSomeone once said that Audrey Hepburn\'s was the beauty of possibility and transformation -- she was always in motion, always becoming something else. "Roman Holiday" is very much of a piece with that notion. On the surface, the film is about a princess who disguises herself as a "commoner". But in truth she\'s actually pretending to be a princess, at least at first. She finally becomes authentic -- is transformed and prepared to deal with her destiny -- only through the ennobling power of love and sacrifice. That\'s one heck of a mythic subtext and does a lot to explain "Roman Holiday\'s" enduring power. ', u'0.274428', u"I recently caught this little gem of a film on a retro program and it was a trip well worth it. William Wyler was a genius directing throughout his film career. Here he's in top form.\n\nThe only way this film could have been conceived was with the charming presence of Audrey Hepburn in her first appearance on a Hollywood film. She is without a doubt, an angel who was sent to this earth to delight the movie audiences in whatever movie she happened to dignify with her appearance in.\n\nSome people have compared Audrey Tatou with the incomparable Audrey Hepburn. Seeing Ms Hepburn in Roman Holiday will certainly change the minds of those comparing fans. Audrey Hepburn was a star's star! She exudes charm, intelligence, elegance, and beauty. Just one look from her could disarm Gregory Peck forever.\n\nThe only wrong note of this production was the way the writer, Dalton Trumbo, was treated since he had been blacklisted by the anti-communist faction lead by Sen. McCarthy and company. In the end, Mr. Trumbo was vindicated in having his name recognized as the writer of Roman Holiday.\n\nThis film is a feast to the eyes in that glorious cinematography and Rome as a background. This was Hollywood at its best. Gregory Peck and Audrey Hepburn will be forever young any time we take a look at this classic that I'm sure will live and charm its viewers whenever they take a chance to see it for the first time, or like some of us, for another loving look.", u'0.645079', u"\nA plot as slender as Audrey Hepburn but oh what magic! If you've never seen this jewel, you're to have one of the best evenings of your week, your month.\n\nPerhaps the key to this movie's success is restraint - in the dialogue, in the music, in the cynicism of Peck and cronies at the movie's beginning. No one gushes - all is understated - but how one feels its power.\n\n\nI hope everyone has experienced a day such as they - with someone they come to care for - as much as they. It's my wish for the world.\n\n\n", u'0.291203', u"\nAudrey Hepburn's first big film role cast her as a Princess of country unknown, making a state visit to Rome.  Bored of the endless run of openings, dedications and so on, she decides to see something of the city, and runs into American newsman Gregory Peck.  He recognises her as the missing Princess and plans to scoop a major interview for his syndicate, with the help of pal Eddie Albert and his hidden camera.\n\nHepburn is an absolute joy, particularly when her hair is shorn down to the classic urchin cut and she takes a motorcycle ride.  Peck, too, is served well by this kind of role, and the romance of the city of Rome helps their relationship to develop during their 24 hours of freedom.  Roman Holiday is one of those rarities which are truly perfect and memorable, a real girly flick with beautiful photography and a sparkling script.  Highly recommended, and especially so in the wonderful recent restoration.", u'0.618017', u"A Holiday worth celebrating every day of the year. The Princess awakens from her slumbers in this classic fall-from-innocence, coming-of-age tale with a royal twist. Audrey Hepburn stakes her claim as the most perfect woman who ever lived. Gregory Peck at his best as the ne'er-do-well American reporter who guides her chastely from girlhood to womanhood. What can I add? One of the finest movies ever made. Now will you please stop reading this review and rent the movie, for heaven's sake? ...Now, according to the rules, this review has to go for at least 10 lines. And yet I've said everything I have to say about Roman Holiday. It is perfect. Rent it. Or better yet, buy it. You won't regret it. There, now that's 11 lines, that ought to do it.", u'0.296554', u'Constantly advised, overprotected, and bored with her royal duties, Princess Anne, on holiday in Rome, evades her protectors and sneaks out at night to discover how the ordinary Italians live...\n\nExhausted from a claustrophobic schedule, she collapses in a public place\x85 \n\nPassing by is Joe Bradley (Gregory Peck), a newspaper reporter who was planning to interview the Princess the following day\x85\n\nNot realizing who she is, he eventually takes her to his apartment where she spends the night on his couch\x85\n\nAfter discovering her identity, Bradley charms the runaway princess for the exclusive story he visualizes writing\x85 He calls his carefree photographer friend Eddie Albert and proposes to spend the day with her and experience everything she has always desired to\x85 \n\nAudrey Hepburn\x97the exquisite incognito princess who finds romance in the capital city of Italy\x97 not only lets down her long tresses, but also gets a more fashionable cut, as she blossoms to embrace a life she knows she cannot keep\x85\n\nHepburn received an Oscar for Best Actress in recognition of her gamine charms and for her great acting ability\x85\n\nIf you like to remember Princess Anne at the caf\xe9 ordering champagne for lunch; smoking her "very first" cigarette; dancing on a barge on the Tiber River; hitting the royal agents with beer bottles; and testing the legend of \'The Mouth of Truth;\' don\'t miss this delightful movie with three legendary stars\x85', u'-0.0275086', u"Audrey Hepburn doesn't have a vulgar bone in her body: she breezes through this comedic romp with the spirit of a saint on holiday. When a princess escapes the castle while touring Italy, a down-on-his-luck American reporter chances to meet her and smells a good story. A joyful fairy tale, but with the heartbreak of reality at the finale, and what sweet sadness there is in those final shots! Hepburn won an Oscar for Best Actress, and deserved it. Gregory Peck is almost playful in his scenes with her, and Eddie Albert is a perfect buddy-match. Director William Wyler sets up the story very gingerly, but he cuts loose as well, and the whole picture plays like a delectable dessert. ***1/2 from ****", u'0.606978', u'\nWith a very nice blend of fantasy and reality, and two very likable stars, "Roman Holiday" is both entertaining and thoughtful.  Sometimes it is very funny, and at other times it makes you feel a great sympathy and warmth towards the characters.  Audrey Hepburn and Gregory Peck are ideal in the leading roles, and the story is very clever in getting a lot of mileage out of a simple idea without pushing things too far, which makes it quite effective.\n\nThe idea of Princess Ann (Audrey) slipping away unnoticed and unrecognized for a day of fun and freedom from responsibility is of course fanciful, but it works for a lot of reasons, not the least of which is Peck\'s role as a pragmatic newsman.  He is a good balance for Hepburn\'s charm and energy, remaining calm and logical without ever becoming cold or distant.  You feel as if you could spend a lot more than a couple of hours in their company.  And how could you improve on Eddie Albert\'s performance as Peck\'s photographer friend?  The movie also adds in the atmosphere of Rome itself, with some creative scenes that make good use of the setting.\n\nThere are many fine moments in a story that at times seems almost like a daydream, and then it brings the characters back to reality in a moving way.  It\'s not an easy combination to pull off, but here it all fits together very well, to make the kind of classic worth remembering, and one which you can watch and enjoy more than once.\n\n', u'0.805257', u"When Roman Holiday was in the planning stages William Wyler envisioned either Elizabeth Taylor or Jean Simmons in the role of the princess. When neither proved available, he and Paramount studios decided to do a Scarlett O'Hara type search for an unknown for the part. The film then would only have Gregory Peck as the star to draw the people in.\n\nBut when Peck saw the screen test and also realized the film would rise and fall on the performance of the princess part, he insisted on top billing for Audrey Hepburn. Audrey had only done a few small bit parts in some English films up till then, however Peck insisted on the billing of her right after him with 'introducing Audrey Hepburn' as her title credit. \n\nIn the same way that William Holden credited Barbara Stanwyck with helping him get through Golden Boy, Audrey Hepburn credited Gregory Peck with her performance in Roman Holiday. As well as William Wyler who still has a record of more people getting to the Oscar sweepstakes for his films than any other director.\n\nRoman Holiday is simple and delightful film about a young princess of some unnamed European country who gets tired of her programmed routine and wants a break from it. In Rome while on a European tour, princess Audrey fakes an illness and runs off for a day of fun.\n\nAn American wire service reporter Gregory Peck finds her and realizes he's got an exclusive. So he chaperones her around without letting her know she's on to him. He even gets photographer Eddie Albert to help him out.\n\nEddie Albert got the first of two nominations for Best Supporting Actor for Roman Holiday, the second one being The Goodbye Girl. He lost to Frank Sinatra for From Here to Eternity. Though Albert is funny in this film, for dramatic work I never understood why he was not nominated for Attack or for Captain Newman, MD.\n\nIf you're thinking that the film is starting to bear a resemblance to a continental It Happened One Night you would be right. And if that's your thinking it will come as no surprise to learn that Frank Capra originally had the idea to film this. The property reverted to Paramount as part of his settlement to leave that studio after doing two Bing Crosby films.\n\nI wish Paramount had done Roman Holiday in color though. Darryl F. Zanuck over at 20th Century did Three Coins in the Fountain in gorgeous color and later on MGM did The Seven Hills of Rome also in color. Still the Roman locations really add a lot to Audrey's adventure.\n\nWhen Oscar time Audrey Hepburn in her first starring role and really first role of any consequence won an Oscar for Best Actress. Until the day she died Audrey Hepburn had charm enough for ten, you can't help but love her in anything she ever did. Even if the film she did was not that great, Audrey sparkles through.\n\nEven in black and white, the Eternal City with Audrey and Greg make anyone young at heart.", u'0.31916', u"\nI could just write my one line summary over and over again, but that would make for a rather dull comment, so I won't (stop cheering in the balcony!). In addition to the wonderful Ms. Hepburn, Gregory Peck does his typically superb job and Eddie Albert turns in a delightful (but no doubt painful, for him) performance in this incredibly charming jewel of a film.  This film made me an incurable romantic for life!  *sigh* I'd better quit before my apartment becomes a wind-tunnel!  Joyously, happily recommended!", u'-0.0213527', u'Enchanting is the word that comes to mind to describe "Roman Holiday". It\'s got that escape from reality wonder about it that might be envied even by royalty. Audrey Hepburn is luminous in her first American film appearance, allowing the viewer to believe that she really could pull off the disappearing act for twenty fours hours for the purpose of living life on a \'fun schedule\'.\n\nI was impressed by how much mileage Princess Ann got out of that five thousand lira note; could one really buy sandals, a haircut and a cone of gelato all for less than a dollar and a half in 1953? That would have made Joe Bradley\'s (Gregory Peck) five thousand dollar payday close to a king\'s ransom, or at least a princess\'s. Bradley\'s put into a predicament when Ann comments on his sacrifice to spend the day showing her around Rome; she describes it as \'completely unselfish\'. By that time, one gets the idea that just maybe he\'ll wind up doing the right thing.\n\nSlow to pick up on Bradley\'s non verbals, photographer Irving Radovich (Eddie Albert) bears the brunt of Joe\'s spilled drinks and takes a pratfall or two. Sadly, one of his remarks to Joe brought to mind the unending scrutiny suffered in real life by Princess Diana - "She\'s fair game Joe, it\'s always open season on princesses." Odd how art imitating life, in this case predicting it, could end in such tragedy.\n\nIt was heartwarming then to see how Joe and Irving turned their back on a story, and instead opted to reaffirm humanity. The finale is both uplifting and bittersweet, echoing one of Gregory Peck\'s lines to Hepburn earlier in the story - "Life isn\'t always what one likes, is it?"', u'0.203586', u'As Robert Osborne of TCM says, Roman Holiday is one of the best movies, maybe the best movie. It\'s not grand in scope, like Gone With the Wind or Citizen Kane. It\'s really a simple romantic comedy: Royalty goes slumming for a day to rub shoulders with the commoners, while a couple of benign hustlers try to make a buck from it. Hustler and Blue Blood fall for each other, big surprise. The settings in Rome are nice, the photography is OK. The plot is sweet, the dialog clever. So what makes this movie so great? It\'s Audrey and Gregory. One could say she was the most beautiful woman in the world at that time. (Along with Liz Taylor?). Her youth, enthusiasm, sweetness, charm, pretty face and slender figure make a package that is so spectacular it\'s probably never been surpassed since. It\'s hard not for anyone not to fall in love with her. And they dress her to show it all off! Gregory, himself tall, dark, handsome and slim, is also remarkable with his comedic style. He also has a charm that is unique to him and is very attractive. They are both the best of actors, and the script let\'s them shine.\n\nWhat some consider the best scene is when Gregory puts his hand in the mouth of the statue and pretends his hand is being bitten. Audrey\'s reaction, they say, was completely natural, as Greg\'s acting was so good it fooled her.\n\nEddie Albert is very good, as is his beard!\n\nOf course, when you look at who directed it, Wyler, who made some of filmdom\'s greatest, like Wuthering Heights, Ben Hur and many others, it may make sense that this movie is so good. But putting together a "dream team" has often flopped. But there\'s no smugness or overconfidence here. Like in the scene when Princess and Reporter separate in front of the palace. The vulnerability and emotion is remarkable. And the end, with the "making love", as they used to say, with their eyes, again remarkable.\n\nFor such a lighthearted movie, it has at bottom a dark theme: the classes cannot mix. The audience feels this as the source of the sadness at the end of the film. It\'s reminiscent of The Great Gatsby: people can interact with the Rich, thinking they may be treated as equals or even ascend, but in the end the Old Guard accepts no newcomers and even tramples whomever it encounters.\n\nA rating score of 10 is the best that can be given in IMDb. This movie rates higher than that.', u'0.289316', u'Roman Holiday is one of the very few "flawless" films in the history of film making. In Audrey Hepburn\'s first American film, she steals the show. It is impossible to take your attention off her. Not only is she beautiful, but talented as well. She has a great sense of timing, and this is so important for any actor in a comedy. Each scene is beautifully shot in the city of Rome, making it a delight for the eyes. Gregory Peck has incredible chemistry with Hepburn, and is a delight to watch. I would recommend this film to anyone; young, old, male or female. This is a timeless classic and the platform from which Hepburn became a huge star and made her mark on American film, fashion, and style.', u'0.587203', u'I absolutely love this movie. The chemistry between Audrey Hepburn and Gregory Peck is magnetic. You can tell they truly enjoyed each other. Audrey was quoted as saying for her first major motion picture Gregory Peck was the perfect choice due to his genuine warmth of character. In fact, Peck insisted that Audrey name be placed next to his because to do otherwise would be "silly" (this was her first major role). My favorite scene, though a sad one, is the ending where the love they have for one another is seen in their faces as they both know they can never be together. Just a fantastic movie both light hearted, funny and a unique love story all in one film. Any fan of Audery can\'t miss her Oscar winning performance in this film. She truly was one of the most beautiful actresses of all time and a remarkable human being.', u'0.549913', u"Roman holiday is the most incredible movie I have ever seen. I came across this movie quite by chance. I like suspense movies and I watched Charade starring Audrey and Cary Grant. Audrey's acting in that movie impressed me so I decided to watch Roman holiday too. Too be very frank I was not really looking forward to watching this movie. Like most people of this generation I dislike black and white movies.\n\nMan was I wrong. I have never seen a movie, which had so much romance, comedy and emotional drama. It would be fair to say that magic was created in this movie. The plot I guess everyone knows, a young princes tired of her regulated life runs away and hooks up with a reporter (Gregory Peck) for a day of fun in Rome. The reporter lies to her that he is a businessman and she lies to him about her true identity. They both have fun visiting Rome's historic places. But the reporter has a hidden agenda. He wants to write a story on the princess's escapades in Rome and enlists the help of his photographer friend (Albert). Things work according to plan for the reporter until he finds that he is really starting to fall in love with the princess.\n\nThe story line may appear to be simple but take my word for it that Gregory Peck and Audrey Hepburn create magic and the movie will take a hold over you like nothing else you have ever seen. This is Audrey's best movie and the only movie she got an Oscar for and she was never so charming, innocent and beautiful as she is in this movie.\n\nOne of the reviewers has suggested that Cary Grant would have been ideal for the role that Gregory Peck plays. I only have to say this to the devotees of Cary Grant that he would never have worked as a romantic lead in this movie. He was 50 years old at the time this movie was made and the sight of him cavorting around with a girl half his age would have removed from the movie it's romantic element. It would have become perhaps a slightly funnier movie but without the heart wrenching almost magical hold it now has. Also it is my humble opinion after seeing Charade that Cary Grant is too suave to play the role of a struggling reporter convincingly.\n\nHistory has already spoken; this movie is regarded as one of the all time greats, why would we want to change something, which is already perfect. Gregory Peck is ideal for the role of the reporter, he is incredibly handsome in the movie, a kind of man a young girl could fall in love with even after being with him only for a few hours. In this movie, Gregory Peck acts his heart out, especially at the end and he has a wonderfully chemistry with Audrey, which is the reason this movie still seems so fresh and charming even after 50 years.\n\nThis is one of those rare movies that works across cultural and national borders. I was surprised to learn that according to a poll in Japan even after so many years Roman Holiday still is the number one foreign movie of all time.\n\nThis movie is simply the best.", u'0.381283'], u'tt0073195': [u"\n'Jaws' is the original summer blockbuster, setting the standard by which all others are measured. It's the Michael Jordan of cinema: there will never be another 'Jaws,' simply because the film so profoundly changed the way movies are made and marketed.\n\nBased on Peter Benchley's bestselling novel, 'Jaws' centers around the fictional North Atlantic resort island of Amity, which finds itself terrorized by an enormous great white shark. Our hero is Martin Brody, a New York cop who took the job as Chief of the Amity PD to get his family out of the city and then finds himself in the midst of an unprecedented crisis none of his prior experience has prepared him for. The remains of young Christine Watkins are found on the beach, the apparent victim of a shark attack(Chrissie Watkins' death scene at the opening of the movie is one of the most legendary in the history of film). Chief Brody wants to close the beaches, but is refused permission by Mayor Larry Vaughn (Murray Hamilton) and the Amity selectmen, all of whom fear that news of a shark attack off of Amity will threaten the summer tourist trade, on which the town depends for its very survival. The Mayor and his lackies persuade Chief Brody that such incidents are always isolated, and, inexperienced in such matters, he grudgingly agrees to keep quiet.\n\nConsequently, the shark kills again (and again), and Chief Brody eventually finds himself dealing both with his own moral guilt for agreeing to hush up the first shark attack and with an enormous human and social catastrophe which appears to be his sole responsibility. Help comes first in the form of Matt Hooper (Richard Dreyfuss, in the role that propelled him to stardom), an icthyologist and oceanographer dispatched to Amity to lend his expertise. Together, Hooper and Brody struggle in vain against both the shark and Mayor Vaughan, who is certain that keeping the beaches open for the sake of the town's economy (and his own real-estate business) is worth the gamble.\n\nFinally, Brody and Hooper charter an expedition with the enigmatic, vaguely malevolent Quint (Robert Shaw), Amity's most feared and respected shark hunter, to find and kill the shark and save the town from financial disaster. What ensues is an epic, archetypal man vs. beast quest that would make Herman Melville and Joseph Campbell proud. Our shark, it turns out, is way above average size, terrifically swift and powerful, and uncannily smart, to boot. Hooper, the scientist, is awestruck at having encountered the Bigfoot of the sea; Quint, the crafty fisherman with a serious chip on his shoulder against sharks, realizes he has met the ultimate test of his skills; Brody, who swims poorly and is afraid of water, must overcome abject fear and disorientation just to maintain his composure. \n\nRobert Shaw's Quint is one of the greatest anti-heroes the movies have ever seen. He is funny and frightening all at once, and the famous soliloquy in which he recalls the tragic sinking of the USS Indianapolis--where, over the course of a week waiting for rescue, at least 90 US Navy personnel died from shark attack wounds--is one of the most chilling and unforgettable performances ever committed to film. \n\n'Jaws' is the movie that made Steven Spielberg's career, and it's among his finest. It's easy to forget because of his enormously successful blockbusters that Spielberg is a phenomenally skillful and artful director. His timing is superb, he mixes horror with comedy to brilliant effect, he gets great performances out of his actors, and his love for special effects has never overwhelmed his understanding of the importance of story and character. \n\nThat said, the most brilliant aspect of 'Jaws' was a serendipitous accident.\n\nThe special effects team had yet to fully troubleshoot 'Bruce,' the mechanical shark, by the time filming was to begin. Under tight budget restraints and enormous studio pressure, Spielberg had no choice but to press on while his crew labored vainly to make the shark work in the cold and corrosive north Atlantic seawater. To compensate for the absence of the non-functional fake shark, Spielberg used shots from the shark's point of view and John Williams' famous two-note theme to create the illusion of the shark's presence in the early scenes. Fortunately the crew was ultimately able to get Bruce into operational status in time to film the big showdown, and some of the scenes are filled in with live-shark footage filmed by Australian underwater video pioneers Ron and Valerie Taylor. Consequently, the audience's fear is magnified by the fact that, for the majority of the film, they cannot see the shark, creating suspense towards the climax of the confrontation between man and beast on Quint's fishing boat.\n\n'Jaws' succeeds on almost every level. It is terrifying without being grotesque, and spectacular without being unbelievable (if the shark looks a little fake, remember that, at the time 'Jaws' was released, 'Space Invaders' was on the cutting edge of computer graphics design and there was no such thing as 'Shark Week on the Discovery Channel'). Roy Scheider's Brody is a quintessential everyman, an average guy beset by fear and guilt who finds himself in extraordinary circumstances and rises to the occasion. Dreyfuss' Hooper is brash and brave enough not to come off as nerdy or self-righteous, and his friendship with Brody becomes the backbone of the movie (Spielberg and screenwriter Carl Gottlieb wisely deviated from the novel in regards to the character of Hooper, who was originally Brody's nemesis). Robert Shaw's Quint is a modern-day Captain Ahab, a worthy foe for the malevolent shark. The suspense is potent and the action thrilling, but the humor, emotion, and character development make this movie much more than a summer blockbuster.\n", u'0.345443', u'Jaws is a movie the I grew up with, it\'s like the first real horror film I ever watched. What a great one to start with, right? This movie not only scarred me out of the water, I was afraid to go to the bathroom! I thought Jaws was going to pop up out of the toilet and bite my butt! :D I know it was silly, but that was how much Jaws effected me. I know also that it has not lost it\'s effect to this day. I\'m questioning, because it seems like all the terrific horror films came out of the 70\'s.\n\nJaws is based on the best seller book by Peter Benchley. Steven Spielberg, before he was STEVEN Spielberg turned this horrifying book and made it into a reason to hate sharks. He brilliantly took what could have been a cheesy movie and turned it into a classic that will never be forgotten. To this day, I still need a friend to hold onto, it\'s that score! Duh na... duh na.... dun dun dun dun.... Oh, my gosh, that music just scares the heck out of me! On such a low budget, Jaws not only turned into one of the greatest horror movies of all time, it turned into one of the greatest movies, period.\n\nJaws starts off with one of the most terrifying scenes in horror movie cinema, a young pretty girl goes into the water and is brutally attacked and killed by an unknown creature in the water. The next day Chief Brody investigates suspecting a shark attack, and urges the mayor, Larry Vaughn, to shut down the beach, but afraid of a panic and less tourists, Larry ignores the chief\'s suggestions and keeps the beach open leading to another attack on a young boy. Brody calls in Matt Hooper, a marine scientist to see if they can find the shark. But when another attack ensues and almost kills Brody\'s young son, Michael, he, Matt, and a cocky man, Quint go out to find Jaws themselves.\n\nThis turns into several of the greatest cinematic scenes of all time, like the "Indianapolis" speech brilliantly given by Quint, how he describes seeing his first shark was just so intense and you couldn\'t turn away from the screen. Then, one thing that is interesting about this movie, you do not see the shark until Brody is just chucking blood to attract the shark over his shoulder and Jaws appears roaring out of the water! "We\'re gonna need a bigger boat!" he replies to Quint. And then the scene where Jaws jumps onto the boat and Quint is trapped sliding into Jaw\'s, well, jaws! That\'s the scene that nightmares are made out of! Jaws is one of my favorite films of all time. It\'s one of those films that should never be missed, because it is so important. To many, including myself, the shark looks fake, but it\'s your imagination that gets with you. Spielberg embraced that and you could tell there was just something special about him. Jaws will scare you out of the water just like The Exorcist scared you to the church! \n\n10/10', u'0.0842581', u"\nThis is the movie that started it all. I'm not talking about the Hollywood  blockbuster, or the insane madness that sent thousands of misunderstood  Great Whites to their deaths, I'm talking about the beginning of my  interest in movies. This is the movie that did it.   I couldn't tell you how old I was when I first saw it, but I do remember  this is the movie I made my parents rent time and time again when we went  to the video store. This is the movie that drove my parents and some of my  friends nuts while I watched it day after day after day when my mom gave it  to me for Christmas. This is the movie that made me want to turn a real  interest in the movies from just a hobby and into a career. For that, I owe  Spielberg, Benchley, Scheider, Shaw, Dreyfuss, Williams, Fields and  everyone else a sincere and heart-felt thank you.   I own this movie on every format in which it is available. I love it that  much. I've probably seen it between 200 and 300 times. I guess you can say  it is an obsession. A sick obsession.   The plot, the pacing, the editing, the score, the acting, and, oh yes, the  shark. Who cares that is fake? By the time we finally get to see it, do we  care? Truly, a more suspenseful movie was never made. Several come close,  but none quite reaches the primal level the JAWS does. No other film so  effectively taps into our fear of the unknown, and then gives it a riveting  score to boot. No other movie grips us so strongly with heart stopping  suspense that we find ourselves nearly falling off our seats. And no other  movie leaves us feeling so spent and wasted after a viewing.   And the reason for all the fear, suspense and emotional withdrawal is not  top-notch special effects. It was the mid-70's. You can barely apply top -notch to anything of that era. The reason the movie does all that to us is  that it is a great story. It is filled with real people, who have real jobs,  and who have real fears. And who must now confront a real shark. Can you  think of anything more terrifying that getting on a rickety, leaky boat to  kill a 25-foot shark when you already have a paralyzing fear of the water?  I can't. And Martin Brody sure can't.   And so, no matter what ranking JAWS may get on AFI's list of the 100  greatest movies, or TV Guides list of the top 50 movies, or any list for  that matter, JAWS will always come in number one on mine.   Steven, Peter, Roy, Robert, Richard, John, and Verna -- thank you. Not for  just giving me a sense of direction in my life, not for just making me want  to be a screenwriter, but also for making a movie that still thrills me as  much now when I watch it as when it did when I saw it for the very first  time.\n\n\n\n\n", u'-0.106797', u'I will never forget the first time I saw Jaws. I was glued to the seat from start to finish. I jumped, I held my breath; this was one of the experiences that made me fall in love with movies. This was probably the first film where I completely forgot everything around me. I was there, in that boat, in that gloomy cabin, with those people - everything seemed so real (and alas, the sea never looked the same again). When I watch it these days I still marvel: the atmosphere and the performances in this film are simply magical. Spielberg without the schmalz. He has never been better.\n\nMy vote: 10 out of 10\n\nFavorite films: http://www.IMDb.com/list/mkjOKvqlSBs/\n\nLesser-known Masterpieces: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls070242495/\n\nFavorite Low-Budget and B-Movies: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls054808375/\n\nFavorite TV-Shows reviewed: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls075552387/', u'0.139693', u'\nWidely regarded as the film that began the "summer movie blockbuster era", JAWS (1975) was also rightfully one of the year\'s most critically acclaimed movies. It was also the recipient of an Academy Award Nomination for Best Picture and a winner of Oscars for film editing (Verna Fields) and music score (John Williams).  One of the reasons the film received no acting nods is that everyone involved is so good, how could one single out just one or two? (I personally feel Robert Shaw should have gotten a Best Actor nomination, however). Roy Scheider is wonderful as New York cop Martin Brody, who has relocated to a small coastal island town, only to have his bad case of "aquaphobia" put to the ultimate test. Richard Dreyfuss is perfectly cast as a shark expert and provides some truly funny comic bits along the way. Lorraine Gary (who director Steven Spielberg says was the first person to be cast for the film) does an excellent job of being the concerned wife and mother. Finally, there\'s Murray Hamilton, who gives one of the best performances of his career as Mayor Vaughn, who seems to be more concerned about the economy of the town than the safety of the residents. In a way, Vaughn is really the film\'s villain. Solid cast indeed. The screenplay (by Peter Benchley and Carl Gottlieb) is tight and well-written, as is Spielberg\'s direction. Whether it was the mechanical shark\'s failure to operate correctly or Spielberg\'s decision to simply see less of the shark until the end of the film, the "less is more" idea works perfectly, particularly in the opening scene, which is chilling to this day.\n\nOne thing I do want to add: if you choose to watch this film at home, do yourself a favor and rent or buy the WIDESCREEN version. The full-screen pan and scan version is a travesty that ruins the great camerawork that Spielberg and cameraman Bill Butler made. I always recommend the widescreen version but it is especially important for JAWS.\n\nNo offense to fans of ONE FLEW OVER THE CUCKOO\'S NEST, but this is the film that should have taken home the Oscar gold. Grade:  A+', u'0.597295', u"Spoilers Ahead:\n\nMy title refers to the serendipitous failure of the mechanical shark to function as planned. Steven admits this is a whole different movie than the one he planned. Because the mechanical shark broke, all the time, he was forced to use Hitchcock's techniques that Ridley used as well in ALIEN. You see a little more the shark as the movie progresses; he uses your imagination, just like in ALIEN, to supply the effects he couldn't with the broken shark. Steven himself admits that this worked out much better though the studio was furious with him at the time. Look, this is why Steven is such an overrated filmmaker; look at the rest of his works, all overrated and faded with time CLOSE ENCOUNTERS and E.T. to cite a couple. The only other true classic in his canon is SCHINDLER'S LIST. The entire rest of the catalog is just awful including SUGARLAND EXPRESS and the overrated DUEL. It is not an accident that this immortal classic is an accidental masterpiece. It is not the film Steven wanted to make; he did not know it but the shark breaking was the best piece of luck that ever befell him.\n\nThe script and the Hitchcockian suspense done with understatement, as I said, is why the film is so great. You add three of the best actors of the 20th century Shaw, Scheider and Dreyfuss and this is what you get. Young people, the opening attack on Chrissy was so graphic, my friend and several people, ran out of the cinema at high speed to vomit. You have no idea how that effected people in 1975; this was probably, up to that time, the most graphic gory depiction of violence in a film. What so many reviewers miss is the incredible humor of the film. The quaint fishing town and its locals is a source of never ending jokes about how goofy they were. Steven said he had the screenwriter deliberately lighten the movie because the rest is so unrelentingly grim. He did a great job; the clashes between Hooper and Quint are hilarious. The humor is the deepest of any Spielberg film even his unfunny disaster 1941. \n\nThe film starts and never stops to catch its breath. It is all go go go. The only breathers are well written humorous or moving scenes like where Quint tells the terrifying story of the U.S.S. Indianapolis. What a scene, now we see Quint as he as always been, trying to get back his shipmates one shark at a time. This is some of the best acting you will ever see in a movie; the performances give the film a depth that is so absent in the awful sequels. The photography is legendary with the trademark Spielberg comet up in the sky. Look, however it happened, this is an undeniable masterpiece; it is the only film that will survive him. All his other films are fading fast but not this one. You have to watch it to believe it. Everything works here: script, pacing, acting, photography and suspense. One of the greatest films ever put up on a movie screen. In 1975, my audience gave it a three minute standing ovation. It deserved it.", u'-0.115925', u'When I first saw the film, "Jaws" I was immediately frightened by the unseen terror that pulls the human psychosis to the depths of the ocean...literally! Steven Spielberg had made himself the most successful director of all time when he went all out with this one! Running to the back of the house and turning all the lights on were just a few things I resorted to after watching the opening for the first time!!! I Never watched anymore of it until 1-3 years later. I was highly hesitant because to a young child, a skinny dippers suffering to the wrath of the giant unknown mouth was the most horrifying sequence in film history at the time...and it still is now! Once I finally got the courage to view the film, I was still in for a lot of surprises. The cinematography is superb in its ruthless attempt to bring the audience to the depths of a powerful ocean, and to the eyes of the dark, wretched creature the inhabits it. The story of the killer shark attacking the unfortunate island in the world is more than scary. It could have been any place in the world, and it had to be Amitty Island. The shark could have easily lost it\'s way in the swaying currents of the ocean, but as the opposite inhabitants of the beach get angry, this big mother is here to stay! The technique is wild, absolutely wild, and John Williams score earned more than an Oscar for it! Creepy piano notes enter this films titles, and the blue depths of the uncharted territory beneath the sea let us all know that no sense, however small, was to be spared. The first victim, alone will haunt those who view it for the rest of their days, and the rest of the story is more like a battle. This strange battle is often more focused on understanding the other side. What Brody, Quint, and Hooper must do is plunge into the depths themselves, and seek out the unruly monster of the sea. The common theme in this terrific classic is survival, and why not? Survival is a natural instinct to all animal alike. The shark must survive, as it makes so clear by snagging unsuspecting swimmers, but also the people, they to have to survive, but the island is not big enough for both man and fish together. Always a joy to experience over and over again, this film is the ultimate scare show to end them all! Sometimes, a lot of us fans can not seem to get enough of this instant classic!', u'0.117543', u'\nMy Rating: **** out of ****. \n\nSteven Spielberg is one of the best American directors working today. He has made many films that have been hailed as classics. Yet before the Dinosaurs, Holocaust, Peter Pan, UFO\'s, and Indy there was the Shark. Jaws represents one of the masterpieces on Spielbergs resume. It is also probably the "Quintessential Spielberg Film." \n\nJaws was very popular when released, it was the gighest grossing film of 1975. It spawned three sequels, which were all inferior. In fact, no film about Sharks or any killer fish has been able to come close to the level of Jaws. \n\nThe genius in Jaws is its ability to build suspense. The Shark is never really shown till near the end of the film. When ever the Shark is approaching its victims, we get the Sharks point of view, instead of seeing the Shark. These POV shots combined with John Williams very effective score, make the scenes when the Shark is about to devour his victims much more effective. \n\nEvry actor does a nice job with their performances. Roy Scheider brings Martin to life. Martin is not a showy character but Scheider is able to make us like him. Richard Dreyfuss exhibits energy in his performance as Matt Hooper. Robert Shaw is very effective as Quint, that Indiannapolis speech is still very chilling to me. Lorraine Gary and Murray Hamilton also give solid support. \n\nPeople always talk about how fake the Shark looks. I think its passable but today it would definitely be done by CGI. However, the Shark is not seen that much in the film so its not that big of a deal. \n\nI would like to say Jaws is Spielbergs best film, Schindlers List closely follows. But I would like to see Close Encouners and the Indiana Jones films again. I did not like Close Encounters the first time, and I like the Indiana Jones films but they never stood out to me. If these films dont surpass Jaws, then it is definitely Spielberg\'s best film.\n', u'0.203014', u'\n"Jaws" is a thrill-ride of suspense that continues to deliver the goods to the audience 25 years later.  The plot is somewhat thin: a large shark is terrorizing the tourists at the local beach.  However, with that said Steven Spielberg\'s direction is amazing.  The young director (only 28 at the time) showed unlimited potential that would only increase with age.  A great accomplishment that could have been a multi-million dollar bust.  5 stars out of 5.  ', u'0.381744', u"A man eating shark is terrorising the holiday island of Amity. Police chief Martin Brody, shark hunter Quint and marine biologist Matt Hooper set sail in the hope of killing the great white monster.\n\nJaws is responsible for many things, it's responsible for propelling director Steven Spielberg's career into the stratosphere, it was responsible for a downturn in the package holiday trade, and it was responsible for shaping the summer blockbuster release practise's. There are many other things which one doesn't need to bore you with, it's just true to say that Jaws is firmly ensconced in movie history, if one hasn't seen it then one surely knows about it, it is, even today, part of popular culture.\n\nBut is it any good? Is it worthy of a long standing reputation as one of the greatest monster movies of all time? Hell yes it is, one or two easily overlooked flaws aside, it busted the box office {world wide} and tapped into a primal fear that resides in the majority of mankind, the unseen that resides in the sea.\n\nJaws sets out its marker right from the start with a truly shocking and attention grabbing opening sequence, from then on in Spielberg {learning from Hitchcock for sure} tweaks the tension to have the audience living on their nerves, even as character building {by way of Brody's family arc} sedates the pace, we just know that it's all relative to an extension of fear and terror that is around the next corner. After the first victims remains are found Brody glances out at the ocean, Spielberg perfectly framing the shot to say so much that we are about to be witness to. Jolts and shocks pop up from time to time to help build the unease whilst Spielberg makes the audience wait before we even see what it is that so coldly and efficiently destroys man, and then the claustrophobic switch as our brave protagonists are out at sea on Quint's boat, unaware that the giant menace is now hunting them, eyes as black as death itself.\n\nSo many great scenes linger for all time in the memory, the entrance of Quint is a hum dinger, a mournful widow reducing Brody to a stunned realism, the Indianappolis monologue, the bigger boat! Just some of the reasons why I personally love cinema so much. The score from John Williams is as effective as any for the genre and Robert Hoyt's sound team's work furthers the dread unfolding. The cast are superb and uniformly excellent, casting aside technical problems {and genuine resentment at times} to portray this story with verve and genuine depth of feeling. Yet Roy Scheider {Brody}, Robert Shaw {Quint} and Richard Dreyfuss {Hooper} were from from original choices, Charlton Heston was wanted for the role of Brody, Sterling Hayden and Lee Marvin were both mooted for Quint, and John Voight was Spielberg's preferred choice for Hooper, whilst Jaws author {and co screen writer here} Peter Benchley was heading for the top by asking for Newman, Redford and McQueen!! Imagine that!\n\nStill it all turned out well in the end because Jaws stands the test of time as one of the best films of its type to have ever been made. No amount of complaining about continuity and a rough looking mechanical shark will ever dim its appeal, even as I revisited it recently for the hundredth time I still got tingles all over my body, file it along side King Kong in the pantheon of Monster Masterpieces, 10/10 always, now go enjoy your dip in the ocean.", u'0.526347', u'The film opens with a shot of a group of teenagers enjoying a campfire out on Amity beach... A couple leaves the group for a midnight swim... The silhouette of a woman is seen in full flight toward the sea... Her dress, bra, and panties fly toward her drunk admirer who can\'t make a fist to catch them... \n\nIn a delicate splash, Chrissie goes swimming in the cold ocean, drawing herself into deeper water... When a wave of pressure lifts her up and eases her down, her face begins to show a certain fear... Her eyes go to the beach where her friend, too drunk to stand, is struggling with his shoe...\n\nChrissie turns and starts for shore... But her expression freezes... Something terrible is hurting her underneath... She struggles with all her forces, but she is soon submerged in a horrifying scene... \n\nPolice Chief Martin Brody (Roy Scheider) reacts quickly to the news of shark attack, and emerges with enough poster-board, wooden stakes, nails, paint and brushes to close every beach on the island... \n\nBut as Amity is a beautiful summer resort with clean air, clear water, and beautiful white sand beaches... Mayor Larry Vaughn (Murray Hamilton) tries with his town officials to convince the insecure police chief to file the incident as a \'boating accident.\' \n\nBrody reluctantly agrees, but later regrets his decision after few more fatal incidents... The shark has claimed Amity Island as his territory...\n\nQuint (Robert Shaw), an eccentric old shark killer, offers to kill the menacing Great White Shark for ten thousand dollars... \n\nMatt Hooper (Richard Dreyfuss), an arrogant young oceanographer, proves that the giant shark that killed Christine Watkins is still on the loose... \'They caught a shark. Not the shark,\' he determines... and predicts future outbursts of attack activity in the area...\n\nBrody, Quint and Hooper become allied in a life-and-death hunt... They go after the monstrous creature with rifles and poison pistols... They try to tire him, slowing him down with coiled ropes and barrels... They fight him with everything, harpoons, poles, gaffs and compressed air tanks...\n\nShaw is absolutely convincing as the colorful master fisherman whose obsession for destroying sharks was triggered by an actual incident in World War II... \n\nScheider is quiet likable as the dedicated family man who doesn\'t even like the water, swimming or boating... His line to Quint (\'You\'re going to need a bigger boat.") suggests a specific cause...\n\nDreyfuss manages to humanize the picture while stealing it... \n\nSpielberg alarms us with unexpected twists, and heart-stopping scenes wonderfully engaging... His grasp for sustaining the feeling of terror comes not only from what we see, but from what we\'re afraid we\'re going to see... He uses an imposing classical score to prepare the audience for something really scary that is about to show up... \n\nWith every breath, every thought, heart beat and movement, the realism of the increasing menace is present from the opening to the end... And believe me, we are never allowed the relief of looking away from the screen\x85', u'-0.129483', u"\nJaws is an epic movie and it is My favorite shark film.Great acting by Roy Scheider and Richard Dreyfuss but the acting was superb in My opinion by Robert Shaw!The shark itself was awesome!The view of the water in Jaws is spooky and it makes you feel that anything can be in it!The music by John Williams is great and the direction by Steven Spielberg is terrific!Jaws has three other sequels but they aren't  classics like this!If you like shark movies and haven't seen Jaws or even if you have check out Jaws today!", u'0.455463', u'Every once in a while the right talented people are at the right place together and come up with a masterpiece. "Jaws" is definitely one of those movies, that is thanks to the amazing cast and the crew the classic masterpiece that it is today.\n\nLet\'s face it, the story is dumb and silly and in a way very average. Spielberg magically turns the silly story into a tense exciting thriller with brilliant dialogue and classic scene\'s. Mark my words, "Jaws" is a movie that will never be considered outdated.\n\nEverything in the movie works so well! The acting, the dialogue, the tension, the typical Spielberg humor, the music, everything! It\'s hard to name just one thing why this movie is such a masterpiece. It is the mix of everything combined that makes the movie work. Probably my favorite thing about the movie would be the dialogue, they are very raw and performed well by the perfect cast. Another thing of course would be the music and I\'m not just talking about the main theme but about the entire musical score in general.\n\nThe cast is great but they are mainly great together. All of the Scheider/Shaw/Dreyfuss scene\'s are like three ingredients thrown together and the end result of it is pure gold.\n\nAnd than Bruce the shark. Yes, he really looks believable even now days.\n\nA real classic masterpiece that launched Spielberg\'s career\n\n10/10\n\nhttp://bobafett1138.blogspot.com/', u'0.461829', u"\nFar from being a monster movie, this is a realistic and gritty example of a town which relies on summer trade having its beaches invaded by a dangerous shark.  There are genuinely suspenseful sequences, a first-rate soundtrack and believable people.  The character development of the three men in the boat shows there's a lot more to this film than just a rubber fin.  I'd recommend this and Jaws 2 to any fan of drama/thrillers.", u'0.494362', u'\nI saw this film when I was about 8 years old.  And what I remember most about it, is thinking that I had found the most frightening film that I had ever seen.  When I asked my parents if there really was a Jaws and they reassured me there wasn\'t, I still thought they were lying ( and they were, he does exist, I\'m sure of it ).  To this day, almost 20 years later, I am still frightened to go swimming.  I have been to the Caribbean twice in my life.  Once to the Bahamas with my high school graduating class and once to Acapulco for March Break.  Neither time did my classmates or friends venture into the water because of me.  " Did yo know that most shark attacks happen in three feet of water of less? " I asked them.  Needless to say the hotel pool was well utilized on both trips.\n\nJaws is perfect on every level of film making.  It has incredibly well developed characters, so well that we feel their fears and their bravado when we are supposed to.  The direction is some of the best I have ever seen.  We are but marionettes in Spielberg\'s fingers.  When he wants us to feel, he pulls our strings and masterfully we feel scared or horrified or even amused.  A perfect example of this is the killing of the Kinter kid, the second death of the movie.\n\nThe scene starts off shortly after Chrissie Watkins is killed.  There are people playing on the beach and in the water.  Brody ( the police chief ) is sitting tentatively watching things intently.  He hears screams from a young girl.  But of course they are playful screams.  Then we see a man playing fetch the stick with his dog.  Finally we meet Alex Kinter.  He goes out on his raft into the water.  Then we see the shots from under water.  It\'s as if something is approaching.  We\'re really not sure if we are being teased here or not.  But then we see a stick floating in the water and the man calling out for his dog.  But he is not there.  Then we see more kids splashing and then we cut to a shot approaching the Kinter boy on his raft from under water.  And the music.  And then...... well, we all know what happens.  Now that is a director masterfully manipulating us.\n\nJaws stands up to and surpasses any film these days that is considered brilliant and it surpasses anything that came before it.  This film should have cleaned up at the Oscars.  After all, what film is remembered more? One Flew Over the Cuckoo\'s Nest ( a very good film ) or Jaws?  The answer is quite clear.', u'0.0203546'], u'tt0044079': [u"\nOne would have expected Hitchcock's return to major studio filmmaking to err on the side of chastened caution.  Surely few expected his most riotous, unrestrained film, a gleeful melange of vicious black comedy, exciting suspense, mocking manipulation, and astonishing flights of fancy.  But that is precisely what they got: STRANGERS ON A TRAIN.\n\nWhat is remarkable is how much Bruno's transgression disrupts the world of the film.  Much has been made of the masterly crosscutting motif, but its immediate effect is to completely obstruct the straight line of progress Guy is making of his life, and hence the society he represents or is eager to join.  Guy is the archetypal American, the working-class boy made good, moving in influential circles, athletic, successful, handsome.  Bruno is his destructive opposite, gay, decadent, 'European' (he lives off his father, in a Big House, and just lounges about dreaming of murder).  Bruno's life is one of repetition, circularity, whereas Guy moves straight ahead.  It is Bruno's achievement to move Guy into his realm (represented by the merry-go-round) and force HIM to transgress (break the law, hope for murder (Bruno's)).\n\nBruno is quite literally fighting patriarchy.  All the authority figures in the film are criticised - Bruno's father, a man whose brutality we get a glimpse of, but the true horror of which is constantly alluded to in the film (especially in Aunt Clara's paintings - that incredibly intense negative energy must come from somewhere); Anna's incredibly Machiavellian, self-serving father; the insensitive judge who thinks nothing of lunching after an execution; the tennis commentator whose smugly authorative comments are always mistaken.  Far from being the mother-hater of legend, Hitch, as Robin Wood perceived, is deeply hostile to fathers and patriarchy.\n\nBruno's transgression turns the world topsy-turvy.  This is Hitch's most surreal film.  Whenever Guy is in his plot, he is filmed straight, with conventionally romantic music.  But whenever Bruno intrudes, the atmosphere becomes carnivalesque, bizarre, much more fun.  This is Hitch's first truly American film, revelling in the primitive detritus of Americana.  Grown men puncture little boys' balloons, or try to throw them off merry-go-rounds. Distinguished professors of mathematics sing about goats on trains.  Elderly society matrons are strangled at elegant soirees.  Washington is filmed like a series of spare lines in a vast desert under a huge sky, like a haunting Dali painting.  There is one of the greatest, and funniest, scenes in all cinema when we see a motionless, smiling Bruno in a sea of turning heads at a tennis match, an image worthy of Magritte.  Just look at any scene with Bruno in it, and watch it derail into the bizarre.\n\nPhalluses abound in the most ridiculous permutations - check all those balloons (Hitch had obviously just seen THE THIRD MAN) - as well as in more staid environs: Washington will never look the same again.  STRANGERS is also, VERTIGO notwithstanding, Hitch's most overtly sexual film - as well as the phalluses, there is the sustained homoeroticism, the remarkable play with 'riding' horses; the gobsmacking fellatio joke when Hitch's daughter spills powder over the policeman.\n\nAnd yet Hitch doesn't stint on good old suspense.  In the very proper endeavour to show what a great artist he was, critics tend to overlook what made him famous in the first place.  Much has been made of Bruno as a prototype of Norman Bates, and Hitch plays merry havoc on audience identification, willing Bruno into murder.  There is a hilariously painful sequence where Bruno loses the lighter with which he intends to frame Guy down a drain.  The gasps of tension and sighs of relief on the part of the audience I was a part of in support of an insane murderer is inherently funny, slightly disturbing, and highly revealing about our true reactions to conformity and success.  And Hitch milks it with callous glee - listen to the mocking music and exagerrated compositions, and kick yourself for taking it all so seriously.\n\nSTRANGERS is one of Hitch's five best films, and therefore one of the greatest things in cinema.  The dialogue is so strange and brilliant, I can't believe it wasn't written by Chandler.  Patricia Hitchcock is a wonderful imp, standing in for her cheeky father as she taunts Guy.  The fairground finale is a remarkable, dizzying fusion of exciting, tense set-piece, black comedy and symbolic site.  If Bruno's final words condemn him to hell (according to the Catholic precepts Hitch is supposed to embody: compare with a similar ending in THE KILLERS), we applaud his integrity, infinitely preferable to Guy's debased serving of self.", u'-0.0104069', u'\nAlfred Hitchcock has made many brilliant thrillers, and many of them have gone on to be hailed as some of the greatest films of all time. One film that tends to get somewhat lost under the Vertigo\'s and the Psycho\'s is this film; Strangers on a Train, the most compelling film that Hitchcock ever made. The story follows Guy Haines, a tennis player and a man soon to be wed to the Senator\'s daughter, if he can get a divorce from his current wife. One day, on the way to see his wife, he meets the mentally unstable Bruno Anthony aboard a train and soon gets drawn into a murder plot that he can neither stop nor stall; and one that could ultimately cost him his life.\n\nThe conversation aboard the train between Bruno and Guy is one of the cinema\'s most intriguing and thought provoking of all time. What if two people "swapped" murders, thus resolving themselves of all suspicion of the crime, and rendering their motive irrelevant? Could this truly be the perfect murder? What makes this film all the more frightening is that the events that Guy is lead into could happen to any, normal everyday person. Everyone has someone they\'d like to get rid of, so what if you met an insane man aboard a train that does your murder for you and then forces you to do his? The chances of it happening are unlikely, but it\'s the idea that anyone could be a murderer that is central to the message of Strangers on a Train; and in this situation, anyone could. \n\nIs there any actor on earth that could have portrayed the character of Bruno Anthony any better than Robert Walker? The man was simply born for the part. He manages to capture just the right mood for his character and absolutely commands every scene he is in. The character of Bruno is a madman, but he\'s not a lunatic; he\'s a calculating, conniving human being and Robert Walker makes the character believable. His performance is extremely malevolent, and yet understated enough to keep the character firmly within the realms of reality. Unfortunately, Robert Walker died just one year after the release of Strangers on a Train, and I believe that is a great loss to cinema. Nobody in the cast shines as much as Walker does, but worth mentioning is his co-star Farley Granger. Granger never really impresses that much, but his performance is good enough and he holds his own against Walker. Also notable about his performance is that he portrays his character as a very normal person; and that is how it should be. Ruth Roman is Guy\'s wife to be. She isn\'t really in the film enough to make a lasting impression, but she makes the best of what she has. Alfred Hitchcock\'s daughter, Patricia, takes the final role of the four central roles as Barbara, the sister of Guy\'s fianc\xe9. She is suitably lovely in this role, and she tends to steal a lot of the scenes that she is in.\n\nAlfred Hitchcock\'s direction is always sublime, and it is very much so in this film. There is one shot in particular, that sees the murder of the film being committed in the reflection of a pair of sunglasses. This is an absolutely brilliant shot, and one that creates a great atmosphere for the scene. Hitchcock\'s direction is moody throughout, and very much complies with the film noir style. The climax to the film is both spectacular and exciting, and I don\'t think that anyone but Hitchcock could have pulled it off to the great effect that it was shown in this film. It\'s truly overblown, and out of turn from the rest of the movie; but it works. There is a reason that Hitchcock is often cited as the greatest director of all time, and the reason for that is that he doesn\'t only use the script to tell the film\'s story, but he also uses to camera to do so as well. Strangers on a Train is one of the greatest thrillers ever made. Its story is both intriguing and thought provoking, and is sure to delight any fan of cinema. A masterpiece.\n', u'0.496338', u"\nThis is a little known Hitchcock movie but I think it is one of his best. I like how he inserts humor into this crime drama. For example the small boy pointing a gun at the Bruno character at the carnival and the Bruno character popping his balloon with a lit cigarette. And there is the comic scene at the tennis courts where the audience in unison moves there heads back and forth following the ball except for Bruno who glances straight away at the tennis player. \n\nHitchcock plays suspense masterfully as in the tunnel of love sequence  early in the film. We know that Bruno plans to murder the woman and we 'see' that is why he  is following her into the tunnel. We hear a scream and think the deed is done when voila! the girl comes sailing out with her two admirers. Then there is one of the finest scenes in all movie history: the final scene on the carousel. Hitchcock manages suspense on many non-stop levels: the two protagonists fighting each other, a small boy who nearly falls from the ride as it whirls at tremendous speed, and the elderly man who crawls beneath the carousel to try and get at the brakes. Although I think the end of the scene was a bit over the top it was masterful to that point and I will never forget it.\n\nI was surprised to see Ruth Roman in the lead. Usually Hitchcock has blondes for his leads, but the commentator on the TMC channel told us Hitch had to use her because she was under contract to the studio where he filmed it.\n\nI highly recommend this obscure Hitchcock masterpiece and give 9.99 out of 10.", u'0.357815', u'"Strangers on a Train" is a brilliant example of what Hitchcock could do best, continually develop his plot and characters in an atmosphere both creepy and humorous. The film has great dialogue, superb characters, good acting, and naturally superb direction from the master of suspense who is truly at his best here. Robert Walker\'s Bruno Anthony is a character few will forget; he is creepy, psychopathic, and as M. Night Shyamalan says on one of the DVD\'s special features it is the fact that he has moral standards, however unconventional and disturbed they may be, that makes him such a dangerous man. \n\nStrangers is a truly involving film, one that takes you on a ride you won\'t forget anytime soon, it has one of the best examples of buildup you could find on film, and as soon as it ends the film takes you on a journey that entertains and terrifies and even makes you laugh. This is a truly brilliant example of film-making, every shot is drenched in suspense, every cut is masterful, every detail important, every second exciting, it never lets go till the very end, and what an ending that is, a delicious bit of humor that is perfectly in tone with the rest of this delightful masterpiece.\n\nSome have criticized Farley Granger\'s performance as Guy Haines, but it really is quite perfect; he delivered all his lines well and makes us feel honestly sympathetic towards him. Robert Walker is simply genius as Bruno Anthony, a great character that wouldn\'t have been nearly as memorable without Robert Walker\'s devilishly evil portrayal of him. The supporting cast are good, Ruth Roman, Leo G. Carroll, Kasey Rogers, Howard St. John and Patricia Hitchcock all deliver good performances that enhance what was already a good film and make it a great film. Alfred Hitchcock\'s direction is, as always, sublime.\n\nWhat makes "Strangers" so good is the simple plot. It isn\'t a complicated story, two strangers meet on a train, and one comes up with a crazy plot: "You do my murder, I do yours." One takes it as a joke and shrugs it off, but the other takes himself seriously and goes on to commit the murder he offered to, getting the \'good guy\' into huge trouble. The script is adapted superbly well by Whitfield Cook from a novel by Patricia Highsmith.\n\nThis is really one of Hitchcock\'s most interesting films from a technical perspective while also providing more than enough laughs, suspense, and thrills to keep just about anybody engaged.\n\n10/10', u'0.481354', u'"Strangers on a Train" was one of those film classics I had always heard about but somehow never gotten around to actually seeing. I finally watched it a few weeks ago and, as always with any Hitchcock movie, it not only stood up to the test of time, it far surpassed most thrillers being made today. You can see the inspiration for future action movies here - the climactic ending with the out-of-control merry-go-round and the two villains dueling each other reminded me of the big action sequence at the end of Jan de Bont\'s "Speed." Of course, "Strangers" is over forty years older than "Speed" and contains no modern special effects, but the visceral thrill is there - Hitchcock was a true genius.\n\nThe not-so-subtle gay side of Bruno (Robert Walker in an amazing performance) has taken form in many other psycho-stalker-figures in future movies. Consider him a male version of Jennifer Jason Leigh in "Single White Female." He knows about Guy before he even meets him on the train - we almost get the feeling their contact isn\'t incidental - and is soon entirely obsessed with him.\n\nHitchcock loved the Oedipial elements in his movies (also see "Psycho" for more blatant undertones) and there\'s a lot of that here. Bruno hates his father and wants him to die so he can be with his mother. His effeminate ways and obvious homosexuality must have just slipped by the censors in 1951, when gays were not "allowed" to be portrayed on the screen - yet Hitchcock gets the message through effectively when we see Bruno in the lounge on the telephone wearing a very non-masculine robe, flirting with Guy and responding to his mother.\n\nThe deep layers of this movie make it a fast-paced thriller than you can return to again and again - unfortunately it\'s being remade as a big-budget Hollywood production, but after seeing the original I honestly can\'t imagine anything surpassing the sheer white-knuckle thrills of this movie.', u'0.297807', u'\nUsually, it is the other way around, but in this case, the movie is a major improvement over the original book.\n\nI had seen this wonderful movie at least a dozen times, before I managed to find a copy of the book it was taken from....the book has the same title and was written by Patricia Highsmith.\n\nI scoured the used bookstores for years, before I finally found a copy, and because the movie was SO good, I could not wait to begin reading the story in its original version.\n\nI was never so disappointed!\n\nNot because the book is unreadable...but because Hitchcock made such vast improvements over the book that the book simply does not come close to measuring up to the movie version.\n\nThat said, let me now comment on Robert Walker\'s amazing performance as Bruno Antony.\n\nThis was Robert Walker\'s last completed performance...he died while shooting his final film, "My Son John," in August, 1951.\n\nThis role as Bruno was the performance of his career!\n\nPerfect in every way.\n\nThe movie has been around now for nearly half a century.  I see it every time it is shown on television, and I also watch the tape I have of it occasionally.\n\nRobert Walker\'s performance only seems to improve with each new viewing.\n\nI can not recommend this movie highly enough.\n\nIf Hitchcock and Robert Walker can read me, up there in heaven, let me congratulate them both on an absolutely superlative job! \n\n', u'0.288474', u'Even though some unrealistic things happen at the end (i.e. a cop \r shooting a gun into a crowded merry-go-round where any number of \r innocent could be killed), this still was an intense, enjoyable \r thriller, one of Alfred Hitchcock\'s better films.\r \r\nRobert Walker is excellent as the chilling nutcase, really convincing \r giving a fascinating performance that is almost too creepy at times. \r His co-star in here, Farley Granger, is okay but is no match for \r Walker, either in acting or in the characters they play. \r \r\nIt\'s the typical Hitchcock film with some strange camera angles, \r immoral themes, innocent man gets in trouble, etc. Unlike a lot of his \r other films, I thought this one was a fast-moving story with a very few \r dull spots. Being an ex-tennis player, I enjoyed his footage of some \r excellent old net matches that featured some good rallies.\r \r\nHitchcock\'s real-life daughter Patricia has an interesting and unique \r minor character role in here. She didn\'t just get the job because of \r her dad; she can act. Also of note: the DVD has both the British and \r American versions and there were some differences in the story. This is \r a classic film that is still referred to in modern-day films, even \r comedies such as "Throw Momma Off The Train."', u'0.255684', u'Looking back at the career of Alfred Hitchcock, it never fails to be surprising how such a brilliant and visionary man could be denied sufficient recognition for how revolutionary he was for the film industry. It is likely a sign of how ahead of his time Hitchcock was, always attempting to push the envelope, and never coasting along with a film made simply for the purpose of being entertaining, but always with a deeper, more poignant motive on his mind. Strangers on a Train, one of Hitchcock\'s first and more underrated hits, is a perfect example of these traits - an entertaining and suspenseful story, even when viewed over 50 years later, yes, but so carefully and intelligently constructed it stands today as a masterpiece in film technique. \n\nArguably one of the pioneering "suspense thrillers", Strangers on a Train may come across as slightly dated in certain aspects, but it retains every bit of superbly crafted tension as it did back in 1951 (if perhaps slightly less shocking). The brilliant use of cinematography and lighting as well as quick, careful editing are what really make the film stand out, drawing out every possible iota of tension and retaining the audience\'s focus even in slower scenes. If there was ever any doubt of what a simply masterful filmmaker Hitchcock was, simply watching five minutes of Strangers on a Train should be enough to disavow such sentiments; every shot is so carefully chosen and constructed, all serving to drive the storyline ahead in a particularly innovative fashion. Sadly enough, there are certain moments in the story which are screechingly out of place enough to jar our focus away from the superb cinematography and editing - Bruno being able to reach down to the bottom of a sewer grate is simply unbelievable, and the figure of a stereotypical old man crawling under a wildly out of control carousel provides unintentional comedic relief in what is meant to be the film\'s most tense and engaging scene. These are only brief moments, but they are enough to stand out as painfully weak in an otherwise stellar film.\n\nBut what really makes Strangers on a Train stand out is the story premise. As Hollywood films of late run the risk of descending inescapably further and further into the vat of turgid clich\xe9e after clich\xe9e, it\'s wonderfully refreshing to see a 50 year old film with a premise which actually comes across as smart and original. Sure it\'s fairly straightforward, but the concept of "swapping murders" is simply one that would not fly in films of today\'s day and age, which makes it all the more entertaining to watch; the film\'s brilliant screenplay keeps the action flowing at a swift pace while providing us with some wonderfully memorable lines all the while. One can\'t help but notice the deeper themes Hitchcock is alluding to throughout as well, especially the concept of "darkness in humanity\'s heart", demonstrated by elderly ladies being fascinated and exhilarated by the prospect of murder, as well as Bruno\'s own cavalier attitude towards death. Hitch also works in many moments of dark humour (Bruno popping a child\'s balloon with his cigarette is priceless), and irony, shooting suspenseful scenes in happy, easy-going environments, such as the iconic carnival scenes, to create an even more eerie atmosphere. This may be a suspense thriller, yes, but to overlook the brain concealed beneath it would be simply inexcusable. \n\nThe antagonistic figure of Bruno (essayed to perverse perfection by Robert Walker, sadly in his last film role, but easily stealing the film from his admittably very talented fellow cast members) is without a doubt what makes Strangers on a Train so memorable, as the character is a marvel to behold. Here we have a simply superbly crafted villainous figure, all the more intriguing by how ordinary and unassuming he seems. Rather than cackling madly and thwarting the hero at every possible moment, Bruno is a calm, controlled, psychotic mess. He speaks of murder in such an offhand tone, yet retains a passionate glint in his eye when discussing different fashions of killing people. Bruno could seem to represent the "Id", as Freud would put it, the inner, darker and uninhibited aspects of mankind. It makes an interesting contrast to the hero figure, Guy Haines, and how bland and uninteresting he seems, almost as if to drive home the prospect of evil being much more interesting and appealing than constantly striving to do the right thing. \n\nYet despite this implied message, Hitch still twists our emotions enough that we root for Guy at every turn, and cheer at each new obstacle he is forced to overcome. It\'s a testament to actor Farley Granger\'s talent that despite Robert Walker\'s villain easily stealing the show, Granger\'s hero still comes across as sympathetic, still commanding our support even when falling prey to being a far less compelling character. Superb support is given by Ruth Roman, who manages to overcome the clich\xe9e and be a more innovative and complex romantic interest figure, Kasey Rogers giving a stunning performance as Guy\'s horrifyingly manipulative and hedonistic first wife, and Patricia Hitchcock, proving that she is far more talented than being simply "the director\'s daughter" would imply. The superb cast (headed by a simply wonderful Walker) really bring the film to life, adding so much more merit to the film than simply Hitchcock\'s breathtaking stylistics. \n\nAll in all, Strangers on a Train may still come across as slightly too dated for certain viewers, but it\'s still a shock how modern and appealing to contemporary audiences seems, considering it was released half a century ago. Once again, Hitchcock proves his unparalleled mastery of tension and film technique, and the film\'s surprisingly original and enjoyable premise is alone worth a viewing. Highly recommended to anyone wishing to undertake a brilliantly made but superbly entertaining film experience! \n\n-9/10', u'0.471019', u'\nRobert Walker is a rich, soft spoken (and possibly homosexual) psychopath who meets his apparent idol, a tennis player played by Farley Granger (who looks like Bernardo from "West Side Story"), and strikes up a conversation with him on a train. After managing lunch with him, Walker strikes up a conversation about "criss cross" murders: two men kill people who are enemies of the other man. Granger is dating a politician\'s daughter with hope of becoming a politician himself and is divorcing his prettier but unfaithful wife who got herself pregnant by another man. Walker proposes the possibility of killing the unfaithful wife, which Granger shrugs off as "crazy talk".\n\nLater, Granger tries to get his wife to sign some papers, but she reveals her evil plan to make it look like HE was cheating on HER and will try to pass off her illegitimate child as Granger\'s; odds are the other man left her. Granger is NOT happy. Later, the wife goes running around having a good time at a carnival with two younger men and she is stalked by Walker. After a lot of build up, black humor and creepy imagery, Walker sneaks up on the wife and strangles her to death.\n\nWalker then goes to Granger and tells him he killed his wife. Granger wasn\'t exactly fond of his wife, but he\'s appalled to learn that she\'s been murdered and that Walker ow expects Granger to murder his father (who suspects Walker of his devious doings, whereas his unsuspecting mother does not) in return for the favor. Thus begins a battle of wills wherein Walker torments Granger, his girlfriend and the others in his life, while concealing that he has Granger\'s cigarette lighter, which could incriminate Granger in his wife\'s murder if he places it back at the murder scene.\n\n\nLike many of Hitchcock\'s films, this features the usual assortment of distorted relationships between men and their mothers, badly portrayed authority figures, creepy imagery, black humor, flawed but essentially innocent men, and lots of observations about the darker side of human nature. An interesting film, but there are some lulls. Not that Hitchcock was perfect, but this one has more lulls than some of his other films, which, when combined with the lack of star power/big name actors that this film had starring in it, may attribute to why it is largely forgotten in light of films like "Rear Window", "To Catch A Thief", "North By Northwest", "Notorious", "The Man Who Knew Too Much", "Vertigo", "Psycho" and what not.\n\nStill, Walker is memorable as the film\'s killer, with his fey voice and intense gaze. At the time, he actually had the potential for a big career (he turned in some other less threatening performances in other films), but alas, fate was not on his side. One memorable image includes the murder being reflected in the wife\'s glasses. The climax on the merry go round is overkill though.\n\nOne of my favorite quotes from the film comes between the girlfriend\'s sister and their father. Upon hearing of the wife\'s murder, the sister (played by Hitchcock\'s real life daughter) calls the wife "a tramp" (which may have been true) and the father reprimands her with "She was a human being. Even the lowest of us are entitled to life, liberty, and the pursuit of happiness." The daughter retorts "She pursued it in five different directions."', u'-0.206004', u'Robert Walker admirably goes all out as a psychotic daddy-hater who befriends tennis pro Farley Granger and discovers the rather naive young man hates his estranged wife; Walker suggests swapping murders. Lots of intricate plotting in the set-up, but this Alfred Hitchcock thriller is relieved of tension by its banalities, such as the vapid dialogue, an overlong tennis sequence near the finale, and silly situations like the one where Walker "cleverly" winds up in his father\'s bed when Granger arrives. The frenzied finale plays well, but with some afterthought you may notice how emotionally hollow it is, what with an innocent, elderly carnival worker getting shot dead by the police (!) and nobody seems to care. Flamboyant, if over-the-top, performances, a great deal of style in the usual Alfred Hitchcock fashion, but not much substance. **1/2 from ****', u'-0.488525', u"A wonderful, rich and entertaining film. It manages to be just about all things to all men: a noirish thriller, but with plenty of humour; a matin\xe9e feature with iconic set pieces (the tennis match and the final fairground showdown) and a handsome cast led by an unspeakably beautiful Ruth Roman. The acting is good and to some depth. Robert Walker's schemer Bruno Anthony sets the standard the others follow. Farley's tennis chump (sic) Guy Haines (a character he's recycled from the earlier Rope) is likable but bubbleheaded enough to maintain the suspense; I also liked Patricia Hitchcock's Bobbie soxer sister to Roman, a good foil for Farley's character (and reminiscent of Barbara Bel Geddes' homely Midge opposite James Stewart's Scottie in Vertigo).\n\nWhat I hadn't expected is the homoerotic character, not only explicit in Walker's Bruno, but also throughout the action as a strong concurrent subtext. Once I had the idea in my head that Hitchcock intended the film as a homosexual tragedy, I found it difficult to shift. Of course, it's no more than subtext, albeit a pervasive one (it's 1951 after all) but the psychosis of the queer character moves fluidly between the surface action and the implication of his relationship with Haines. It also serves as a way of explaining Haines' perplexing procrastination in involving the authorities \x96 perhaps Bruno's behaviour is that of the sexual blackmailer. As I say, such readings breed themselves. Anyway, any sympathy that Hitchcock might have been seen to be harbouring towards the orientation of Bruno, if not the character himself gets tied up neatly at the end with Haines decisively removed from the 'danger' and getting the girl.\n\nHitchcock seems imperiously in control of his ideas and technique in this film. I was particularly taken with a sequence at a party. He successfully shows five different, well-developed characters all benighted to different degrees and coming to their own conclusions without any need for dialogue, both racking up tension and pushing the drama forward. There's very little to take issue with here. 8/10", u'0.00671167', u'\n\n"Lets swap Murders- your wife, my father"- seemingly innocent conversation between two strangers - Bruno Anthony and Guy Haines when they meet over lunch on a train journey. Guy, a solid, respectable tennis player, whose problem is that his wife, the flirtatious Miriam, won\'t divorce him so he can marry senators daughter Anne, laughs the whole conversation off as a joke. The following week he isn\'t laughing any more. In a scene of classic Hitchcock suspense, Bruno stalks Miriam through a carnival and strangles her. As he does, her glasses fall off and we see the murder eerily reflected twice through her lenses. Cold hearted and amoral Bruno, his part of the deal completed, approaches an appalled Guy expecting, even pressuring him into \'doing his bit.\' Matters are not helped when Anne\'s precocious and outspoken younger sister turns up suspecting Guy of Miriam\'s murder. So accused of a murder he didn\'t commit and expected to commit another, what is Guy going to do? The power of this film is in the presentation of human beings as having a murderous side to their nature - and this Hitchcock does to perfection.\n', u'0.0200839', u"Once Alfred Hitchcock said that good movie requires three things, good script, good script and good script. Surely this thing is very much depicted in this movie. The movie is about a tennis player (Fraley Granger) who has an unfaithful wife and a beautiful girlfriend. In the train he meets with a stranger (Robert Walker) who is infatuated to kill his father. Farley tells him about his chronics and casually stranger offers a very compelling proposal that I kill yours and you kill mine. And that the point where Hitchcock captivates his audience. Hitchcock had handled the neurotic sense of the movie immaculately and it mesmerizes you till the end of the movie. All the cast performed very well and the plot was very persuasive. No doubt its one of the best works of Hitchcock and for Hitchcock fans it's very much indulging.", u'0.439221', u"In Strangers On A Train, it's obvious from the start that playboy wastrel Robert Walker has singled out Farley Granger as an unwilling accomplice to a pair of murders. Granger's a semi-public figure, he's a tennis pro, but not an especially high one. High enough however for him to know that Granger is trapped in a loveless marriage and would like to be free to marry Ruth Roman.\n\nSo when they meet as complete Strangers On A Train one afternoon, Walker knows enough that Granger will at least be intrigued enough with the possibility that if the two of them, complete strangers, did commit homicide on parties that the other would be convenienced by their demise. Though Granger is repulsed by the idea, one of the beautiful things about this film, is that you can see in the performance he gives that Granger just might submit to temptation.\n\nIn fact when Walker kills Laura Elliot, Granger's wife whose been two timing him and even gotten pregnant by another man, he expects that Granger will in turn murder Walker's father so that Walker can inherit his estate. Today Walker would be called a trust fund baby and a pretty malevolent one at that.\n\nAlfred Hitchcock directed Walker to his career role, ironically in his last complete film. Walker died the following year with most of My Son John finished. Hitchcock does not do too bad by Farley Granger either. \n\nOf course when Granger does balk at committing homicide on people who never did anything to him, the tension. Strangers On A Train is also characterized by great editing, first in the tennis match in which Granger has to finish the match and waylay Walker before he plants evidence convicting Granger at the crime scene. And also in that final climax with a fight on a runaway carousel between Walker and Granger.\n\nStrangers On A Train is Hitchcock at his best, it should not be missed and ought to be required viewing when film classes study editing.", u'-0.0751146', u"Strangers on a Train boasts a neat central idea (the 'swapping' of murders), several classic Hitchcockian moments, and a fine performance from Robert Walker as psychotic socialite Bruno; but despite these admirable qualities the film fails to qualify as a complete success thanks to a severely flawed final act that makes one wonder what the hell Hitch was thinking.\n\nFarley Granger's tennis-pro Guy Haines being coerced into discussing murder by charismatic lunatic Bruno\x97all well and good. The nutter carrying out his side of the plan as discussed\x97great stuff. Haines afraid to go to the police for fear of being implicated in a murderous pact with a clearly deranged Bruno\x97hey, why not? People don't always make the wisest of decisions when under pressure.\n\nThe whole ridiculous fairground finale, however, cannot be so easily brushed aside. Bruno develops telescopic arms, the police act like bumbling trigger-happy fools, and a merry-go-round achieves warp-speed before a toothless old guy confuses a self-destruct lever for the brake. It's like something out of a fever-dream\x97illogical, perplexing and utterly deranged\x97a dreadful way to end what was proving to be a very enjoyable thriller.\n\n6.5 out of 10, rounded up to 7 for IMDb.", u'-0.788384'], u'tt0072684': [u'In the midst of the many wonderful films made by Stanley Kubrick, it is strange to note how rarely people mention "Barry Lyndon".\n\nThe film portrays an unusual young Irish man, Redmond Barry, and his endeavours as he is forced to leave his home and tries to make good his life elsewhere. His life away from home starts out as a career in the British Army; only to evolve in surprising ways and lead to as different places as a position of trust within the Prussian Army and later a title of nobility, gained by what our time can only measure as rather disgraceful means.\n\nSome consider Barry Lyndon a slow and tedious film \x96 and it is in deed past three hours in length, but this is because of the artistic flow of a film that strays not only to tell a tale about a man who is by no means neither hero nor villain, but also a film which is in no hurry and takes the time for every detail to sink into the mind and heart of the viewer. Some of the scenic images in "Barry Lyndon" are in themselves pieces of art, rendered with a passion for the landscapes and the man-made structures within them.\n\nThe myth that all scenes were recorded using no artificial lighting no doubt stems from the very realistic lights during indoor takes, and some of them truly did not feature artificial light. This is but one of the many details that so easily conveys a sense of a realistic portray of the era; the 18th century and the time after the seven-year war in the later half of the century. The impressive atmosphere and the wonderfully picturesque scenarios along with the fact that the entire plot moves at a calm pace makes this film a very pleasant experience.\n\n"Barry Lyndon is", amidst Kubricks\' many masterpieces, a film so easily dismissed due to length and the fact that it is overshadowed by others, but I deeply recommend this film to anyone who would like to see a film both for the plot line, the story and the pure enjoyment of the images presented. Stanley Kubrick made many great films \x96 and this one is most definitely one of them! KimotoCat', u'0.490009', u'\nIn fact it\'s one of Kubrick\'s most gripping pictures, with a narrative drive second only to that of "Dr. Strangelove" (and it\'s unquestionably a more glorious creation than, say, anything he made in the 1950s).  English director Michael Powell (while attributing a similar failing to one of his own works) says that Kubrick fell into "the trap of the picturesque", but while I admire Powell as a creator, the judgment is absurd: at the VERY least, each lush image shows us people not just occupying a part of the screen but inhabiting a world, and tells us much about their relation to that world.  Many shots are indeed amazing and beguile the eye, but they don\'t have the effect they do simply because they would make nice postcards.\n\nTHIS, I feel sure (without having read Thackeray), is the proper way to adapt a long story from novel to screen.  Each scene is either allowed as much time as it needs to make its point and its impact, or it\'s cut altogether - you won\'t catch Kubrick skating too quickly over his material for no better reason than to fit it all in.  The third-person narration (consisting of witty, beautifully crafted sentences - it\'s about time I did read Thackeray) almost performs a kind of dance with the images, gliding in just when we need it, taking a step back when we don\'t.  (So rarely is even third-person narration used so well.)  And as always, Kubrick\'s musical sense is unerring.  My impression at the time was that I was listening to mid-eighteenth century music that gave way to pieces from the classical era as the hero started to move in higher and higher circles.  I was more or less right.  But then I noticed Schubert\'s name in the credits - and I realised with a start that I\'d been listening to, had even started tapping my feet to, a Schubert piece I was familiar with, without the anachronism registering.\n\nIt\'s a pity Kubrick stopped making epics after this.  Look at the ones he\'s responsible for: "Spartacus" (not a project Kubrick was fond of, admittedly, but still the most magnificent of all Roman epics) "2001" (the most magnificent of ALL epics), and "Barry Lyndon".  The last of the three is by no means a poor cousin.', u'0.238549', u'Barry Lyndon (1975) has to be Stanley Kubrick\'s most realized project that he has ever taken. A big task for the maverick director. For a film like this to be made during the free wheeling seventies had to take some big stones. One must admire Mr. Kubrick for even trying to produce and direct such a complex and expensive film that had all the ear markings of a financial and personal disaster. Not only did Kubrick manage to out do his last epic "2001" but he has created a movie that not only showcases the untapped acting abilities of Ryan O\'Neil, but a beautifully lensed film that uses minimal lighting , gorgeous sets, perfect balance, positioning and meticulous timing. I have never seen such a magnificent film such as this one. Every shot and frame plays out like an eighteenth century oil painting.\n\nA young Irish man of lower class has the strangest quirk of luck. After participating in an illegal duel, young Barry is forced to flee from his home village. After being accosted by some gentlemanly highway robbers, Barry winds up cross country and becomes a conscripted soldier. Rising in rank, Barry is sent to fight in the Seven\'s Year War. Whilst in battle he watches his friends and fellow soldiers being slaughtered in combat due to poor tactics and leadership. Having enough of this life of hardship and struggle, Barry uses his god given talents to do what he has to do in order to survive and become a man of proper social standing.\n\nI was very impressed with this movie. I\'ve put off watching this film until recently. Some have told me how long and boring this movie was. Others have said it was pretty self serving and not worth watching. But after seeing part of it on T.C.M., I just had to find a copy of my own. The film is over three hours in length but they go by very quickly because Barry\'s story is so captivating. Kubrick poured his heart and soul into this film. The results are on the screen. He\'s clearly a master film maker. His reputation is cemented forever with this movie. Ryan O\'Neil impressed the hell out me with his role as Barry Lyndon. He gives the character some dignity and depth that no other actor could have possibly given to the title role.\n\nOverall I would have to give this film one of my highest recommendations. This is one of my top ten films of all time. If people tell you not to watch this masterpiece ignore them. I advise you to get a copy and enjoy. For a film like this you need to set aside a weekend afternoon to fully appreciate a film such as this. Believe me you will not regret it.\n\nHighest recommendation possible.\n\nIt doesn\'t matter whether you watch it on D.V.D. or V.C.D. because the transfers are excellent on either format.', u'0.216797', u'(Note: Over 500 of my movie reviews are now available in my book "Cut to the Chaise Lounge or I Can\'t Believe I Swallowed the Remote!" Get it at Amazon.)\n\nStanley Kubrick\'s beautifully opulent production takes many liberties with William Makepeace Thackeray\'s picaresque romance, The Memoirs of Barry Lyndon, Esq (1843), narrated in the first person depicting events from the eighteenth century. In particular, Redmond Barry who becomes Barry Lyndon, is something of an admirable rake, whereas in Thackeray\'s novel he is a braggart, a bully and a scoundrel. No matter. Kubrick, in keeping with a long-standing filmland tradition, certainly has license, and Thackeray won\'t mind.\n\nRyan O\'Neal is the unlikely star, and he does a good job, rising from humble Irish origins to the decadence of titled wealth, employing a two-fisted competence in the manly arts, including some soldiering, some thievery at cards and a presumed consummate skill in the bedroom. Marisa Berenson plays Lady Lyndon, whom Barry has managed to seduce; and when her elderly husband dies, she marries Barry thus elevating his social and economic station in life. But Barry is rather clumsy at playing at peerage, and bit by bit manages to squander most of the Lyndon fortune until his stepson, Lord Bullingdon (Leon Vitali) grows old enough to do something about it.\n\nThis really is a gorgeous movie thanks to the exquisite sets and costumes and especially to John Alcott\'s dreamy cinematography and a fine score by Leonard Rosenman. The 184 minutes go by almost without notice as we are engrossed in the rise and fall of Barry\'s fortunes. There is fine acting support from Patrick Magee as the Chevalier de Balibari and Leonard Rossiter as Captain Quinn, and a number of lesser players, who through Kubrick\'s direction bring to life Europe around the time of the Seven Years War (1754-1763) when decadence and aristocratic privilege were still in full flower.\n\nThe script features two dueling scenes, the first showing the combatants firing at one another simultaneously at the drop of a white kerchief, the second has Barry and his stepson face each other ten paces apart, but due to the flip of a coin, the stepson fires first. Both scenes are engrossing as we see the loading of the pistols with powder, ball and ramrod, and we are able to note how heavy the pistols are and how difficult it must be to hit a silhouette at even a short distance. It is this kind of careful attention to directional detail that absorbs us in the action and makes veracious the story. Notice too the way the British soldiers march directly en mass toward the French guns. They actually used to fight battles that way! Also note the incredible pile of hair atop Lady Lyndon\'s head. Surely this is some kind of cinematic record. \n\nBottom line: one of Kubrick\'s best, certainly his most beautiful film.', u'0.382396', u"\nBarry Lyndon is one of my favourite films of all time.   Kubrick's craftsmanship is impeccable.   The film is slow and dreamy in its pace which, along with the scenic shots, establishes a romanticised watercolour view of the period (somewhat like a Carpenter landscape). In fact, Kubrick has set up almost every shot (indoor and out) like a painting. This romanticism provides an interesting counterpoint against Lyndon's less than admirable actions throughout the film.\n\n I would have to say that the best acting in Barry Lyndon comes from some of the minor actors.   Leonard Rossiter delivers a fantastic portrait of the arrogant Captain Quinn, with exaggerated  facial expressions and movements (eg. like in the dance scene, or when his engagement to Nora is announced)  that are perfect for the self-aggrandising bluster of this character.  Leon Vitali as Lord Bullingdon also gives an insightful performance as Barry's stepson.\n\n\n", u'0.598539', u'Some movies - I wish there were more of them - simply look like a series of great paintings. This film has that look. You could freeze-frame many of the scenes and swear you were looking at a Gainsborough, a Vermeer, a Hogarth or similar work of art by one the great artists of three to five centuries ago. It\'s just beautiful.\n\nFor that, we have Director Stanley Kubrick and Photographer John Alcott to thank. Being a three-hour movie, there are plenty of wonderful shots to admire, too. In addition, the costumes are lavish and authentic and the scoring is notable. It\'s no accident that Oscars were garnered for art/set direction, cinematography, costume design and scoring. Yeah, if you enjoy classical music, you\'ll really enjoy the soundtrack, too, under the guidance of conductor Leonard Roseman.\n\nNot to be overlooked is the fine acting and the interesting and underrated story. I say "underrated" because this film, from what I\'ve read, bored a lot of people and and it was a box-office flop. That\'s too bad because, frankly, I found the story (outside of the first 10--15 minutes) to be fascinating. As I watched, I kept wondering what strange occurrences will happen next to the lead character, "Redmond Barry/Barry Lyndon," played beautifully by Ryan O\'Neal. (For most of the movie, he\'s called "Redmond Barry," so I will refer to him as that.) \n\nOverall, this was a low-key adventure story about the rise-and-fall of a "scoundrel" back in late 18th century Englishman. "Mr. Barry" is an Irishmen living in England who winds up dealing with a number of people: Irish, English, Prussian, French. His dealings with these people are bizarre at times. While he mainly is shown doing what he can to promote himself, for either monetary gain and prestige of a name and power, he\'s not all bad. There is a compassionate side to him, but it only shows itself in small doses. It makes him all the more interesting to watch, because you don\'t always know how he\'s going to react to his circumstances, which change radically every few years.\n\nWe witness his rise to prominence and then his fall when his "sins begin to find him out," as the Bible would describe. It\'s quite a roller coaster ride.\n\nThis is an emotional, involving story, and a feast for the eyes and ears. It\'s quite different, too, certainly not the average fare from Kubrick. I can only hope this comes out on a high-definition disc some day. Admirers of this film need to see this in all its glory.', u'0.331969', u'\nIn some way almost all of Stanley Kubrick\'s movies are very gloomy, dreary and wicked. The idea of "Lolita" is definitely perverted, "The Shining" is maybe the most terrifying film ever made, "Full Metal Jacket" is still one of the most pressuring war movies, from time to time "Eyes Wide Shut" looks almost like a horror film and even "2001: A Space odyssey" has some pretty frightening visions.\n\n"Barry Lyndon" was Kubrick\'s next film after his darkest masterpiece "A Clockwork Orange" and certainly a totally different kind of a work. Even though "Barry Lyndon\'s" second half is slightly darker and the movie certainly isn\'t a comedy of any kind it\'s still quite a nice, warm and genial picaresque story. It\'s hard to say is it a bit overlong because it\'s easier to watch in two parts but nevertheless it\'s a brilliant film from the very start. "Barry Lyndon" is full of unforgettable sequences. My favorite is probably the duel between Barry Lyndon and his stepson Lord Bullington.\n\nOne of the things I love most about this movie is the splendid epilogue. Closing words of "Barry Lyndon" brings hilariously together every event seen in the film. Ryan O\'Neal makes a fabulous performance as Barry. He isn\'t all that well-known actor in the movie business but he does a great job in the difficult leading role. I\'ll give 9 out of 10 to "Barry Lyndon" and point out that although it\'s not Kubrick\'s finest flick it\'s still a very excellent movie and an extremely important part of his works and it should not be underestimate. If you have seen lots of Kubrick classics but not this one, take this chance to jump into 18th century and watch the entertaining adventures of Redmond Barry.', u'0.659347', u'\nWhen I was in high school, it was considered "cool" to watch Stanley Kubrick movies as they were seen as "more enlightened forms of entertainment" over stuff by Steven Spielberg and John Hughes.  If you didn\'t memorize the opening speech to Full Metal Jacket or hadn\'t seen Nicole Kidman in Eyes Wide Shut then you were rejected from the clique.  This was at the time when I was first viewing Kurosawa\'s Rashomon and Ran and accidentally came across this gem.  Sure, the rest of the gang would be quoting along with Alex DeLarge in A Clockwork Orange, but not one of them would dare sit down and watch this or 2001: A Space Odyssey.  Fools.\n\nBarry Lyndon is another sign of sheer genius on behalf of Kubrick.  Notice that in his career he is never concerned about making money, just creating an image and telling a story.  Imagine if Michael Bay did the same, he\'d be out of the business in no time and having to sell his own movies at the Video Hut.  This movie is one of his better detailed (and yet mysteriously unsung) masterpieces that is so beautiful to look at that it almost becomes artistic pornography (in the sense of creating intense emotion).  This isn\'t to say that Barry Lyndon is vulgar.  By comparison to Eyes Wide Shut and The Shining, this is a kid\'s cartoon.\n\nKubrick is once again a certified genius with his camera.  The elaborate and glamorous scenes ranging from duels to gardens and even just the opening prologue are beautifully rendered in a style reminiscent of Monet or other artists.  I found it interesting how Kubrick includes pigeons (doves?) in the final duel.  Perhaps John Woo gained some inspiration from this.\n\nThe story is paper thin compared to 2001 and lacks much of the symbolism.  In fact, it is very hard to either sympathize with Ryan O\'Neil as the title character because of his lack of portrayal.  As a whole, none of the characters gain either support or disapproval because of their fleeting presence.  The sets and costume designs themselves become more of a character than the actors.  Thankfully, the story is not as convoluted as I expected.  It flows nicely and never gets boring because of the variety of powerful elements infused into it.\n\nFirst off, kudos to both Ken Adam and Vernon Dixon for their brilliant production design.  I loved what Ken did with Dr. Strangelove (smart move for him to ditch the Bond series for that).  John Alcott is one of Kubrick\'s lesser cinematographers, but he is still very talented here.  I\'m certain that, if he had lived longer, Kubrick would\'ve kept using him.  He is not as concerned about symmetry, that or the topics aren\'t, as the rest of Kubrick\'s work.  The biggest irony about Barry Lyndon would have to be that everyone in the categories EXCEPT Kubrick won an Oscar for their work.  I think the Academy has something of a grudge against him because of his superior quality of work.\n\nOverall, a phenomenal quality of film that they just don\'t make anymore.  I put this in my Top 10 required viewings for anyone who wants to be in film.  Kubrick has transcended Shakespeare with this film.  4.5 out of 5 stars.', u'0.217953', u"\nKubrick's adaptation of Thackeray's Barry Lyndon sharply divides fans of the great director's work, as the languid pace and seemingly interminable running time -- not to mention Ryan O'Neal's questionable performance in the title role -- are cherished by some and deplored by others.  Little argument will be made against John Alcott's Academy Award-winning cinematography or Ken Adam's production design, however, and Kubrickian motifs are manifest in the gallery of characters' wide-ranging displays of cowardice, guile, duplicity, avarice, jealousy, greed, and cruelty.  Marisa Berenson is terribly short-changed in her role as the Lady Lyndon, but a number of other performers are given the opportunity to create a handful of memorable moments -- especially Arthur O'Sullivan (albeit briefly) as the charming, intelligent highwayman and Patrick Magee as the Chevalier.  Love it or hate it, Barry Lyndon will remain essential viewing for aficionados of the director, who enjoys taking his usual shots at the more discouraging aspects of human behavior.", u'0.398019', u"While this is, in my opinion, not the best of Kubrick's films, it is in no way a bad film of his... some have claimed it is overlong and dull, but I don't think so. From what I've heard, it does the novel justice, and I believe that is what Kubrick went after, more than anything else. That is admirable, for a man who throughout his career was known for making unfaithful film adaptations of famous and popular novels, much to the dismay of the authors. The film perfectly presents everything from the time period in which it takes place... something that few, if any, other films have accomplished. It deals with the life of Redmond Barry, his ups and downs. The first half has us feeling sympathy with him, and shows his rise to a high position and gain the name Barry Lyndon, and everything that entitles. The second seems to turn us a little more against him, as he goes through the expected downfall that must always follow an unexpected rise to high life. Through the film he gets desensitized and careless. We follow him through most of his life, and an uneventful one it is not. As all other Kubrick films, the visual side is probably the most prominent one of the film, as he grants us several long looks at the beautiful sets and locales, and there are more than a few of his trademark shots slowly zooming out from the focus point to display the surroundings. The plot is great, and almost constantly developing. It is narrated with a good sense of irony and clever social satire on the time period. There's plenty of humor in the film to make the three hour run-time seem less long. The pacing is good and thorough without the film being slow(though I do admit that it isn't a film for those who are not used to long, visual films). The characters are well-written and credible. The acting is excellent all the way. Not even the child-actors seemed less than perfectly convincing. The costumes and sets are great. From what I understand, there is no detail in the film that is even slightly historically inaccurate. That is quite impressive for a film that takes place about a century and a half before it was made. I have heard of great deals of work done to keep many films accurate, but I don't believe one exists that manages to do so with such perfection as this. Even the very language that they speak is accurate. The special effects in the film also deserve mention here... for a film that is almost thirty years old, it's impeccable how believable and convincing the effects are... I couldn't tell how most of them were done. Kubrick was indeed one of the most brilliant directors ever... he was not only a master at his craft, he was also one of the most innovative and inspiring film-makers to have ever lived. I recommend this great piece of cinema to anyone who has an interest in the time period the film is set and any fan of Stanley Kubrick. Don't miss this one. Not his greatest, but a truly great one nonetheless. 10/10", u'0.293229', u'The beauty, the depth, and the mystery of this film are unsurpassable - what Kubrick was doing with light is just a miracle. Special lenses were designed to shoot interiors and exteriors in natural light. In one scene Barry (Ryan O\'Neil) was having a dinner with a German woman who was feeding her baby and the candle light made the whole scene look like a Caravaggio\'s painting. This is just one of many scenes. Each of them is perfection and harmony. Costumes and sets were crafted in the era\'s design. Age of Enlightenment with its gallantry, wars, and duels, had been recreated in the film with the precision of the celebrated landscape and portrait masters of the period such as Thomas Gainsborough; Sir Joshua Reynolds, founder of the Royal Academy of Arts; George Romney to name just a few. If nothing else, watching BL is pure aesthetic delight - and there is one man who responsible for it, Stanley Kubrick. If ever divine film was made, "Barry Lyndon" was it and Kubrick could\'ve quoted the Bible - "God looked at everything he had made, and he found it very good".\n\nI\'ve read the comments and articles that call "Barry Lyndon" cold, slow, boring, "the collection of pretty pictures\', "flawed" masterpiece, and the most ridiculous one, "glittering ornament with a hollow center". I simply can\'t understand it. "Barry Lyndon" is the most compelling and compassionate realization of the inevitable finality of everything in this world which was presented by the visionary director with elegant sensual melancholy. Stanley Kubrick known for his detached, seemingly remote and non-sentimental style chose to reach out to his viewer directly during the epilogue, "It was in the reign of George III that the aforesaid personalities lived and quarreled, good or bad, handsome or ugly, rich or poor, they are all equal now". I don\'t recall any other movie that would illustrate the old wisdom, "everything will pass" in such sublime and deeply moving way.', u'0.448228', u"\nSpoilers herein.\n\nKubrick is a hard filmmaker to touch. He's obviously competent, even brilliant in some ways. And a few of his films -- `Strangelove' comes to mind -- make enough sense superficially that one is not compelled to go farther. The problem is that Kubrick never gives us much hint that his films are a whole different beast than the others on the shelf at the video store. I think he relished the confusion.\n\nMost films tell a story in the old fashioned way: time moves, things happen, characters act. In these films, the story is largely apart from the storytelling. Because film is different than everything else, the means of storytelling are unique to film. And because film is still new, we have lots of room for discovering how to tell a story.\n\nSo we have the vast majority of filmmakers and viewers who think of a film purely in terms of the story. But we have another group of people who watch the storytelling, and perhaps (like myself) don't demand that much from the story itself. That's why we admire empty stylists like De Palma, but of course prefer master visual storytellers like Kurosawa.\n\nThe holy grail is when the narrative of the conventional threads and the cinematic ones mesh, or are coordinated in some clever way. By cinematic threads, I mean a narrative invested in the very fabric of the camera, like `Marienbad,' like `Pillow Book,' like Welles' `Othello,' or with the aid of actors like `Sweet and Lowdown,' or `Vanya on 42nd Street.' There's a sublime joy to parallel immersion in both the story and cinematic narratives.\n\nBut sometimes along comes a Kubrick to confound us. I spent a lot of time with `Eyes Wide Shut' before understanding it, because I was looking for the tie with the story. But Kubrick has the equation the other way around. The primary narrative anchor is in the cinematic narrative. The story isn't a skeleton around which the filmmaking takes place, rather an annotation or an incomplete dream that results from it. Jarmusch, Malick, and Kar-wai Wong (`In the Mood for Love') have this same attitude, with minor twists.\n\nFreed from limiting expectations, I am now able to enjoy `Barry Lyndon' in more the way I think Kubrick saw it. It is not a story about a Black Irish told through pretty pictures. It is a visual tone poem on the seduction of beauty, with a dissonance between natural beauty and cosmetics. The primary story is visual. It needs space. It needs time. (`2001' has the same cinematic narrative, with the `cosmetics' being logic; the minor twist in `Clockwork' is that the cultural cosmetic is in the future.)\n\nThe part of the narrative that O'Neal contributes is a loose stitching of this to plot elements as seasoning to help our digestion: war/ gambling, arbitrary privilege, duals and duels, face and body costumes, superposition of languages.\n\nThe ironic point is that Kubrick tricks you into soaking up the lushness, and doesn't punish you at the end. That's why you leave the theater feeling guilty and not knowing why. (He takes away one of our legs -- the story -- and sends us to wander in America, not quite sure what has happened to us.) Can you think of any other artist with that power?", u'0.26279', u'Spoilers Ahead:\n\nFirst, have you ever seen such a beautiful film? The photography and sets are just stunningly well done; the attention to detail that was Stanley Kubrick. My review is a philosophical review. I must say, as just a straight narrative, the picture is very interesting and well done. You do not have to grasp the ideas I am talking about to enjoy a very intriguing, straight forward adventure picture. The going out into the world to find my place archetype shorn of all the Kubrickian\'s themes serves the movie sufficiently to make it worth owning. \n\nKubrick\'s main goal is always to expose human irrationality how the surface, seemingly rational facade, is but a thin patina covering an utterly irrational savage. HAL goes nuts trying to reconcile the two opposing directives of his designers: perfect information processing and imitate humans as much as possible. Well, humans are complete mendacity always prevaricating mostly to hide from themselves their true natures. Here the template is human ambition. Redmond gets a hankering to climb the social ladder after some interesting misadventures. \n\nThrough laborious, painstaking, immoral deceit and ruthlessness, he supplants the previous Lord of Lyndon; he gets the noble wife but no title. His ruthless mother gets behind him with a whip and a chair pushing him for that title he must have. He then is forced to chase all these nobles all around throwing money and galas for every blue blood for miles. The first thing to notice is how unhappy Redmond is when he attains his earthly Nirvana. The look on both of them; how utterly bored with all the endless work that goes with being rich and owning all those possessions. The constant status games to own the right paintings, know the right people. What a crushing bore? Again, Kubrick wants you to see how completely crazy to desire and fight to achieve misery. Like Schopenhauer points out, human life is a pendulum between desire for the poor and boredom for the rich. Misery is the usual outcome. The poor, like naive Liza, in My Fair Lady crooning how,\'\'wouldn\'t it be lovely," to be rich; no, it is a massive amount of work, worry and boredom.\n\nSchopenhauer points out how the rich own so many homes so that at least all the travel will consume all that boredom. Kubrick shows you the stack of bills, the huge staff, the entourage that goes with you everywhere. I love the scene where Redmond is just staring blankly, in boredom, as Lady Lyndon signs the mountain of checks. The other major theme is that the skills requisite for ruthlessly grabbing the wealth are the very ones that destroy Redmond. When he is just about to ooze his way, at a music recital, into that coveted title; Lord Bullington provokes him, the old Redmond, the violent usurper, attacks and beats him. Well, there goes the title. It is a beautiful masterpiece another illustration of the utter insanity within human beings that will lead to their self annihilation in Dr. Strangelove. However he strays, Stanley always returns to this theme: humans live totally in the dark about their irrationality and their violence. I think this is a real work of art.', u'0.0116404', u'Kubrick\'s "Barry Lyndon" project was initially a project about Napoleon Bonaparte. Simply titled "Napoleon", the film aimed to portray the life of a lowly man who had seemingly conquered his environment. Like an obsessive film director (guess who), Napoleon tamed his surroundings, forcing the cosmos to bow to his own singular vision.\n\nKubrick envisioned this film as being awash with intricate plans, strategies, military formations, and animated schematics. His Napoleon was a man who took control and waged war, not against the Spanish, Russians or Italians, but against an indeterministic, malevolent universe. \n\nBut of course, like Johnny Clay in "The Killing", Napoleon does eventually fail. He suffers a series of military defeats which leads to him realising that, even without his obsessive micromanagement, all his battles would have achieved the same results. Variables far beyond his reach governed the final outcome.\n\nThe Napoleon project failed to materialise for various financial reasons. Always the pragmatist, however, Kubrick then decided to make the complete thematic opposite of Napoleon.\n\nAnd so we have "Barry Lyndon". Unlike Napoleon, Barry doesn\'t scheme or try to force things into position. A man at the mercy of (or oblivious to) the cosmos, he does as told, taking fortunes and misfortunes as they occur.\n\nWhile Kubrick\'s "form as content" approach dictated that Napoleon be awash with intricate plans. . .plans in which a mere man seemingly thwarts nature (a largely Gnostic nature that is evil, malevolent and hostile), Barry Lyndon\'s "form as content" approach dictates that Kubrick\'s universe completely subvert Barry the man.\n\nAnd so we have a cosmic tragedy in which the very form of the film attempts to reduce man to nothingness. Kubrick\'s painterly canvas locks his actors into predetermined compositions, such that they appear to have no free-will, unable to break free. He portrays the universe (director) as the ultimate artist, its beautiful brush-strokes concealing its suffocating ugliness, life itself portrayed as being the artistic result of the universe\'s unmappable web of rules and formulae.\n\nSimilarly, each event in the film is portrayed as being the direct result of some prior occurrence. The first scene highlights this continuous past/present relationship. Watch too how the clouds, trees and walls in the first shot "frame" Barry\' father; man is a spec on the horizon, playing his ritualised games as the cosmic order engulfs him. \n\nLikewise, the character\'s are all bound by duty and rigid social roles. Their lives are ritualised, robotic, learnt and rehearsed. While "Dr Strangelove" and "2001" are swathed in birth and sex imagery, here Kubrick uses a semiotic fabric of chance. Every scene is awash with games of chance, duels, courtship, cards, gambling, luck etc, all of which bolster the notion of fate on Barry\'s life.\n\nEven the narrator subverts Barry\'s story. While the acting and visual compositions attempt to relegate Barry to the background, the narrator attempts to undermine his tale by negating all drama and tension. Why are you watching this man, he says? He is nobody. ("Though this encounter is not recorded in any history books, it was memorable enough for those who took part") \n\nOf course, visually, the film is unsurpassed. But this is a film in which beauty and cosmetics seduce us away from innate malevolence. This is a Schopenhaueren world in which finiteness is at war with the infiniteness of Time and Space. A world in which the present is constantly Becoming without Being, man a desire machine continually wishing without being satisfied, his efforts always thwarted, victory rarely won. Time, and the transitoriness of all things, are merely the form under which the will to live, has revealed to Time the futility of its efforts. In this world, no man is happy, always living in expectation of better things, always striving or demanding "satisfaction". A world in which man accepts the present as something that is only temporary and regards it only as a means to accomplish his aims. Beauty, sensuality, aesthetics, splendour and riches, are thus futile attempts to escape the inherent misery. Disillusion behind illusion.\n\nThus, Kubrick places emphasis on the landscape and background to such an extent that his visual style subverts the character\'s on screen drama. Typical cinematic language is therefore REVERSED, such that we have a BACKGROUND which is constantly fighting to drown out Barry\'s FOREGROUND story. Expanding the metaphor further and we have a universe which gradually dwarfs and suffocates Barry\'s life.\n\nKubrick\'s constant use of long zoom ins and zooms outs further highlights this theme. Here is man, ZOOM OUT. . .and here is man put in context. The irony is that whenever Barry attempts to assert himself over this natural law, he\'s punished terribly.\n\nThe most severe punishment occurs during the duel at the end of the film. After a misfire, fate rolls in Barry\'s favour, giving him the opportunity to shoot his opponent down. But no. Refusing yet again to be a pawn, Barry altruistically chooses to exhibits free will at its most pure. He sacrifices himself. And of course he\'s punished dearly for this. Frozen in time, he\'s robbed of his leg, immobilised, pinned in place by history, no longer able to prowl his pretty canvas.\n\nAnd so the entire film is about the inevitability of loss. Barry loses his father in the first shot, his first love (cousin) in the next. He loses his home, his family, his surrogate father (the general), his second surrogate father (chevalier), his son, his wealth and finally his leg. With the loss of his leg, he is then literally frozen as "art". As historical image. \n\nSignificantly, the only object in the film able to outpace Kubrick\'s zoom out is a coffin, which moves inexorably toward the moving camera. As death is constant, all history is about loss.\n\n20/10 - Doomed to never be fully appreciated.', u'-0.0980082', u"Martin Scorcese reportedly considers this to be Kubrick's best film. I must agree, and I would say it's his best by some fair margin. I've never seen a film with photography that even begins to approach that in Barry Lyndon. But everyone mentions the photography. The three things that most decisively set this film apart from all of Kubrick's others and really haven't been mentioned enough are its enormous heart, its uncompromising spirit, and the way it seems to suspend time over and over again, simultaneously standing still yet flowing along easily, almost breathlessly. If you watch it expecting A Clockwork Orange or The Shining, you'll be very disappointed and may end up calling it long and boring, but if you set aside an entire evening and surrender yourself totally to its magic, I swear you'll be looking for yourself in Stunland a few hours later. I's time to treat yourself to Barry Lyndon. You may be shocked at discovering what's been there for so long.", u'0.505707'], u'tt0038787': [u'*Notorious* may not be Hitchcock\'s greatest film, but it may very well be his most perfect film. Rarely is a viewer treated to so much talent in all areas of film creation: Hitch directing, Gregg Toland photographing, Ben Hecht writing, Cary Grant and Ingrid Bergman and Claude Rains acting. And everyone is firing on all cylinders.\n\nWhat gives *Notorious* its singularity amongst the pantheon of Hitchcock\'s masterpieces is the highly symbolic, literate, and penetrating script by Hecht. Nominally, the film is about the OSS (the pre-natal version of the CIA) using a compromised young daughter of a condemned, unrepentant Nazi to infiltrate a cell of German expatriates in Rio de Janeiro just after the close of the Second World War. The plot hinges on some nonsense involving "uranium ore" stuffed in wine bottles in the cellar of Claude Rains\' mansion. In actuality, the film is nothing less than a dark fugue on alcoholism, and secondarily (and of most interest to the director), invasion of privacy. Thirdly, we are treated to some more of the Master\'s endless fascination with Freudian slop: yet again, we get the Oedipus Complex in all its ardor, with a domineering old bat wielding the motherly whip-hand on Rains\' cuckolded, castrated, romantic ex-pat Nazi.\n\nBut Hecht is interested primarily in alcoholism, and Hitchcock obligingly complies, utilizing a dizzying myriad of symbols and reference points. In the original script, Bergman\'s Alicia is something of a whore: the filmmakers were forced by the censors to tone this aspect down, thereby bringing Alicia\'s dependence on booze to the forefront. Indeed, Bergman spends much of her screen-time woozy-headed, whether from alcohol or poisonous coffee (symbolically functioning as the same thing). Very early in the film, she declares at a party, "The important drinking hasn\'t started yet!" Exactly. Throughout the movie, Bergman drinks in order to escape her unpleasant circumstances or to wash away bouts of low self-esteem. A bottle of champagne bought by Grant becomes a phallic symbol: he forgets it at the offices of the OSS, with arid results when he arrives home to Bergman. Wine bottles are literally the "key" to the plot. Spilled wine in a sink blows her cover. And late in the proceedings, the simple physical act of drinking -- coffee, yes, but the point comes across -- almost kills her.\n\nThere\'s much more going on here -- too much for a short review, really. Let\'s finish by asserting that Hitchcock\'s Forties period was every bit as cinematic as his later, grander, colorized period in the Fifties and Sixties. The slowly swooping shot from the crane, starting from high atop the ceiling of a ballroom and ending up focused on the wine cellar key in Bergman\'s hand, is merely one famous bravura moment. There are many others:\n\nGrant approaching a hungover Bergman in bed, in which the camera takes her up-ended POV quite literally; Bergman, overcome with poison, hallucinating the figures of Rains and his mother into monstrous shadows that grow larger and larger, eventually merging into one darkness; the two great tracking shots of Grant and Bergman kissing in her Rio apartment and later when Grant rescues her from her poison bed. The trailers for *Notorious* were already calling Hitchcock the "Master of Suspense" . . . it\'s easy to see why.\n\nAs for the performances? Cary Grant proves to be a true soldier, spending much of his screen-time either expressionless or with his back turned to the camera (!), unselfishly giving the film to Bergman, even though his part is actually the more interesting one. Bergman, meanwhile, gives one of the best performances of her illustrious career. No two Bergman roles are quite the same; Hitchcock wisely allows her to do some of her own interpretation, particularly early on during the "character-building" scenes (before the plot moves all the characters into their appointed places on the chessboard). Perhaps best of all, both Grant and Bergman were at the very peak of the physical charms: the movie is some serious eye-candy for both genders. 9 stars out of 10.', u'0.113947', u'"Notorious" is, of Hitchcock\'s "earlier" films, certainly the most durable and endlessly fascinating. Not, God knows, for its "brilliant" shots -- including the famous tracking shot from the foyer ceiling down to the key in Ingrid Bergman\'s hand.\n\nBut for the frank eroticism Hitchcock establishes from the opening party sequence on, and Bergman\'s breathtakingly uninhibited playing against her "virginal" type.\n\n"Notorious" is riddled with bad, jerky rear-projection sequences. The first is Bergman\'s drunken drive along the Florida highway before the policeman stops her.\n\nThen, every sequence where she and Cary Grant meet in the park in Rio. Sitting on that bench while the entire world "jerks" behind them.\n\nPitiful.\n\nDo we care? Hell, no.\n\nIngrid Bergman was never so starkly sensual and frank on screen, as she is as "Alicia." And Cary Grant, as agent Devlin, was perfectly directed to play cold and largely unresponsive to Bergman\'s unrestrained and ultimately heartbreaking heat.\n\nGrant is given subtle moments early on, to show his falling in love with Bergman. The brief glance he gives her as she leans across his lap in the plane descending into Rio, before Hitchcock quickly fades it out, is almost pornographic (for the era).\n\nTheir repartee is so fraught with sexual tension and mutual challenge as to be unparalleled in cinema up till that time -- and perhaps even since.\n\nBergman, so powerful an actress, is utterly vulnerable and natural in the early sequences -- emerging from her father\'s trial with her usual Bergmanesque stoicism, only to instantly become surprisingly, drunkenly, girlish and accessible and dangerous in the next sequence -- brushing windblown hair from her lips as she drives -- viciously fighting off Devlin when she realizes Devlin\'s an agent -- awakening to a hangover so realistic you can almost smell her breath steaming off the screen -- finally agreeing, out of patriotism, to help the "cause." The range of Bergman\'s performance, from drunken party girl desperate to escape her background, to duplicitous double-agent portraying "Madame" Sebastian in elegant surroundings, to helplessly, hopelessly lovesick Alicia finally in love with an unresponsive American agent (Grant) -- to an imprisoned woman dying of poisoning -- Bergman is simply brilliant.\n\nShe was never more sensually presented on screen.\n\nNor was Cary Grant. One does not expect emotional displays or outbursts from a government agent.\n\nGrant\'s / Devlin\'s professional reluctance to admit, much less act on, his feelings for Bergman\'s Alicia is evident from frame one. His self-control as an actor and as a man was never better realized. At any moment, he could sexually assault Alicia -- whether out of rage or love is never clear, until the final, tender, moments of the film.\n\nBy the time Alicia and Devlin reach the infamous two-plus minutes on-off kissing scene in Alicia\'s Rio apartment, viewers of both sexes are watering at the mouth, wanting them to devour each other.\n\nThat they don\'t adds another layer of suspense to what ultimately becomes almost unbearable tension after Alicia weds Sebastian and moves in with him, his mother, and the other Nazis.\n\nThis is an amazingly daring film in terms of female sexuality, for its day or ours. Hitchcock asks us, as he asks Devlin, to sympathize with -- and love -- a woman who not only sleeps around just as men do, but who is willing to sleep around under false pretenses for the good of her adopted country. If that\'s a stretch for audiences now, consider what it was for audiences in the late 40s.\n\nIs there another "heroine" in cinema history who blatantly sleeps with a man she despises in order to win the love (and successfully) of another man whom she adores?\n\nName one. \n\nNot "Mata Hari," who, no matter that she was played by Garbo, had anywhere near the emotional/political/moral complexity of Alicia.\n\nWe still have to contend with those cheeseball rear-projection sequences. But Bergman and Grant play them so beautifully that the shoddy rear-screen technological primitivism is immediately forgiven.\n\nAnd the secondary casting is so flawless that, in "Notorious\'" final sequence, as Claude Rains is called back into the mansion and walks up those steps to his inevitable death, and the door closes while Bergman and Grant escape to a new life, our feelings are a mixture of triumph and pity.\n\nTruly, one of Hitchcock\'s most complex, sexually challenging, political, adult, ambiguous and disturbing films.\n\nForget the cheeseball rear-projections, please.\n\n"Notorious" is several glasses -- perhaps too many -- of vintage cinematic champagne.\n\nGood grief!', u'0.145067', u"Hitchcock introduces his stars with a cinematic blow that makes the opening of this dark, scrumptious thriller a monumental treat. He uses their star personalities and turns them round to dislocate us, teasing us with his unmistakable touch. The absurdity of the plot becomes totally plausible and the suspense is not merely unbearable but thrillingly entertaining. All of Hitchcock's favorite emotional and visual toys are present here. The icy blond, the sexual tension, the weakling villain with a castrating mother. A legendary kiss and a happy ending. Whenever I meet someone who hasn't seen any Hitchcock movies - and there are people in this world, believe it or not, who hasn't - I show them Notorious and always without fail, they are hooked forever. Just the way I was, I am and, I suspect, will always be. Cary Grant is allowed a dark unsmiling romantic hero and Ingrid Bergman lowers her strength to become a woman in love and in jeopardy but unwilling to appear as a victim. This gem of a film can be seen again and again without ever becoming tired or obvious. I'm sure you guessed it by now, this is one of my favorite films of all time.", u'0.221025', u'As a young woman, back in the "olden days" days before video, DVD and TCM, I was always fascinated by this film, though it came and went on more obscure T.V. channels, with no clue of when it would return. Notorious has everything...inimitable Hitchcock moments, mystery, suspense, personal drama, high romance, passion, great character development, international espionage, nuanced acting, a visually stunning foreign locale, post-war period mystique, patriotism, fine supporting cast, a charmingly evil Claude Rains, a most sinister Mme. Konstantin, Grant at his most enigmatic and romantic, and Bergman her most alluring and luminous. As in all great films, it is a spot-on rendering of its own unique story in the ambiance of its own time, but timeless in its portrayal of human character and emotion. Like a handful of others, it is as satisfying a movie experience now as it was 40 years ago...probably more so...whether on first viewing or 40th.', u'0.535905', u"\nIn Alfred Hitchcock's 1946 film, `Notorious', Cary Grant plays T.R. Devlin, an American agent who employs the assistance of Alicia Huberman, (Ingrid Bergman) a German expatriate whose father has just been convicted as a German spy.  Devlin brings Alicia to Brazil in hopes to arrange a meeting with Alex Sebastian (the fantastic Claude Rains); another German spy who just happens to have a history with Alicia insofar that he was in love with her.  The plan is to get them together so that she can spy on Sebastian and his colleagues so that the Americans can get a leg up on their mutual espionage.  Of course, love develops between Devlin and Alicia, which complicates their operation and of course, their lives.\n\n `Notorious', despite adhering to the chaste Hayes Code of the time has some of the steamiest scenes between two actors that I can recall during that era.  While the scenes never get beyond the standard close-ups of their kisses, the chemistry is a heavy physical presence.  The acting in `Notorious' is top-notch; Grant and Bergman were at their best during this era.  Claude Rains, who is a personal favorite of mine, is absolutely fabulous in this film.  He gives his character, who should be hateful, a humanistic quality that makes him an even more complicated figure.  Screenwriter Ben Hecht and Hitchcock team up for some pretty intense moments in `Notorious', and compliment each others styles and talents wonderfully.  There are not many nail-biting moments in `Notorious', but the script is excellent.  Coupled with the superior acting and direction, `Notorious' is certainly a Hitchcock film that should not be missed. \n\n\n--Shelly\n", u'0.569471', u'Where do some of these "reviewers" come from? Calling Notorious and Alfred Hitchcock boring and outdated is the height of arrogance. Where are the obvious fake sets, that the oh great one, "TedG" is referring to? The mansion? Alicia\'s Rio apartment? I guess I\'m just not in the same league as they are because I can watch a movie and be entertained by it. Personally, Notorious (in my uneducated opinion) is perhaps Hitchcock\'s most tightly knitted story-ever. There is no unnecessary scene, no irrelevant dialog, no padding or fluff. Outstanding acting abounds, intricate camera movements, (the reflection in Alicia\'s binoculars at the race track, the long camera shot starting at the top of the stairs slowly narrowing in and coming to rest on the key Alicia has secured in her hand, the fragmented images as Alicia realizes she is being poisoned)angles and shadows carry you along effortlessly.\n\nBergman, Grant, and Rains, along with a superb supporting cast bring to the screen the ultimate stylish spy vs. spy yarn. Suspense is slowly built up, and then released throughout; Devlin and Alicia snooping in the wine cellar as the sommelier realizes they need more wine for the party, Devlin finding Alicia confined to her room, and trying to rouse her so he can get her away from the evil in the house are but two examples of the suspense that build to the climax of the film. \n\nIn a day when we get the likes of Catwoman, American Pie II and Meet The Parents, I\'ll take the boring and outdated Notorious any day of the week. I\'m crazy that way.', u'0.0447712', u'\nAlicia Huberman (Ingrid Bergman) is the daughter of a German-American who has been imprisoned for turning traitor to the U.S. during World War II.  Despondent, she becomes an alcoholic and flits from man to man, until one day a mysterious government agent named Devlin (Cary Grant) comes to her and asks for her help.  Some old Nazi acquaintances of her father\'s has taken up residence in Rio de Janeiro; he needs her help to spy on them.  Somewhat reluctantly, Alicia agrees.\n\nOnce in Rio, it takes some time for the couple to be assigned their mission.  The trip takes on the character of a honeymoon, and Alicia and Devlin start falling in love.  Then their orders do arrive, and Alicia is assigned to infiltrate the house and the bedroom of the Nazi leader, Alexander Sebastian (Claude Rains).\n\nThis movie delivers a very different kind of suspense from Hitchcock\'s more famous NORTH BY NORTHWEST.  There are no strafing runs by malevolent crop-dusters, no cliff-hanging mountain-climbing scenes, no mad footraces.  The suspense here relies all on subtleties that get under your skin and chill you much more than the in-your-face antics of Hitchcock\'s later piece.  The popping of champagne corks signals time running out for two spies in the wine cellar; an impassioned lover seeks to kiss the hand of his lady who has a deadly secret concealed in her palm; a victim of poison sees the shadows of the poisoners merge together on the wall.  The final scene is the best of all.  Who but Hitchcock could imbue the innocent sentence, "I wish to talk to you," with such chilling power?\n\nThis is one of Ingrid Bergman\'s best performances; Alicia is hardly perfect, but brave and lovely.  Hitchcock was far ahead of his time in discarding male chauvinist attitudes that elevated a woman\'s chastity and "ladylike" attributes over her courage and intelligence.  When a superior disparages Alicia for the lack of "character" she has shown by following the orders he himself has given her, Devlin sarcastically lashes out: "She may be risking her life, but when it comes to being a *lady,* she doesn\'t hold a candle to your wife, sir, sitting in Washington playing bridge with three other ladies of great honor and virtue."  Yet Devlin himself is often unsympathetic and harsh in his treatment of Alicia, and the unfairness of that treatment is sharply highlighted in a manner very sympathetic to her.\n\nNot to be overlooked is Rains\' magnificent rendition of Alexander Sebastian, a villainous but human and rather weak man who genuinely loves Alicia.  I have never seen Rains better except for his immortal portrayal of Cap. Renault in CASABLANCA.  Also superb is Leopoldine Konstantin as Sebastian\'s domineering, scheming mother.\n\nNOTORIOUS is intense and meticulously crafted, and benefits from the best acting in any Hitchcock movie.  While NORTH BY NORTHWEST or THE 39 STEPS might be a better introduction to Hitchcock for people used to the slam-bang action of modern cinema, NOTORIOUS is the best I can recommend for those who have already learned to love Hitchcock\'s work.', u'0.493639', u"Notorious is absolutely one of Hitchcock's best films. The suspense sneaks up on you, and I found myself on the edge of my seat. Cary Grant is in love with Ingrid Bergman, (but who wouldn't be) caught in a triangle of love, deceit and lies. They both shine as the super stars they are in this meticulously filmed masterpiece. Hitchcock's hand is all over this film. And as is usual for the master, he never misses a beat, never puts in a sloppy scene, and sees it all in his mind's eye (and on paper) before committing it to film. This is why he is The Master of his craft. Bergman is at her lovely best, that sometimes smiling, sometimes pouty mouth, that cute nose, and those stupendously beautiful eyes. This film, which I've just seen for the first time (why, oh why, did I wait so long?) is up there, near the top, I have to see it again and again.", u'0.671678', u'\nBergman and Grant are the true romantics of cinema.  They move throughout the film as if they were acting naturally toward one another.  Hitchcock puts them both in closeups especially the illuminating Bergman, capturing the power of the medium.\n\nWhen Bergman says "Oh, you love me-you love me" in that wonderful close up I have to think to myself, how much I look forward to becoming a film maker. Why can\'t Hollywood capture moments like these in today\'s features?\n\nNote how long the kiss lasts as Bergman and Grant move from the balcony to the living room.  The lighting and camera positioning are phenomenal.  Do not expect the typical Hitchcock here but then again it is hard to say what a typical Hitchcock is.  Each of his films contain so many different elements yet, at the same time possess the true signature of an auteur.\n\n', u'0.577516', u"\nOne of Hitchcock's most thrilling examinations of psychosexual ambiguity, with the Grant-Bergman relationship veering from an initial meet-cute to genuine (beautifully conveyed) mutual delight to sadistic manipulation  - he makes a whore of her and forces the fact again and again into her face, seldom giving an inch until the very end, where his change of heart has a largely tacked on feeling. We first see him from behind, quietly, predatorily watching at one of her\tdrunken parties; they go for a drive and we see his hand poised to grab the wheel even as he pretends to submit himself to her drunken control over the car - it sets the tone, for Grant never relents on his desire to possess her, and reacts all too like a spurned lover to events, belittling her love even as she continually reasserts it; the callousness with which he distances himself from her after learning of her assignment is breathtaking. The main plot can hardly match the complexity of the central relationship, even though it's an excellently constructed yarn, with the fine set pieces of the party and the ultimate escape, which is essentially a battle between Rains and Grant for possession of the weakened Bergman - a finale which emphasizes how she's always been a prisoner, of her father's myth, of the male system, of her own emotions.", u"I'm a big fan of Hitchcock movies, and was expecting Notorious to be in the same genre as North by Northwest and Charade---and I was initially disappointed. However, I watched it again and fell in love with this movie!\n\nThe plot, if you take the time to think about it, is amazing. Also, it's pretty risqu\xe9--everything about it. Bergman is absolutely superb--as is Cary Grant. Ingrid Bergman should have won an Oscar for her performance. Every line is classic and I've ended up seeing the movie three or five times. However, if you're up for a thrilling movie at home w/friends or at a party, this wouldn't be the one. I wouldn't say this is the type of movie for a romantic date either...it's in its own category where you just have to watch it with true classic film fans.", u'0.577154', u"\nA nostalgic revisit for me. Unlike many of our other young posters in our community, I didn't grow up with a strong background in the classics. Notorious was the first Hollywood classic from the studio era that I went out and rented. I had seen several others, but they were either Disney movies, The Wizard of Oz, or forced upon me in my first film class (e.g., Stagecoach, which I despised for years!). Notorious wasn't even my first Hitchcock movie; that was The 39 Steps, which I also didn't care for. But Notorious was suggested to me by a good friend, so I went to the video store, went to the classics section for the first time, and picked it up. It isn't responsible for the path I took afterwards (I would probably give that credit to Citizen Kane), but I remember liking it. This was the summer after my Freshman year in college, in 1998. \n\nIt's amazing how much I've learned in the five years since I saw it first. I liked it quite a bit, but it certainly wasn't one of my favorites. This was the summer I discovered the American cinema after the studios collapsed, movies such as The Godfather and 2001, so Notorious seemed a little dated to my uneducated eyes. I remembered a couple of the more showy scenes, like the one where Ingrid Bergman realizes why she's sick. I especially remembered the entire final scene. But I was unprepared for the subtlety.\n\n\nOn this second viewing, I was shocked at just how intimate Hitchcock's direction is in Notorious \x96 it's easily one of his very best works as a director. He utilizes close-ups to an almost uncomfortable degree. At first, I thought that Grant's and Bergman's love affair felt kind of forced, but that scene where they make out for two minutes straight pretty much sold it for me! Notorious was first suggested to me as an example of screen eroticism, and I would have been far too unrefined to feel that power five years ago. \n\nI do still have a couple of problems with the film, but they're minor. Well, they're worth mentioning, anyway. I don't really like Cary Grant in the film. He's good, but he's not at the level of the rest of the film. I really think he's best suited for comedy; he has such a gift for comic timing. He has problems shifting between the passion he has for Bergman and the anger he has for what she's doing. I'd love to see what other actors could have done with that (Montgomery Clift comes to mind, for some reason, although he was still a couple of years away). I also feel that Devlin's anger with Alicia (talking strictly about the characters now, not the the actors) is maybe a little exaggerated. I realize that this is 1946, but I might imagine that spies and secret agents would not be so offended at this sort of thing. This is, of course, the main conflict of the film, so I guess I just have to accept it as the premise.\n\nAs for the other actors, they are uniformly brilliant. Ingrid Bergman gives one of her best performances. Claude Rains is brilliant as the villain. He's one of those Hitchcock antagonists whom I shouldn't care for, but, for some reason, I really feel sorry for him. He's so pathetic. The sequence where he discovers who his new wife is is quite heartbreaking, really (although I think that the musical score, which is generally excellent, goes overboard on the sting when he discovers the broken wine bottle). Perhaps another thing I hold against Grant and Devlin is that final, cruel moment when he locks the car door on Rains. I know he's a Nazi, but it's hard not to feel sorry for him at that point. I also love, just love, Leopoldine Konstantin's performance as Rains' mother. She is simply frightening. Reinhold Sch\xfcnzel is also rather intimidating as the scarred Dr. Anderson. I love the suspicious look he gives Rains as Grant leads Bergman down the stairs.\n", u'-0.0323497', u'I\'ve seen this about 4 times and I return to it occasionally hoping to see the merit people find in it. I never do. \n\nYou can see that this movie would have been useful in establishing Hitchcock, but that moment is quite over. He surpassed it (technically and artistically) quickly after with his own work. It\'s value is only in context. It\'s not good Hitchcock by my standard. It has one daring idea for the time; that a tramp may show greater nobility and heroism than the off-screen prim and proper 1950\'s housewife that is mentioned; and one interesting performance; a German mother more threatening than the harmless, effete villain.\n\nUnfortunately Hitch is more interested in the technical aspects of Notorious, and then only in places, making it a weird, lopsided production. It\'s chilly, and many scenes are crappy genre clich\xe9s. It\'s technically "on" but emotionally off. I never feel a thing watching this. It\'s an academic exercise.\n\nIf the apparent level of a movie is so disappointing, why would a viewer be interested in learning more about its symbolic or semiotic level? Which, by the way none of these reviews even touch.\n\nTECHNIQUE: All the major scenes are showy but hollow.\n\nThe classic camera shot zooming in from an overhead full-room shot to Alicia\'s hand holding a key embodies the problems here. It\'s pointless. The plot has set up the moment. We\'ve SEEN her steal the key, and we know she\'s handing it off to Devlin at the party. The shot is vapid because it adds nothing but conspicuous technique to the moment. The shot is pivotal but it changes nothing. After it we know exactly what we knew before; that\'s not mature Hitchcock. What does it mean when he makes such a laborious, self-conscious shot, but the rest of the movie is so hideously fake? The rear-screen projections are fatal here: whether it\'s a park bench, a courthouse, a caf\xe9, or all of Rio, the movie is about one yard deep. I can\'t believe people love a movie with such phony methods of getting imagery into a camera.\n\nWorst of all is the convention of the actors betraying necessarily clandestine reactions on their faces for the benefit of the audience; looks that would give them away over and over again. The acting here is all about making faces. Forget body language or something subtler.\n\nCary Grant plays a petulant, vindictive ass. It\'s a miracle we won the war with unprofessional jackasses like this working for us. After one drunk date he\'s a snotty lover? I have now seen all the Grant/Hitchcock movies (after seeing Suspicion yesterday) and I dislike each one for different reasons.\n\nHOLES: Over and over again Hitchcock chooses the dumb & cinematic over internal logic or common sense. It\'s as if he assumes the audience left their brains at home.\n\nWhy such tension developed over handing off the key to Devlin upstairs at the party, when Alicia arranges to be at the wine cellar door WITH HIM when he opens it? This is the films major setpiece and it makes absolutely no sense. \n\nWhy is neither Devlin or Alicia concerned with devising a way to get the key back on Sebastians ring? Because Hitch needs that tension-building wine cellar sequence more than he cares to fit it convincingly into a romance or a spy plot. Why can\'t Devlin piece her fate together, after say ten seconds of thought, where he realizes neither he nor she gave a damn about being detected after the fact? Because he\'s the worst agent ever scripted in a Hollywood movie. This isn\'t rocket science.\n\nDevlin and Alicia meet 4 or 5 times in public to hand information off. They meet at a racetrack, or on a park bench talking out the sides of their mouths, so as to avoid discovery. But what would anyone need to \'discover\' about their conversation if they were seen together? Just being seen together would betray them. Sebastian knows Devlin is an agent from the start and has figured out that the two are in love. What\'s the point of sitting an extra foot apart on a bench pretending to have idle chatter? Two people in their situation would never choose to meet in public.\n\nWhen I read fawning reviews of this movie, it makes me sorry Hitchcock used such constant motifs across his career; because shallow fans can watch engaging nothing but a checklist of elements: *the directors appearance, *a technical trick, *a stairway, *a camera gimmick, *a domineering mother, *a character falling to their death, *an icy blonde, etc. They can\'t wait to declare it a masterpiece and congratulate themselves. But they couldn\'t tell you why this is important or discuss it\'s ideas for ten seconds because they lack any criteria that would tell them when those elements construct a shallow movie. In Hitchcock\'s great movies that checklist is supported by convincing psychology, a bit of humor and satisfying depth that yields layers of meaning. Not so here.', u'-0.390208', u'Today is the third time I\'ve sat down to rewatch Notorious the past few years, and I was determined that this time I would get through it. I am a HUGE Hitchcock fan, and have seen all but three or four of his 40+ sound-era films, most multiple times, and have a particularly soft spot for some of the less celebrated films like Secret Agent, Sabotage, Saboteur and The Trouble With Harry.\n\n\'Notorious\', though, has always been a puzzle to me - it\'s one of his most highly esteemed films, up there with The 39 Steps, North By Northwest, Rear Window, Psycho, Vertigo and The Birds, yet it seems to have none of the inventiveness, wit, magic and charm that all these others overflow with, well at least to start with. Where are the great lines of dialogue in \'Notorious\'? Where is the great theme music? The unforgettable bit parts and fantastic plot twists? Where is the suspense? For the first hour Notorious has none of these, and apart from the celebrated crane shot (even that a pale imitation of the earlier, better one in Young And Innocent), there are few truly memorable set pieces, whereas all Hitch\'s best films have at least a half a dozen apiece.\n\nThe acting, too, is below par, with the leads both stiff and uncomfortable and struggling to find anything to do with their parts. Cary Grant in particular is playing entirely against type, playing a cold, distant and unsmiling government agent with zero charm or interest. In essence, what this means is we get a Cary Grant film without Cary Grant in it. Which is not good, obviously, and it makes me wonder why on earth Hitch chose him for this role when there were a hundred hard-boiled character actors that could have done the job much better - and a lot cheaper - and perhaps found some corners of the character to draw out and illuminate. As it is, for the first hour Grant brings nothing of any value to the role, and one can only assume it was his box-office draw potential that influenced this strange miscasting. Oddly enough the only other film I\'ve seen where Grant is so badly used is yet another Hitchcock misfire: \'Suspicion\'.\n\nBergman is solid enough, and continually improves as the film goes on, but it is Claude Rains who really gives the best performance in Notorious. He hasn\'t much to do either, but at least he invests what he does get to do with some genuine feeling. He\'s not really much of a bad guy (another flaw of the film), just a man having his heart played with and broken by a woman he loves. The nicest twist of the film is that his mother is far more diabolical than he is.\n\nIn essence, the problem of Notorious is this: the first hour drags abysmally, and is just as limp and lifeless a film as Hitchcock ever allowed his name to go out on. If it wasn\'t for the names involved, it\'s doubtful anyone would find any of what goes on there to be worth any attention whatsoever. But after that it picks up astoundingly, with the bit about the key and the wine cellar finally ushering in some much-needed suspense, and it becomes a recognizably Hitchcockian film at last. The acting all round improves and deepens, the tension mounts and Grant\'s sex appeal returns. But by then the damage is done, considerably more than half the film is over and you only get to see the good bits if you\'ve stayed awake that long. Maybe the people who rate it so highly only remember the last half hour.\n\nIn the end, for the most part this is just another of those odd-fitting films Hitchcock made for Selznick when he first came to Hollywood. It has all the big names and all the money in the world to make and promote it, but little sparkle or imagination. Well, until the end, anyway: it crosses the finish line in style. But is that enough to save it? Does that make it a great film? I\'m not so sure it is. Bt then, as Voltaire so perceptively once said: "Fools admire everything in an artist of reputation".', u'-0.0311705', u'Dark, cruel, beautifully photographed, and deeply erotic, Notorious in one of Hitchcock\'s very best. It\'s remarkably sexual and sophisticated story from a time in Hollywood where the power of the Breen Office was at its apex. Alicia Huberman (Ingrid Bergman) is the daughter of a convicted Nazi. American agent Devlin (Cary Grant) contacts her and convinces her to spy against some of her father\'s Nazi colleagues in Brazil. The chief of these of Alex Sebastian (Claude Rains), one of the most genial Nazis depicted on the silver screen, who has a crush on Alicia. Of course, Alicia has fallen madly in love with Devlin, and he with her, though he could never admit it, and instead pushes her to seduce Sebastian to obtain his secrets. He wants her for the mission when she accept, he brands her a whore. Only a whore would sleep with a man for his secrets, right? Hitchcock gathers some of Hollywood\'s best and casts them against type. Ingrid Bergman, who hitherto had played a fair number of virginal ing\xe9nues, plays Alicia Huberman, a powerfully sensual woman but also a drunken nymphomaniac. You get the sense that she can merely stroke Devlin\'s cold, frozen face and bring him magically to life. The great comic-acrobat-sophisticate Cary Grant is cast as the emotionally stunted and almost sadistic T.R. Devlin, a mysterious secret agent who recruits Alicia to work for the government. Cary Grant utilizes his inherent reticence to create a character who is isolated and closed off, who can lash out and act disinterested so easily toward the woman he loves. Claude Rains, with his rich English voice and amiable face plays Nazi Alex Sebastian, a rather nice fellow who happens be plotting against the United States. He is genuinely in love with Alicia and when he learns of her betrayal, his despair and terror is palpable and moving. Madame Constantin, imported especially by Hitchcock from Germany for this film is the brilliant and icy cold Madame Sebastian, Alex\'s powerful mother. In one particular scene she smokes a cigarette with a malice unequaled by any actress in Hollywood history. It\'s like she has it clasped in her talons. Louis Calhern is Devlin\'s boss, breezy, narrow minded, and casually misogynistic.\n\nNotorious is a very stylish production. Ingrid Bergman, who usually wore little makeup in her films, has a very natural sensuality and wears lovely 40s hats and suits very elegantly. Cary Grant is hitting his stride as the fashion icon he later became in the 50s. The suits are slimmer than they were in earlier roles and help emphasize Grant\'s lean and powerful, but graceful, physicality. Hitchcock\'s camera is characteristically authoritative, shaping the audience\'s impressions. It is very open to Bergman and very closed to Grant. Bergman is often shot in close ups and medium shots, and in flattering soft focus, and in accessible to the audience. Her heartrending luminosity, used so brilliantly in Casablanca is used again here by Hitchcock. Grant, on the other hand, is several times shot with his back to the camera, looking away from from the camera or with his face obscured by shadows. You suspect, but you never really KNOW what Devlin is feeling for the majority of the film. Grant is inscrutable and here is really demonstrating his economy --and brilliance-- as a performer. Sometimes he does seem a bit too stiff, especially since we know that he\'s capable of doing Dr. David Huxley and Editor-in-chief Walter Burns, but most actors wouldn\'t have dared to give such an understated performance as Grant does here.\n\nThe world of Notorious is very insular. Most of the film, with the exception of the love scenes, is indoors. Any other scenes that find the characters outdoors find the characters closed off. Barricaded between objects or people. All this gives the film a claustrophobic feel, like Devlin and Alicia have no place to hide and no place to breathe. People said that Hitchcock disliked actors. I don\'t think that\'s true, but Hitchcock seems to have extraordinary control over the technical aspects of filming. In order scenes to work actors must explicitly follow direction; they are the tools of film-making. All this attention to detail is absolutely necessary considering the complex composition of many of his scenes. The reputed "Longest kiss in film history" where Devlin and Alicia embrace and talk and kiss for several is a very intricate piece of blocking as the characters move from one room to another, Devlin speaks on the phone, reach, turn etc... If Hitchcock worked like someone like Howard Hawks, for instance, this sort of scene wouldn\'t be possible.\n\nSince this is a Hitchcock film, people may be mislead into thinking that it\'s a thriller. It\'s not. It\'s really a perverse romance. The characters are more intricately drawn than they are in thrillers. Indeed, plot and character development seem to be equally important. The story does not move quickly but you don\'t really notice, you\'re too busy being immersed in Hitchcock\'s world. Thrilling, sexy, and moving, Notorious is highly recommended', u'0.230831'], u'tt0264464': [u"\nWhile watching 'Catch Me If You Can' I had so much fun I smiled constantly. Well, that smile was interrupted by laughs. The movie tells the story of Frank W. Abignale, Jr. who is just a kid as he pretends to be a schoolteacher. After his father and mother get a divorce he runs away and starts pretending to be a co-pilot, a doctor, a lawyer. The way he does this is funny and brilliant.\n\nI am not a big fan of Leonardo DiCaprio who plays Frank but in this movie he is perfect. He gives a very fine performance. Tom Hanks is the FBI-agent Carl who is after him, and as always Hanks is good.\n\nThe story is inspired by a real story. I don't know in how many ways it is true but watching this guy all I wanted to see was him pulling more of his nice little tricks. The scene where he pretends to be a schoolteacher is just great. If you want a nice funny movie, not too heavy, this one will definitely please you.", u'0.491221', u'\nAt first I thought I was going to see a lightweight film from a great director but instead I watched another impressive achievement by Steven Spielberg. A few things stand out and of course the performances are terrific. Leonardo Dicaprio is believable as a guy that can convince people that he\'s someone else. Dicaprio is a charmer and is very smooth as we watch his character do some fancy talk to the young ladies. Tom Hanks as the FBI agent reminds me of his cynical character that he played in "A League of Their Own" and his mere presence adds more to this film. The sign of a great film star. And Christopher Walken gives one of his best performances in his already interesting career. The last scene of him as he talks to his son in the restaurant is so moving that it reflects on the great talent of Walken. You can understand why Dicaprio admires and loves his father. Walken conveys these emotions and makes the audience react just accurately. I\'ll be rooting for him at Oscar time. Another impressive thing about this film is the beautiful cinematography by Janusz Kaminski who\'s a real artist with a camera and has worked on several Spielberg films. One shot in particular stands out. The ray of sunshine coming in through the kitchen window on Walken. Very thought provoking. And of course since its a Spielberg film its very personal. Spielberg was interested in the Frank Abagnale character because as a youngster he also came from a broken family and wanted to be someone else. Spielberg would sneak onto the studios and tell people that he worked there. Also, the real Frank Abagnale jr. appears as a French police officer. Well made, extremely well acted and sharply written. Viewers seem to forget that this is really a film about the breaking up of a family and the aftermath. This really is a personal film from Spielberg, and a very good one. ', u'0.650874', u"This was an entertaining and fun piece of film making from the ever-reliable Steven Spielberg. It is a bit of a depart from his usual full-blown and hugely epic pictures, yet this does not detract at all from the fascinating story of Frank Abagnale Jr. I was interested in this man before I'd seen the movie, and it only served to increase my interest. Although it is important to remember (as with any such film) that this is only 'inspired' by a true story and not told word for word from one, the plot is fascinating and keeps you laughing, crying and wondering until the end.\n\nFrank Abagnale Jr. is an astounding and interesting character. The real life Abagnale originally said that he did not believe Dicaprio to be 'suave' enough to play the role, but he certainly does pull it off. Dicaprio's acting is superb, and totally believable as a man who could lie to, deceive, and con everyone he met without once losing any of his charisma or charm. Hanks is also excellent, he plays the role of the obsessed FBI agent well, and also with a likable quality. The interaction between these two characters was great, it was interesting to see a budding relationship slowly build between two characters who were actually positioned against one another.\n\nI loved the look of the film. It was a refreshing blast to see the 60s portrayed in such a vivid and colorful way. The whole setting and atmosphere of the film gave it a wonderful and almost (I hesitate to use the word) 'magical' sense. This tone appealed to me much more than a darker tone might have.\n\nHowever, the film is rife with moral ambiguity. As much fun as it is to watch Dicaprio jumping from one place (and identity) to the next, forging checks and spending inordinate amounts of money at a whim, the film never really focuses on the morally bankrupt side of the story. The portion of the film devoted to this at the end still seems to skim over the fact that this man has stolen millions of dollars. It ends on a high note for Frank Abagnale Jr., never fully spelling out the wrongs he committed. Still, this would probably bring the whole film down, and sometimes it's fun just to enjoy a bit of escapism without being told off for desiring such things. I mean, it's hard to be totally strict and upright - you have to love it when Dicaprio's character swindles Jennifer Garner's prostitute for $400! \n\nOverall, this is a fun film and really enjoyable. Not as much of an epic masterpiece as some of Spielberg's other movies, but still a great film!", u'0.396475', u"\nFrom the opening credits design we get in the mood of this very entertaining film. They create the tone for what will follow. Steven Spielberg is in rare form directing this movie that doesn't have a dull moment.\n\nMr. Spielberg has found a perfect actor to fill the shoes of the con man with the perfect casting of Leonardo DiCaprio. It's very easy to see why all the women fall prey of this charmer. He was a fast talker and a slick operator. He exudes charisma to fill another couple of movies.\n\n\nIt's a welcome sight to have Mr. DiCaprio working in a vehicle that shows his talent as Frank Abagnale, a man of many faces. He plays a game of hide-and-seek throughout the movie with Hanratty, the FBI agent that is in his trail. Tom Hanks shows great assurance and gusto with this character. Of course, the DiCaprio magnetism dominates the action with the many ironic twists and the miraculous and narrow escapes he pulls with an aplomb that's bewildering to the Feds, who are on his tail all the time.\n\nThe minor roles are equally important. Christopher Walken as the father starts out as the prototype of the con man, but he's too decent to do wrong; his business fails eventually. His marriage to Natalie Baye, the fine French actress, ends in divorce because obviously she hates being married to a loser.\n\nThe action doesn't stop for one moment. This film is great fun to watch with the winning combination Mr. Spielberg assured hand gives us this time out. Mr. Spielberg can thank the genial Mr. DiCaprio who responds obviously to his direction and makes this con man endearing even when he is committing crimes.", u'0.326037', u'On Leonardo DiCaprio\'s 31st birthday, I have the pleasure of praising one of the finest actors working today. I didn\'t realize what I was seeing when that homeless boy showed up on \'Growing Pains\'--a show not exactly known for the quality of its actors. And I didn\'t see much to like about "Titanic" except the excitement of watching the people evacuating and the ship sinking. Also, \'Romeo and Juliet\' was just corny, with 400-year-old dialogue in a modern setting.\n\nBut if he could be nominated for his \'Aviator\' performance, DiCaprio must be doing something right. And here he shows us what he is capable of. Especially when Frank Jr. is conning people, and most of all when he tries to outwit Hanatty. I am reminded of Harrison Ford and Tommy Lee Jones in "The Fugitive", or perhaps Burt Reynolds and Jackie Gleason in "Smokey and the Bandit". The strange but enjoyable chemistry between these two characters goes a long way toward making this movie work.\n\nFrank Jr. showed a lot of intelligence, and DiCaprio effectively showed us what this man could do. Imagine what he could have accomplished if he had stayed on the right side of the law. But his life on the run was more fun to watch.\n\nTom Hanks, as popular as he is, can be commended for his willingness to play second banana for a change. And he did a fine job. Martin Sheen and Christopher Walken also made an impact here.\n\nI loved the old cars and the even older songs. The clip from \'To Tell the Truth\' was a nice touch. The theme song still gives me a craving for vanilla ice cream after nearly 30 years (I didn\'t feel I had time to watch the new version).\n\nThis was Oscar-caliber. Too bad the Academy Awards people didn\'t seem to agree.', u'0.277412', u"\nWhen his parents file for divorce and he has to chose between them for custody, Frank Abagnale Jnr runs away from home.  He begins to con his way around - getting better and better at it with each ruse.  Posing as a pilot, a lawyer and a doctor he earns his money from cashing forged cheques.  As the numbers go up, FBI agent Carl Hanratty starts tracking him in a game of cat and mouse.\n\nBased on a true story, although it doesn't rely on `and it really happened' to be a good film - although that this guy could even do half of this stuff is impressive, this film is a slick bit of entertainment even if it left me feeling a little bit like it was too much presentation.  The plot starts at the end and jumps back to see the whys and the hows of the tale.  It is told with a slick energy that keeps the story moving and never really lingers on any scene longer than it has to.  It is for this reason that the two hours goes by relatively quickly.\n\nThe presentation is good.  Williams' score is not as memorable as his usual work but it is what the film needs it to be - unobtrusive and slick.  Just like the opening credits, this film is very much a chase movie with a nice sense of period.  The only downside of this slickness is that it feels like eating a sweet - it is very nice while it lasts but it doesn't fill you up. I enjoyed the film but it did leave me wondering what else there was; even if I did still have a sugary taste in my mouth.  But to be fair - this is a\nminor compliant as the film didn't set out to be some massive thought provoking film; it was a chase movie and it was a very stylish and enjoyable one at that.\n\nThe cast is good even if they aren't all used well.  If anyone can tell me why Jennifer Garner even bothered to show up I'll be happy to listen. DiCaprio is very good. I'm not a massive fan of his but he was engaging here and looked about the right age to play the part - sort of between man and boy.  Hanks does good work in support. Because his character is quite drab it is easy to forget him but I really enjoyed him and thought he brought more to the film than DiCaprio.  Walken is good in support and Sheen adds another famous name to the end credits but it is very much a two hander with Hanks and DiCaprio more than able.\n\nOverall this film is a slick, stylish chase movie which should be enjoyed as such and is slightly more enjoyable for being a true story.  If anything it is a little too slick for it's own good, but that is a petty complaint to make against a film that kept me pleasingly entertained for the past two hours!", u'0.333782', u'What a terrific piece of film-making! From the charming animated title sequence (featuring John Williams\'s delightfully sneaky score) to the end, this is an enormously entertaining film from the gifted craftsman, Steven Spielberg, who is so damn good people take him for granted or resent his "manipulation," i.e. his seemingly effortless ability to create effective drama.\n\nLeonardo DiCaprio (in his best performance that I\'ve seen) stars as Frank Abagnale, Jr., a real-life teen-aged con man so spectacularly gifted that he was able to steal millions from various companies with forged checks, while successfully impersonating an airline pilot, a doctor and a lawyer, among other guises. He is chased by a rigidly rule-bound F.B.I. agent, Carl Hanratty (Tom Hanks), who is at first comically out-classed by the young improvising criminal genius; but the agent is steadfast and relentless and has the law on his side. The movie is filled with delightful supporting performances, starting with Hanks and continuing on with Nathalie Baye as the boy\'s selfish mother, Amy Adams as his immature fianc\xe9e and on down to the tiniest role. I\'m especially grateful for the sympathetic part given to Christopher Walken, as the mischievous and spirited Abagnale Sr., whose life darkens as his fortunes fall. Walken is one of my favorite actors, but while I enjoy the occasional one-dimensional freak or villain he plays, I wish most of his parts were like this.\n\nSpielberg\'s movie is rich with fascinating details and memorable incidents, while the script by Jeff Nathanson moves backward and forward in time to tell the story in the most engrossing way possible. This is top-notch entertainment.', u'0.64014', u"\nCATCH ME IF YOU CAN (2002) **** Leonardo DiCaprio, Tom Hanks, Christopher Walken, Martin Sheen, Nathalie Baye, Amy Adams, James Brolin, Frank John Hughes, Brian Howe, John Finn, Jennifer Garner.  DiCaprio gives a grandly charming performance as Frank Abagnale, Jr. a teenager who adopted the professional guises of airplane pilot, physician and lawyer to front his check kiting schematic modus operandi during the 1960s and eventually making the FBI's most wanted list by bilking millions until his capture and imprisonment.  Based on Abagnale's best-selling memoir and adapted with lean storytelling by Jeff Nathanson, the film never lets up in the giddy cat-and-mouse/Road Runner/Wile E. Coyote relationship between fugitive DiCaprio and amalgamated FBI square Hanks (replete with thick as clam chowder Boston accent, dorky specs and porkpie hat) one step behind his two-steps ahead prey and a unique dynamic of a father/son esthetic.  Walken gives an Oscar worthy supporting turn as the elder Abagnale whose financial woes and tanglement with the IRS acts as his son's catalyst.  Once again filmmaker Steven Spielberg makes popular entertainment into a work of art.\n", u'0.711798', u"I Don't know how accurate these events are but as they are based on accounts written by Frank Abagale Jr. himself, then i assume that they are probably only dramatised for the viewing audience.\n\nIt's hard to believe that people were so naive, that they allowed Frank Abagnale to achieve what he did, but i have give the guy credit for pushing the system, and riding the high life for as long as he did.\n\nLeonardo DiCaprio does a great job of capturing the character of Frank Abignale Jr. (strange i didn't picture him in the role of a jet setting Gigalo) and the rest of the cast although only little more than fringe characters, are all very well cast and give typically fine performances, as you would expect with the calibre of Hanks and Walken.\n\nAll in all this is a fine film, that most people will enjoy watching 8/10", u'0.471486', u'\n"Catch Me If You Can" is based on the true story of Frank Abagnale, the most successful conman in history. By the age of 19, Frank had already posed as a pilot for Pan Am, paraded around as a medical doctor, and fooled everyone by taking an on-the-side-job as a lawyer. (By the way, he faked a Harvard-graduate diploma to become one.) During this time he cashed fraudulent checks at various banks around the country, and eventually around various places in the world. His is an amazing story, and this film is based on it.\n\nThere\'s no real plot to go into, as I have already given it to you. Other than telling you that the film opens when Frank is sixteen and runs away from home after his parents (Christopher Walken and Nathalie Baye) have a messy divorce, you pretty much have the setup for a light, fluffy, and altogether fun film.\n\nFrank is played by Leonardo DiCaprio, and the man hot on his trail, agent Carl Hanratty, is played by Tom Hanks. There isn\'t really a Carl Hanratty in real life, but it adds to the story. Frank, on the run, actually starts to become friends with Hanratty, who realizes Frank is just an adolescent and does not realize the eventual outcomes of what he is doing. Hanratty sort of adopts Frank, even after he is caught and thrown in a French prison. He helps him get transferred to an American prison, and then even gets him a job in the FBI for spotting fraudulent checks.\n\nI read Frank William Abagnale, Jr.\'s true-crime memoir, which was released a few decades ago. It differs from the film at times, and it isn\'t always as light-hearted as the film is. But in terms of pure, fluffy fun at the movies, "Catch Me If You Can" is a sure-fire hit. At times it seems to stray a bit too far off the path of realism, unlike the book, but that\'s part of the fun, really.\n\nThe film is entirely watchable, and doesn\'t try to become an epic. Steven Spielberg creates a real dazzler here; it is effortlessly watchable and even at two and a half hours long, it doesn\'t become overbearing. I thoroughly enjoyed it, and, unlike most critics, I thought Tom Hanks did a great job in his role. \n\nI especially like how Spielberg captured the image of the \'60s so well here, and John Williams\' score fits the part of the film very well. And as for the cast, they are all matched perfectly to their characters. I especially liked Christopher Walken as Frank Abagnale, Sr., who steals every scene he is in. His performance was worthy of its Oscar nom. \n\nIf you just want to sit back and relax, "Catch Me If You Can" is the perfect film for you. There\'s nothing all that special in the film, but the film kind of becomes special because it is so easy to watch. I recommend "Catch Me If You Can" to anyone who can enjoy a movie for what it is.\n\n\n"Catch Me If You Can" is a true popcorn flick, and maybe a little bit more.\n\n4.5/5 stars -\n\nJohn Ulmer', u'0.396052', u'\nAn all-around good movie worth seeing.  The plot is pretty basic: Quick-thinking kid from a broken family that he loved.  He spent the next few years playing a pilot, doctor, and lawyer.  Think "Pretender" (the television series) but based on real events.  The surprise was the unique relationship of the FBI agent and the con-man in their cat-and-mouse chase they have over the years around the globe.  An engaging film that you are curious to see how it ends. That goes even for my girlfriend who stayed awake for the entire movie because she was captivated by it [Note: she has slept thru "Gladiator", "Shakespeare in Love", "Elizabeth", and the "Fellowship of the Ring" because they (apparently) didn\'t peak her interest].  So if your date is the discriminating-type, he/she should be able to sit through this movie and enjoy it.', u'0.359831', u'!!!! MILD SPOILERS !!! \n\nMuch hyped as a true story on its release CATCH ME IF YOU CAN tells the tale of con artist extrodanaire Frank Abagnale Jr and FBI agent Carl Hanratty\'s attempt to catch him but the cold facts are this is not a true story - It\'s a Hollywood story inspired by real events and therefore the audience are required to do nothing more than pay their money at the box office , sit back and be entertained . Certainly they won\'t be expected to ask questions such as why is con man Abagnale being portrayed as some sort of misunderstood little boy lost \n\nRight from the outset we\'re shown Abagnale\'s ability to con people as being a force of good . Check out the scene in the school where he takes the class bully down a peg or two " Ah " thinks the audience " Frank\'s a good guy , he\'s a man of morality " but I\'m afraid he\'s not because he\'s a con artist and the story telling technique doesn\'t allow much thinking to be done by the audience . What about the scenes where he passes himself off as an airline pilot . Can anyone explain to me how he did this for many months and was never ever suspected of being a fraud ? Didn\'t anyone ever ask him seriously technical questions about flying a jet that caused alarm bells to be rung ? These questions are never answered \n\nAbagnale also passed himself as a doctor where he falls in love with a young nurse lacking confidence called Brenda and this sub section of the story caused a few alarm bells to be rung in my head , so after I saw the movie I conducted some internet investigation only to find that while Abagnale was posing as a doctor a baby almost died under his care due to his own lack of medical knowledge . I ask you if the screenplay included this scene how would you feel about Abagnale then ? Exactly . All through the running time we\'re shown Frank Abagnale as some kind of cheeky chappie , a little bit naughty but hey he\'s a young good looking kid with no real harm in him . As John Ford said - " Always print the legend " \n\nI can certainly understand why people enjoyed CATCH ME IF YOU CAN and won\'t criticise them for it and I can also understand why Spielberg and company decided to make an entertaining movie that doesn\'t dare get involved in any type of morality . It is unfortunate however that the director and everyone else involved are involved in fundamental dishonesty themselves', u'-0.228739', u'Steven Spielberg has what you might call D.W. Griffith disease. If he can\'t make a monumental film, he makes an insignificant one. I thought that, anyway, until a second viewing of "Catch Me If You Can" convinced me I was wrong. Like many great artists, Spielberg doesn\'t have to swing for the fences to make an indelible impression every time out.\n\nIndelible impressions are the sort of thing Frank Abagnale Jr. is good at, especially on the kind of phony checks that fool bank security. After his parents\' divorce, Frank (Leonardo DiCaprio) sets off in the Big Apple, making his way as an airline pilot, a doctor, and an assistant district attorney, all by means of fraudulent credentials and irresistible charm, not to mention the ability to stay one step ahead of the law, as represented by FBI Special Agent Carl Hanratty (Tom Hanks).\n\nA film that owes a debt to Alfred Hitchcock by way of Henry Mancini, "Catch Me If You Can" zips along on its own kind of sneaky charm, making us root for a character who would probably steal our life savings if given half a chance. At the same time, Spielberg avoids the pitfall of relativism by making sure Hanks as Hanratty keeps some amount of our rooting interest, however much we feel for this crazy kid with his naive belief that, like the mouse stuck in a bucket of cream, he can churn his bucket into butter and crawl out. It\'s a trick every bit worthy of the subject of this engaging tale.\n\nFrom the opening moments of this film, featuring the best-ever Spielberg titles sequence (courtesy of Kuntzel-Deggas) and a very unusual but entrancing John Williams score that uses shushing sounds and finger snaps in place of his normal bombast, we realize we are in unusual territory for a Spielberg film. Right away, the theme of mistaken identity is introduced courtesy of a "To Tell The Truth" clip with host Joe Garagiola giving us three Frank Abagnales to choose from. We think we know which one he is, but we don\'t know as much as we think.\n\n"You know why the Yankees always win?" asks Frank\'s father, Frank Sr. (Christopher Walken). "It\'s because the other team can\'t stop staring at those damn pinstripes." Walken, like Spielberg, works against audience expectations. Sure, he\'s a criminal, much what we expect from Walken, but he\'s got a good heart and a beguiling innocence. He believes in the American dream, even if he cons innocent ladies with phony jewelry to get what he wants. Ultimately he\'s a victim, and a lesson to his son about why the straight and narrow isn\'t the way to go.\n\nDeCaprio gives a solid, impressive performance, the best I\'ve seen from him, playing a consummate conman who succeeds because he believes his cons as much as his victims. He finds the drama in his character, but also the comedy, in a film that shows Spielberg can be funny even when he involves us in a dramatic story. As we watch him fake his way aboard a cockpit, in an operating room, and even in a bedroom with an expensive callgirl played by Jennifer Garner, we shake our heads at what he gets away with but smile because he\'s succeeding.\n\nThe film also benefits from an immersive sense of the period in which it is set. Williams\' score, along with the costumes and set design, present us with a view of the 1960s in its more sophisticated adult form, with Dusty Springfield and Frank Sinatra providing the music rather than the pop and rock acts we think of when we think of the time.\n\nDoes "Catch Me If You Can" go on longer than it should? Yes, I think tougher editing would have made it better. But I don\'t miss the mawkish attempts at uplift that pock Spielberg\'s lesser work, and the few poignant moments Spielberg throws in amid Abagnale\'s ruses ring true, especially a moment involving Frank and a little girl at a window near the end of the film that only Spielberg would try to get away with, because he can and does.\n\nNo, this is not a great film, just a very good one that might have slipped past a few people on its first release, as it did me. But give "Catch Me If You Can" a chance, and you may find this as a con you not only enjoy being taken by, but wish to experience again just to see how the masters, Abagnale and Spielberg, make their plays.', u'0.37361', u"\nSpoilers herein.\n\nYesterday, I saw the first watchable Scorsese film in decades, and the same today with Spielberg. Something weird is in the wind.\n\nAnd yes, I know this isn't a `real' Spielberg movie and that he only stepped in after paging through a half dozen directors, and only to protect his investment as a producer, and only because he has no real project underway. Still, I'm surprised. The compact Spielberg usually demands of the viewer is that in return for allowing him to turn us into children, he will expertly push children's buttons. He has been consistent in this even as he plowed through `serious' matters of war and holocaust. All are steeped in juvenile sentimentality. His recent `AI' and `Minority' were solid attempts to escape himself. After all, he knows he will not be remembered well and wants to be before he dies.\n\nSo even though this is something he stepped into late, I count it as a solid victory for the pressures from his peers to make a real movie, with an intelligent stance. He does. Its not a great movie, but it has smarts. And it is relatively original.\n\nThe first thing is how he adopts the notion of making the film itself a character. Lynch did this first (to my knowledge) with `Velvet.' Most recently, Haynes did so with `Far from Heaven,' where the dynamics of the story occur not in reality but in the artificial reality of films of the era. So the limits of `society' were the action of the film as a force within the drama. So too here -- to denote this we have the colors of the stock of the era, we have the very air of the film world invading as smoke. And we have the director asking the actors to discard modern irony and act as if they were Michael Caine in the early seventies. `Pleasantville' was another in this line -- the production designer is from that project.\n\nThe film is set up as a reverse con. We know in the first couple minutes what he did and how the con ends. The traditional con story is a film within a film, which gives the opportunity to make the inner film the character as already noted. It is a clever idea that only could be conceived by someone intimate with shaping film. It makes the outer film more genuine by making the inner one more counterfeit.\n\nThen we have the actors. The con artist is the most sought after role in all filmdom because the actor plays a character who is acting, something that allows them to exploit their own experience (often the only real experience these stunted lives have). Decaprio doesn't quite rise to the challenge. We've had one wondrous performance in `Gilbert Grape,' and another intelligent turn in Luhrmann's `Romeo.' Nothing of note since except occasional competence. He is competent here. Hanks gives us his regular routine: he's sinking fast, turning into another Morgan Freeman.\n\nThe real acting here is by Walken, who exceeds Spielberg's shaping of the project so much that we suspect no one really noticed it made the others look bad. Amy Adams has a passion that Leo lost long ago.\n\nIncidentally, we have another filmworld jab at the French here. They really do have thuggish police who brutalize Americans when possible. Film `police' too. And the Mom in real life was a real tart who played a dumb soldier for US citizenship then sold herself to a higher bidder. But why introduce all this without developing it? The man in charge here has a special ax to grind, I think.\n\nTed's Evaluation -- 3 of 4: Worth watching. ", u'0.0148183', u'Well, first I\'d like to comment how easy it is to lure spectator into this movie, due to the great names involved in this project. Steven Spielberg, Leonardo DiCaprio and Christopher Walken are what made me wanna see it. To be honest, the film as a whole is good. Frank Jr. is a guy who is willing to do anything in his power to make easy money, even if it means stealing and cheating all around. There are plenty of moments in which the spectator gets to think "he won\'t get away with it", but, surprisingly, the well written plot always allows him escaping from the FBI. However, sometimes the way DiCaprio\'s character gets away feels over-the-top, considering that people wouldn\'t be THAT dumb in real life. I mean, how would Frank Jr. work as a physician in a hospital without EVER being asked about diseases or something related to it? Wouldn\'t Brenda\'s family make questions involving medicine? So, in my opinion, "Catch Me If You Can" is a well directed movie that entertains the spectator for the whole time, but sometimes admits to be just a movie and not a real thing.', u'-0.000631656'], u'tt0044706': [u'John Wayne was totally wrong to call this movie un-American. Courage and cowardice are universal emotions, and the attitudes of the characters in High Noon are, I think, incredibly truthful and telling. I know that if I lived in the Wild West, had a job and family, and was asked to stand up and fight against a gang of gun-toting psychos I would probably not be able to do it. That\'s why Gary Cooper\'s Will Kane is such a remarkable character in terms of self-respect, morality and inner strength. It\'s the way he MUST uphold the law even though it will perhaps cost him his wife and his life. It is the various townfolk with whom most of us will identify, even if it makes us feel shame or unworthiness to admit it. No matter how bravely we act, nor how much we want to think heroically of ourselves, 90% of us would cower in the shadows when the time came to do what Will Kane does in this movie.\n\nOn his wedding day, dependable lawman Will Kane (Gary Cooper) has just handed in his badge and is preparing to leave town with his bride Amy (Grace Kelly) when he receives devastating news. An old adversary, Frank Miller (Ian MacDonald), has been pardoned for crimes that he should have hanged for and is on his way to Kane\'s town of Hadleyville to get revenge. He is due on the noon train, leaving Kane one hour to either run for his life or make preparations to fight. Kane and Amy set off at full gallop, hoping to put some miles between themselves and danger, but Kane doesn\'t get far before he feels compelled to turn back. With the new sheriff not due for a day, he just can\'t let go of the extraordinary sense of duty and responsibility he feels towards his town. However when he gets back to town he gets quite a shock - for no-one has the guts (nor, in some instances, the inclination) to fight alongside him against the Miller gang. As time ticks unstoppably towards noon, Kane gradually realises that if he\'s going to stop Miller and his boys, he\'s going to have to do it alone!\n\nCooper\'s performance is extremely powerful and he received a thoroughly deserved Oscar for it. Kelly is good as his bride, although many viewers will find her character hard to like. Lloyd Bridges has a brilliant early role as Kane\'s deputy, while the very best of the supporting pack is Katy Jurado as a Latino woman whose "history" with most of the men in town puts her in an unenviable position when the shooting starts. Fred Zinnemann directs the film outstandingly, making each scene fit into the grander scheme of things with literate precision. Any aspiring young film-maker wanting to learn how to pace a film correctly should watch High Noon with a close eye, for it is unparallelled as the most perfectly paced film of all-time. The music by Dmitri Tomkin - plus that incredible ballad "Do Not Forsake Me Oh My Darling" by Tex Ritter - is just one more element that makes High Noon one of the great masterpieces. There\'s nothing else to say - if you haven\'t already, go out and see this film NOW!', u'0.0397933', u"\nGary Cooper's greatest role, at 50, as the newly-married sheriff, Will Kane, left to fend for himself against his returning enemies, abandoned by the town he remains loyal to, and played out in real time through its 90 minute running time.\n\nAbly supported by Grace Kelly as his pacifist Quaker wife, who discovers love and right triumphs over long-held preconceptions; Katy Jurado as Kane's former mistress, a fiery Latino type; and Lloyd Bridges as the feisty deputy; Cooper runs away with the acting honours.  The theme tune by Tex Ritter is also worthy of note.\n\n\x91High Noon' works because of its tightly written script, its cracking pace and crackling tension.  I've seen the film many times and always see something different to notice and admire; still, I'd love to see it again for the first time and not know the twists and turns, not know how it ends.  A fabulous film \x96 one of the best.\n\n", u'0.556179', u'\nThis is the definitive Western. There are other excellent Westerns of course ("The Unforgiven," "Pat Garrett and Billy the Kid," "The Searchers," "My Darling Clementine," and "The Man Who Shot Liberty Valance" come immediately to mind), but none tops this one. Even though the difference in age between Gary Cooper and Grace Kelley makes the thought of their marriage seem a little kinky, it\'s easy to buy into the story. Katy Jurado is sexy, Lloyd Bridges is callow, and the townspeople mean well, but when push comes to shove, they reveal their cowardice. (If you remember the scene in "Blazing Saddles" in which Van Johnson says, "Howard Johnson is right," you\'ll almost certainly laugh at an inappropriate moment in "High Noon." ) "High Noon" is a textbook example of the storyteller\'s art. The drama begins with the opening credits and doesn\'t let up until everyone\'s true character has been laid bare. This one is suspenseful and thrilling, and I find more to admire with every viewing.  ', u'0.326598', u'\nHigh Noon is for me one of the two finest Westerns ever made (the other is Shane). It is an elemental commentary on the best and worst of America, the best and worst of mankind. It is Greek tragedy and Shakespeare brought to the Old West in a grandly simple form. Gary Cooper is superb and the supporting cast is outstanding as well (although I wish Grace Kelley would have spoken without the artificial sounding school-girl accent, something which marred so many of her otherwise fine performances). I do not read into the film a commentary on events of the 1950s, specifically the ongoing investigations by Congress of left-wing activities. High Noon transcends such specifics as this. I know John Wayne called the film un-American but I must disagree. I have great respect for the Duke but think he got this one wrong. Weak, timid people are everywhere and the strong are often few and far between. Goodness and right often prevail because a small minority insure that they do. All benefit from the courage of the lonely hero whether they realize it or not. Hign Noon is a testimony to this truth.\n', u'0.189289', u'I am puzzled; how can anyone rate this as less than a 10? Can anyone find a single flaw in this movie? Any way it could have been better? This is the gold standard by which Westerns should be measured, not to mention any drama. It simply doesn\'t get any better than this.\n\nAs film, High Noon does an exceptional job of giving depth to characters quickly. The situation defines their character. Katy Jurado\' role is one of the exceptions, where there is more talking, but we see unfold an exceptionally interesting person. \n\nHow many movies can you watch repeatedly over the years as you grow up and grow old that continue to move you and continue to reveal new depth and meaning? That is the measure of art.\n\nThis movie is timeless, and has a lesson for humanity of all eras and all nationalities. It will be watched a hundred years from now, a thousand years from now, if civilization survives that long. The message of this film is that this is not at all certain. It is up to us.\n\nI suspect the reason some people down-rate High Noon is not for the quality of the film, but the message. Like John Wayne, they just don\'t like what it says about America. \n\nWell I\'ve got bad news for you, John, the Frank Millers have killed the sheriff and now run this country. The gang has gotten elected president and vice president. And the townspeople and ministers acquiesced like sheep or even actively supported it as "good for business."', u'-0.0176614', u'I just watched this movie again. I have no idea how many times I have seen this movie over the span of my 52 years (yes I was born the same year the movie was released). Each time I have seen it, of late, I continue to develop a greater appreciation for it. I normally liked to be lightly entertained by a movie. This movie provides a glimps at so many varied characters, showing such a variety of emotions and complex personal issues. This is no-nonsense, un-contrived, straight forward story telling, at its best. I truly enjoy the restrained use of dialogue. It is amazing how much story is told with so few words, in a limited running time. WOW, I love it.', u'0.56167', u'For me, Will Kane embodies the American ideal of a hero: a man who stands up for what is right, even when nobody else does, even when the temptation is strong to stick the head in the sand.\n\nWill Kane explains his outlook at the outset: there is no point in running away if that means spending the rest of your life watching your back. His best chance is to face his enemies on his home ground. At this point, he still thinks that honest folk will stand by him. The rest of the movie is a study in character: will he stand his ground when his entire world crumbles around him?\n\nIt is puzzling that Howard Hawks, John Wayne, and others thought of High Noon as un-American. I am not sure if this is because of the allegory of the McCarthy era; or the people of an American town collectively sticking their heads in the sand; or the Marshal throwing his badge to the ground in the last scene.\n\nClearly, the movie does not criticize McCarthyism itself. (It has nothing to say about communism, either.) It appears to criticize the people who did not stand up to McCarthy and the HUAAC, but it can equally well be seen as a comment on the appeasers who did not stand up to fascism or communism.\n\nIn any case, not too much must be made of the anti-appeasement angle, because the townsfolk is not the primary focus of the movie: the focus is on Will Kane. When the townsfolk behave like cowards, that gives Will Kane a chance to prove that he is a hero. If the town had stood by the Marshal, we would have seen, at best, an excellent Western like Rio Bravo, but not a masterpiece like High Noon. For Will Kane to be a hero, it is necessary that he stands alone.\n\nNo statement can convey the dramatic impact of Will Kane throwing his badge away, but it is worth discussing what this gesture means. For me, it means that the town and the badge were not worth fighting for. Will Kane fought for principle: he fought because he does not run away.', u'-0.0130485', u'On Marshal Gary Cooper\'s wedding day to Grace Kelly, Lee Van Cleef, Sheb Woolley, and Robert J. Wilkie wait at the train station for the noon arriving train. It will be carrying their former gang leader, Ian McDonald who Cooper sent to prison and who\'s vowing vengeance. \n\nFrom the gitgo it\'s made abundantly clear that these are four nasty dudes who the town ought to deal with expeditiously. But the good elements of the town have grown fat and lazy and content to throw the responsibility of law and order on Cooper\'s shoulders. And he\'s quitting anyway, going on his honeymoon with his Quaker bride. A new marshal is going to arrive the next day. Why get involved. They want Cooper to just take his problem elsewhere. That view is probably best expressed by Thomas Mitchell in the scene at the church.\n\nSpeaking of the scene in the church my favorite business in High Noon is when preacher Morgan Farley tells Cooper how dare he come into the church because a few hours earlier he didn\'t see fit to get married in that church. What a set of priorities.\n\nGrace Kelly had her breakthrough role in High Noon. She\'s a Quaker with deeply held pacifist principles. She\'s marrying a lawman, but one who\'s quitting that life. Her best scene in the film is with Katy Jurado who is Cooper\'s former gal pal. Katy explains the facts of life to Grace about marriage and the duty of standing by your man, long before Tammy Wynette ever sung about it. When the time comes, Grace does the right thing.\n\nLike his rival in western films, John Wayne, Gary Cooper had one of the great faces for movie closeups. Back in the day it used to be a running joke about how Cooper\'s dialog used to be just "yep" and "nope." It was a good deal more than that. But High Noon\'s plot is carried quite a bit by the many closeup shots of Cooper. His face tells more than ten pages of speech and it keeps the tension of the film going. Man did not win two Academy Awards for nothing. \n\nOf course the theme of High Noon is also expressed in Dimitri Tiomkin and Ned Washington\'s Academy Award winning song, sung at times during the film by Tex Ritter. However the big hit record of the film was from Frankie Laine. I doubt there has ever been a movie theme song that expressed everything you needed to know about the motivation of the central character in the film. I don\'t think High Noon would have attained the classic status it has without that song.\n\nAnother great performance in the film is Lon Chaney, Jr. as the former town marshal, old and cynical, who\'d like to help Cooper out, but at his age and health realizes he\'d be more of a hindrance. He\'s the only one that Cooper understands and forgives.\n\nThe final gun battle is choreographed like a ballet, it\'s that good. Maybe the best ever filmed. Can\'t describe it, you got to see it.\n\nThe interaction of the town\'s responsibilities for maintaining law and order and Cooper\'s personal pride and integrity have been dealt with in various ways in other films. I\'d check out Rio Bravo, Warlock, Death of a Gunfighter, Welcome to Hard Times, all of these take a different slant on the same themes.\n\nBut personally I\'ve always liked what the townspeople did in a Frank Sinatra film, Johnny Concho. That\'s what the people of Hadleyville should have done right at the start.', u'0.342338', u"\nHigh Noon is one of the most loved films of all times thanks to the elements that came together to make it the classic that it is. The movie owes a lot to Fred Zinnemann for his tight account of this story by Carl Foreman. The film benefits from Dimitri Tiomkin's great score and the great cinematography by Floyd Crosby.\n\nThis is a film that packs a lot of symbolism because of the times when it was done. Those were the days of the communist hysteria where many people in the industry were accused, tried and lost jobs because when they faced the HUAC and Senator Joseph McCarthy. \n\nGary Cooper plays a man who is decent enough to return to the town where he just has gotten married and has finished his tour of duty. His conscience doesn't let him leave his post as he delays his  plans and goes back to defend the town from the bandit who's been freed by Northern judges, and is coming back to seek revenge from Marshal Kane and the town.\n\n\nGary Cooper embodied the all Amercian hero. He was an actor who could do no wrong, as he proves in his take of Marshal Kane. We see him as the clock is ticking away toward noon time when the train will arrive in Hadleyville. We see him perspire as he goes around trying to get people help him deal with the problem, to no avail; he will have to do it himself. In the process, he clearly disappoints his new bride, who is horrified at the prospect of losing the man she clearly loves.\n\nGrace Kelly was such an elegant figure that it's hard to imagine she would be in Hadleyville at all! Katy Jurado was also excellent as the jaded Helen Ramirez, the woman who owned a lot of businesses in town. Also effective, Thomas Mitchell, as the mayor of the town and Lloyd Bridges, as Harvey.\n\nThis is a film to treasure.", u'0.33801', u"\nHIGH NOON is a movie that can be taken down from the DVD or Tape shelf and played again and again. Gary Cooper fans will find this to be one of the best, if not THE best, Cooper performance. The plot, the performances, the brutal series of events leading up to the final show down gun fights all contribute to a feeling one has that it truly is noon day with a relentless sun beating down. This is a Western which almost makes one smell the dust of the town streets. The sheer masculinity of Marshall Kane is beautifully balanced with superb feminine grace and strength found in Grace Kelly and Katy Jurado. Ian MacDonald's Frank Miller comes across as a villain par excellence. This is a perfect presentation for black and white. Color would have diminished the sense of impending death that builds relentlessly with each coward's refusal to help Marshal Kane. The film emphasizes that triumph often comes with a price. In the end, Kane removes his lawman's badge and throws it down into the dust, and he rides off with his Quaker bride who must forever live with the fact that she took a human life in violation of her religious convictions. Courage and valor do not come easily.\n", u'0.422249', u'\n     The sombre ballad, the beleaguered marshall, the cold wife who deserts her man within an hour of marrying him ... "High Noon" is part of everyone\'s consciousness.  \n\n     Will Kane is the veteran lawman of Hadleyville, a small Kansas town that used to be the playground of bad men, notorious among them one Frank Miller.  "This is just a dirty little village in the middle of nowhere," but Kane cleaned it up.  Five years ago he had Frank Miller committed to a distant federal court on a murder charge.  Today, as Kane weds his quaker bride, news arrives that Miller is free and heading for Hadleyville.  His henchmen gather at the depot, and it becomes clear that Frank will arrive on the midday train, looking to settle scores with the marshall who arrested him.  Should Kane leave town with his bride, thus avoiding trouble for himself and for Hadleyville?  Or should he stay and face the Miller gang?  Will the citizens rally round their marshall?\n\n     John Wayne famously criticised the film for being \'unAmerican\', in that (in his view) a frontier community would not desert its lawman so abjectly.  Implicit in Wayne\'s malediction is the notion that mainstream movies should promote wholesome patriotic values - a notion that led in Wayne\'s case to the debacle of "The Green Berets".  Zinneman\'s acclaimed film probes the ugly side of human nature, "sifting out the hearts of men".\n\n     Zinneman and Director of Photography Floyd Crosby devoted a lot of care to the look of the film, effort that paid off handsomely.  From our first view of Lee Van Cleef as an ominous shadow on the horizon to the climactic cuts which seem to accelerate the arrival of the fateful train, this is a movie which speaks through images.  The arid, flat expanses of Kansas mirror the impassive sky, and the town\'s rickety structures seem puny against the bleak magnificence of nature.  Human wishes are vain in the face of Fate.  Rail tracks extend with cruel exactitude into the distance, converging in perspective upon the vanishing point, the symbolic spot whence Frank Miller will materialise.  Lurking in the depot\'s shade, the dark presence which is the Miller Gang bristles with malice.\n\n     Zinneman is not afraid of extreme close-ups, which he uses to reinforce moments of emotional power (Kane realising that he has no support, Helen refusing to beg).  He shoots Kane predominantly from below waist height, stressing his tall, erect stance as a symbol of moral authority.  Compositions are tight and attractive throughout.\n\n     Gary Cooper was fifty-one years old and quite ill when "High Noon" was shot.  He is, in truth, too old for the part.  Gregory Peck had turned it down, and it is fascinating to imagine Peck as Kane.  There is no rapport whatsoever between Cooper and Grace Kelly, and they make unconvincing newly-weds.  "I won\'t be there when it\'s over," says the blushing bride, and though the script tries valiantly to give Amy a motivation (she became a quaker after seeing her menfolk gunned down), the abiding impression is of Kelly\'s prissy coldness.\n\n     "High Noon" is, for an action western, surprisingly strong on character.  The judge (Otto Kruger) is clear-headed about running away from the Millers, and argues his position powerfully, yet his authority is punctured by his actions as he speaks - lowering the Old Glory, and concealing the scales of justice.  Lloyd Bridges is excellent as Harvey, the deputy whose moral vision is clouded by lust for Helen and immature resentment of Kane.  Katy Jurado never looked lovelier than here, playing the fallen woman Helen Ramirez who loved and lost Kane - and loves him still.  A young Harry Morgan is Sam Fuller, the self-important coward who cannot face Kane.  Marshall Howe (Lon Chaney Jr.) is the retired lawman who is now embittered and counsels Kane against throwing his life away for the sake of these undeserving citizens - "They just don\'t care!"  In a cameo of pivotal importance that must have been great fun to play, Howland Chamberlain is the bitchy hotel desk clerk who hits Amy with a few home truths.  James Millican is Herb, the dependable deputy who vacillates when the chips are down, and Jack Elam makes a fleeting appearance as the town drunk who sleeps through the entire drama.\n\n     One interesting plot development is the strange alliance which forms between Kane\'s two women.  They meet in Helen\'s hotel room and decide to leave town together.  Significantly, as they ride past Kane in the buggy, it is Helen who looks back, not Amy.\n\n     It has been suggested that "High Noon" obeys Aristotle\'s three unities, especially that of time, the depicted events being capable of fitting into the film\'s ninety-minute span.  Clocks are everywhere in Hadleyville, and the passing of the minutes is constantly emphasised.  My only observation is, it remains ten minutes to twelve for an unconscionably long time.\n\n     "The day cometh that shall burn like an oven," we are informed, and I for one found the film\'s climax rather disappointing after the intense build-up.  "It\'s our problem because this is our town," declares a local worthy, but neither he nor anyone does anything about it.  Zinneman\'s great crane shot, about halfway through the film, speaks more eloquently than the hollow words, zooming back to show a silent, friendless street, and one upright man, utterly alone.     ', u'-0.11951', u'For many, Gary Cooper was the Westerner par excellence\x97cool, taciturn, courageous and just; skilled with a gun but slow to use it; gentlemanly, generous and shy, appealing to men as much as to women... This image reached its culmination in "High Noon" with his characterization of Marshal Will Kane, the brave and stubborn ex-marshal standing alone against the forces of evil, and the prototype for countless Western heroes ever since...\n\nHighly-stylized, carefully and beautifully shot, "High Noon" possibly owes its great popularity to a combination of three things\x97It\'s a suspense film in the real sense; the dearly beloved set-piece climax of the gun duel never got better or more thoughtful treatment; it has a theme tune that persistently whines its way into the subconscious... Most people first remember the Dimitri Tiomkin theme tune, then Gary Cooper stalking down the lonely street\x85 The bits and pieces gather from there\x85 The film also ties a small town of do-nothings showing their cowardice by turning their backs on trouble, integrity, and an elected representative...\n\n"High Noon" is also distinguished by many fine images from the incidental (the brief close-up of the wagon wheel revolving against the town\'s facades as Cooper and Kelly leave the community); to the poignant ( Zinneman\'s camera drawing back from Cooper\'s face to show him standing vulnerable and alone in the dust of a deserted main street); to the deliberately melodramatic (Cooper bitterly grinding his marshal\'s badge in the dirt before riding away for good ).\n\nBy means of rapid cross-cutting, Fred Zinnemann gives shots\x97repeatedly\x97of the pendulum of the clock, of the empty railroad tracks, and in rapid succession, shots of tense faces\x97taken at close range\x97of the townsfolk in the church, in the local saloon, then of the worried face of the marshal, his wife, and of the three criminals ready for the approaching train...\n\n"High Noon" is the simple and forceful tale of an aging lawman on his day of retirement and also on his wedding day...\n\nWill Kane, on a blazing June morning in 1875, has just married a pretty young Quaker girl... The bride feels doubly blessed... She\'s got her man, and this is the day he will hang his guns... She has firm Quaker convictions and never did imagine herself as a lawman\'s wife...\n\nBut, while it\'s all being celebrated a badly shaken stationmaster (Ted Stanhope) bursts in with quite the wrong kind of wedding telegram... It states that an outlaw Frank Miller (Ian MacDonald) whom Kane had put behind bars six years ago for terrorizing the town has been released... The stationmaster adds that three members of his old gang are already awaiting his arrival at the depot\x97their object a reunion with the pardoned man who will get off the train at noon, and presumably settle the score with Kane...\n\nThe marshal, like a sensible man, does, in fact, put his wife in the buggy, but then like a man of honor but also a sensible man (for the gang will surely hunt them down wherever they go) changes his mind and heads the horses back to town\x85\n\nA bride, especially a Quaker bride, can\'t quite see it this way on her wedding day so she hands him her own ultimatum\x97if he won\'t go away with her she\'ll go alone by train\x97the one that leaves at twelve...\n\nEverything on this torrid, dusty morning therefore hinges on midday\x97therefore Kramer\'s insistence on his clocks. From this point onwards High Noon, although it remains completely classic in Western terms, faithful to period and concerned with an indicative historical situation, takes on wide and profound implications\x85 \n\nIt\'s about group cowardice and short-term interest\x97particularly the treachery of so-called \'good\' people\x85 \'Law abiding,\' you feel, doesn\'t mean what it should mean\x85 When a group of people decide that they must passively refuse to support the law for reasons of personal preservation, who, in fact, are the outlaws?\n\nThus the marshal\'s predicament\x85 He is an embarrassment to everyone, from Judge (Otto Kruger)\x97he\'s leaving town\x97to the humblest citizen of Hadleyville\x85 Only one is ready to give assistance and he melts away when he finds there\'ll be no other volunteers\x85 The marshal\'s immature deputy (Lloyd Bridges) is willing to take over his job\x97again, provided Cooper leaves town\x85 But this is absolute ambition at work\x85\n\nThe build-up of tension as the lawman prepares to meet the four thugs and makes fruitless attempts to recruit help from the cowardly citizens has never been handled better, and it is sustained right up to and through the climactic gunfight as the lawman\'s bride finds herself trapped in the crossfire...\n\nFilmed in Black and White, "High Noon" is among the ten Best Westerns ever made... The film achieved the shape of a democratic allegory which reached people in much the same way and for the same reasons that "The Best Years of Our Lives" had done... Its cutting suspense was the hallmark of Zinneman\'s mastery of the movie medium... \n\nGary Cooper\'s performance, as the very vulnerable, worried man, won him the year\'s Oscar...', u'0.0652117', u'\nLife was going well for Will Kane, Hadleyville\'s town marshal.  He\'d cleaned up the city and made it safe.  He\'d sent the badmen packing or to prison.  He\'d just hung up his star and married beautiful young Amy Fowler, surrounded by his loving and loyal friends, and he looked forward to a peaceful life with her as a storekeeper.  And Then It Happened.\n\nA telegram reaches him to let him know that Frank Miller, an outlaw killer whom Kane thought was to be hanged, has been pardoned and will arrive at the Hadleyville train station at high noon.  Three of his old time bandit companions are waiting for Miller there, and they will surely come to kill Kane when Miller arrives.\n\nAt first, Kane prepares to run.  But he realizes that the killers will come after him and Amy; they have to be faced, and it might as well be here and now with a posse at his back.  So Kane pins his badge back on and goes to his friends and neighbors for help in facing the badmen, but most of them turn their backs on Kane.\n\nThis movie gives a brilliant examination of the cowardice of Kane\'s fellow townspeople.  The person who remains most mysterious is Kane himself.  Courage, as I understand it, is the ability to ignore one\'s fear in order to do what must be done.  Kane is afraid, and he is able to ignore his fear, but why does he think that he must fight?  Does he feel a duty to protect Hadleyville, even though it has spurned him?  Is he convinced that, no matter where he runs, he will still have to fight the four killers alone?  Does he believe that running from any situation, no matter how impossible, is unmanly and dishonorable?  Would he have fought ten men?  A hundred?  A million?  Kane himself doesn\'t seem to be entirely sure.  He clearly has very strong morals, but lacks the ability to explain them.  Even when a man asks him to cheat the new sheriff out of a job, Kane refuses, but can\'t explain why, merely saying, "If you don\'t know, there\'s no use in me telling you."  When someone asks him why he says "I\'ve got to" fight the killers now, he frankly admits that he doesn\'t know.\n\nLloyd Bridges is excellent as Harvey Pell, Kane\'s former deputy and the first man Kane approaches for help.  When Pell cravenly abandons Kane to his fate, Bridges is wonderful at showing his guilt.  One of the best parts of the movie is where Pell tries to allay his guilt by trying to get Kane to run away; if Kane won\'t fight, Pell thinks his own cowardice will feel more excusable.\n\nGrace Kelly, in her first major role, is quite good as a woman whose Quaker religion compels her to pacifism, and cannot understand her husband\'s need to meet violence with violence.  Even better is Katy Jurado as the beautiful, tempestuous Helen Ramirez, who understands Kane far better than Amy does.  Harry Morgan portrays Sam Fuller, a deputy so gutless that he not only won\'t face Frank Miller, but won\'t even face Kane to tell him so.  And Thomas Mitchell is great as the town leader who subordinates Kane\'s life to the economic future of the town.\n\nAs an allegory for the Hollywood blacklist, HIGH NOON is pretty weak.  Kane is not falsely accused of subverting the town\'s welfare; the whole emotional power of the plot is based on the fact that the townsmen refuse to help him even though everybody recognizes that he has done nothing but good for Hadleyville.  The killers, on the other hand, are openly lawless and evil, not poseurs pretending to protect the townsmen by their persecution of others.  Still, whatever its flaws as an allegory, HIGH NOON is one heck of a great western and a great story.\n\nFred Zinneman did a very good job on directing the movie, with one exception.  Throwing out the usual Western orchestra for Dimitri Tiomkin\'s lonely guitar music was a good idea, but it is used far too much.  It doesn\'t take long to get tired of Tex Ritter\'s sing-song drawl.  But the use of clocks for suspense, particularly in the climactic montage, is a masterstroke.\n\nHIGH NOON ranks as one of the top ten westerns I have ever seen.  It is worthwhile renting for just about anyone, regardless of whether they are fans of the genre.\n\nRating: *** out of ****', u'-0.130754', u'\nThree criminals wander into a Western town to wait for the 12:00 noon train to arrive. Their leader, Frank Miller, will arrive on it and together they will get revenge for Miller\'s jail time (he was supposed to be hanged). The man who put him in jail is Will Kane (Gary Cooper). He has just been married (to Grace Kelly) and is about to leave town, but he figures he can\'t while those criminals are there to start trouble. He goes back to raise a posse to take the outlaws before they can do anything. No can do, though. Everyone else is out for him/herself, and they all either refuse or ignore Kane when he asks them to be deputees.\n\nHigh Noon telegraphs its every move ten minutes in advance. There\'s nothing special about it, and its themes are rather trite. It would be passable if any of the performers were good. It\'s actually kind of depressing, considering how good some of them are elsewhere. I loved Gary Cooper in Meet John Doe, but he seems really uncomfortable in High Noon. We never really learn anything much about Kane, and Cooper only helps us know less. Grace Kelly is particularly bad. To tell the truth, she was never a great actress. One year later, in John Ford\'s Mogambo, she gave an equally neurotic and unbelievable performance. Only in Hitchcock\'s films, in particular Rear Window, did she shed that nervous quality. Lloyd Bridges - well, maybe it\'s just me, but I can never find him effective in a drama. He was so much better when he got older and started to do comedy like Airplane. Perhaps the only one on par with the rest of his career is Thomas "Doc Washburn" Mitchell.\n\nThe villains are particularly pathetic in High Noon. I know, the "real villains" are those who refuse to fight, but the film would have been infinitely stronger if Frank Miller and the other three thugs had some personality. When a movie talks about a villain for 3/4 of its run, and then he appears without any bells or whistles, it\'s sure to disappoint. When the obligatory gunfight arrives, it\'s nothing if not boring. I longed for the dramatic effectiveness of the shootout in My Darling Clementine.\n\n\nHigh Noon is a film made with some skill. The cinematography is good. For some reason, it always got really good when they would cut over to the three outlaws waiting for Frank Miller. Those three actors always seemed to be standing in some clever composition. The only thing about High Noon that I would rate as exceptional would be the music. It\'s quite good, if a bit overused (especially during the gunfight sequence; again, I think back to the beautiful and harrowing silence of My Darling Clementine). Overall, I don\'t hate High Noon, but just feel it is weak and definitely overrated. 6/10.', u'-0.24462', u'\nMuch of this movie is as good as it can been.  The acting, the casting, the directing are execellent.  The music is so good as to be beyond belief.  But the movie fails in one important area, and that is plot.\n\nThis community is set in frontier Arizona sometime in the 1880s. All of the adult men in this communitiy would be veterans of the Civil War.  Men who fought at Antitam and Gettysburg would not run from four punks who would destroy their town.  It is also interesting to wonder what caused the fire at the stable to go out.  The villians start a fire at the stable and and once they are dead it ceases to be a problem.  Were there any logic to this movie the entire town would be engulfed in flame at the end of the movie.\n\nThe tragedy of this movie is that with a good plot it could have been the best western ever made.', u'0.0269358'], u'tt0118694': [u'\nI think that New York Times film critic Elvis Mitchell wrote the best one line review of In the Mood for Love when he said that it is "dizzy with a romantic spirit that\'s been missing from the cinema forever." How true those words are! Truly romantic films are so rare these days, while films that include plenty of sex and nudity (which are often portrayed in a smutty and gratuitous manner) abound. So, given this cinematic climate, Wong Kar-wai\'s latest film feels like a much needed breath of fresh air. In the Mood for Love is about the doomed romance between two neighbors ("Mr. Chow," played by Tony Leung and "Mrs. Chan," played by Maggie Cheung), whose spouses are having an illicit affair, as they try "not to be like them." But after hanging out with each other on lonely nights (while their spouses are away "on business"/"taking care of a sick mother"), they fall madly in love, and must resist the temptation of going too far.\n\nSeveral factors are responsible for making In the Mood for Love a new classic among "romantic melodramas," in the best sense of that term. First, the specific period of the film (i.e. 1960\'s Hong Kong) is faithfully recreated to an astonishing degree of detail. The clothes (including Maggie Cheung\'s lovely dresses), the music (e.g. Nat King Cole), and the overall atmosphere of this film evokes a nostalgia for that specific period. Second, Christopher Doyle\'s award-winning, breathtakingly beautiful cinematography creates an environment which not only envelopes its two main characters, but seems to ooze with romantic longing in every one of its sumptuous, meticulously composed frame. Make no mistake about it: In the Mood for Love was the most gorgeous film of 2001. (It should also be mentioned that Wong Kar-wai\'s usual hyper-kinetic visual style is (understandably) toned down for this film, although his pallet remain just as colorful.) Third, there is the haunting score by Michael Galasso, which is accompanied by slow motion sequences of, e.g. Chan walking in her elegant dresses, Chan and Chow "glancing" at each other as they pass one another on the stairs, and other beautiful scenes which etch themselves into one\'s memory. The main score--which makes its instruments sound as though they\'re literally crying--is heard eight times throughout various points in the film and it serves to highlight the sadness and the longing which the two main characters feel. Fourth, Tony Leung and Maggie Cheung both deliver wonderful performances (Leung won the prize for best actor at Cannes) and they manage to generate real chemistry on screen.\n\nThe above elements coalesce and work so nicely together to create a film that feels timeless, "dizzyingly romantic," and, in a word, magical. In the Mood for Love, perhaps more than any other film of 2001, reminded me why it is that I love "going to the movies." And I guess that is about the highest compliment that I can pay to a film.\n\n', u'0.515819', u"\nIt's easy to see why many people consider In the Mood for Love to be Wong Kar-Wai's best film. The toned down appeal of the film, centering on the studied view of a relationship put through an emotional ringer, is a retread into Happy Together territory but without the hyper-kinetic patchwork of jarring film stocks and hyper-saturated sequences that have become a trademark of Kar-Wai's films since Chungking Express. Like Soderbergh's The Limey, this is a different kind of curio for Kar-Wai; where dialogue and plot are forsaken by mood and composition in order to create a tale of two delicate lives in a seemingly confining emotional stasis.\n\nIt's a testament to the genius of Kar-Wai that he is capable to making such a simple tale so resonating. Chow Mo-Wan (Tony Leung) and Su Li-zhen (Maggie Cheung) move in next-door to each other within the same apartment building. He's a journalist who dreams of publishing martial-arts novels and she is a\nsecretary at a shipping company. Their eventual coupling is obvious from the beginning but the pleasure here is the way that Kar-Wai ambiguously paints such a journey with his grand masterstrokes.\n\nThe key to the success of the film is Kar-Wai's use of the interior space, playing with foreground and background planes in ways that are similar to the works of Polanski. During the wooingly sensuous first half of the film, Kar-Wai isolates Leung and Cheung within shots in such a way that the second person in a conversation is never visible. Kar-Wai is concerned with environment and space here, creating a cramped emotional dynamic between his characters. It's also telling that Kar-Wai never chooses to focus on the physicality of Mo-Wan and Li-zhen's spouses. Their faceless partners are noticeably absent from the film, as they are tending to their own love affairs with each other.\n\nThis is not to suggest that In the Mood for Love is a confining experience because Kar-Wai manages to inundate his film with broad splashes of hypnotic camera movement and sound. There is one shot where Cheung's slow, sensual rise up a metaphorical stairway turns into Leung's descent down the very same stairwell; their movements perfectly compliment each other, bookending the shot and creating a sense of erotic duality between the two figures. Their souls have connected but they have yet to physically unite. The erotic displacement of these scenes is both fascinating and frustrating, as two star-crossed lovers reject physical consummation due to their humble fidelity.\n\nOther scenes in the film are punctuated with brief slow-motion shots of Cheung erotically moving through her interior surroundings, set to Mike Galasso's hauntingly beautiful score. Cheung's dresses beautifully compliment her exterior space as she moves slowly through her surroundings. Her movements slowly build up to what seems to be an inevitable fusion between Li-szhen and her dream lover even though the seduction process seems to be entirely sub-conscious.\n\nIf I make it seem that these two characters are more like two birds unleashing pheromones on each other, it probably isn't that far-fetched of a\nstatement. The tight bond these two characters have with their internal spaces is almost as intense as their relationship to the exteriors. The film rarely moves into an exterior space and when the camera does it is usually to peak through oval windows and symbolic bars that always remind us that these characters are like confined animals. Kar-Wai continues to tease us even when the lovers get close enough to touch, shattering the couple's proximity to each other by shooting them through mirrors or through gaps within articles of clothing located inside of a closet. Mother Nature even seems to respond to their love lust, often unleashing a soft crest of rain over the characters after their bodies have glided near each other.\n\nKar-Wai's hauntingly atmospheric shots of a waterfall allowed Leung's Lai Yu-Fai to experience a cathartic release in Happy Together, even if Leslie Cheung's Ho Po-wing was not there to enjoy it with him. By that film's end, love was so inextricably bound to the act of war that a third man's muted declarations of love signaled Yu-Fai's realization that his dreams of seeing a waterfall would bring him inner peace, even if it would not bring him back his lover. Mo-Wan's journey terminates within the confines of a crumbling temple. His own emotional depletion is paralleled nicely with the political climate of his country, and the absence of Li-szhen is only made tolerable by the fact that Kar-Wai allows Mo-Wan to experience a release of sorts. Mo-Wan caters to an ancient myth and his secretive release into a crack in the temple leaves him capable of living his days with the hope that all his loss and heartache somehow served a higher purpose.\n", u'0.288174', u'In 60s Hong Kong, a man and woman move in the same day into adjacent apartments with their respective spouses. Soon they suspect their ever absent spouses of having an affair with one-another. A strange bond emerges between the man and woman as they cope with their sadness by taking turns playing each other\'s spouse, before a more complex bond emerges...\n\nNo summary can do it justice, for Hong Kong auteur Wong Kar-Wai\'s "In the Mood for Love" is nothing short of a miracle. A story about sadness that manages to be touching and at times funny. A romance that never feels forced or fake. No doubt the director\'s method has a lot to do with that.\n\nDirected from an inexistent screenplay (though the concept largely flows from a Japanese short story) to favor improvisation, the film is immediately set apart by the freshness of it\'s performances. All the film revolves around that and the rest is pure enhancement. At the core of the film are two characters that will ease into your heart and stay there long after the end credits roll: Maggie Cheung and Tony Leung are simply amazing and no language barrier undermines a single fragment of immediacy and truth they display. The additional material is also top-notch: the films is magnificent to behold (in part lensed by "Hero"\'s Christopher Doyle) and the music is heartbreaking.\n\nThis is something everybody must see, if only because it is by far the most heartfelt, mature and authentic "love story" out there. Unmissable.', u'0.630966', u'\nI was recommended this film as one of the best love stories ever told. And as I am huge fan of love, I bought the tickets and sat myself in the theatre. After 90 minutes I left the theatre with nothing but disappointment and the theme song as the only positive thing of the film. I was appalled at the story itself, that two people can love each other but be so afraid as to never act it. I just couldn\'t go passed the language barrier and the cultural barrier. The second time I ran into it... I was in a different mood, no longer had any expectation ... and had more patience, more relaxed mind to "see" the film... and as soon as I opened my eyes, I discovered the love... the beauty of the film. I went beyond the language and the love story and saw the acting (not even for a moment did I ever felt like they were acting!) and the cinematography. The first time I heard a definition of what a film is, I was told that it should be a chain of perfectly balanced photographs (shots) and this is the film to match the description. Almost every shot has an idea behind it, and combined with the music... and the light effects... the result is just a masterpiece! And a masterpiece is just something that you must have in your collection of films.\n', u'0.240181', u'I won\'t bore you with story and plot lines, as they have been presented many times already on this page, so\x85 It\'s been along time coming since I have seen such a film. Beautiful, elegant and restrained, with a narrative pace to match. A film with sensitivity and understated qualities that is rare in these times of clich\xe9d plots. The beautifully subdued photography, saturated in rich luxurious colors, and for lack of better words, each frame is filled with an air of tension. The settings and locations are used repeatedly but the film manages to breath new life into them each time they featured, there always seems to be a key prop, light fixture, or set piece to slightly clue the audience as to where we are in the characters world.\n\nThe acting reminds me of the "The Bicycle Thief", not the style, but the fact that you forget that you are watching two actors engaged in their craft. There is meaning behind every gesture and almost every movement has assigned significance to explain the inside world of the characters, the relationship, the feelings, and situation of the two lovers. The dialogue is sparse but like the rest of the movie, is imbued with meaning. Speaking of meaning, the soundtrack is infectious. Used here it becomes a story telling device. And although the film is of Chinese origins, even a song sung in Spanish by Nat King Cole imparts the film with subtle meaning. The orchestrated soundtrack is repetitive, but the repetition is what makes it comfortable. It is used in conjunction with the story, and not just a means to put music to action, or to cue the audience to feel a certain way at a certain plot point.\n\nI would not recommend this film to anybody, I fear most people would be jaded by the calm flow of the story, but I would recommend it to someone who is looking for an alternative to the romantic schlock that fills the multiplexes on our side of the world. I must say that I was completely taken by this film, and continued to watch it night after night. The story takes time to present itself and bears repeated viewings as very few films in this genre are open to such a broad interpretation. A very beautiful movie.', u'0.411432', u'\nWhen I fist watched the movie, I said to myself, "so a film can be made like this." Wong Kar Wai\'s gorgeous poetic love story captured me throughout and even after the film. I must admit this is one of the best love movies, maybe the best of all, I have ever watched. The content and the form overlaps perfectly. As watching the secret love we see the characters in bounded frames that limits their movements as well as their feelings. Beautiful camera angles and the lighting makes the feelings and the blues even touchable. I want to congratulate Christopher Doyle and Pin Bing Lee for their fantastic cinematography which creates the mood for love. Also the music defines the sadness of the love which plays along the beautiful slow motion frames and shows the characters in despairing moods. And of course the performances of the actors which makes the love so real. Eventually, all the elements in the film combined in a perfect way under the direction of WKW and give the audience the feeling called love. ', u'0.821065', u'\nWARNING: SPOILER,SPOILER,SPOILER!!!!\n\nThis is written for filmgoers who may have walked away from "Mood for Love" perplexed and confused about paths the main characters choose in life. From reading other comments and reviews it seems that many viewers and critics missed some very important details which may have prevented them from enjoying this delightful tease of a movie.\n\nWe are so use to seeing blatant SEX in narrations that we forget that there was a time when filmakers would suggest the "dirty deed" by simply showing the slack-mouthed couples ride off in a sleigh or haywagon only to return into the next scene with a bulging gut or a fat toddler stuck to the hip..."Meet your child".\n\nThe director chose the same nostalgic approach in telling the story of Mr Chow and Mrs Chan.  Last warning...SPOILER SPOILER SPOILER\n\n\nMr Chow fools Mrs Chan into showing her real emotions when they rehearse his departure forever. Next scene: Mrs Chan leans her head on Mr Chow in the taxi and says "I do not want to go home tonight". Translation: "Let\'s Do It"\n\nWhy then did the couple just not do the modern thing of dumping their cheating spouses,get a divorce,raise their love child and live happily ever after? The answer is that this whole story takes place in Hong Kong during the Sixties. A bastard would live in a bleak life of shame if he were the child of an adulteress;whereas,a "legitimate" child could live a tragic but noble/honest life if his mother chose to raise him away from his cheating "father"-the invisible Mr Chan. In short,Mr Chow and Mrs Chan sacrifices their relationship for the future of their child.\n\nThat is why Mr Chow,upon learning that Mrs Chan lives alone with a little boy gives a knowing smile and ends his dreams of making Mrs Chan his Mrs Chow. He then,also realizes why Mrs Chan went to all the way to Singapore to be with him,only to reconsiders at the last momment and leave..,choosing to never see him again.(But not before taking some unnamed keepsake) Mr Chow lives with this wonderful secret with no one to tell. No one,except for a crumbling temple wall and of course we the viewer,...but only if we listen carefuly.    ', u'-0.137785', u'Two people living in the same flat complex find their partners are having an affair with each other. As they try and piece together how it happened, they also embark on an emotional journey that aches for a resolution\x85\n\nBuilding on his previous success with Happy Together and Chungking Express, Wong Kar Wai gives us this rather old fashioned and marvellous story of reawakened passions, yearning and unrequited love. \n\nPossibly, In the Mood for Love is not to everyone\'s taste. It wanders in rather lazily at 98mins: not particularly long for a film, but it appears longer because not a lot really happens. But this lazy feel conceals a quite tightly constructed film. Most of the story is cunningly woven around a series of set piece role plays, where the characters act out presumed scenarios between their respective spouses, trying to work out how the affair started. I say cunning because, of course, this makes it difficult for the audience (and the characters) to tell what is "in-role" and what is genuine. \n\nIf all this sounds rather arty and self-conscience, that\'s because it is. Unashamedly so. And it is played to perfection by two of Hong Kong\'s finest, Maggie Cheung and Leung Chui Wai, with some excellent support from Ping Lam Siu and Rebecca Pan.\n\nIt is also a virtuoso performance by Wong Kar Wai, who treats the audience to a sensory, and sensual, overload. Bringing together Christopher Doyle (who later deployed his lush, over-ripe style on Hero) and Pin Bing Lee (whose beautifully understated style can be seen on Springtime in a Small Town) was cinematographic genius. It has all the bold beauty of Doyle, without, frankly, the Athena-poster cheesiness of his work on Hero. The music, as always with Wong, is prominent. From Nat King Cole singing in Spanish, to the haunting strings of the main theme, it perfectly matches the eclectic beauty of the images. \n\nAll in all a top film, whether judged on plot, acting, cinematography or soundtrack. Similar to, but more accessible than, Wim Wenders\' Wings of Desire, this is a beautiful, old fashioned story about love lost and regained. \n\nAnd watch out for Tony Leung\'s hotel room 2046, which presaged Wong\'s recent film of the same name.', u'0.447837', u"\nThe most attractive factor that lies in this masterpiece of a film is not the beautiful lead actors. It isn't their outstanding acting and sizzling chemistry either.\n\nTo me, it is the mis-en-scene of the entire movie. The settings, the lighting, the props... all add to the mood for love between the main characters. A whiff of smoke from Chow's cigarette tells us his state of mind, the ever-changing tight-fitting cheongsams of Lizhen reflects the constraints of decision-making, the ruins of Angkor Wat ties in with the deteriorating relationship of the two leads.\n\nThe excellent use of mis-en-scene gives the film just the right amount of feel needed to flesh out the complicated nature of the characters' relationship. The film leaves the audience fruitlessly yearning for more.\n", u'0.283327', u"\nBeautiful film set in 1962 Hong Kong about a man (Mr. Chow) and woman (Mrs. Chan) who become close friends when they suspect their spouses are having an affair. Stylistically, the film is also beautiful. Wong Kar-Wai uses a lot of slow motion and close-ups on parts of the body (feet, hands, waist). The film itself has a reticence and properness that suggests its time period. It's sexy without showing everything. Wong Kar-Wai  also doesn't allow the audience to see what the spouses look like, suggesting that Mr. Chow and Mrs. Chan should be together. Smoking is even made to look elegant with close-ups of the curls of smoke. A really lovely film. Just prepare yourself for the ending.\n\n\n", u'0.434945', u"Set in 1962 Hong Kong (in turbulent times, as we are informed), this extremely intimate story of a failed romance between a two married people tied to their traditions manages to recall the essence of old Hollywood in scene after scene of lush colors, evocative yet restrained sensuality (as opposed of the requisite sexuality and occasional nude scenes which has become part of the norm of a romance in film), and the use of facial expressions to suggest subtle changes in mood or communication. It's not hard to see the influence of Marguerite Duras here, since she is known for minimalism in storytelling as well as describing powerful drama using the art of verbal and non-verbal conversation between two characters with a strong bond as well as the use of re-enacting scenes that could eventually take place in both the characters' lives. From Hiroshima MON AMOUR to MODERATO CANTABILE, her pen is strongly visible here from the moment we enter the cramped rooms of Mr. Chow (Tony Leung) and Mrs. Su Li-zhen (Maggie Cheung) to the last scenes which explain the intensity of regret that he feels as he recalls the opportunity which was lost in reaffirming this relationship.\n\nThe plot even resembles something that Duras could have written: Mr. Chow and Mrs. Su Li-zhen, neighbors in a tenement apartment while both being fairly successful professionals, begin to discover in the most banal of ways that their spouses are cheating on them, and they discover quite naturally, it's with each other. The question is, should they act upon what they also feel towards each other or not be like their partners? Every scene plays with the notion that at any moment they will give in to each other, and at one point, it is suggested that eventually they do though as intrusive as the camera is in detailing to us their encounters (which seem to occur on a daily basis as seen by the frequent changes of Cheung's dresses), we never see it. And just as not seeing either of their spouses heightens their own love story, not seeing them carry through with their attraction makes the eventual separation even the more bitter because at every moment we want for something to happen -- some catalyst -- and the only one which comes is when Leung reveals to her that he loves her, followed by his quietly brutal revelation that she will never leave her husband, which implies that neither will he. It also gives us a glimpse of what culture and timing can do: from a Western point of view, a consummation of their romance into a more solid, lasting affair would have been possible especially in the 60s, but as it's Hong Kong, cultural values are markedly different.\n\nPerformances here are of the high order: it's very easy to play a torrid love affair, but to continually play a repressed, platonic relationship that is brimming with desire only barely suggested is hard and makes all the sensuality more cerebral than palpable or visual. Cheung and Leung smolder and their blighted chemistry lingers long after the credits have rolled.", u'0.391025', u"In Hong Kong, 1962, the editor Chow Mo-wan (Tony Leung Chiu Wai) and his wife, and the secretary Su Li-Zhen Chan (Maggie Cheung) and her husband simultaneously move to an old building. Each couple has just rented a room in apartments on the same floor. Their wife and husband stay most of the time away from home, and Chow and Li-Zhen have the same habits: they like kung-fu stories and noodles and soap from a restaurant nearby the building. Their close contact becomes friendship and a sort of platonic and repressed love. Later they realize that their mates are having an affair, Chow falls in love with Li-Zhen, but her shyness and probably repressed condition of married woman keeps her love in a platonic level. 'In the Mood for Love' is a very slow, beautiful, melancholic and romantic love story, with a wonderful photography and soundtrack and a very unusual edition. The film had not had a screenplay, and the actors were never sure about what they would be shooting. Later, the director edited his story based on the footages. When Chow moves to Singapore, there is a gap of many years in the story until 1966, when its conclusion is intentionally open and not well defined, leaving questions such as who is the boy with Li-Zhen. My vote is eight.\n\nTitle (Brazil): 'Amor \xc0 Flor da Pele' ('Love on the Surface of the Skin')", u'0.272526', u"\nSpoilers herein.\n\nStart with your typical Hong Kong Kung Fu movie. A normal director will simply film that. But not this guy.\n\nWhat drives kung fu movies is not the bozos doing the fighting, but the masters behind them who use them as surrogates. But then, what drives the kung fu masters? The fellow writing the story, that's who.\n\nThat's where this kung fu movie starts. The central figure is the writer of a successful martial arts series. But it is even more abstract: the film is about what creates him.\n\nIt is half about his space. every shot starts or finishes on the surrounding space, very close, confining. That space includes his neighbor, who is thrust into his life by proximity and indirect relationship.\n\n\nI choose to think that the relationship between the spouses is imagined, part of an extended role playing activity which forms the core of the film. That's what we see: a story about the creation of a story (the relationship) which results in the story (the martial arts series). \n\nAll the mechanics are meditative, repetitive. We see countless small acts, the movements of people interacting with their environments. Lot's of close space, smoke, crimped walking, unsaid comments. The music recurrs. Everything repeats. All the major acts are relived or anticipated in practice.\n\nFinally, the environment, hence the story unravels as the space changes, first as he gets a space in which to write, then moves to Singapore. Finally, he whispers the story into a hole in a ruin in Cambodia. Along the way we are transported to an abstract world of human causality.\n\nThis is great. In my rating system, for every high mark I give, I have to balance it with a low mark. Now I can watch a 2.", u'-0.0773489', u'\nit is indeed a poem!\n\ni\'m aware of the fact that not everyone is going to enjoy this movie.. it\'s not about "getting it" or not.. it\'s about a certain sensibility.. you have to be receptive to it.. if you are able and willing to get lost in the movie\'s atmosphere you\'ll certainly love it.. i love it..\n\nwhat an incredibly intensive tale.. so deeply sad and poetic.. and the score! particularly the score.. it\'s a piece of art..\n\njust overwhelming', u'0.919705', u'Whoa\x85 To be honest, I would have never seen this movie if it wasn\'t for my film class\x85. It would have been my loss. The beginning of the film starts with a two different people moving into an apartment. This is scene that most people get lost in and then can\'t understand the movie. The theme of the film is about a two people who find out that there spouses are cheating on them with the other spouse. This is where the film took a unique path from the other Hollywood films, it follows the journey of them falling in love. The film is not about cheating, it is about the struggle and the tension created by Chow and So can be felt. The film is not about a sexual affair, but it is about an emotional affair. The story has a perfect ending for this film. The film is not like the rest of the other Love Film genre. The best thing about the film is the way it was filmed. The movie is ALL about tone. The tone is created by the songs and by the color of the scene. The music compliments the scene so perfectly, that the songs could have been a character in the film. The slow motion is overly used in many other films, but it is used perfectly in this film. The color of the scene and dresses is used to show the emotion that the two characters cannot show to each other. This film is an example about how film about romance can be shown without sex. This is a perfect example of why film making is an art work. The film sets a great tone, that the song "Yumeji\'s Theme" haunts me at night.', u'0.125785'], u'tt0056217': [u'\nOther reviewers, aside from seeing this as the end of the classic western, saw the plot as myth granting to one man that which was rightfully another\'s. I disagree. I see TMWSLV as a tale of a man stepping aside for the sake of a better man and a better world, at great personal cost.\n\nI view Tom as someone who has lived a cynical life--kill it before it kills you. With the advent of Ransom he recognizes that there is a better way, and that Ransom, by defying evil from a position of weakness, is far braver than Tom, who has merely defied evil from a position of strength. Additionally, Ransom brings about an answer to the question "must the sword rule forever?" with a resounding "no," a denial that at first seems foolish to Tom, but who then realizes that things really should be Ransom\'s way.\n\nAnd so Tom, knowing that one of them is the better man, allows that better man to receive the fame attendant to heroism; and in fact Ransom, for daring what Tom never did dare, is the true hero of the tale. Like all honest men must, Tom steps aside for the better man, knowing what it will cost him to do what is right.\n\nAn earlier reviewer said that the depiction of the politics was a parody; in fact, the politics of the early portion of the republics was even more lively (read: pugnacious) than is depicted in the film.\n', u'0.114863', u'"This is the west, sir. When the legend becomes fact, print the legend". - Maxwell Scott, The Man Who Shot Liberty Valance In John Ford\'s most mournful tale, the legendary director asks the question "How did this present come to be? Just how did an inferior race of men whose only weapon was that of law and books defeat the old gunslingers of the great West? Just what exactly happened to the Western heroes portrayed by John Wayne when law and order came to town? How did the wilderness turn into a garden? In The Man Who Shot Liberty Valance, John Ford depicts a world where everyone has got everything they wanted, but nobody seems happy with it\x85 sound familiar to anyone? Senator Ransom Stoddard (James Stewart) arrives to Shinbone on a train with his wife Hallie (Vera Miles) to visit the funeral of an old friend named Tom Doniphon (John Wayne, remarkably the film opens where this iconic star is dead). The newspaper men have never heard of him, so why would such a powerful political figure visit the town to attend this funeral of a "nobody"? Through the use of a flashback, Stoddard tells us the tale of how he came to the town as a young lawyer but was immediately attacked by the psychotic villain Liberty Valance (terrifyingly played by Lee Marvin) who teaches him "Western law". The rest of the film tells the tale of how the man of books eventually defeated the race of the gunslinger and what sacrifices had to be made for that to happen.\n\nIn truth, The Man Who Shot Liberty Valance is more of a melodrama than a Western. Gone are the vibrant landscapes of Ford\'s landmark movie The Searchers six years earlier, which was so proudly promoted as being in VISTAVISION WIDESCREEN COLOR and instead the film has given way to a bleak, claustrophobic black and white tale, with so many enclosed sets and not one shot of Monument Valley.\n\nThere\'s a lack of a real bar scene, lack of shots of the landscape, lack of horses, lack of gunfights. It\'s a psychological Western, probably unlike anything ever filmed until maybe Clint Eastwood\'s Unforgiven.\n\nWhy is this movie so good then? In basic terms, it\'s about the sadness of progression and without giving way too much away the film tells a remarkable tale which truly does examine what Ford\'s view of the West as promoted in his earlier work truly meant. It\'s a tragic and pessimistic movie but it\'s a rewarding one, with huge replay value and one that leaves you with so many more questions than it does answers.\n\nDo we prefer the legendary tale of our heroes or the truth? Are tales of people such as \'The Man With No Name\' just more interesting than Wyatt Earp? Is living a lie as a successful guy better or worse than quietly dying as a hero? The Man Who Shot Liberty Valance is one of the most complex Westerns that has ever been put on film and is a remarkable film when you consider it was directed by a guy who made his living telling grandeur tales of the American West. Well acted, very well written and is one of the most rewarding Westerns for replay value in the history of the genre.\n\nMatt Holmes \n\nwww.obsessedwithfilm.com', u'0.22694', u'It\'s a sad movie in many ways. Ford is closing the book on his meditations on progress here. The black and white photography itself is rather depressing -- most of the scenes, including all the important ones, seem to take place at night, in the dark. And what do they show us? As Edmund O\'Brien puts it, the West began with Indians and buffalo and the only law was survival. Then the cattlemen moved in and took the land over and the law was that of the hired gun. Now the West has been settled by hard-working farmers and turns into a garden, once the power brokers are out of the way. But it\'s a wistful garden. The cactus roses have disappeared and been replaced by turnips. And the rowdy, raucous, plain-speaking heroes and villains have been replaced by pretentious blowhard politicians of th e sort that Ransom Stoddard (James Stewart) has become.\n\nThe framing story begins with Senator Stewart and his wife, Vera Miles, coming back to Shinbone for the funeral of the uknown Tom Doniphon (John Wayne). "Where are his boots?," Stewart asks upon seeing Wayne\'s body laid out, "Put his boots on." (Ford claimed this incident was borrowed from Tom Mix\'s funeral.) A few of the old crowd are still around but the streets of Shinbone are empty and are a tired gray. Everyone is now old. Stewart patronizes Wayne\'s old retainer, Pompey (Woody Strode), giving him a handful of bills and saying, "Pork chop money." Some "garden"!\n\nFord could be a sadistic director. He asked Stewart what he thought of Woody Strode\'s old-age makeup: the white fringe of hair, the overalls, the slouch hat. Stewart said it looked okay, but Ford prompted him for criticism until Stewart finally admitted that, "Wahhll, it\'s a little Uncle Remus, isn\'t it?" It\'s what Ford was waiting for. "I designed that outfit myself, and that\'s exactly what I had in mind." He called everyone over -- cast and crew alike -- and said, "Mister Stewart here thinks there\'s something wrong with Woody\'s wardrobe. Maybe he doesn\'t like Woody\'s wardrobe. Maybe he doesn\'t like Negroes!"\n\nWell, if the present is filled with nostalgia, the past is lively enough, and the flashback, which is to say most of the film, is full of action and gusto. People just don\'t eat in John Qualen\'s restaurant. They eat huge platters of steaks, beans, potatoes, and deep dish apple pie. The steaks come sizzling from the vast greasy grill and are large enough to hang over the edges of the over-sized platters. Lee Marvin and his henchmen (Lee Van Cleef and Strother Martin) enact their villainy with relish. John Wayne is, of course, the hero of the tale. You can tell because, in addition to his John Wayneness, he wears the only black and white outfit in the cast, which draws attention to his figure whenever it is on screen. In fact, though, Wayne does a reasonably decent job of playing Doniphon after his fall. When he enters the political meeting toward the end, banging open the swinging doors, staggering slightly, bearded, shabby, his magnificent white hat replaced by a battered gray one, slightly bleary, he looks and acts like a man who has been defeated but has not yet died, putting up a brave front with nothing left behind to prop it up. He\'s not bad in this scene. For the most part, though, he plays John Wayne, the resolute, proud man of principle. Edmund O\'Brien is the comic town drunk and editor, the Thomas Mitchell part, and is given some amusing lines, including quotes from Henry V. (Actually O\'Brien was pretty good in MGM\'s "Julius Caesar," as Casca, making Shakepeare\'s lines believable enough.)\n\nThe principle Doniphon represents, however, is O\'Brien\'s second stage of the West\'s development. He\'s not only a rancher but a gunman, soon to be replaced by farmers and lawyers, but it\'s only at the final shootout that he realizes it. He saves Stewart\'s life the old-fashioned way, then gives up any plans of marriage to Vera Miles, gets drunk, and drives himself and Pompey back to the ranch he\'d planned as a home. He burns the ranch down. He and Strode had a problem shooting the arrival at the ranch. Wayne lost control of the horses and Strode reached over to help. Wayne pushed him brusquely out of the way and Strode fell from the wagon. Angry, he threatened Wayne, and Wayne responded the way Wayne would respond. Strode, a former fullback, was several years younger than Wayne and in good shape. Ford stopped the altercation by shouting that the movie needed Wayne\'s face in one piece.\n\nFor all its darkness, however, the movie reflects some of Ford\'s prejudices in his comic way. A pompous orator at the political meeting (John Carradine) announces in his stentorian public voice that he came here with "a carefully prepared speech" but is going to disregard it and speak the truth. Here he crinkles up the speech and throws it contemptuously to the floor. Someone picks the page up and uncrumples it to find it blank on both sides. The rhetoric is extremely funny -- "The bullet-riddled body of an honest citizen?" -- recalling Donald Meek in "Young Mister Lincoln." During a carefully choreographed spontaneous demonstration after the cattlemen\'s candidate has been nominated, a band plays, a cowboy rides up onto the speaker\'s platform and twirls a lasso, and there is a brief shot of the Chairman staring appalled at the cowboy\'s horse lapping water out of the chairman\'s pitcher.\n\nBut it\'s still a sad comment from Ford. His earlier work brimmed with hope for the future. Here, the future has arrived and it makes one long for the past. It\'s the way an old man might feel about life in general.', u'-0.0235245', u'Nostalgic, sour and powerful, Ford\'s "The Man Who Shot Liberty Valance" is one of the most memorable of all his Westerns... It\'s triggered off, and that\'s the right phrase, as it turns out, by flashback... The old device works well in the hands of the master... In fact, John Ford couldn\'t have got the feeling he\'s after in any other way... \n\nFord seems to be mourning the Old West... It\'s a mixed feeling\x97composed of pride, regret, and a sense of the inherent injustice of life, and certain forebodings about the future...\n\nWhen a famous elderly Senator Ranse Stoddard (James Stewart), looking every inch the revered veteran political figure, gets off a train at a small Western town with his good lady (Vera Miles) you can tell by the way his eye roves for and rests on bits of time remembered that this is very much a sentimental journey\x85 He\'s come to pay his last respects to a friend of the long, long ago\x97a small rancher in those days, played by John Wayne...\n\nDissolve into the distant story\x97presenting young tenderfoot lawyer Stewart, eagerly intent on bringing Eastern law-books to bear on the problems of the West\x85 His first taste of the West is a sound beating up, by a man called Liberty Valance (Lee Marvin) who is a gunman employed by powerful cattlemen who oppose statehood for the Territory...\n\nNor does Ranse find any real custom even among the law-abiding... He starts his career, in fact, as a kitchen hand in a caf\xe9 where he\'s been taken by Tom Doniphon (Wayne) following his nasty experience with Liberty... Ford is at his \'domestic\' best in this caf\xe9 which is run by a Swedish pair (John Qualen and Jeannette Nolan) and where Ranse\'s wife-to-be is one of the employees... Stewart, wearing an apron contrasted with Wayne, pure frontiersman, is something to see in that kitchen... And there\'s always an edge to their meetings...\n\nIt isn\'t hard to guess that before long the waitress, Tom\'s girl, is going to fail for the injured tenderfoot who takes on her education... Ranse eventually hangs up his sign in the office of the local newspaper editor, Dutton Peabody, a typical \'character\', played by Edmond O\'Brien, and from then on it\'s the story of a territory growing up and seeking statehood, with Ranse Stoddard maturing, too, as the natural leader of \'civilized\' law and order aspirations...\n\nBut none of it could have happened without the removal of Liberty Valance... Ranse confronts him and the bullets fly but the bullet that actually drops him comes from another Winchester in the shadows... Ranse goes to Washington on the strength of ridding the territory of Liberty Valance, but he knows that the shot was fired by another man\x85 \n\nIt\'s another film about the right man being in the right place at the right time in order to advance the course of Western civilization... Skillful, undoubtedly, but in this case the right man never gets his just deserts\x97if he ever wanted them, because the Wayne character in his way is just as much a part of the Old West as Marvin...\n\nHerein lies the bitter essence of the film... Wayne, at heart, is as contemptuous of what Stewart stands for\x97talk and conferences and thick legal tomes as the gunman is\x85 And through him you feel Ford saying that the hard men who had it the hardest on the frontier are soon forgotten, and some of the frontier\'s simple virtues have been buried with them\x85\n\n"The Man Who Shot Liberty Valance" is honest, unpretentious and deeply moving... In no other Ford Western does the audience feel so involved... The playing is brilliant\x97from the smallest role to the beautifully interpreted ambivalent relationship of Wayne and Stewart...\n\nTheir acting style are quite different... Stewart had developed a standard repertoire of mannerisms that his public had come to cherish... Wayne\'s style was spare, clean and unadorned; he stood tall, very much himself... Certainly this film exemplifies a wonderful blending of three great talents, Ford\'s, Stewart\'s, and Wayne\'s, and their seamless mutual chemistry is one of the salient aspect of it...', u'0.0883646', u'\nSome films are slow to give up their secrets first time round and need some time to elapse before they are revalued.  An opportunity to see "The Man Who Shot Liberty Valance" after a gap of several years turned out to be an unexpectedly rewarding experience.  It had never been one of my favourite Ford films; indeed I was always puzzled why many rate it so highly in the canon.  Its rather plain black-and-white visuals smack of low production values and it has little of the grand operatic sweep of many of his other Westerns.  I can now see that I was rather missing the point: "Liberty Valance" is that rare thing, a chamber Western, a quiet and elegiac reappraisal of the legends of the West made almost at the end of Ford\'s creative career with "Cheyenne Autumn" the only Western still to come.  A U.S. senator played by James Stewart returns with his wife (Vera Miles at her most attractive) to the small Western town, where, as a young man, he tied to set up a law business, to attend the funeral of the man (John Wayne) who saved his life when he tried to rid the community of its villain, Liberty Valance (Lee Marvin).  Ford\'s Westerns had always been the stuff of legend.  Now, towards the end of his career, he began to take the legend apart.  The hero is not the one who goes on to become one of the town\'s most illustrious sons but the quiet man who fades into the background.  It needs more than idealism to overcome evil, the film seems to be saying,  Brute force has to be countered by brute force; moreover, true worth is not always rewarded or recognised by society.  It is a bleak message that Ford is giving us.  By homing in on character and plot to a far greater extent than usual, he gives us an experience that is often more akin to filmed theatre than cinema.  There are unusually long sequences in studio built interiors, the diner, the bar and a theatre where an election adoption meeting is taking place.  Outdoor sequences are few and far between.  Instead of a large collective enemy such as marauding Indian tribes there is just the one baddy and his pair of sycophants.  The pivotal action scene where Liberty Valance receives his just deserts takes place in a dark street and has none of the climactic sense of drama to be found in such shootouts as "My Darling Clementine" of Zinnemann\'s "High Noon".  I can at last see that those very limitations that for so so long prevented me from appreciating "Liberty Valance" give it a sense of concentration and strength that the Western rarely achieves.', u'0.135386', u'John Ford\'s 1962 film, The Man Who Shot Liberty Valance, is an ode to the end of the classic western. It is a satiric look at the civilizing of the once wild American west where Ford deliberately uses stereotypical characters and situations to undermine and reexamine the very myths that he helped create. Ford\'s world is one of moral certainty and untamed villainy where legends are born and cowboy heroes ride free amidst the broad natural landscapes of America\'s West. In the west of Liberty Valance, the hero is not made nor born, but manufactured by the media. As the editor of the Shinbone Star says; "This is the West. When the legend becomes the fact, print the legend."\n\nThe legend concerns lawyer Ransom Stoddard, played in typical earnest aw-shucks fashion by Jimmy Stewart. Stoddard has been brought, bruised and beaten, to the western town of Shinbone following an altercation with a gang of stagecoach highwaymen, led by arch-villain Liberty Valance. As played by Lee Marvin, Valance is deadpan and over-the top evil. His uncompromising performance is one of the pleasures of the film. With his lethal black whip and his giggling and glowering henchmen (played by Strother Martin and Lee VanCleef), Marvin is unabashedly nasty and taunting at every turn. His nemesis is that stalwart icon of the heroic west, John Wayne as Tom Doniphan. His code of honor is as solid as his skill with a six-gun. Doniphan knows that might rules the west, and will inevitably vanquish evil. But Stoddard\'s mission is to see that justice is done through the more civilized rule of law. Of his nemesis Valance, Stoddard says; \'I don\'t want to kill him, I just want to put him in jail!\' Not likely, in John Ford\'s west.\n\nInto the mix come a parade of character actors whose vivid stereotypes have enlivened westerns for decades: Edmond O\'Brien as the drunken but noble newspaper editor; Andy Devine as the whimpering, good-hearted, but cowardly sheriff; Woody Strode as the silent, noble black man, backbone of the west; and last and most essential is Vera Miles as Hallie, for whose heart our heroes compete. It is in that romantic triangle that the real heart of west may be won. In this way the Hallie, like the cactus rose she carries to Doniphan\'s funeral, becomes a bittersweet symbol for the loss and the hope of the new west.\n\nFord makes Liberty Valance into a western that seems to examine itself as a western. He removes the window dressing to focus on the intricate play of characters and symbols. Gone is the Technicolor of the Searchers. This is in stark black and white. Gone are the outdoor landscapes of Ford\'s west. Most of the film looks like it was on the back lot, and many scenes take place indoors. He moves his camera in on faces not vistas. The world of 1960\'s America was changing and beginning to reexamine the usefulness of certain cultural mythologies. The new decade was about people; the grand ideals of postwar America were being reexamined and were about to become even dimmer with the assassination of President Kennedy. America was beginning to be about recognizing unique individualities, about embracing change, about individual rights, strong women, sensitive men. Ford didn\'t like that much, I imagine. The film\'s characters are flawed and cartoonish. I suspect his film was a wry satire on his own mythology and a critique of what he viewed as a softening of American society. Some critics didn\'t get it, while others consider this one of his more remarkable films. There is no doubt that it is nothing short of brilliant the ability to balance the elements of satire and seriousness, comedy and melodrama.\n\nAs the train leaves Shinbone, the truth forever gives way to the legend. The conductor leans over to light Stoddard\'s cigar saying; \'Nothing is too good for the man who shot Liberty Valance.\' In that moment we are incredibly moved. This is, after all, about the creation of stories. But in those stories there live truths about human nature that are universal and forever.', u'0.146081', u'I just read the comments of someone from August 30, 2004, who had reached the conclusion that John Wayne\'s character had stepped aside "for the better man," played by Jimmy Stewart. From my view, nothing could be farther from the truth. For all Ransom Stoddard\'s disdain for frontier violence, in the end, he was left with no choice but to pick-up a gun to finally silence Liberty Valance, something Valance knew better than to do with Wayne\'s Tom Doniphon. Call Stoddard the idealist and Doniphon the realist, but don\'t call him the better man. In 1946, John Ford directed My Darling Clementine, perfectly blending Wayne and Henry Fonda with his usual cast of characters to create a masterwork. Sixteen years later, he put Wayne together with Stewart (plus all the ol\' gang) and made another peerless film. There was a time I didn\'t really "get" John Ford and John Wayne. One day, I awoke and now, the greatness of these two giants of the cinema is undeniable.', u'0.655094', u"\nStarring the greatest actor ever in Jimmy Stewart and the man who defined Western acting in John Wayne, one knew the movie was going to be good.  But this movie tops them all. The movie continues through many great plot twists and unexpected events to arrive at a moving and stunning conclusion.  Love, violence, politics, law, law-enforcement: this movie has it all.  It is a western drama with action and even a little mystery topped off with a few comedic moments.  Start to finish, you won't find anything like it anywhere else.  Make sure you see this movie.", u'0.454351', u"Senator James Stewart and his wife Vera Miles get a telegram from their old home in Shinbone about the death of a friend. They arrive in Shinbone and go to a sparsely attended service. When prodded a bit by the editor of the Shinbone Star, a paper he was once employed at, Stewart sits down and tells the story of just how his political career got its start.\n\nThe Man Who Shot Liberty Valance is John Ford's final homage to the western film genre that made his reputation. It's maybe the most nostalgic of westerns he ever did. Beginning with the cast all of whom are way too old for their parts. But if you notice there's a kind of soft focus photography used on John Wayne, James Stewart, and Lee Marvin which masks their age. The skill of these players does the rest.\n\nStewart arrives in Shinbone, a newly minted attorney who has taken Horace Greeley's advice and the stagecoach he's riding on gets held up by the local outlaw Liberty Valance and henchmen. When Stewart protests Valance, played by Lee Marvin beats him with the butt end of a silver knob whip and leaves him on the road.\n\nHe's found by John Wayne who brings him to Shinbone to get medical attention. Stewart stays with restaurant owners John Qualen and Jenanette Nolan and their daughter Vera Miles who's Wayne's girl. Miles who can't even read or write takes quite a shine to the educated easterner.\n\nBut Stewart and newspaper editor Edmond O'Brien keep getting on Liberty Valance's bad side, especially when they come out publicly for statehood whereas the big cattle ranchers who hire Liberty Valance and henchmen want to keep this part of the USA a territory for as long as they can. This is all leading to an inevitable showdown.\n\nLee Marvin as Liberty Valance is one evil man. No subtle psychology here, no explanations of a mom who didn't love him or a girl that dumped him, he's just an evil guy who likes being evil. If Liberty has any redeeming qualities, despite repeated viewings of this film, I haven't found any. Marvin clearly enjoyed this part, but he never turned it into a burlesque of himself. That he waited for Cat Ballou to do.\n\nJohn Wayne who by this time was playing more roughhewn types than he did when he was Ringo Kid in Stagecoach, gets back to that kind of a portrayal here. He's more Ringo than he is Ethan Edwards. But that's at the beginning. Over the course of the film he changes into something like Ethan Edwards, his character from The Searchers. What happens to make him that way in fact is the story of the film. \n\nBut actually the film really does belong to Stewart. He's on screen for most of it, he's the protagonist here and until almost the end, what's happening to him is what The Man Who Shot Liberty Valance is all about. \n\nFord once again rounds out his cast with many of his favorite players in support. Andy Devine as the cowardly marshal, John Carradine as a pompous windbag politician, Woody Strode, Denver Pyle, Strother Martin, all who had appeared in Ford films before.\n\nThere are two to single out however. This was the last film Jack Pennick ever did with John Ford. You might not know his name, but he and that horse-face countenance appeared in just about every sound John Ford film there is. He has a bit role as a bartender. Pennick died after completing this film.\n\nEdmond O'Brien made his one and only appearance in this film as Dutton Peabody, founder, editor, and owner of the Shinbone Star and as he said himself, he sweeps the place out occasionally. He's a regular character in Ford films, the wise friend of the hero who has a bit of a drinking problem. Kind of like Thomas Mitchell as Doc Boone in Stagecoach. \n\nLike Stewart, O'Brien is an eastern immigrant who came west to be his own newspaper editor like his former boss Horace Greeley. Words are his weapons, like the law is Stewart's. It's no wonder that these two annoy Lee Marvin so. Even the fast draw hired gun can't kill public opinion. \n\nWhen they're both chosen as Shinbone's Delegates to the territorial convention it is O'Brien who makes the nominating speech to draft Stewart for the job. It is one of his finest bits in his long and distinguished career. It encapsulates a lot of what Ford was trying to say about progress and progress in the American west. In the end it is the farmer, the merchant, the builder of cities will eventually triumph just about anywhere. Stewart and he are as much pioneers as Wayne and the others in Shinbone are, they're just the next logical step.\n\nProgress always comes at a price. We see the price in the beginning and the end of the film, the scenes of Shinbone during the early Twentieth Century. The paved streets, the electric lights are there because of who came before and what they did. There wasn't room in the changing west for many like Wayne and Marvin, their time came and went, just as Stewart's time came and went too.\n\nActually I think the real winner in this film was always Vera Miles. She started out as an illiterate girl working in her parent's restaurant and wound up the wife of a United States Senator. That's progress too.", u'0.125936', u'John Ford was the first to see the potential in John Wayne and helped \r shape his image in a series of a classic westerns, including \r Stagecoach, Fort Apache, She Wore a Yellow Ribbon, and The Searchers. \r The Man Who Shot Liberty Valance, is the most subtle treatment of \r Wayne\'s character, and represents one of his most fully realized roles, \r approaching the tragic in its depth. The film deals with the passing of \r the American West\'s values of freedom and independence. In many ways it \r is a summation and re-examination of the whole notion of the West as \r promulgated by Wayne and Ford.\r \r\nThe story begins at the turn of the 19th century. Senator Ransom \r Stoddard (Jimmy Stewart), is traveling by train to Shinbone, the town \r of his youth, for the funeral of Tom Doniphon (John Wayne). Stoddard is \r a senior senator with presidential aspirations. Doniphon is an unknown. \r Stoddard and his wife, Hallie (Vera Miles) go to the undertaker and \r stand before the plain box that holds Doniphon.\r \r\nEnter the local press. They must know why the Senator has gone out his \r way to attend the funeral of an unknown cowhand. There is an old \r stagecoach on blocks at the undertaker\'s\x97a reference to the stagecoach \r that marked Wayne\'s breakthrough role. Stewart hems and haws, dusts off \r the old stage. It looks like the one that brought him to Shinbone \r decades before. And so the retelling begins.\r \r\nIt is the 1870\'s. Stoddard is a young lawyer journeying by stage to \r make his fortune out west. Bandits waylay the stage and Stoddard is \r beaten by the eponymous Liberty Valance (Lee Marvin). Stoddard is the \r symbol of eastern civilization, impotent in the face of Valance\'s \r lawlessness. In the next scene we see Doniphon entering Shinbone with \r the beaten Stoddard thrown into the back of his buckboard. Between the \r impotent Stoddard and the lawless Valance is the figure of Doniphon, \r the only man whom Valance fears, and pillar of the town, friend to the \r newspaper editor, beau to Hallie, and foil to the inept marshal (Andy \r Devine). Shinbone is a dysfunctional town. Legal authority, as embodied \r by Devine, is cowardly, gluttonous and corrupt. Stoddard, the man with \r the intellectual ability to bring law to the town, is devoid of \r authority. Doniphon, the man who has the physical power and respect of \r the town to give force to the law and bring order to Shinbone hews to a \r code of individualism that keeps him from committing to the notion of a \r civil society.\r \r\nThe political climate is fertile; statehood is being discussed and will \r change everything, bringing the rule of law and threatening the open \r range. At the local meeting to elect representatives, Valance tries to \r disrupt the proceedings but is held in place by Doniphon. Stoddard \r nominates Doniphon as a man uniquely qualified to represent the region. \r If he accepts the nomination, he unites physical and legal authority, \r bringing order to Shinbone and relegates Valance to the periphery. But \r he refuses. Accepting such a role is incongruent with his notions of \r individuality. Stoddard and the newspaper editor are instead elected. \r Valance vows revenge. Instead of supporting Stoddard, Doniphon counsels \r flight. He arranges a buckboard to take Stoddard out of town before \r Valance arrives that night to have it out with him.\r \r\nDoniphon\'s abdication leaves Stoddard with the decision: leave the town \r in the clutches of Valance, or stand and challenge him. Stoddard calls \r Valance out. Valance toys with him, shooting the gun out of his hand. \r Stoddard picks up the gun. Valance takes aim. Stoddard fires. Valance \r falls dead. Miraculously, Stoddard has liberated the town, also winning \r the heart of Hallie.\r \r\nWayne goes on a bender, drinking himself into a stupor, then burns down \r his home, symbolically burning his own hopes for the future. He has \r lost everything. But the depth of his loss only becomes apparent later. \r Stoddard goes to the state convention, heralded as "The Man Who Shot \r Liberty Valance." On this wave of popularity, he is elected to \r represent the state in Washington, launching his career. As he is \r elected, Doniphon enters the hall. He is drunk and haggard. He calls \r Stoddard into a back room and confronts him.\r \r\n"You didn\'t shoot Valance, Pilgrim," he tells Stoddard, "Think back, \r Pilgrim."\r \r\nWe dissolve to the gunfight in the street, this time from Doniphon\'s \r POV. He stands in an alley. As Valance makes his final shot, Doniphon \r shoots him, the shot simultaneous with Stoddard\'s, killing Valence, but \r in a manner without honor. In doing so, he loses his self- respect and \r violates the code by which he has lived.\r \r\nThis illuminates his raging drunk. All is lost. Wayne approaches the \r tragic in this role. He was the best, but because of the limitations of \r his code, he defers acting against Valance and defers again. When \r leadership comes his way, he refuses. When events force him to act, he \r must do so in a manner that is dishonorable. Doniphon\'s only sin is \r that of pride\x97he will not stoop to the needs of the group and holds \r himself aloof. For this alone, he fails and ultimately transgresses \r against all he stands for.\r \r\nWhen Stoddard and his wife return to Shinbone for the funeral, their \r solemnity springs guilt. Stoddard has traded on the Valance shooting \r his entire career and he knows that he has lived a lie. Ironically, the \r reporter tears up the story at the end, saying "When the legend becomes \r the truth, print the legend."\r \r\nJohn Ford made the western what it is today. Here he gives us movie \r that is a complex and, at times sardonic, critique of the genre, while \r at the same time giving Wayne his deepest, most tragic role. There was \r not to be another western of equivalent depth until Clint Eastwood\'s \r Unforgiven. It rewards repeated viewing and is a capstone to the career \r of Mr. Wayne.\r\n', u'-0.126474', u'Anticipating Peckinpah and Eastwood, John Ford\'s Hamlet-like Western The Man Who Shot Liberty Valance deconstructs the legends of the Old West as a place where good always triumphed over evil and civilization overcame barbarism, a myth that he helped to create. Ford\'s 1962 film, based on the story by Dorothy M. Johnson, looks at how myths are created and, in its complex vision of the passing of an era, both pines for the lawless open spaces and eagerly anticipates the railroads bringing paved roads, schools, and law enforcement. The film contains the classic phrase "When truth becomes legend, print the legend", cited by a journalist who refuses to print newly discovered facts about an incident surrounded in myth that took place years before.\n\nWhile there are stereotypes and all-too familiar stock characters, Liberty Valance succeeds because of strong performances by John Wayne as the macho embodiment of the old school, and Jimmy Stewart as the man who brings literacy and respect for law to the small town, though unconvincing as a young man just out of law school. Shot in black and white on a studio sound stage, the film opens with gray-haired Senator Ransom Stoddard (James Stewart) arriving at a small frontier town named Shinbone with his wife Hallie (Vera Miles). Met at the train station by a reporter eager for a story, Senator Stoddard tells him that he came to attend the funeral of an old friend, Tom Doniphon (John Wayne).\n\nIt is there that he reunites with Tom\'s dependable ranch hand Pompey (Woody Strode) and, since no one remembers Tom Doniphon, relates his story that takes us back to the time before the coming of the railroads. As Stoddard tells it, he was a young law graduate who arrived from the East in a stagecoach, following the advice "Go West, young man, and grow up with the country" first made in 1851 by John B. L. Soule, editor of the Terre Haute Express and incorrectly attributed to Horace Greeley. His welcome to Shinbone, however, is not what he had hoped. He is met by a sadistic bandit named Liberty Valance (Lee Marvin) who robs the stagecoach and beats Stoddard after he tries to protect a female passenger.\n\nRancher Tom Doniphon finds him unconscious and brings him to Hallie, his girlfriend\'s house. When Stoddard recovers, he asks the Marshal Link Appleyard (Andy Devine) to make an arrest but Doniphon soon sets him straight about how justice is done in Shinbone - with the barrel of a gun. Without money, Stoddard works in the family restaurant as a dishwasher and also for the editor of the local newspaper, a man named Dutton Peabody (Edmond O\'Brien) who is overly fond of the bottle.\n\nRansom develops an interest in Hallie and soon sets up classes to teach her and other locals how to read and write and also to convey the finer points of democracy and its institutions. Threatened by Valance and taunted by Doniphon, Stoddard goes against his ideals and learns how to shoot a gun with the help of Doniphon who "educates" him and shows him the error of his liberal ways.\n\nAfter Stoddard and Peabody defeat Valance in an election to be representatives to the Sate Senate and an editorial appears contrasting the goals of statehood with the interests of Valance and the cattlemen, Dutton is severely beaten by Valance who then baits Stoddard into a gunfight. The showdown between Stoddard and Liberty is the centerpiece of the film and the shot heard round the West allows the victor to build an entire career based on the incident.\n\nThe legend of Shinbone will soon be joined by real-life icons Wyatt Earp, Wild Bill Hickok, Buffalo Bill, and Kit Carson and the truth about the West with its corruption, misogyny, domination of the weak by the strong, and Native American genocide will be quietly buried. John Ford helped to romanticize the West and create the myth and, now in The Man Who Shot Liberty Valance, he allows us to understand its melancholy and its lie.', u'0.0538421', u'Although I have seen this movie numerous times, I am just getting around to commenting on it. I measure other films against it when I see them. The James Stewart, John Wayne, Lee Marvin, Vera Miles, and Woody Strode performances are magnificent. It is important to note the contributions of past and future notables: Andy Devine, Lee Van Cleef (Hang\'em High), and Strother Martin (Cool Hand Luke).\n\nThis movie captures some of the aspects of how hard life was on the western frontier towns and how they sprang up and died later in the era. Also, it it depicts how law and order are just as important today as in that time. Without L&O, you are in just another "third world" broken nation.\n\nA superb motion picture!', u'0.234663', u'\nThis film had every element of classic western action/story.  Directed by John Ford, and starring John Wayne and James Stewart, the film focuses on an eastern lawyer attempting to make a career out west.  Early on, he runs up against Liberty Valance, the baddest of the bad, keenly played by Lee Marvin, in one of his most villainous roles.\n\nStewart manages to bring some sense of education and fair play to the town citizens, but ultimately gets embroiled in conflict with Valance.  In a shootout outside the local saloon, Valance takes dead aim on the eastern dude, Stoddard, (Stewart).  Shots ring out, and surprisingly, Valance falls to the ground.  But, who really fired the fatal shot?\n\nThat question is answered in a convention meeting attended by Stoddard as a delegate, where Tom Doniphan (Wayne) reveals the truth of the fatal shooting.\n\nThis movie is unique in that it was one of the last of the truly great westerns shot in black and white, and the story is presented in flashback sequences.  The viewer can settle back to a truly marvelous story.', u'-0.070481', u"Westerns aren't normally my favourite so it has to be a good one, and this one starring two legends, James Stewart & John Wayne, is surely one of the best. It ranks with me right behind High Noon.\n\nIt tells the tale of an aging Washington Senator, Ranse Stoddard, who returns to Shinbone, his (sometime) hometown in the West with his wife, Hallie, for the funeral of their friend, Tom Doniphon. While there he relates his story to a journalist, telling how he came to Shinbone as a young lawyer and met there both Tom & Hallie (who was formerly Tom's sweetheart). He became famous as the man who shot the notorious bandit, Liberty Valence, which kick started his political career. \n\nHowever, Stoddard realizes that this career is based on a lie, and he experiences his own guilt dealing with it. The shot that actually killed Valence came from another gun, not his own. The film emphatically makes the point that perception (or rumour reported as truth) and reality are not necessarily one and the same thing. The public has lauded Stoddard all these years for a heroic deed he didn't really do.\n\nThe movie has marvelous characters and a stellar cast portraying them. Both Ranse Stoddard and Tom Doniphon, though seemingly opposite, come across as sympathetic, honourable men with great personal integrity. This is a film with TWO heroes, protagonist & antagonist to one another... though jointly opposing the villainous Valence. The legendary James Stewart, such a decent man himself, is perfect in the role of the noble lawyer & Senator Ranse Stoddard, who is initially opposed to gun violence, advocating education and the rule of law. He is not too proud to don an apron and wash dishes to pay for his keep. That great Western hero, John Wayne, is forceful (as always) portraying the rough hewn Tom Doniphon. His philosophy is 'the gun is the law', and he has little respect for either book learning or law courts.\n\nLee Marvin is downright deliciously sullen & evil as the whip wielding Liberty Valence. I love that restaurant steak scene, he's just so despicable the way he holds the terrified citizenry in his grip! Few villains elicit more outrage than his heinous acts against Dutton Peabody, the drunken editor of the Shinbone Star. Liberty Valence...what an absolutely fabulous name for this wretched snake! Can you imagine any other name in the movie title?\n\nThis film seems to take a nostalgic look at the decline of the Old West and its replacement with modern civilization. Tom Doniphon of course represents the rugged frontier West. He is actually dead throughout this movie, his character revealed only through the flashback retelling of the story. By contrast, Ranse Stoddard brings from the East law and literacy to this Western town. From the time he first comes to Shinbone as a young lawyer, he teaches its inhabitants to read & write. \n\nThe conflict between the old frontier ways and the new educated society based on law & order is clearly revealed in the love triangle here. Both Tom Doniphon and Ranse Stoddard court the lovely and quietly spirited Hallie (played by Vera Miles). The cactus rose symbolizes her early attraction to Tom and the Old West, the real rose her newfound romance with Ranse and his Eastern sophistication. Her courtship by Tom is eventually replaced by her marriage to Ranse, causing Tom's increased drinking and gradual decline. \n\nOther characters include the drunken Doc Willoughby and the cowardly Marshall Link Appleyard, who shrinks away from dealing with Valence. The movie is a compelling metaphor for the decline of the Old West, has a gripping plot, and surely some of the best character depictions ever. All told, it's a wonderful movie for both fans of westerns and for those who are normally not.", u'0.126101', u'I either love or hate John Ford\'s early movies; there\'s no middle ground. Anyone who admired F. W. Murnau as much as Ford had to be touched by the great man\'s fire, but many of Ford\'s well-regarded films, "The Iron Horse," "Young Mr. Lincoln," and "She Wore a Yellow Ribbon," seem dreadfully mannered and stylized compared to "3 Bad Men," "Stagecoach," "My Darling Clementine," and "Fort Apache." After 1948 Ford embraced his worst idiosyncrasies, as did his co-dependent John Wayne, who became an enthusiastic promoter of his own "legend."\n\nNot heeding the glaring defects in Ford\'s worst films, the film school generation of directors in the 1970s over-praised films that were rightfully panned by the critics. One of the travesties they promoted to "classic" status is Ford\'s adaptation of the interesting Dorothy Johnson short story "The Man Who Shot Liberty Valance."\n\nIn Johnson\'s story "Rance" Foster is an insufferable eastern snob itching to face Liberty Valance in a gun duel because the outlaw had savagely beat him for no reason, injuring his sense of eastern superiority. Cowboy Bert Burricane saves him from dying of thirst on the prairie, but he repays Burricane with indifference and, on his own, begins pistol practice for his showdown with Valance. He dislikes everyone in town because he\'s humiliated at having to take a swamper\'s job in a saloon. And although Burricane\'s girl Hallie is drawn to Rance because of his education, he conceals his attraction for her because he\'s embarrassed to show interest in an illiterate girl he\'s teaching to read. When Valance comes to town Rance jumps at the opportunity to meet the outlaw and gain respect in the eyes of others even if it means his death. Burricane kills Valance from a concealed vantage point just as the two men fire, making it look as if Rance killed Valance. When Burricane tells Rance he killed Valance, he explains that he did it because he loves Hallie enough to let her have the man she wants. After recovering from a wound he received in the gunfight, Rance marries Hallie and is elected Senator in part because of publicity generated by the shooting. Years later when Burricane dies alone and forgotten, Rance returns to show respect for the man who changed him.\n\nBut instead of making James Stewart\'s character, Rance Stoddard, an eastern snob, Ford and his writers make him an idealistic young lawyer, uncomfortable with guns, who is beaten by Valance when he stands up for fellow passengers in a stagecoach holdup, and who continues to seek remedy through the law until forced into one desperate, violent act. John Wayne\'s character, Tom Doniphon, doesn\'t save Rance from his macho pride for Hallie\'s sake. He maintains his usual tough guy persona, urging Stoddard to get a gun, a man who is disappointed to find, when he loses Hallie after killing Valance, that the gunman\'s day is past. In Johnson\'s story the tough westerner ironically must teach the easterner to be a gentle man. But that\'s too radical a concept for Ford and the writers, who subvert Johnson\'s irony to make her story fit the western conventions she was trying to deflate.\n\nBut aside from the watered-down story, there are still the seemingly obligatory Ford inanities. Wayne and Stewart were certainly too old for their parts, and O. Z. Whitehead, who was one of Ford\'s Stock Company in \'40s, plays a sullen, truant teenager in Stoddard\'s school, even though he was in his fifties. Then there is Woody Strode\'s "Yassuh, Boss" portrayal of Tom Doniphon\'s "boy" Pompey, and Edmund O\'Brien\'s bombastic, drunken newspaper editor, an over-the-top ripoff of Thomas Mitchell\'s Doc Boone from "Stagecoach." And Ford insists yet again on having John Qualen annoy us with his best stage-Swedish accent.', u'-0.349959'], u'tt0075148': [u'It\'s hard to explain what this movie means to me. Words could never. I remember when I was a kid, I never liked the first Rocky, was too obsessed with III and IV. It happened when I was 11 and I went to see V in the theater. I never been to a movie like that before. People were screaming and cheering. Shook the whole damn place. They were dancing in the isle\'s and celebrating. It was then I realized the true power of Stallone\'s vision. The realization that only the original would ever really matter.\n\nRocky to me is so many things. I had to beg my girlfriend to see it. She said she doesn\'t like boxing. I almost dumped her right there. If she wasn\'t so hot, I probably would have. I was crushed that someone could think that this movie is about boxing. To me it was never that. It\'s about a guy, much like you or me, who\'s down on his luck and everyday feels like Sunday. He\'s pushing 30, single and broke. I\'m sad to say that at this moment it almost reminds me of myself. Every minute more another reason. \n\nIt\'s hard to pick my favorite scenes from the movie. I love the chemistry between Rocky and Adrian (Shire). When he\'s talking to door and she finally comes out and then stops to look in the mirror. It\'s a thing of beauty. Or when Mickey (Meredith) goes over to Stallones apartment. Rocky gets upset and punches his shitty wall, then goes to hide in the bathroom. The look on Stallone\'s face when he comes out to find Mickey still there is priceless. I heard it wasn\'t in the script or directed, just happened. But the one that does it for me is when he comes home in the opening scene after the chapel fight. He turns on his record player and goes for a beer, but it\'s empty, like everything else in his life. Talks to the turtles and his fish, why because the Rock is lonely. Goes to the mirror and practices a joke for his love. Looks at a picture of himself and realizes he\'s wasting his life. It\'s more than beautiful or real.\n\nIt\'s safe to say that I have seen the original more than 100 times. I still feel all the emotion. I love this movie more than any other film. I hope one day, with God\'s help, to show it to my kids and have them feel the same way. I think if I ever got the chance to meet Stallone, I\'d want to thank him. Tell him how he changed my life. But in reality, he probably wouldn\'t care. Because, "I\'m at least half a bum."', u'-0.181391', u'"Your gonna eat lightning and your gonna crap thunder" \n\nRocky is about a poor boxer living his life in Philadalphia. His life changes when an invitation from the heavyweight champ Apollo Creed is given to him.\n\nRomance, Drama, Fight.\n\nStory- With minimum resources and low money, this movie was an underdog itself. Stallone wrote it and fought to play Rocky. When they were low on resources, they changed the story all together and made it even better. The story is flawless and keeps you on the edge of your seat. 9/10 \n\nMusic- The best thing about the movie itself. The music in this movie is guaranteed to give you goosebumps every time you watch it. Bill Conti gives you an excellent score throughout the movie, including the famous "gonna fly now". 10/10 \n\nActing- 4 nominated performances in this movie. The acting is very good as well, especially Burgess Meredith who offers one of the greatest acts I have ever seen. Stallone plays Rocky Balboa and changes his voice very well to be Rocky. He did a very good job. Talia Shire plays Adrian, a shy pet store owner who has never had a BF before. She did a good job as well. Burt Young plays the drunkard Paulie. Burgess Merideth plays the boxing trainer Mickey. I have never seen a better performance. 9.5/10 \n\nStallone fought for this triumphant movie that made me want to go the distance (sounds corny but its true). It made me strive to work harder and not give up. If you haven\'t seen this, buy it and watch it. I\'ll guarantee it will change you too. A classic.\n\nI give it a perfect 10/10', u'0.199451', u'\nI don\'t remember exactly when I first saw this film, but for a long time I thought that the second of the series was my favorite.  Well, I recently bought the DVD box-set and after I watched the first movie again I knew that it was definitely the best in the series, and also one of the best movies ever made.  Rocky is very much more than just a boxing movie.  It\'s a movie about the unbreakable human spirit, determination, and the will to "go the distance."  Rocky(Sylvester Stallone) is a second rate club-fighter and a debt collector for a loan shark(Joe Spinnell).  He becomes involved with a shy girl working in a petshop named Adrian(Talia Shire), and also becomes friends with her brother Paulie(Burt Young).  Rocky\'s life really isn\'t anything of interest - until the World Heavyweight Champion Apollo Creed(Carl Weathers) gives him an unexpected shot at the title.  An old boxer-turned-trainer named Mick(Burgess Meredith) offers to be Rocky\'s manager.  Although the whole film is outstanding, what follows are some of the greatest and most memorable movie moments of all time.  Rocky striving to go the distance in the training scene, the final fight, and the closing moments of the film are so emotional and inspiring that they perfectly demonstrate the human spirit and can bring out the will to win in anybody. Add to this an excellent music score and you have  a classic and unforgettable movie.  Without a doubt deserved the Best Picture award in 1976.   Exceptional performances by all the cast members, notably Burgess Meredith and Sylvester Stallone.  **** out of ****', u'0.503118', u'"Rocky" is about a man. It is the story of a man who exceeds past all normal expectations and makes the most out of what he is doing. What is he doing? Boxing. Why? As Rocky says in the film, "You have to be a moron to want to box."\n\nRocky is played by Sylvester Stallone, whose only other film before "Rocky" was "Weekend at Kitty and Stud\'s," and, as you can probably guess by the title, it was an X-rated movie. But Stallone gives just about the best performance of his career here. Before he started getting into recycled action movies and unfunny comedies, the man had talent, as seen shining through in "Rocky." Somewhere along the way he lost that talent, but it\'s pretty evident that he had it at one time.\n\nStallone wrote the script, which is about a down-on-his-luck Philadelphia man named Rocky Balboa. Rocky is your average tough-guy you see walking down the street, but this film takes a closer look INTO the guy walking past you, and not AT the guy walking past you.\n\nHe lives in a beat-up, old apartment, infested with roaches, and he barely makes enough money to support himself. His job? Rocky retrieves money for loan sharks. His real job, however, is to break the loaners\' thumbs if they don\'t pay up. He\'s a muscle man.\n\nAfter he returns from his "job" every day, he takes time to do what he has been doing for the past six years, which is boxing. Then, after that, he takes a trip to the local pet store to see the love of his life, Adrian, who works there. He constantly tries to impress her and talk to her, but she is shy and literally does not talk much throughout the entire film.\n\nBut things change for Rocky after heavyweight champion Apollo Creed (Carl Weathers) decides that he wants to make a big performance on the 4th of July. He wants to appear nice by letting a regular Joe Schmoe fight him in the ring. All for show, of course. As he is looking through a book of local boxers, he points his finger at the letters THE Italian STALLION, a.k.a. Rocky. He says that fighting an Italian is perfect. "An Italian found America," Creed says. If he fights an Italian-American on the 4th of July, it will be symbolic and will also make Creed look good.\n\nBut Rocky doesn\'t realize this is all for show. When he receives word that Apollo Creed wishes to fight him in the ring, Rocky begins to train long and hard with Burgess Meredith, which results in the famous scene where Rocky runs up an entry of stairs in Philly with the music "Gonna Fly Now" playing in the background. This scene is spoofed by films world-wide, and it\'s one of the cornerstones in film history. You will see it all the time. It\'s just one of those film moments that are marked down in history.\n\nThe most entertaining thing about "Rocky" is how innocent Sylvester Stallone comes across in his role as Rocky. You feel for him when he is trying to impress Adrian and she shrugs him off. The scene where her brother invites Rocky over, and Rocky keeps saying, "Are you sure she knows I\'m coming?" is a sign of how the guy has been put down. And then when she comes over to his apartment, he acts nice and talks to her. He\'s not trying any moves on her. He just enjoys being with her. Rocky is a bit of an idiot, as he himself admits, but he\'s a sweet idiot.\n\nAnd the end, when Rocky fights Apollo Creed, is amazing. A nobody who actually stands a chance against the heavyweight champion of the world. Creed and Rocky are being battered by each other. Creed goes into the opposite corner as Rocky, and one of Creed\'s managers says, "This guy thinks this thing is for real -- knock him out!" You feel sorry for Rocky there, because he is giving the fight all he\'s got, when it was just a publicity stunt from the beginning, but he didn\'t even realize it.\n\nThings like that are what make "Rocky" what it has become over the years. It is a great film, and it has many classic moments that you will see spoofed in films all the time. You should probably see it just for that fact.\n\nBut the truth is, if you take away all the underlying intricacies, "Rocky" is just the story of a simple guy who gets a chance to do something amazing, and he gives it all he\'s got. I think we\'ve all gone through something like that before, and if so, you will be able to identify with "Rocky" all the more.', u'-0.0101631', u'\nWhen I was a kid there were only three major things in my life: food, wrestling and `Rocky\'. My brother and I followed the numerous Rocky Balboa struggles religiously, and even today, there is no exception. Although the latest efforts of Stallone have been pitiful, the movie that made his career is the 1977 Academy Award Winner for Best Picture, `Rocky\'. On top of that, `Rocky\' also earned two more Academy Awards for Best Film-Editing and Best Director (John G. Avildsen).\n\nThis movie is unlike any other ever put on film. It\'s films like this that remind us of the beauty that is going to the cinema, and if only I was around during that year when such films as `Close Encounters of the Third Kind\', `Jaws\', `Saturday Night Fever\' and `Network\' were all playing in cinemas. The storyline takes place in Philadelphia, where Rocky Balboa (Sylvester Stallone) struggles to make a living as both a small-time boxer, and the brawn of a loan shark. Until one day, a sudden opportunity is handed to Rocky to compete for the World Heavy-Weight Title against the champion, Apollo Creed (Carl Weathers), a charismatic and flamboyant fighter labelled as `The King of Sting\' and `The Master Of Disaster\'. Attracted to Rocky\'s reputation as "The Italian Stallion", a match between Creed and the unknown boxer is set, which is subsequently advertised as a fight where a "nobody" can become a "somebody". Mickey (Burgess Meredith), is the owner of the gym where Rocky trains and later becomes Rocky\'s manager. Mickey is passionate about the world of boxing, and believes that Rocky has the potential to go the distance, instead of being `a cheap second rate loan-shark\'. However, the central character in Rocky\'s life is Adrian (Talia Shire), a shy pet-store clerk, who acts awkwardly when Rocky even breathes in her direction. However, these almost completely distant outcasts are strangely drawn to each other. While one `didn\'t have much of a brain\', the other `didn\'t have much of a body\', so they worked on their opposites, only to end up together. The legend of this film when it was first released in the mid-70\'s was: `His whole life was a-million-to-one shot\', but what Stallone did was prove to the world that `Rocky\' is one-in-a-million.\n\nSeeing `Rocky\' is both a cinematic experience and a religious experience. When first released, the film appealed to the widest audience, and all felt the emotion and intense passion which passed from the film, to them. The film\'s possession of realistic acting, superb dialogue and the most phenomenal music score by Bill Conti to date, indeed transformed the face of cinema. Stallone\'s wholesome performance of his own screenplay is electrifying as the film celebrates of the underdog battling to beat the odds. Fans of cinema aren\'t manipulated into thinking that the inevitable will happen as it does in every other tedious hero drama.\n\nOver 25 years on, `Rocky\' still manages to let the audience\'s emotions explode; Rocky\'s blossoming relationship with Adrian, the seedy worlds of Mickey and Adrian\'s alcoholic brother, Paulie (Burt Young), and the affirmation of Rocky\'s inability to overcome Creed. And who could forget the excruciatingly compelling Balboa / Creed confrontation? Rocky\'s determination overturns the boxing fraternity, and supplies cinemaphiles with one of the greatest moments in cinematic history, as a body of spectators both on-screen and off applaud and chant for Rocky in unison. The following four Rocky sequels attempted to deliver the same magic as the original, however failed to convey it\'s message. `Rocky\' illustrates how life itself is stifling and perplexing, but sometimes when you lose your way as well as your original intentions, you may just find something better.\n\nSimply put, if anyone has a free Friday / Saturday night, this is the film to go out and borrow from the local video store. It\'s unbelievable that this film was only voted in at #78 on the AFI Top 100 films of all time, and worse yet, was voted in at the SECOND best sports film of all time (the first went to `Hoosiers\', starring Gene Hackman). C\'mon people, be you black or white or brown or any other skin colour we have yet to discover, get out there and be inspired by Stallone\'s masterpiece, `Rocky\'.', u'-0.012468', u'One of Stallone\'s first and finest feature film performances is as Rocky Balboa, a lonely, small-time boxer who gets by doing muscle work for a neighborhood loan shark. Everything about his life spells "underdog"-- he\'s even left-handed. He lives alone in a shabby apartment, and when he\'s not slowly being swept aside at the local gym, where even the trainer calls him a bum, he fauns over an introverted pet store clerk named Adrian.\n\nHe gets his first break when he\'s chosen at random by heavyweight champion, Apollo Creed, to take a shot at his title. No one thinks he can beat Creed-- not even Rocky. All Rocky wants is to be able to go all ten rounds with the champ, because no one else has. And in the final ten minutes of the film, Rocky finds out just how far he can go.\n\nWhat\'s terrific about this movie is that it\'s about Rocky. It\'s not about winning; it\'s not even about fighting. It\'s about Rocky and his desire to get by in the world without being a bum. The sequels to this widely popular film have focused more heavily on the upcoming fight, whereas this story focuses on Rocky\'s life. He doesn\'t want to win; he just wants to survive and feel good about himself. That\'s what most of us want, and that\'s why this film is a classic.', u'-0.335074', u"If you think Sylvester Stallone has made nothing but stinkers you just have to see 'Rocky'. This is a brilliant film, based on Stallone's own screenplay, where he plays a complex character in such a terrific way it is not strange people thought this was going to be a great actor. Compare it to another great film about a boxer, 'Raging Bull', and 'Rocky' will be better at some points. It goes without saying that it's quite an achievement.\n\nThe story is about Rocky Balboa (Stallone), a boxer who once had a glorious future, but now fights for little money in gyms. Then, out of the blue, he gets the chance to fight the heavyweight champ Apollo (Carl Weathers), a stunt from his side. Although Rocky seems to have no chance he starts his training to make the best of it, although at first he is too proud to accept any help. The scene where he finally accepts the help from his old trainer Mickey (Burgess Meredith) is one of the best scenes in the film. Rocky also starts dating the very shy girl Adrian (Talia Shire), sister of his friend Paulie (Burt Young).\n\n'Rocky' is a terrific film in every aspect. The acting is what amazed me the most. Stallone gives such an impressive performance it is very hard to believe he is also the star of films like 'Over the Top', 'Stop! Or My Mom Will Shoot' and 'Judge Dredd', and from the other 'Rocky'-films for that matter. Not only Stallone is impressive, Shire, Young and Meredith find perfect notes for their characters as well. Every little thing that happens seems natural through their acting and of course Stallone's screenplay does a great job here. Director John G. Avildsen serves this material the way he should. Of course he is no Martin Scorsese, 'Raging Bull' stays the better directed film, but he knows how to tell this story.\n\nI do not like boxing very much, so a boxing-film is not something I would enjoy. But this is not a boxing-film, it is a film about a boxer. It tells about a character who happens to be a boxer running for a title. This is probably one of the points where the other four 'Rocky'-films fail and where films like this one and 'Raging Bull' and Clint Eastwood's 'Million Dollar Baby' succeed.", u'0.125438', u"\n    As much as the media mocks Stallone, he won best picture for this film.  He will never top this film, which made him a icon.  It's a story about a down on his luck loan collector/ boxers who gets a one time shot at the heavy weight championship, because of a late pull out by a contender, and the champ does not want to lose his money on the deal.  There is romance between Rocky and his new girl friend who lives just as hard of a life as Rocky, and together they make life livable. The rest of the cast is other down and outers who give the viewer a feeling of hopelessness until Rocky gets his chance.  This film is touching, and unforgettable.  \n", u'-0.0712651', u'\nThe first common misconception about Rocky, and something that\'s almost inevitable when you put a half-naked Stallone with boxing gloves on the cover is that it\'s a fighting movie.  In that time it would fall into a category including Jean-Claude Van Damme and Jackie Chan.  Now don\'t get me wrong, I like both of these actors a lot, they\'re among my favorites, but Rocky is not just another cheap movie about a man who like to win a fight or tournament because he deserves it (Bloodsport, Quest).  Instead of a fighting movie we should say that it is a movie about a fighter.  That changes the context altogether, it means that sure he has fighting on his mind but has other personal issues that are demonstrated throughout the movie.  In fact in the whole movie there are two fight scenes (at the beginning and at the end) which together add up to about 15 minutes.\n\n\nThe rest is the portrayal of a man who has never had it easy in his life but nonetheless keeps his heart.  That is to say that he keeps his moral and ethics, just keeps on trying no matter the hardships.  A MAN WITH A DREAM... an un-realizable dream to be frank.  But in the end, a lot, even most, of our dreams are un-realizable... but we try anyway.  The difference here is that this man is given a shot at his dream, a "one-in-a-million shot". It\'s something that we all would like so we can relate and CAN\'T HELP but cheer for him at the end of the movie.\n\nThe largest portion, in minutes, of the movie is actually devoted to the love theme between Rocky and Adrien.  So that should maybe make this a "love story" movie instead of fighting movie.  Adrien is another of his dreams, slightly more attainable which is why he devotes more of his time everyday to trying to attain it (her).  She won\'t open up to anybody but in the end, with a certain amount of tenacity on the part of Stallone, she can\'t help but fall for the heart deep inside the rough exterior.\n\nAnother theme here is that of fraternity between Rocky and Mickey, his trainer/manager.  In fact THE MOST TOUCHING SCENE in the whole movie in my opinion is one of about 15 to 20 seconds long and without any words.  It\'s when Mickey goes to see Rocky at his home the first time to see if he can manage him.  Rocky gets angry with him but keeps it to himself until Mickey leaves, at which point Rocky takes it out on the door jam and yells at Mickey who can still hear him outside.  Rocky\'s life is being turned upside down by this whole "fighting Creed" business and although it is his dream, he doesn\'t know how to deal with it and is scared to get mangled in the ring, knowing he\'s not of the same caliber as the champ.  The touching scene is when he realizes that he has yelled at an old man.  His heart takes him out into the street after Mickey, he joins him and shakes his hand.  The beginning of an enduring friendship which will ultimately lead to tears in a\nlater film (Rocky 3 and 5).\n\nThis movie simply seeps with "classic", and by the end you know you have just seen a movie of courage, of the portrayal of "the indominable spirit of man" (Rocky 3).  No matter the difficulties, Rocky\'s heart takes him through it all.  It doesn\'t fit the mold of today\'s classics (like Private Ryan) with melodrama and grandiose scenery, just a simple movie, with simple qualities but very large meaning intricately woven into the fabric of the film itself by Stallone and the director John G. Avildson, with the musical overtones of Bill Conti.  A classic from a different age, and the mold of a lot of movies to follow.', u'-0.065415', u"If there is a chance for you which can turn you from nobody to somebody, how would you treat it? Would you let it go pass because it is almost impossible to achieve or you want to use all you have to give it a great shot? This is what the movie about, how a struggling underdog became hero, legend or more. This is the one of my favorite movies. Because it has a simplest storyline but it successfully gave expression to it's theme-if you want to be on the top, you have to pay the price which means hardworking and determination A good movie must require an understandable storyline which clearly tells its theme. That is why I think rocky is a great movie. The movie is about the sudden life change of a struggling underdog boxer-Rocky, the world champion set up a fight between himself and Rocky, but he decided to give it the greatest shot just to prove that he is not a bum for a entertainment show. So basically, whole movie is about how Rocky trying so hard to achieve his goal: go the distance with the champion.\n\nThe acting of the film is another shinning point; it has many great actors in it. Especially the main actor Sylvester Stallone (Rocky) he made a great impression in my mind by his excellent pyrotechnic acting skill. In the famous fighting scene, Stallone performed an emotion of a boxer who is suffering from pain, frustration and exhaustion, but he is not giving up. The scene became so real because Stallone's incredible performance. Also, other actors like Burt Young (Pauline), Tailia Shire (Adrian) Burgess (Mickey) acted perfectly in the movie.\n\nIf there is anything else can highlight the movie that is the fantastic music used in the movie. Because the music played in the movie perfectly contributed to the atmosphere of each individual scene. E.g. when Rocky started his morning run, pumping up style music plays simultaneously while he is running, that generated a memorable scene. Also again in the fighting scene, a part of passionate and stirring background music played when rocky is trying so hard to stand on his feet, it has successfully reinforced the mood of the scene.\n\nThis movie is simple but well made. Fantastic music, excellent action sequences and incredible acting crew lined with a nice storyline to express its theme: a man can be anyone he wants to be but is requires great determination and stamina to achieve that. The movie is appealed to audiences who are 15 or above, and strongly recommended to every boxing fan! PG Rating: 8/10", u'0.566567', u'After not seeing this film since it had come out in the theaters in 1976, I was almost shocked at how little action this movie had compared to what you see today....or in the Rocky sequels, for that matter. It\'s okay. It was needed to give us character studies of the main players: Rocky, his wife, his brother, his manager, etc., people we would see in subsequent films. Also, the fight scenes in those sequels went on too long, anyway. Frankly, I\'ve enjoyed all the Rocky movies, beginning with this one.\n\nIn this film, the romance between "Rocky Balboa" (Sylvester Stallone) and "Adrian" (Talia Shire) was a major subplot to the boxing saga. It reminded me a bit of the \'50s film with Paul Newman, "Somebody Up There Likes Me." If you enjoyed this movie, check that classic film out.\n\nThe DVD transfer is excellent, especially considering the movie is 30 years old.', u'0.315461', u'\nRocky is one of two great boxing movies. Only Raging Bull challenges Rocky as the greatest boxing movie of all time. Not only is there great action inside the ring, the story and drama outside the ring makes for a movie worth watching over and over again. There is no doubt in my mind it should be at least in the top 25.', u'0.0256367', u'\nThis is the first (and the best) chapter of one of the most famous saga ever. The story of an unknown boxer that have the chance of his life challenging the world heavyweight champion. A story of hope, of dreams that come true, where the life suddenly changes form a day to another. From the misery of Philadelphia suburbs to the fame and the glory. ', u'0.637091', u'Stallone is just perfect as Rocky, a "bum" who gets a shot at the Heavyweight title in Boxing. \n\nWhat works perfectly here is the era in which this film was made. I seriously doubt that had this movie been made a decade later it would be half as charming. It\'s got that glorious 70\'s trashy style film-making and setting which made films like Midnight Cowboy or even Five Easy Pieces so appealing to begin with. The characters here feel real and authentic, and most of all, completely human. Nothing spectacular about them, more or less lowlifes who wouldn\'t arouse any interest in other people than social workers perhaps. \n\nThe script by Stallone is exceptionally good and completely deserved the Oscar. Rocky is a treasure of a character and Stallone plays him to perfection, really should have picked up an Oscar for that as well. This is basically a fairytale story in a different setting and almost feels very real.', u'0.465958', u"Rocky Balboa (Sylvester Stallone) is a struggling Italian/American boxer who also earns cash collecting debts for shady Philadelphian 'businessman' Gazzo (Joe Spinell). When heavyweight boxing champion Apollo Creed (Carl Weathers) finds himself without an opponent for his upcoming match, he offers the unknown fighter a chance at the title as a gimmick, but doesn't count on Rocky's determination to go the distance.\n\nI watched Martin Scorsese's Raging Bull not that long ago, an excellent film, but something of a downer\x97a gritty study of a not very nice character whose horrible personality and poor choices see him winding up losing everything. Rocky, on the other hand, is a real feel-good film about a guy on the skids who is given a once-in-a lifetime opportunity to make something of himself. It's an uplifting Cinderella story, a classic underdog tale that leaves the viewer with a big smile on their face, which is why I prefer it slightly over Scorsese's film.\n\nRocky also has a great story behind the making of the film which mirrors that of its main character: star Stallone went from an almost broke struggling actor to Hollywood mega-star by not only writing the script for Rocky, but also insisting that he play the title role. The rest, as they say, is history.\n\nThose only familiar with Stallone's later action hero work will be surprised at how good an actor he is in his breakthrough role, tackling the drama just as well as the boxing: Rocky's burgeoning romance with shy pet store clerk Adrian (Talia Shire), his friendship with her brother Paulie (Burt Young), and his strained relationship with trainer Mickey (Burgess Meredith) are all handled superbly.\n\nDirector John G. Avildsen also manages all aspects of his film with aplomb, with the final fight between Rocky and Apollo being the absolute showstopper, a gruelling battle of wills, both combatants pushed to their limits. Add a rousing score from Bill Conti and what you have is an unmissable, uplifting classic of the '70s.\n\n9.5 out of 10, rounded up to 10 for IMDb.", u'0.160704'], u'tt0861739': [u"Tropa de Elite is an amazingly good film; by turns brutally real and horrifyingly hilarious.\n\nIt claims to be based on a true story and I find that sadly believable. The main plot revolves around the captain of an elite police unit trying to find a replacement for himself, while dealing with the birth of his child and the horrendous stress of his job, and a mission to clear out a dangerously violent slum.\n\nThere are no wholly good people in the movie, and it's frighteningly easy to compare some of what goes on to things happening in the USA (and other places) today. That said, the system of government and policing portrayed comes across as so amazingly inept and awful that it's almost like something straight out of a nightmarish sci-fi dystopia.\n\nIf I had to compare it to other movies, it comes off as a cross between Brazil, Office Space, and Full Metal Jacket. Not for the weak of stomach, and you may find yourself greatly disagreeing with the ideals of various groups portrayed (which I believe is part of the point), but I would be enormously surprised if this movie doesn't make you think and give you something to talk about.", u'-0.186179', u"The movie tells the story of BOPE, which is equivalent to the SWAT in Rio de Janeiro, Brazil. Only difference is that, in Rio, the police is so corrupt, that they often must fight for themselves.\n\nThe movie has action - a lot of action-, and it also touches on deep sociological problems that plague the city to these days. It's a great compliment to City of God and, in my opinion, even better. City of God shows how the drug problem started in Rio. This movie shows where the city is now.\n\nVagner Moura is perfect in his role. He's a great good-bad guy. The movie is brilliant.", u'0.332465', u'"City of God" was just a perfect movie. "Elite Squad" goes beyond that; it\'s a WTF movie.\n\nBrutal realism, terrific acting (Wagner Moura... wow), brilliant script and plot, precise edition, unforgettable quotes... This movie is just insanely good.\n\nIf you live in a developed country you\'ll probably think this is just another thriller. For anyone living in a 3rd country it\'s way more than that: it\'s a brutal picture of our degradation and corruption, a revelation that runs over you like a truck.\n\nThe most striking aspect about the movie is how clearly it shows how everyone is at the same time guilty and victim in the whole war against drugs: the do-gooders NGOs, the politicians, the corrupt police and the not-corrupt but truculent "Elite Squad". It shows it precisely but with sense of humor and very smartly. In this war, everyone that proclaim to have moral and values is actually hiding skeletons in the closet. It\'s all a story of gangsters against gangsters in a degraded society.', u'0.162003', u'In 1997, before the visit of the pope to Rio de Janeiro, Captain Nascimento (Wagner Moura) from the elite squad BOPE (Special Police Operation Battalion) is assigned to eliminate the risks of the drug dealers in a dangerous slum nearby where the pope intends to be lodged. Captain Nascimento is trying to find a man to replace him because his wife is pregnant and he intends to quit the command and become a trainer of the new recruits. Meanwhile, the two idealistic friends Neto (Caio Junqueira) and Matias (Andr\xe9 Ramiro) join the Military Police force expecting to become honest policemen and fight the criminals. However, they see only corruption, lack of competence and efficiency, manipulation of data and stupid bureaucracy in the Military Police, and after a serious incident in the Morro da Babil\xf4nia, they decide to join the BOPE. The lives of Capitain Nascimento, Neto and Matias are entwined along the next months, first in the tough training period and then in action against drug dealers. Nascimento believes that Neto could be his substitute, but his impulsive attitudes jeopardize his choice. Later, the intelligent Matias seems to be the correct choice, but he needs to prove that he has heart.\n\n"Tropa de Elite" is the most impressive and realistic movie I have ever seen about the police forces in Rio de Janeiro and the role of the society in Brazil. In a city surrounded by more than seven hundred slums, actually lands without law and ruled by drug lords, this movie depicts the corruption of dirty policemen, the incorrect behavior of part of the society and the importance of the BOPE, a team of well trained men that can be compared to the American SWAT. The narrative in off of Captain Nascimento follows his saga, showing an obstinate man divided between his professionalism and love for his career and his family; Neto, an impulsive and honest military policeman, but not smart to be a leader; and Matias, who is studying in law school and is very intelligent and also honest, but is not totally committed with his responsibilities of policeman. The story is so realistic that seems to be a documentary with scenes very well choreographed. The direction of Jos\xe9 Padilha is simply outstanding, using a magnificent screenplay and excellent actors and actresses. In an inevitable comparison with "Cidade de Deus" ("City of God"), these movies complement each other. "Cidade de Deus" discloses the lives of criminals, and "Tropa de Elite" of policemen and part of the society. This movie should be nominated to the Oscar, but unfortunately what the Academy usually selects does not correspond to the best of the cinema. My vote is ten.\n\nTitle (Brazil): "Tropa de Elite" ("Elite Squad")\n\nObs: (a) On 29 September 2007, I saw this outstanding movie again with a group of friends and family. \n\n(b) "Tropa de Elite" was awarded with the Golden Bear of the Berlin Festival on 16 February 2008.\n\n(c) The DVD is scheduled to be released on 28 February 2008.\n\n(d) Many expressions used in this movie ("Aspira" ("Ensign"), "Bota no Saco" ("Put in the Plastic Bag"), "Pede Para Sair" ("Ask to Get Out"), "Voc\xea \xe9 Moleque N\xe3o \xe9 Caveira" ("You Are a Kid, not a Skull") etc.) have been incorporated in Brazilian Popular Culture.\n\n(e) "Bota no Saco" ("Put in the Plastic Bag") the Brazilian Commission that has not selected this movie to dispute a nomination to the Oscar in the Best Foreign Language category.', u'0.202182', u'"Tropa de Elite" isn\'t merely one more Brazilian film on urban violence; it\'s a cathartic socio-cultural phenomenon of almost unprecedented proportions in Brazil, the omnipresent theme on TV talk shows, newspapers articles, bars and dinner tables. Prior to its theatrical release this October, "Tropa" was seen by an estimated record 11 million people who bought pirate DVD copies or illegally downloaded it on the net (the biggest Brazilian box-office success in the last 25 years was "2 Filhos de Francisco" with 5,5 million tickets sold).\n\nThe reaction is passionately polarized: some call it the best Brazilian movie since "City of God" -- a definite influence here, in the cinematography, editing and screenplay structure, with an omniscient narrator and use of mixed chronology -- exposing the endemic corruption of Rio de Janeiro\'s police force and the "unorthodox" methods used by BOPE (the self-called "incorruptible" elite squad of Rio\'s military police force, created in 1978 and inspired by the U.S. SWAT) that include torture and shoot-first-ask-later modus operandi in the ultra-violent, ever-growing drug war in Rio\'s favelas. Others have publicly attacked it as fascist in its glorification of BOPE, its sadistic depiction of torture and the reductionist, simple-minded vision of the complex issues involving violence/ drugs/police corruption in Rio. \n\nDirector Jos\xe9 Padilha and co-writer Rodrigo Pimentel (a former BOPE captain who left the squad for disagreeing with its praxis) had collaborated in the extraordinary "Bus 174", a multi-faceted documentary on Rio\'s violence. In "Tropa", they controversially chose to give us a deliberately biased vision of the problem: from the start we\'re stuck with one man, the overstressed, rebellious, self-righteous Capt Nascimento (Wagner Moura) in his journey into becoming a psychopathic sadist and hot-blooded killer, who believes drug traffic is caused by the druggie middle-class bourgeoisie (as if the poor didn\'t do drugs!) and claims the solution is to kill all traffickers. To Nascimento, corruption is abominable; torture isn\'t.\n\nNascimento is the film\'s absolute protagonist, narrator, commentator and "truth-puker". In his mind, all non-elite policemen are corrupt and incompetent, all charity NGOs in the favelas are cover-up fraudulent enterprises, all college students are useless double-faced potheads, and legal procedures are an inefficient waste of time. He\'s nearer to the traffickers\' violent, revenge-based, lawless ethics than he\'s ever able to realize.\n\n"There\'s nothing wrong with shooting people if you shoot the right people", used to say Clint Eastwood\'s Dirty Harry back in the 1970s, and it could well be Capt. Nascimento\'s motto. He\'s a vigilante in uniform, in the tradition of the executioners played by Eastwood, Bronson, Stallone and 24 Hours\' Jack Bauer; he\'s the heir to the 1970s\' Brazilian military regime know-how on torture. Yet, the film tries hard at "humanizing" Nascimento: his wife\'s pregnant, his marriage falters, he\'s moved to tears by the suffering of a mother who lost her son in the traffic war, he\'s in medication for his panic attacks. AND he\'s trying to save the POPE\'s life, no less! \n\nAll the other characters are just rough sketches or caricatures. The one character who might be the classical "narrator/observer" (like Buscap\xe9/Rocket in "City of God") is the idealist, Foucault-reading aspiring police officer Mathias (though it\'s hard to believe an aspiring officer could afford to attend Rio\'s most expensive law school). But Mathias, too, is finally co-opted by the brainwashing "Full-Metal-Jacket"-like BOPE training that changes him into an amoral beast fueled with rage.\n\nPadilha says he wanted to portray Nascimento as a monster, and that audiences who are hailing Nascimento as a "hero" and BOPE as a "model" institution have caught him by surprise -- oh, really? Padilha is probably being sarcastic, naive or silly: everybody knows movie vigilante cops have been consistently idolized the world over (and co- writer Pimentel has publicly disagreed, stating the "Tropa" is clearly pro-BOPE). The graphic, sadistic scenes of torture -- supposedly meant to inspire disgust -- make the delight of a large vigilante-minded part of the audience. And Wagner Moura\'s extraordinary, scary performance as Nascimento is unsettling: we can\'t dismiss him as a stupid fascist the way we dismissed inarticulate stiffs like Bronson, Seagal or Stallone. The fact is that there\'s now a BOPE cult-following, with BOPE\'s logo (a skull pierced by pistols and knives) reproduced on t-shirts and underwear, BOPE officers being cheered in the streets in their armored "glory", and young kids (from all social classes) mimicking the film\'s "bag-in-the-head torture" as a new bullying style. \n\nMilitarists and pacifists will hardly change sides after the watching the film; militarists will have multiple orgasms and pacifists will cringe in horror. The filmmakers aren\'t interested in seriously discussing the drug issue (legalization is not even mentioned as an option). Nor in exposing Rio\'s drug traffic\'s multi-fingered interconnections, the zillion-dollar, highly organized international business involving farmers, money-washing executives, chemistry labs, gun-runners, bankers, politicians, accountants, lawyers, transport systems, etc. Nor in showing the real victims: the majority of the favela inhabitants, who aren\'t involved in the drug business but have to live under its rules, mere "extras" whose fate (in movies and in real life) is to be used, humiliated, segregated or, worse, wounded/killed by random bullets from BOTH policemen and traffickers. \n\n"Tropa" is a must-see film, but it\'s misleading and entrapping: by opting for an "open", "what would YOU do?" ending (probably influenced by the breathtaking finale of "Paradise Now"), the filmmakers demands us to take sides about a very, VERY complex issue they\'ve shown us only ONE angle of. "Tropa" is cinematically dazzling, but so physically and ideologically nauseating you\'ll need an antidote -- be sure to also watch the faceted, influential documentary "Not\xedcias de uma Guerra Particular" and be aware of many other angles to a terrible reality that plagues not only Rio, but most of Third World\'s chaotic, no-man\'s-land, way out-of- control big cities.', u'-0.546838', u'It\'s the best police movie I\'ve ever seen. \n\nIt\'so realistic, specially the shots. The "microwave" scene was also perfect!\n\nThere is nothing compared to this film! I haven\'t seen one single person who watched this film which have seen it only once. It will surely win festivals! The film is not finished yet (someone put it in the internet illegally)and it have been incredibly so well accepted by everybody who have seen it, so we can guess how it will be when it finally be released in the Cinema. It probably have been the most searched film in the internet in Brazil the last 2 weeks.\n\nThere are rumors it\'s censored and producers are fighting against that! Anyway, that\'s the best police film I\'ve ever seen and surely the best of 2007.', u'0.161817', u'If you loved City of God and Carandiru, you have to see this movie. Maybe it\'s the most complex Brazilian movie about violence. It combines a discussion about the problem of violence in Rio de Janeiro, the police corruption and the society responsibility and, what is more important, Elite Squad is a terrific thriller: nervous, intriguing and entertaining. Cinema at it\'s best. \n\nBr\xe1ulio Mantovani, from City of God, wrote the screenplay and Daniel Rezend, also from CDD, is the editor (Both nominated to the Oscar).\n\nAbove, one article about the film: \n\n"WASHINGTON (Reuters Life!) \n\ncharacters lie dead in the street within minutes of the opening of Brazilian director Jose Padilha\'s new film which he hopes will shed new light on gang violence and police corruption in his country.\n\n"Elite Squad," which Padilha wrote with former Rio police officer Rodrigo Pimentel, follows two young Rio de Janeiro police officers as their fantasy of implementing law and order disintegrates into bloodshed and corruption.\n\nIt details night raids through the makeshift homes of the city\'s hillside slums known as favelas, as well as the stark class differences that feed an appetite for riches among many of its poor residents.\n\nPadilha, 39, said he had originally hoped to use the information he received from Pimentel for a documentary but quickly realized that it would not be feasible.\n\n"How would I do this, go to corrupt cops with cameras?" he asks. "If I tried to make this film as a documentary, it would probably get me killed." Padilha, whose highly-acclaimed debut film "Bus 174" about a real-life bus hijacking in Rio was released in 2002, has strived to make the film as realistic as possible, shooting much of the film on the favelas\' narrow streets.\n\n"Elite Squad" is based on Pimentel\'s account of his tenure as captain of Rio\'s elite police force which has come under attack by Amnesty International for brutality.\n\nLike "Bus 174," it exposes the darker elements of Brazil that contrast vividly with the nation\'s colorful, extravagant Carnival celebrations."', u'0.0551971', u"Elite Squad is a most see movie. Despite all of the frenesi it's causing all around, it has a good storyline, excellent screenplay and a brilliant performance from all the cast in the movie, especially Wagner Moura who deserves all prizes he can get for this great performance.\n\nBasically the movie explores the fight between drug dealers and corrupt cops against the good policemen's, some of them from the military police force and most of them from BOPE. That's the way the director Padilha's sees this fight which is not entirely true. Although it shows how the corruption of the Military Police Force works out in Brazil, how the system is used against itself and how the bureaucracy makes everything so difficult that it's almost impossible for honest people to deal with their own personal issues without dealing with corruption. And by the way, that's entirely true.\n\nThe baseline of the movie is the story of Nascimento's, who is the captain of BOPE (Special Forces Operations Battalion) which can be compared to SWAT. Nascimento needs a replacement and he needs to find the right person, someone who has all of the qualities the job demands. Two guys come up to be this person but none of them have all it takes. Neto has the attitude, the heart, but he's not smart and centered as he's best buddy Matias. The only thing they have in common which is mandatory for the job is the honesty and the will of changing things for the better.\n\nThe movie has all the elements that makes us go to a movie theater. It has a storyline, it has action thriller, and it has a great performance from the cast, all of them.\n\nIf you are planning to spend your money in another blockbuster, don't do it! Give a chance to this great movie that explores the WAR that we, from Rio de Janeiro, have to deal with everyday. It's not only about the fun you are going to have watching this peace of work but the truth you are going to see on it.", u'0.352406', u"If you have enjoyed City of God or felt like something was missing on it, then this is the movie you need to see. Everything here is placed respecting the reality... Scenes are very realistic and all action makes you feel like be in part of it. It shows how policemen are involved with criminals and how many policemen are not involved at all and get blamed by society due to some bad fruits. It shows how family can get affected how two guys with same purpose can get trapped in two different situations.. And shows how a man can be changed by the environment that simply leads him to do what he must. That's how we do a great movie without wasting millions of $$$. Perfect movie, dramatic, sensitive and intelligent.", u'0.252861', u"Well, i don't know if this movie is gonna be exported or not, maybe yes 'cause some titles is in English, but this is a must seen movie! This is a action movie showing everything occurs in the Rio de Janeiro's police. War, corruption, fears, i think this must be the Brazilian movie of the year! \n\nLet's talk about the history: Captain of BOPE (Special Police Operations Batallion in Portuguese) after some time fighting against organized crime in the slums wants to quit but before he must find a substitute.\n\nThe only ones that can do the test to goes BOPE are Military Policemen. Captain soon see that he have 2 good men in hands (they are infancy friends), 1 have heart and the other intelligence, but the substitute must have the 2 attributes.\n\nThe movie have about 110 minutes and keep your eyes on the screen from the beginning to end (a lot of shoot out), and title in English is Elite Squad.\n\nWell i'll stop from here, but again, this is a must seen movie if you want to see a action movie in the real life, because we here in Rio de Janeiro live this, we see this, this is our war that is bit worse other wars.", u'-0.064731', u'Elite Squad has in my opinion surpassed the genius of Cidade de Deus. The movie is shot like a documentary, many times in fact I felt like I was intrigued and interested on how and what the police does to get around the city.\n\nIt is basically about the two main characters working their way up the police academy in Rio until they reach the BOPE unit. The training is shown to be very harsh, sometimes even dehumanizing. The movie depicts life of police men in the city and what they do to overcome the unfortunate bureaucracies. I will try hold myself to not say anymore because I do not want to spoil it for you.\n\nThis movie is violent. It is not unnecessary violence, because its depictions are said to be accurate. (Rio politicians have spoken about its veracity).\n\nEven the production of this masterpiece was bounded by violence. While in production, part of the crew was kidnapped. An unedited version of Elite Squad together with dozens of fake weapons were stolen as well.\n\nYou will be amazed through out the whole film, thats a promise.', u'-0.159564', u"This movie will certainly be seen as another (perhaps good) thriller by most of the non- Brazilian audience. But the movie is not just that, in fact, it's way more than that. Several good thriller movies plenty of violence and shootings scenes have been produced in the last couple decades. But one thing is to inject a lot of money to make a movie on gratuitous violence and rely on special effects to make it get good critics, which then bring the desired money that moves the cinema industry. This is Hollywood, and this is definitely not what Elite Squad is about. The movie has raised and keeps raising important social questions among Brazilian citizens. The way the director tells the story without taking part in any side is genial; contrary to most north American movies, there's no good or bad guy in the story, the situation got to a point where things simply are the way they are. No particular point of view prevails and the viewer gets out of the movie with mixed sensations about what to think about all he sees. Victims of Brazil violence praise Captain Nascimento character to a level of national hero, whereas he ends by being hated by many others who dispraise his ignorance on human rights. There's also a thesis in the movie sustaining that all the violence is fruit of drug commerce, which would exist because the middle and high Brazilian classes buy the drugs to sustain their hedonistic life style. These are the same people that frequent movie theaters in Brazil, create the public opinion, and constitute the Brazilian intellectual society. Therefore \x96 independently of the thesis being right or wrong \x96 the movie somewhat also points the finger to the audience and blames it for all the violence. I think this is also genial, but one has to live there to really feel the whip of this blaming (again, one must have a bit of Brazil culture to really appreciate this movie). While you sit with your popcorn and hope for watching a good thriller, bear in mind that the violence you are seeing in Elite Squad is happening at this very moment, and this is what distinguishes this movie from other violent movies you saw.", u'-0.16996', u"After watching the amazing movie, City of God, a few years ago I just wanted to see more. Although Tropa de Elite has the same raw look of City of God, is different in content. \n\nTropa de Elite is about a group of Rio de Janeiro cops that grow tired of the system and declare war against crime and corruption and literally aren't taking any prisoners to the point that you just can't help but cheer for BOPE no matter their brutal methods of interrogation. \n\nThe photography is stunning and the action is extreme and realistic. You have to see this movie more than once because there is so much going in terms of plot and action that you might miss it. The story is well put together and the acting is as good as any, but what I liked the most was the sense of dread BOPE was able to inflict on the minds of criminals and corrupt cops. If you like City of God and City of Men, you will absolutely love Tropa de Elite. Highly recommended!", u'0.191815', u'This is one hell of a movie. I don\'t like to give 10 ratings to movies, because it\'s hard to find a movie that is excellent, but this one is.\n\nWhile you watch the movie it\'s unavoidable to compare it to City of God (Cidade de Deus), and until the middle of the movie I was thinking to my self that City Of God was a better movie then this one, but when this movie ends and I summed everything I saw, it\'s was harder to choose one, but I believe this one is better, for several reasons.\n\nFirst of all this movie has a great story, and focuses on real life issues, I\'m not from Brazil, but I know some of this stuff is true. This story has emotion, feelings, twists, action, romance and even comedy for those who understand Portuguese I would say "Bota ai na conta do Papa" is a real funny statement. One of the things I loved about this movie was the acting, where Wagner Moura does one hell of a job, as a Captain trying to find a substitute so he can leave his job and be with his family. I wouldn\'t say I\'m surprised because Brazilians are great actors, but still, I loved it.\n\nIn conclusion, if you like action, and like City of God, then you should definitely watch this movie.', u'0.534162', u'Having seen "Cidade de Deus" and thoroughly enjoyed it (though it is a grim tale), I was at first having high hopes for "Tropa de Elite". Then I thought that it could never reach the same high standards, and my hopes were lowered a great deal.\n\nAbout 3 months ago I happened to see about 15 minutes of the movie, and that lowered my hopes even more. How wrong I was to judge such a great movie on what must have been an unfortunate 15 minutes.\n\nI won\'t go into detail about the story, but it is both believable and compelling. Like "Cidade..." this is no fairy tale. It\'s the world as it is. No more, no less. Of course, there might not be that many guns blazing in reality, but I\'d reckon this isn\'t very far off.\n\nWe feel the pain, the lack of morale and the despair and hopelessness. Photography is spot on, the acting is both fantastic and realistic. "Tropa de Elite" never went into the big theaters here in Denmark which is rather unfortunate, since it\'s a true gem. Instead we get loads of mainstream crap. Not to sound arrogant, I watch loads of mainstream movies too (voluntarily, even), but it\'s movies like this that made me love movies as fondly as I do.\n\nDo yourself a favour. Get this on DVD. See it. Feel the pain. Immerge yourself in the desperate world. Then, after it\'s all over, enjoy your life, a life that will seem much, much brighter after this.', u'0.0670759'], u'tt0032138': [u"\nI have a theory that this movie has probably been seen by more people than any other movie. The fact that it comes to us as children is probably the reason why. Other films like 'Gone With the Wind', 'Citizen Kane', 'The Godfather', 'Star Wars', have been seen by a lot of people but in each case I can imagine people that might not have seen them. In the case of 'The Wizard of Oz' it's hard to imagine anyone who might not have seen it at some point in their lives. Almost everyone you talk to has a memory of their first experience. The reason this movie remains the most beloved of Hollywood films even after six decades is because 'The Wizard of Oz' is unique among motion pictures in that it mirrors our longings and imaginations as children. \n\nThe movie, in front of and behind the scenes, has become movie folklore. We love the legends about the rotating directors, from George Cukor to King Vidor to Victor Fleming. We know the legend of Buddy Ebsen who had to drop out due to an allergic reaction to the Tin Man makeup and Margaret Hamilton whose dress caught fire and nearly had her face burned off because of the copper-based make-up. We love stories about the problems on the set between personal feuds, sweltering costumes, partying munchkins and the costume designer who had to keep up with Judy Garland's developing bust line. There's even a spurious legend of a ghost on the set. All of these elements make 'The Wizard of Oz' a much bigger legend than it already it, but that's okay because this is the one movie that deserves to be over-hyped. It occupies such a large part of our memories that we want to make it more than it is, to just have one more reason to make it more than a movie, we want it to be a life experience.\n\nThat experience is brought to us because we are intimately familiar with its story elements. The dreams that Dorothy sings about and the adventure that follows seem to mirror our yearnings as children. She imagines a bigger place where her problems don't linger and she is free to explore them. She imagines a place where there isn't any trouble and people actually listen to what she has to say. She sees the rainbow as her golden gate to a better place because in her drab Kansas world, the rainbow is the only source of color that she knows. She dreams of a bigger place and imagines a world where troubles melt like lemondrops. We can relate. How many of us as kids sat in our room or in our yards and played, imagining a place to go and characters to interact with, a colorful world bigger than our small, confined worlds. \n\nOz is meant to represent the colorful palette of our imagination but for Dorothy it is also a place where she does some growing up. The three friends that she meets along the way, The Scarecrow, The Tin Man and The Lion are emblematic of the lessons of bravery, love and devotion and the ability to think for ourselves. The Wicked Witch of the West certainly represents the real dangers along the way. For Dorothy there is a matronly figure, Glinda the Good Witch who intends for Dorothy to discover for herself how to solve her problems, she knows that Dorothy must grow up along the way. In a way, she seems to represent the parent that Dorothy doesn't have back in Kansas. Her aunt and uncle love her but this was a movie made during the depression and we imagine the climate that they live in, where work means keeping the farm. No work = no farm = no home.\n\nFor 1939, Dorothy was the perfect character for young girls. She echoes many of the small town country girls who, in the midst of the depression, packed their suitcases and ran to Hollywood seeking fame and fortune in the movies. For them this film is a cautionary tale that they'd be better off if they just stayed home. Judy Garland was perfect in the role, 17 at the time, but with wide-eyes and a beautiful, open face she carries that sense of wonderment of a child. Like most of us as children, her only true companion is a dog named Toto and the most frightening moment in the film is when she is nearly robbed of her best friend. When she sings 'Over the Rainbow' we know that it's to escape an unhappy childhood (she has apparently lost her parents) and for Garland we identify. She began in show business as a kiddie act with her sisters and began her long movie career when she was only 13. She was already a familiar face from 'Love Finds Andy Hardy' and by the time of 'Oz' she was already under contract to MGM. That she was familiar to audiences helped her in the role. That familiarity works well with her ability to project the vulnerability and melancholy that the character has to have. We have to believe that she will become frightened and that her life will be in danger because if she doesn't that we sense that the character can work her way out of the situation herself and our interest wanes.\n\nIf movies are a time capsule than 'The Wizard of Oz' wonderfully captures a brief moment of happiness in Garland's life. We know of her problems with studio execs that put her through an exhausting schedule and used drugs to get her going in the morning then put her to sleep at night. We know the legends of her mental and physical problems that dogged her most of her life but 'The Wizard of Oz' sees her at a moment in her life when it all seemed perfect, just as her star was rising and before her problems really began. There's poignancy in that, and that's why I think that the casting of Shirley Temple in the role would have been a mistake. By 1939, Temple was the biggest star in the world her presence in the film would have been too much, she would have stood out and we would only seen Shirley Temple, not Dorothy Gale.\n\nGarland's presence allows the story a certain credibility. I have tried to imagine that famous dance down the Yellow Brick Road with a 4 foot child and it just doesn't fit.\n\nIf Garland gives the film its center than I think the production design, awe-inspiring in 1939, is the perfect backdrop. In these early musicals filmed on a soundstage it isn't hard to spot where the soundstage ends. Some have seen that as a flaw but I think it adds to the dreamlike quality of the film. The matte paintings behind the sets add to the storybook quality. The fact that we're in a dream makes it okay that the special effects look a little hasty. That was the genius of the screenplay, that and to establish the Oz characters as characters that Dorothy meets in Kansas. In our dreams we often see people and events that have recently occurred in our lives, but this is the first time I've ever seen it expressed in a movie. In particular is the notion that Professor Marvel keeps showing up as various characters in the dream.\n\nWhat generosity the filmmakers had. What ingenuity to create this entire world that is colorful and beautiful and scary. What depth of character they created. What messages they send. This is a movie constructed with loving care. We're told that those who worked on the film just thought of this as just another movie, but when I watch the film I find that hard to believe. Certainly from the screenwriters. I wonder if they saw how brilliantly they were tapping our frustrations and our excitement, our dreams, our need and our sense of wonderment. I wonder if they knew the impact of what they were working on, that the lovely sentiments that they created would still resonate 60 years later. I wonder if they knew that their heart's desires weren't that far from our own.\n", u'0.0988192', u'People talk about The Wizard of Oz as a backdrop to their lives; and how true that is. I just saw it again, DVD, for the first time in--gosh!--20 years. There was a little art house in Lansing Michigan USA that ran it back then, on the popular premise that there\'s nothing like TWoO on "the big screen." That\'s the last time I\'d seen it, \'til today.\n\nI guess the part that "gets" me about the movie is how the writers made it pretty plain that the Scarecrow, Tin Man, and Cowardly Lion really already had what they thought they were missing; that their respective problems were in misapprehending their own complete natures. That\'s a powerful statement for many of us. I found myself most touched in scenes where the Scarecrow was showing wisdom, the Tin Man feeling deeply ("...when I think of Dorothy in that awful place..."), and the Lion...well, maybe accomplishing this effect was harder in his case...what *is* true courage?\n\nAnyway, if you\'re reading this here, you must be a movie weenie, and you\'ve no doubt already seen the movie, so I\'m not going to recite the usual "go see this movie" mantra.\n\nI was just very touching to see this movie again, at this phase in my life.\n\nI will mention a few more things about how I now see this movie as a "growed up" (I\'m almost 50): It\'s interesting how you can see the production values of the time; the lot sets and special effects and so forth. This movie is a powerful example of how a good story overcomes limited means in other areas.\n\nPeople who look back with disdain on the low-tech chintz of old movies can see in TWoO the magic ingredient; narrative solidity. And I\'m not a pollyanna about this: I\'m sure the underlying reality behind its making is rife with horror stories of expert disagreement, rewrites, discarding, jerryrigging, and the rest of it. But in the end, something like narrative love won out; and that\'s the important thing.\n\nOh: And having Harold Arlen write the music was good luck indeed. And orchestrations which cleverly appropriated very tasty new ideas in composition (polymodalism, non-standard phrasings, etc.) didn\'t hurt, either!\n\nGeez, this movie is such a little universe....I\'d better stop here.', u'0.19721', u'Dorothy\'s trip, as we follow her from her Kansas farm down the Yellow Brick Road to the Emerald City and back home again, is depicted with rare cinematic imagination and skill\x85 \n\nAt the beginning, we may wonder at the obvious falseness of the black-and-white Kansas setting, although the monotonous, arid landscape ultimately makes an effective contrast to the later scenes in Oz\x85 But rationality disappears the moment Judy Garland strikes at the heart with her trembling singing of "Over the Rainbow." And when Frank Morgan appears as Professor Marvel, we are captivated by his familiar bumbling charm\x85\n\nDorothy\'s entrance into the land of Oz remains one of the screen\'s most memorable moments, as the black-and-white scene give way to glowing color photography\x85 "I have a feeling we\'re not in Kansas anymore!" is her understated response as she enters Munchkinland\x85 The sequence in Munchkinland, though beautifully designed, is actually, a mixed blessing\x85 Billie Burke is exactly right as the Good Witch of the North, and Margaret Hamilton is wonderfully shrill and repulsive as the Wicked Witch of the West\x85 But the Munchkins themselves, midgets gathered from all over the world for the occasion, are all wonderful with their prematurely old faces and chipmunk voices\x85\n\nThe talents of Dorothy\'s friends\x97Jack Haley as the Tin Man, Ray Bolger as the Scarecrow, Bert Lahr as the Cowardly Lion\x97have been frequently celebrated, but their good humor and their shining humanity behind the grotesque makeup remain fresh eternally\x85\n\n"The Wizard of Oz" is a joy forever\x85 Why does it still glow, while other films of the period grow dimmer every year? It is unquestionably due to more than the sum of its sterling cast, winning songs, and lovely special effects, although the absence of these virtues has turned more than one "musical fantasy" into failures\x85 It may be that Dorothy steps from black-and-white Kansas into the bright colors of Munchkinland, she is taking everyone\'s first voyage of discovery\x85 With the universality of the best fables, "The Wizard of Oz" has her learning about evil (the Wicked Witch), friendship (her companions on the road to Oz), and fallibility (the Wizard). And somehow children\x97and the child in all of us\x97like to see this voyage made repeatedly\x85 \n\nChildren as adults, today as in 1939, "The Wizard of Oz" will remain for us the beloved movie ever made!', u'0.301455', u'\nThe NBC Peacock began unfolding its wings.  "The following program is brought to you in living color--with portions in black & white--on NBC." That exclusive intro began my exposure to color television at Grandma\'s in 1968.  When Dorothy stepped out into Technicolor, I\'ll bet my eyes just popped.\n\nThis is the Movie of All Time, folks--a status achieved during its long run as a huge annual TV event during that classic era whose programs now show up on TV Land network.  In the 1970s, Peter Marshall once read the answer on Hollywood Squares as to the program seen more times by more people than anything else ever shown on television.  It was "Oz."  Likewise, no movie has the hold on popular culture that this one does.  What lion character ever since (i.e., Snagglepuss) hasn\'t been an impersonation of Bert Lahr going, "Put \'em up, put \'em uuuuup!"\n\nFew musicals offer an equal combination of lovable music and engaging story. Perhaps "The Sound of Music."  Hard to think of many Hollywood musicals where the story gets as serious as it does here when the Witch informs Dorothy that, "The last to go will see the first three go before her...and her mangy little dog too!"  Yikes!  In contrast, even the best of other Hollywood musicals seem to serve up fluffy, forgettable story lines that are mere backdrop to the song numbers that typically put the plot on hold.\n\nI can\'t say that "Oz" doesn\'t have technical flaws or story element inconsistencies.  It\'s just that the astonishing production values all around so overwhelm the shortcomings.  The tornado sequence is a 1939 special effects tour de force--incredible.  And the Nutcracker-quality musical score offers songs tastefully interwoven with the action.  Certain numbers like "Merry Old Land of Oz," I never get tired off, though I like each of the songs.\n\nOz should be viewed in the lightness of spirit that it deserves.  I mean look, we have Frank Morgan as the Emerald City gatekeeper, then seconds later as the cabbie with the Horse of a Different Color, then the Wizard\'s palace guard, and then the voice of fire-and-smoke Wizard of Oz who bellows, "Step forward, Tin Man!"  What other film could put an actor go through 4 quick-changes within 10 minutes to such an endearing result?  "Oz" is as magic as those sparkling ruby shoes.\n\nThe early Technicolor process utilized triple nitrate negative strips--separately recording each primary color in light.  This was done due to the lack of a suitable "color film" in 1939.  That would quickly change--but films from years following suffered from hues that faded with the years, even original negatives.  Because "Oz" was actually filmed on a black-and-white base film, the negatives never faded.  So now we have home videos/DVDs of breathtaking color quality.  Now, the tinted filters in the cameras that separated the colors onto the negative strips meant that intense illumination was required, rendering the filming experience miserably hot for the actors involved, especially Lahr.  But they all hold up amazingly well.\n\n"Oz" has a valuable message.  As the pop group America once said, "No, Oz never did give nothin\' to the Tin Man....that he didn\'t, didn\'t already have."  If we have truly search, we can find within us--or create through trial, like the Lion\'s courage--what we think we most lack.  The Wizard (like the Lord) helps those who find help within themselves.\n\nI feel sorry for the Almira Gulches who can\'t treasure this film experience. They need to visit the Emerald City to get their own ticking Testimonials and find their hearts.\n\nDidn\'t bring your broomsticks with you?  Well, I\'m afraid you\'ll have to walk.', u'0.0691623', u"\nI remember watching this movie when they would air it once a year on CBS a few years back. Now it is shown on a couple of different networks quite frequently. This is a wonderful film for the whole family. Who wouldn't want to take a journey to the magical land of Oz?\n\nI think that it is terrific how well this movie has held up over the years. It's going on sixty-two years since it was first released and yet, it is timeless. It is great to look back on a film that was made in the thirties, and compare it to the movies made in this day and age. This is a film that will just be something that stays around forever. \n\nThe Wizard of Oz is enjoyable for people of all ages. Everything about it brings a smile to my face. Wouldn't it be wonderful to just magically be transported to a land of talking trees and little munchkins? Of course it would be. The flying monkeys, a talking lion, the astounding ruby slippers, and everything else adds a special kind of magic to the screen.\n\nThe atmosphere and setting is magnificent. This is one of the things that makes the film so stunning. Anyway, the forest, the witch's castle, and even the farm is really well laid out.\n\nI don't think that the casting could have been done any better. Judy Garland shines as the innocent Kansas girl. Her dancing and singing just brightens the whole story up. The lion, tin man, and scarecrow perform amazingly also. Everyone involved down to the littlest munchkin acts so well.\n\n\nEven though this is a movie for everyone, it is categorized as a children's flick. The writing is good with very simple lines and problems, but slightly complex so we're not falling asleep of boredom. \n\nWhat's left to say? Other things like the wardrobe, special effects, musical talents, and even the famous yellow brick road, are so well put together. Oz gives us an idea of what an almost perfect world would be like. No matter how old this movie becomes and we still look back on it, we'll still be able to enjoy at least one thoughtful movie. Classics never die. (Hence the name.)\n", u'0.552924', u"When I was a very little boy, I saw that movie on The Bulgarian National Television and I really fell in love with it:)). It was a kind of magic that took my heart to eternity and from there it saw all the world in a very amusing way:)). I will probably never forget the first time I saw that movie...I really hope that everybody will continue watching it and it won't be among the forgotten movies... If you're very very young and you haven't seen it yet, then see it, you will feel the greatest force of the white magic:)))).\n\nJudy Garland is THE PERFECT DOROTHY!!!:)))\n\nSee it, OK??:)))))", u'0.478754', u'\nJudy Garland\'s portrayal of Dorothy, Dorothy\'s oddball Oz friends, "Somewhere Over the Rainbow", and the rest of this fine production of "The Wizard of Oz" have lost little of their magic over the years. While it has become oddly fashionable in recent years to deride this kind of classic, innocent fantasy, the movie itself has aged very well, and it is likely to retain an appreciative audience for some time to come.\n\nThere\'s no doubt that part of the appeal of the story and the characters comes from them being such old friends to so many cinema fans, but there are also good reasons why they have endured for so long, and have been able to hold up even after becoming so familiar. Although Dorothy is not a particularly complex character, she represents an innocent but deep yearning that is easy to identify with. Likewise, the \'Oz\' characters are bizarre enough to remain interesting, but there is a core of substance that again is easy to believe in. Who does not feel that he or she could use at least one of the things that Dorothy\'s friends want?\n\nThe adaptation from the original story is done quite well, making fine choices for the characters and episodes that would work on film. The settings and visual effects may not impress the devotees of today\'s computer imagery, but in their time they certainly demonstrated a great deal of skill and planning, and even now, in their own way they are more believable than are most of the computer tricks that have become so overused.\n\nThe popular story has also been used for a number of more recent adaptations, and some of them have had some good points of their own. But this Wizard remains by far the most wonderful of the versions of the classic tale.\n', u'0.282943', u'Where to begin? MGM\'s elaborate adaptation of L. Frank Baum\'s 1900 fantasy classic THE WONDERFUL WIZARD OF OZ not only became an institution among itself (and practically defined the concept of modern popular culture), but is reported to be the most viewed film ever made. A sharp screenplay effectively condenses the novel\'s text into a workable film, and director Victor Fleming (along with countless other behind-the-scenes technicians) craft a visually stimulating fantasy world that surpasses the expectations of even the most imaginative viewers. Brimming with stunning visual effects (the film\'s fierce tornado is an FX feat that has yet to be surpassed by CGI), witty dialogue, and eye-popping Technicolor, THE WIZARD OF OZ truly lives up to it\'s reputation as a once-in-a-lifetime film where every element comes together flawlessly.\n\nThe cast could not be improved upon. The quivery-voiced, solemn-faced Judy Garland will always be Dorothy, the little lost farm girl on the road to Oz, clutching her beloved Toto (impressively portrayed himself by the female canine performer Terry, the terrier). It seems inconceivable that MGM had originally wished to cast Shirley Temple in the role, as Temple\'s doe-eyed, cutesy-voiced shtick would have been a catastrophic ill-fit for the tone of this picture. Conversely, Garland is perhaps the screen\'s quintessential woman/child; always seemingly just one step away from reaching full emotional maturity. It is her sadness that transfixes viewers to the screen, the exact same quality that made the film\'s most memorable Harold Arlen/E. Y. Harburg number "Over the Rainbow" into one of the most exquisite marriages between artist and song ever to be recorded.\n\nThe remainder of the cast is similarly exceptional, many of whom perform perfectly even under the most debilitating make-up and costumes. Frank Morgan is marvelously versatile in no less than five roles, the insanely energetic Bert Lahr mugs brilliantly, the handsome Jack Haley swoons sweetly, Billie Burke lends the film an ornate ethereality, and Ray Bolger\'s gravity-defying physical presence nearly steals the entire picture on several occasions. Perhaps most notable is former schoolteacher Margaret Hamilton\'s transformation into the wickedest of wicked witches, which certainly remains among the vilest and most terrifying portrayals of full-throttle evil ever to be seen. No matter how it is analyzed, scrutinized, or satirized, the 1939 production of THE WIZARD OF OZ is a top-notch example of how to turn a great story into a fabulous, milestone of a film.', u'0.446734', u'Even with the advance of special effects there will never be a movie as honest and as true to its heart as THE WIZARD OF OZ, with the exception of THE LORD OF THE RINGS TRILOGY. But since the latter is too new, it can\'t be compared to the former. Everyone at one point of their lives, especially as children, has seen this film and has experienced the emotions that Dorothy experienced, the terror of entering the Wicked Witch\'s lair, her transition from little girl to wise young woman, and this incredible world that L. Frank Baum created and Hollywood perfected.\n\nWhat makes a great movie? The experience that you are watching it for the very first time, whether you were seven years old or an adult living in an adult world. This film is one of those. Even when as an adult I can see some of the cracks peeking through and some lapses in continuity, who cares? The tornado ripping through the cornfields is as real as the real ones I have seen even though is was really muslin. The moment that the sepia-tones from the Kansas segment peel away and Dorothy opens the door of her house and I saw the bright colors of Oz I knew I was there. The story had enveloped me now, as it had did back then. In my world, this is an utterly, fantastic film.\n\nAnd what is Oz, by the way? Well, from a little girl (and the child in all of us), it\'s that place where our imagination runs wild, where everything is perfect, where there is no tomorrow and a yellow brick road will take us to that perfect place filled with song. It\'s that place where we feel we will belong, and who as a child didn\'t feel like we were out of place? Notice I repeat the word \'place\' because this is so much about placement, places, our place and therefore, our own self-expression, our own sense of self. Who hasn\'t wanted to "seek a place of one\'s own\' where light and love prevailed only to return back to where we came from, stronger and wiser? Its message is so universal. Truly, there is no place like home.\n\nTiming is crucial for the symbolic success of this movie as well. Still in the middle of the Depression years, when unemployment was at an all time high, it focuses not just on the harshness of keeping a farm, but then throwing a parent-less girl into a strange land who finds a foster mother of sorts who would tell her that the way back home would not be an easy one. Glinda the Good represents this character, the same way, the Wicked Witch of the West represents the darker forces that watch her every move and aggressively try to trip her up. This is quite a lot on the shoulders of a little girl, and having Judy Garland -- not yet the major star but just on the brink of becoming one -- play Dorothy Gale has become casting history. In 1939 she was about seventeen, fresh-faced, innocent and vulnerable: she is Dorothy, and we can\'t imagine anyone else, not even nearly 70 years later.\n\nAnd speaking of casting, it was genius to have the actors playing Dorothy\'s friends and enemies in Kansas also show up in Oz. Since the movie is so much like a dream, it\'s more than logical: many people in our lives sometimes show up in dreams -- it\'s even in books about dreams. That they also represent that which not only they, but Dorothy most of all, lacks -- courage, love, and wisdom -- makes their appearances even more intrinsic to the story, so when they grow as characters, so do we, and of course, so does Dorothy.\n\nTHE WIZARD OF OZ is timeless. So simple, so honest, but so deep in its messages about love and self-discovery. All of the actors including the veteran Billie Burke would be remembered the most for their roles here more than any other movie. The set direction is made to look as close to a storybook; all that is missing are the page frames. There isn\'t a false move here, and all those back-stories... well, their okay to read but for the cinema lover looking for magic, it\'s all here, in about two hours of pure entertainment.', u'0.424162', u'One of the most cherished fantasy films to ever grace the screen, "The Wizard of Oz" stands as a crowning achievement in 1930\'s film making. The special effects are highly impressive considering the limited technology available at the time, not to mention they are infinitely more endearing than most CGI effects present in today\'s films. The lavish sets, impeccable costume design, and glowing Technicolor help to create a convincing and enchanting Land of Oz. And though obviously filmed on a soundstage, the sets never seem confining; thanks largely in part to the meticulous backdrop paintings used to add depth to the foreground. The musical numbers are quite lively & catchy -- never slowing the pace of the film -- except perhaps for the Lion singing "King of the Jungle". Judy Garland truly shines in her portrayal of Dorothy, perfectly capturing the wide-eyed innocence of her character. She definitely deserved the special Oscar she was awarded for her performance. Margaret Hamilton as the Wicked Witch of the West, Ray Bolger as the Scarecrow, and Frank Morgan as the Wizard also turn in praiseworthy characterizations. Definitely timeless in every sense of the word, this film is recommended to those of all ages \x96 a 10/10!', u'0.810926', u"Dorothy is a young girl living on a Kansas farm, during a tornado, she, along with her dog Toto, is swept up and plonked down in a magical and mysterious land known as Oz. Desperate to get back home and under threat from a wicked witch, she is advised to seek out a great wizard who should be able to help her get back home. As she sets off and on her way she meets and befriends a wonderful array of characters whom also have something to ask of the fabled wizard, it's a journey that will prove to be both magical and fraught with danger.\n\nThe Wizard Of Oz is a film that has been pored over and dissected from almost everyone involved in the wonderful world of film. One thing that strikes me every time I view it is that their not only is no place like home, there is also no film like The Wizard Of Oz, and really, when all is said and done, there is unlikely to be another film of its ilk to ever grace the silver screen. Upon multiple viewings only the most biased of film fan could say that it is a technically perfect picture, it clearly isn't. At times it's a wee bit creaky and when scrutinised, some of the performances in the piece are far from an excellent standard, but crucially any misgivings are quickly erased due to the wonder of it all because the film has an ability to transport everybody who is watching into OZ alongside Dorothy.\n\nThe Wizard Of Oz appeals {and caters} to every demographic and pretty much any age group; adventure, meeting new friends, fears and trepidations, booming colour, songs to singalong with, and of course it's total point of homely values: The Wizard Of Oz stands up well 70 years later because it taps into all the emotions available to the human being, be it a young child spellbound on a first viewing, or an octogenarian couple of grandparents wistfully humming along to the tunes, it's a film that shouldn't be dissected looking for faults and hidden meanings, it's a film that should be loved and praised for the ode to fantastical whimsy that it so obviously is.\n\nThe film of course will forever be associated with its darling star, Judy Garland. Viewing now, and knowing what a sad life she would eventually lead, The Wizard Of Oz is a fitting picture on which to remember what a magical and wonderful performer she was, myself as a 14 stone lump of waning machismo, I have no shame in saying that as Judy sings Somewhere Over The Rainbow I melt and feel as tho I'm being sent spinning into another world, that's the power of the piece, as a sepia Kansas becomes the glorious colour of Oz, nothing else in my world matters, I'm in hook line and sinker.\n\nThere are many interesting back stories to the picture, with books galore available to anyone interested. Some notes that might interest you being: original castings to be W.C. Fields, Shirley Temple and Deanna Durbin, munchkins running riot, drunken cast members, sadness and suicides, and grizzled old pros fighting hard not to let Garland steal the picture. Well it makes for a great read, for sure, but what remains to this day is one of the most beloved pictures to have ever been made, for once in the pantheon of great cinema we have a film that is termed a classic, that actually deserves to have that tag. One of the great things about the advent of technology is that it can benefit old classic movies to make them better, for now we can view remastered editions of The Wizard Of Oz and appreciate even more what a great job the makers did. Keep your eyes on Dorothy's Ruby Slippers during the film and see how they are the sparkling important character that they should be, or take in the brilliant work of the make up crew, the tiniest of rivets on The Tin Man a testament to the brilliant work that goes into bringing magic to our lives. Get the newest copy you can and then see it on the biggest screen available to you because The Wizard Of Oz is a 10/10 movie: and then some.", u'0.555926', u"\nFantastic tale about a Kansas farm girl who's spirited off to the wondrous land of Oz. The film still tingles with freshness and beauty. Garland is forever memorable as Dorothy Gale, the young girl and the supporting performances of Bolger, Lahr,Haley, Hamilton and Morgan are all stand out and will remain national treasures. The superb songs of E.Y. Harburg and Harold Arlen are still beautifully blended with the lovely photography, cinematography and art direction. Unforgettable!!! ", u'0.904509', u'It\'s often been said that this is a simple tale, a story of the coming of age for Dorothy. It\'s not that simple. It\'s also a story of the coming of age of America as seen through Dorothy\'s eyes.\n\nDorothy is a familiar American teen who grew up on a farm, a bit naive, never been to a city, but heard about them. Is family focused, but starting to open her eyes to a bigger world around her and looking for familiar structures through which she can understand that world.\n\nThe scarecrow, who thinks he\'s lacking a brain, is the American farmer. Usually minimally educated, often thought (at that time) of as stupid or ignorant, but it\'s proved through the movie that farmers in fact have a brain. Farmers are often known for their strong common sense and wisdom which is often undervalued by city folk or college types.\n\nThe cowardly lion represents the elected politicians. Afraid to do anything - especially preemptive - and shirks facing any controversy until it bites him on the rear. Only later to find that the problem was impotent all along. Politicians haven\'t changed in some ways.\n\nThe tin man represents industry, which is often seen as heartless machine. But when run by people who have compassion, companies have proved to "have a heart". This generosity is often seen in the form of philanthropy, but sometimes exists right in the corporate culture itself. Industry isn\'t always as heartless as a robot (or computer, to use a more modern metaphor).\n\nPoppies, which represented the opium drug from China that can distract us from our goals and our responsibilities, like the more modern cocaine, marijuana, or even liquor, etc.\n\nThe "wizard" turns out to be only a mere human, as all of our heroes turn out to be in the end. We can strive to be like them, but it\'s only when others place us on a pedestal that our daily acts of heroism seem larger than life. It\'s those daily acts when added together that are truly the heroic in us all.\n\nThe wicked witch, the "enemy" of America, requires more than just an army to be overcome, it also requires brains, courage and a heart to be overcome. By "heart" understand that compassion, sympathy and empathy are vital weapons in the battle, which is why America invests so much in foreign aid.\n\nIt\'s this depth of storytelling that keeps us captivated by this movie as adults. There are many other reviews that better articulate the other great features to this film, such as the visual appeal, the music, the singing, the dancing, and...', u'-0.00251069', u"Spoilers Ahead:\n\nThe real best picture of 1939 not that overrated, boring piece of crap: Gone With The Wind. Please, this is one of the most beautifully crafted little treasures with great moral depth and above all a great heart. The song of youth, the longing for Transcendence: Somewhere Over The Rainbow. It captures what it is to be young. Yet, its power carries forward into adulthood. The feeling that happiness is just further along waiting to be attained. The acting and characterizations are the star of the movie. Who else but Margaret Hamilton could be the Wicked Witch Of The West? When Dorothy sees Auntie Em in pain looking for her, how quickly she runs back home, just as the kind huckster intended. That is the treat of this little treasure, the good hearts of the people within it. Having watched this movie since I was a child, on broadcast television, every November, I still love it as much as I did then. The movie is filled with wonder and humor for all ages. It models loyalty, love and courage in the face of great fear. There is not a better film to show to your children. Its teachings are always hidden deep within its allegorical script so that is is never pedantic or professorial. Just a sweet, timeless classic of a band of seekers joining together in friendship.\n\nWhen you watch it, over and over, you can but wonder what on earth the Academy was thinking when they snubbed this eternal treasure for the young and the young at heart. Who would not want to live within a world with this kind of warmth. Take it from a cranky, misanthropic, old philosopher; the movie is as powerful and moving today as it was seventy years ago. Dorothy lost and alone but for Toto is aided in seeking out the Wizard so she can return to Kansas. She meets others who work together; they fight the evil Witch; indeed, later sneaking into her castle to rescue Dorothy. This is the film's genius, it does not lecture or say goodness, it shows goodness. In its little way, risking your life to help your friends is modeled and shown for the good that it is. A musical with not only a brain, which is rare for a musical, but a great heart. A Movie That Will Outlive All Of Us.", u'0.288892', u"This movie is creative, original, and very watchable. I first saw it 25 years ago. I was about 10 years old. I still find myself watching it every time it's on TV. It's not supposed to be realistic(obviously). It's filled with metaphors and meaning. Here's some trivia that can be missed. Repeated viewing reveals that the 3 characters that Dorothy meets are based on 3 people she knows. They are seen earlier in the movie, and are played by the same people. When re-watching, their early dialog becomes more note-worthy. \n\nThe music is VERY memorable. And the movie has a very popular catch phrase everyone's heard many times. Also, there was a play on PBS in '95 based on the movie and I loved it. It starred Jewel and Roger Daltry as the Tin man and he ROCKed - literally. It was classic. I like how the audience laughing added to the play. It's out on VHS.", u'0.165522'], u'tt0120382': [u'Ashaming that the Academy of motion picture arts and sciences has never realized what a brilliant actor Jim Carrey really is. The is no explanation for him not getting the Oscar for the Truman Show, there is no excuse for not even nominating him for The Truman Show and Man on the Moon. I like the academy Awards, most of the time it is a fair thing, but in that year it was a disaster. How else can you explain that in the year of Saving Private Ryan, The Thin Red Line and of course The Truman Show the most boring and joyless film of all time Shakespeare in Love gets eight, I repeat, eight Oscars and the Truman Show gets none? I think it is because Jim has made so much Comedy, nobody really knows what tough work comedy means. It is ashaming that the Academy is sometimes still driven by outdated prejudices. For me, Jim Carrey is the greatest and most versatile actor in the world! And The Truman Show is The greatest performance by an actor I have ever seen on screen. Finished!', u'-0.115234', u"Truman Burbank is an ordinary guy in an ordinary little seaside town of Seahaven Island where nothing really happens. Everything is clean, everything is perfect, he knows people but never really connects to anyone. The one woman he ever really loved is not his wife and has long since left for the other side of the world where he longs to visit but feels he can never go. Paralysed by his fear of water since seeing his father die on a boating accident, Truman still feels he is missing something. A strange light falling from the sky, a man who reminds him of his dead father, a strange radio broadcast and the feeling that the world really stops when he shuts his eyes all combine to make him feel something is wrong \x96 but what is it that he seeks but feels he cannot find?\n\nWhen I first saw this film it was with my girlfriend (who would then become my wife, then ex-wife!) and I remember how she and our friends felt a little bit cheated by the film that they had expected to be yet another wacky Jim Carrey comedy. In fairness to her and the others, it was easy to do this at the time \x96 who would have thought that Jim Carrey would be able to act \x96 certainly not the marketing department that sold this film on the basis of it being a hilarious film as opposed to the thoughtful and rewarding film it turned out to be. The plot can be viewed on so many levels that it is honestly easier to leave it to each viewer to take what they will from it. On the most obvious level it satirises the media, the emotional fa\xe7ade of television and (the increasingly relevant) look at reality shows. To others it will say as much about God, the empty drone of life and the things that we all desire. Of course to others it will just be a comedy with general comments to make \x96 and there is nothing wrong with that whatsoever; in fact the multi-level approach works to make it appeal to many audiences.\n\nStarting as a comedy, I am always taken by how well the film moves to become more and more interesting but yet never loses sight of those audience members who have come for the basic story. Hence it delivers an enjoyable and engaging central narrative that, plainly put, makes for a comic and involving yarn \x96 we grow to care for Truman and this makes the ending an emotional and satisfying one even if some viewers will bemoan the fact that (to them) it appears 'open ended'. That it is also a very thought-provoking affair is only a bonus, with the satire working on many levels. Of course by seeming to tackle so many subjects and issues in such a short running time, the film never really gets its teeth deep into any one of them but this is not a major problem because it leaves us to do that in our heads after the film finishes.\n\nThe cast is roundly superb even if the majority of them are in minor roles. Of course it is easy now to look back at Carrey and accept that he can act straight but at the time it seemed so unlikely and few felt it was a good casting choice. Of course, seeing the end result it is clear that he can and he delivers such a great performance that he really makes the film work.\n\nHe is comic but yet serious, sympathetic but not worthy of pity \x96 it is a great delivery and one that basically meant that I now look at his Ace Ventura stuff as the 'other' category and see his acting as his real work (6 years ago that was vice versa). Carrey carries the film, being on screen for almost the entire film but he has good support from Linney, Emmerich, Krause and others who play it well despite being stuck in the necessary stiff and unreal roles. The controller etc roles are all well played and feature a collection of well known faces including a great support role from Harris through to roles for Giamatti, Shearer, Baker Hall and a few others. It may be Carrey's show but the support certainly helps.\n\nOverall this is a great film that can be appreciated as much for what it is on the surface (a great little comic story) as it can for the issues that it hints at all the time. There was a time when some viewers may have looked to a Carrey film to be a load of mugging an crude, basic laughs but this was the film that saw that change. Thought provoking, funny, entertaining, short, enjoyable and well acted throughout \x96 well worth seeing and well worth coming back to several times.", u'0.131337', u'\nI asked a friend to describe The Truman Show.  He said, "No, it\'s not a comedy, well...not exactly."  I didn\'t quite understand until I watched it myself.  Truman takes on a tone quite different than any parody/comedies I\'ve seen lately.  The point (the media and its destructive powers)  is subtlely relayed through dark humor, and you don\'t feel like the director is smashing you over the head with his morals.  Peter Weir demonstrated his artistic genius in Dead Poets Society and here as well. The soundtrack is great, Ed Harris is stellar (what were they THINKING at the Academy?) and for once I actually liked Jim Carrey. His performance wasn\'t ribald for once. The final scene--I will not reveal it--is a majestic, long-awaited finish to an intellectual movie. Some people will insist that it was boring or pointless.  Those are the same viewers who prefer slapstick, obvious humor to the subtle layers presented here.  This is a thinking person\'s movie.  If you can\'t see the underlying message here, of course you won\'t like it!', u'-0.0285377', u"\nWhen I first saw 'The Truman Show' I came out of the theatre amazed. This is your first clue that you are watching something different from your normal Jim Carrey movie. I love the dialogue, camera shot, performances, direction, music, and running time of this movie. There is nothing I would do to change it. I came away from 'The Truman Show' feeling inspired which is the goal of good filmmaking Jim Carrey was outstanding as Truman, underplaying him, not making him too comic or too dramatic, but giving true sincerity when asked. He deserved an Oscar nomination. Ed Harris has always been a good actor, but in this movie he's a great actor. He plays Christof with such arrogance and bullheadedness that you don't know whether he's helping or destroying Truman. He and the director, Peter Weir, deserved their Oscar nods.\n\nWeir, who directed the great 'Witness', uses different camera angles to make you feel like you're actually watching 'The Truman Show' and not a movie. He ends it before you get tired of the concept and helped Carrey and Harris give immaculate performances. Andrew Niccol script is a real star in the movie too because of it's inventiveness and ingenuity. Overall, 'The Truman Show' is what I like to call a true American classic.", u'0.313852', u'\nWhen I was a young adult on the search for my true self, religion and God; I found myself reading all kinds of books such as: Demian, Sidarta, Brave New World, 1984, the works of Jean Paul Sartre and Simone de Bolvoir. The world of Truman Burbank certainly took me back to those days. I used to look at myself in the mirror and say out loud: "I wonder if I am me? I wonder if everybody thinks the same shade of red when I say red? Why was I born? Why are my parents my parents? Why did God create the world? Will I get punished by God for thinking all these things?" This is a deep movie, bound to become an art film.  Jim Carey did such a superb job that it earned him a Golden Globe Award. This is definitely an Oscar contender. It made me think! What a suprise! Movies do not make me think very often. They are predictable to me now. Could it be age?\n\nWhen the lady comes on the bike with the basket, then the dog and then the yellow Volkswagen it reminded me of how repetitive life seems at times, when we think that nothing is going to change and we want changes. The Director was like God,  the creator,  although at times he was a mean guy, I think that all of us have questioned God and have been angry at him. Truman\'s world seemed so "perfect", no messy hair, no trash. Just phony! Our world seems much like that, everything is a matter of perception.\n\nThe audience that watched the Truman Show in the movie was a hedonistic audience of consumers who wanted to be entertained no matter what the cost to Truman, reminded me of the soaps, of the Paparazzi, of how we like to know about the celebrities, and ultimatly of how the product could be the death of someone such as Princess Diana, or Truman Burbank.\n\nPurchase the video and watch it many times and many other symbols will come to mind. Like Jim Carey stated while he received the Golden Globe that he would enjoy it down to the crunchy chewy part.\n', u'-0.0230723', u'\nAlthough it sometimes seems that Hollywood is catering to the lowest common  denominator of everything, The Truman Show is proof that there are great  ideas that are able to be turned into great movies.  Jim Carrey plays an  excellent role as a man with whom you can emphasize as well as be  entertained by.  The film\'s surrealistic nature is frightening when the  viewer realizes the legal feasibility in today\'s society, and it offers a  great message about who or what we assume God to be and how He (he?) would  react to our personal drives for discovery to challenge a world we treat as  an aquarium.  Some things to note and ponder: The way the real-life viewers  ignore the real lives of their compatriots and customers while focusing on  a false life on screen; whose life is more real and whose is worth living?   Also, note that Christof does not have his name listed among the "real world"  in the credits, but in "Christof\'s World."  His high-profile media-driven life  is no different from Truman\'s!', u'0.529586', u'"The Truman Show" owes a lot to the direction of Peter Weir. Weir refuses to pump out the movies in a search for extra dollars. Instead he chooses wisely and directs brilliantly. Just by looking at a list of his movies will surprise and even amaze you. So as you would imagine "The Truman Show" is another success.\n\nTruman Burbank has the perfect life, or so he thought until finally his life long suspicions about his world begin to unravel. Even though the idea for Truman is not totally original, it is thought provoking enough and allows the audience to wonder, what if? If you think this couldn\'t happen, just look back over the years at the stupidity of the human race and think again.\n\nJim Carrey once again nails his role, as do the entire cast. It is rare he fails to perform at a level that perfectly complements the movie and its genre. This is something he does not receive enough credit for. Acting for a comical role or a more dramatic role requires no less effort for the performance to be spot on.', u'0.205136', u'\nIt\'s not often a Hollywood film arrives with such lofty ambitions as this.  On one hand this is a high concept comedy in the vein of "Groundhog Day" about an unwitting man whose entire life has been a TV show.  This is also a Jim Carrey vehicle designed to display his charms.  On the other hand this a very satirical look at the way the media manipulates our reality.  The film also wants to take a philosophical look at free will vs. a higher power and reality vs. fantasy.  It doesn\'t always work as the satire often keeps you from thinking too deeply about the underlying themes and the philosophical stuff keeps the satire from biting as well as it could.  Credit engaging performances and solid and thoughtful direction from Weir for keeping things afloat and entertaining.  There are some great cinematic moments here.  I loved the "stolen kiss on the beach at night" and "Cue the sun!"\n\nIn the end this film is closer in spirit to psychological dramas and sci-fi movies where a person suddenly realizes they are the pawn in some grand experiment or a prisoner in an alien world than it is to anything in our current "reality TV" obsessed culture.  Eventually it touches on a very basic conflict all humans must face (most people do so in childhood, some I fear never do).  The universe does not revolve around us.  In the closing moments we are excited for Truman because he finally realizes there is a whole new world out there to explore, but also slightly saddened because we know all to well that he will never be able to return to that idyllic "childhood" existence.  How\'s it going to end?  Who knows...but things will never be the same.', u'0.171793', u"\nHaving been bandied about the release schedules for the best part of a year, Carrey's first semi-dramatic film finally got a UK release last October. He plays Truman Burbank, a vaguely unhappy insurance salesman in the perfect little seaside town of Seahaven. Following some strange occurrences, Truman starts to think that he is being watched. Little does he know that his entire life is secretly filmed, his town is a gigantic sound-stage, everyone he has ever known was an actor and that his every waking and sleeping second is broadcast around the world as a top-rated docu-soap.\n\nCritics have been lavishing enormous praise on this movie since it opened in America last June, and probably rightly so because it is a superbly crafted piece of work. Weir's direction is outstanding, frequently viewing events from the point of view of hidden spy cameras, such as the one in Truman's car radio. One stunning shot has the town's main street full of motionless extras, waiting for Truman to turn the corner. Jim Carrey's performance has been singled out for particular praise, and though his acting is of a much higher standard that his usual comedy antics, it is not exactly Laurence Olivier. This said, an Oscar nomination would have been well deserved.\n\n\nThe setting of a chirpy small town from which escape is impossible echoes cult 60's series The Prisoner, but the balance of reality and poetry is much more restrained here than it was then. The opening credits are especially clever, using those of the actual `show' (e.g. Truman Burbank as Himself). There are, however, a few problems. The film is simply too short to adequately explore Truman's situation, and the character of Meryl, his `wife', disappears about half-an-hour from the end. This kind of slightly sloppy scripting was not something I expected from writer Andrew Niccol, whose previous film Gattaca, which he also directed, was such an immediate classic. Gripes aside, this is an extraordinary and highly original film that really is worth seeing several times to fully understand the director's message. It doesn't even matter if you never liked Jim Carrey before. You will now. \n", u'0.0297217', u'Life is starting to imitate satire. "The Truman Show" was only made seven years ago, but it predates the current mania for so-called "reality" television shows such as "Big Brother". The idea behind such shows is that they present the viewer with a slice of actual reality- real people in real situations with real emotions- rather than the simulated reality of drama or the edited reality of documentaries. The flaw in this idea is that nothing is more unreal than a reality show. The presence of the cameras has a distorting effect, inducing artificial behaviour patterns in those who appear in front of it, and the sort of people who star in such programmes are almost invariably eccentric exhibitionists. "The Truman Show" takes the central concept of reality TV shows one stage further in order to overcome this flaw: what would happen if we made a reality programme about a person who has absolutely no idea that he is appearing on television? Truman Burbank is an insurance executive, living in a small American seaside town called Seahaven, and happily married to a nurse named Meryl. Or at least he thinks he is. What Truman doesn\'t know is that he is the central character in a soap opera and that his whole life is a fiction. The company he works for does not exist. Seahaven, the island it stands on and the surrounding ocean are all part of a gigantic set, specially created for the programme and sealed off from the outside world in a gigantic geodesic dome. Everyone in Truman\'s life- Meryl, his mother, his colleagues at work, his best friend Marlon- are actors playing out their roles in his drama.\n\nFor thirty years Truman has accepted his world unquestioningly, but at the beginning of the film a series of incidents- a light falling from the sky, the reappearance of his father, who was supposed to have drowned in a boating accident when Truman was a boy, strange messages picked up on his car radio- awaken his doubts. Although members of the cast make strenuous attempts to dissuade him, he decides to try and explore the world outside Seahaven; in particular he wants to travel to Fiji where he has been told that his former girlfriend Sylvia now lives. (Sylvia was written out of the show when the scriptwriters decided that he should marry Meryl instead).\n\nThe film has certain similarities with another film from the late nineties, "Pleasantville", which dealt with an inverted version of the same idea; two teenagers from the real world are magically transported into the world of a fifties television show. In my view, however, "The Truman Show" is the better of the two. "Pleasantville" deals with its political themes in a heavy-handed way with some very obvious symbolism. "The Truman Show", although it deals with some weighty issues, is never ponderous or excessively serious; indeed, it is often very humorous. The main source of humour is the contrast between the na\xefve, trusting Truman and the behaviour of those around him, all living a lie and desperately trying to prevent Truman from finding out that it is a lie. I had previously thought of Jim Carrey as a rather annoying actor whose appeal was based upon the idea that manic overacting is in itself funny, but here as Truman he is very good indeed, both amusing and touching. I was also impressed by Ed Harris as Christof, the show\'s enigmatic producer.\n\nAnother factor in the success of the film is its visual look. Seahaven (like the town in "Pleasantville") appears as an eerily perfect, not-quite-real version of the typical American small town, but was actually filmed in a real place, the purpose-built village of Seaside, Florida. There are similarities with the cult British sixties television series "The Prisoner", which was also filmed in an eerily perfect seaside village, Portmeirion in North Wales.\n\nThe film is obviously a satire on the intrusiveness and obsession with celebrity of the modern media; added relevance was given by the fact that it came out shortly after the death of Princess Diana. There is, however, more to it than that. Much has been made of the film as religious allegory; it has been pointed out that Christof whose name is clearly, and quite deliberately, similar to "Christ", is a God-figure, whereas Truman (the "True Man") is a symbolic Everyman. It has even been claimed that the film is an anti-religious allegory, with Truman\'s final escape from Seahaven symbolic of man\'s need to break away from outdated religious dogmas. This is not an interpretation with which I would agree- if one is trying to put across a "God is dead" message, it seems odd to provide a God-figure who is very much real, not mythical or illusory. The imagery of the final scenes \x96 the calm after the storm, the ascent up a flight of stairs into the sky and clouds- also struck me as religious rather than secular. Moreover, the film seems too complex to be reduced to any single allegorical meaning, although it certainly deals with the relationship between man and God. It also touches on man\'s need to explore- both to explore new places and also to explore new ideas and to break away from established ways of life and ways of thought- and on the nature of reality. Truman\'s world may seem unreal to us, but as Christof says, "we accept the reality we are presented with".\n\nThis is a brilliant, multi-layered film, part comedy, part satire, part philosophical speculation, and in my view one of the two best movies of the late nineties. (The other was "American Beauty"). I felt it should have taken the "Best Picture" Oscar for 1999- "Shakespeare in Love" is a good film, but "The Truman Show" is a great one. It confirms my view that Peter Weir is one of the best directors currently working. 10//10', u'0.0923052', u'\nTruman Burbank (Jim Carrey) is the most famous man in the world, and he doesn\'t even know it. Raised entirely \'within\' a television show which comprises his entire world, Truman is an Everyman for the post-television age. Truman\'s world, "Seahaven", is an Eisenhower-era model of American bliss, recalling the prison-like Port Meirion and the moral certainty of Bedford Falls (Its a Wonderful Life). Surreptitiously filmed around the clock by 5000 hidden cameras, the show exists inside an enormous geodesic dome with simulated weather and even its own ocean. Through a series of production blunders Truman slowly realises that he is being controlled and that perhaps all in his world is not as it seems. His surrogate father by proxy, \'Christof\' the producer/director, goes from being benevolent social scientist to evil genius as his attempts to frustrate Truman\'s wanderlust become more and more deadly. Will he escape?\n\nThe film raises some interesting points about our fascination with life as seen through the magnifying lens of tv, and the morality of real lives viewed as so much entertainment. But like most soaps the scenes from "The Truman Show" that appear within the movie are variously dull, mawkish and sentimental. At points the film has a problem deciding on whether it is going to be a straight escape-chase movie or a philosophical piece about morality and technology. The t.v. show\'s inherent blandess also lends little to the pace or our sense that there are characters worth caring about.\n\nCarrey is good. This in itself is gratifying, and a tribute to a script that walks the tightrope of imitating bad t.v. in tandem with the metaphysical angst of Truman\'s unique situation. If it isn\'t quite the film it could have been, The Truman Show is still pretty much unique in the recent crop from our cultural overlords in Hollywood. No arthouse here, this is a watchable, big-budget think piece, with well-executed and stylish direction. Its too early to say but this film may have given some execs at NBC, ABC et al. one very bad idea...', u'0.071433', u"It not so easy to be Jim Carrey, because nobody takes you seriously after many funny movies, even when he is ABSOLUTELY BRILLIANT. He proved himself so many times in dramas, he is so great actor.\n\nThis time, there is no grade for the script, 10 is too low, maybe 10++ would suffice. I must agree that in everything around us we can see only what we are capable to see, but this movie gives so many levels and many people would see it differently and ALL WILL BE THRILLED by this movie.\n\nPeople who are interested in the phenomenon of 'Big Brother',a kind of TV voyeurism (so present today) will see the ultimate human desire to observe somebody's life, from its beginning, and without consent of the person which is the object of that observing. There is nothing special in this man who is watched, but we like to have mirrors of our lives in other people (who knows why). \n\nOf course, the next layer is ethical: do we have the right to watch somebody's life, because we don't talk about a rat, but a human being who doesn't know that he is watched in a TV show. \n\nIf we go further, we must ask ourselves, what is real in our life? There is is always some possibility that we are observed, directed, guided, monitored..., by somebody and our life is not so authentic as we used to think.\n\nNext layer: this movie talks about freedom and personal choice. How we want to be free, no matter what are the other alternatives are. Free to love who we want, free to go, free as much as it is possible. Of course, if we want to be free, if our mind and society stop us.\n\nFINALLY... The most interesting level is the spiritual one.This is a guidebook of the spiritual path. At first, this world is so secure and predictable place. We have our little lives and we can define everything what is important for us, to have some simplification of reality, to feel safe. This kind of ordinary life is a bit boring, but we are in a herd, we are not alone in our dungeon.\n\nBut..., at some moment, this world is maybe not what we thought it is..., maybe we want more of our lives,and the world is not so simple and ordinary place. We feel that there is something BEHIND this so- called 'reality'. And we start to search, to test that reality, which gives us more and more 'magic' things as we go deeper. This is still a stage of curiosity, many people tasted this path and feeling, but at some superficial level.\n\nIf we go further, we must fight the world. All possible obstacles will arise, people and circumstances. When Truman wants to see reality what it is, to be free, all his 'friends' and the complete crew don't let him to go our the ordinary tracks. So alike the spiritual quest. \n\nThen, the moment has come, men must be separated from boys, that is, the curious people from the real seekers. The latter are ready to give even their lives, to 'waste' their time, to face their worst fears, to be 'hunted' by the society (which wants they to be 'normal' again)..., but a true spiritual person won't give up. The same as Truman ('you'l have to kill me!!!!!!!'), the quest is the real one only if we are totally determined to follow our inner feeling and to search the truth. \n\nAT LAST..., we hit the 'border' of the world, the frontiers of the reality, we get know what this world really is. We are free to talk with our 'God' (though I think it is the final trick of our ego, to bring us back to be 'normal' again and it plays so many games to pull us back, by saying that there is nothing out there, everything is the same, and it is better in realm of ILLUSION). \n\nOnly a real spiritual person will say 'thanks' for the offer, and go to freedom, no matter what it is, but it is OUR freedom, our insight, the world won't be the same anymore. \n\nIt is such a pity that this is a kind of review, that I can't make a spoiler, to give more details, to relate the scenes from the movie and my points. But when you see it, you'll know what I am talking about.\n\nAgain, you'll see what you are able to see, the movie will be deep in degree of your ability to open your mind. This scenario can't be beaten even by movies like Gandhi or Mozart, or any other. An excellent work of Andrew Niccol.", u'0.212702', u'The Truman Show may be approached on one level as social satire exposing the emptiness of an American Dream defined by consumerism and purveyed by the electronic media over the last half century. Life in "Seahaven," the vast dome-enclosed set/community in which Truman (Jim Carrey) has been raised under the watchful eyes of a worldwide TV audience of millions, is a sharp and elaborate parody of the corporate sponsored images of middle-class American material bliss and innocence first introduced to mass television audiences through such \'50s sitcoms as Ozzie and Harriet, Father Knows Best, and The Donna Reed Show. A closely related target of The Truman Show\'s satire is the pervasive voyeurism and passivity that has increasingly characterized American social behavior as witnessed in film (ED TV), entertainment television (tell-all talk shows, Reality TV, the talent search genre), and even broadcast news (disaster/victim footage).\n\nYet, on another level, The Truman Show, like Gattaca, The Matrix, Dark City and other more obvious examples of science fiction, deals with broad philosophical themes such as free will versus determinism in human action, subjective versus objective perceptions of reality, the assertion of humanness through existential rebellion, and the quest for an authentic self/ identity. Most immediately, the names and plot functions of the film\'s two principal characters - "Christof," the megalomaniacal producer/director of a 24/7 reality TV show, and "Truman," the show\'s eponymous everyman figure - invite the viewer to approach the work allegorically.\n\nLegally adopted by a corporation (in a clever parallel to virgin birth), manipulated by the all-seeing all-powerful Christof (Ed Harris) into phony friendship and empty marriage with actor-minions, and psychologically conditioned (i.e. terrorized) into fearing adventure and change, Truman gradually begins to suspect that Seahaven is not the paradise it purports to be. To assert his humanity and escape his artificially prolonged state of childlike ignorance, Truman must ultimately undertake that most mythic of journeys, a Sea Voyage. At its end, he must turn his back on the secure, controlled environment of his "heavenly" father\'s house and step through a forbidding black passageway that leads to the true human condition: emotional and physical risk, scary freedom, and - perhaps - real love. In so doing, Truman ironically brings to his TV audience (whether they are still capable of appreciating it or not) the very affirmation that the false god of television claims they receive from the contrived "hope and uplift" pabulum the show has been ladling out for 30 years along with its subliminal primary diet of product placement advertisement. \n\nIn its climactic scenes, The Truman Show reveals Christof to be neither a social visionary nor a benevolent deity. Rather, we learn he has much in common with Orwell\'s Big Brother and - allegorically - with the implacable, sadistic god that Melville\'s Ahab imagines is running things behind the sky\'s impenetrable veil. By literally rending the heaven of his imprisoning universe, Truman navigates his storm-tossed sailing ship toward a completion of the heroic quest that Ahab\'s mad distraction (and Melville\'s theological uncertainty) forestalls: he momentarily frees himself and us from the diabolical/divine puller of the chains of human fate. In its final act, The Truman Show recasts the tragic despair of Moby Dick as comic triumph.', u'-0.0655483', u'Have you ever thought you were being watched? Like you life was possibly a Television show? Well, Truman Burbank never did and this movie tells of how he found out his life was a TV show.\n\nQuite possibly one of the most imaginative plots ever, Peter Weir\'s The Truman Show shows how one man\'s vision (Ed Harris) of having someone\'s life be on TV (that being Truman played by Jim Carey)...without him knowing it. A totally real show that has no boundaries except the walls of the enormous set. With actors playing the roles of the townspeople in this perfect community, as it seems.\n\nJim Carey is brilliant as the confused insurance salesman who just wants the truth about his life. The death of his "father" drowning at sea has given Truman a reason to stay in his town and not venture off. But the urge to see the woman of his dreams is all to much. She was moved to "Fiji" because of some problems. Laura Linney plays Truman\'s wife. She isn\'t only his wife but is a walking commercial. Whenever there is a product she brings home, it seems like she is telling the world how great it is. Noah Emmerich plays Truman\'s best friend Marlon. This always uplifting character brings comic relief for Truman when he needs it most. When Truman\'s world seems to be falling apart, he\'s there. When Truman just needs a friend, he\'s there. Marlon is the one part of his life that makes it seem so real when everything else seems so fake.\n\nWhat makes this movie so enjoyable other than the story is how the people act in this "town". The way they make sure Truman stays there and doesn\'t leave. How everybody has a routine and even the weather is controlled. In the opening scene Truman wakes up and heads off to work to have a stage light fall right in the street. Where it came from?...he doesn\'t know. But doesn\'t worry about it because life is going great...for now. Ed Harris\'s character Cristof a.k.a. the Creator is genius and maniacal. With his people working around the clock to make sure all is well, this world he has created is now a world wide phenomenon. He is on top of the world with millions of people watching his creation unfold.\n\nThis sensational film about a man trying to find his way in the world is incredible. When everything seems like it doesn\'t add up, it just keeps getting more complicated and giving the viewer one hell of a good movie. The Truman Show is in a league of it\'s own.', u'0.119707', u'\nA Solar eclipse occurs when a relatively small,  dark,  cold object comes between an observer and the brilliance of the sun.  A Best Picture eclipse occurs when "Saved-By-The-Bell"-meets-"Amadeus" and "Saving Private Shmaltzy" comes between the movie-going-public and the brilliance of "The Truman Show."\n\nFrankly,  I don\'t know how this script got past the powers-that-be in Hollywood.  It is a scathing indictment of the media.  My only guess is that they saw the word "comedy" and "Jim Carrey" and decided not to look at it too hard.  And judging from some of the comments here, it went over the heads of a pretty good slice of the viewing public as well.  This story is a modern-day fable -- for those with the eyes to see.\n\nIf you are watching this to be entertained by Jim Carrey or to see a great sci-fi flick,  you will be disappointed.  If you are watching this to see the most elegant satire ever to grace the silver screen (maybe ever), then this movie is for you.\n\nI will have this one on DVD.  9/10 ---', u'0.36275'], u'tt0036868': [u'\nI first saw this film (one of my top ten favorites) in 1995 on the big screen, as part of the commemorations for the 50th anniversary of the end of WWII. It had an impact that was so strong that it\'s never left me--I\'ve seen it many times since, and with each viewing the film seems to reveal new artistic richness and spiritual depth.\n\nWilliam Wyler\'s direction is breathtaking.  One of the most moving scenes occurs early on in the film, when Homer, the young disabled Navy veteran, arrives at his family home and stands for a moment on the front lawn.  For that one second there is an exquisite stillness that communicates a depth of emotion that can\'t be expressed physically.  Then, just as the tension becomes almost unbearable, Homer\'s little sister Louella comes to the front door and runs out to greet him.  In a similar way, the scene where Al Stephenson comes home to his wife and children is so finely directed you can almost feel that you\'re in the apartment with them--that it\'s your husband or father come home to you from the war--and you\'re experiencing the sheer elation of their physical nearness.\n\nThis aspect of the film--its portrayal of the joys and hardships of post-war readjustment and the veterans\' experience--is what makes it so enlightening, honest and powerful.  As a young woman, I have never experienced wartime or had my father, brothers or friends go off to fight. The film moves swiftly but seamlessly from the initial joy of homecoming and reunion to the problems, anxieties and humiliations that the three veterans encounter as they attempt to build a new life for themselves and their families.\n\n\nI found it interesting how the film tries to give a picture of the different socio-economic backgrounds of the three men, and show the emergence of an affluent, market-driven economy.  While this in itself is not bad, different episodes in the film show how this economic approach can conflict sharply at times with enduring human values such as integrity and justice.  Al\'s dealings with the young veteran Mr Novak, who comes to him for a service loan to buy a farm, and his later (slightly tipsy) speech to a business gathering show this.  Al declares at the end of his speech that when the bank lends money to poor veterans it will be a financial gamble but "we\'ll be gambling on the future of this country".\n\nThe film\'s interweaving of the characters and their struggles never falters and is deeply satisfying.  Even as Al and Milly, Homer and Wilma gradually move towards a happy resolution of their difficulties this positive strand of the film is counter-balanced by the focus on Fred, the courageous Air Force captain who, in the eyes of the commercial world is "unqualified", suitable only for a job at a soda fountain, and in the eyes of his war bride, Marie, is only wonderful when he\'s dressed up in his officer\'s uniform.  Fred\'s situation seems only to deteriorate and at one point in the film, after he farewells his elderly father to leave town and look for work, the father finds the citations for Fred\'s medals and sits down to read them. As he reads the words describing Fred\'s bravery and dedication to duty while he was terribly wounded in his aircraft, Pat Derry\'s voice nearly breaks with pride and love for his son.  The film beautifully juxtaposes Fred\'s unselfish conduct and willingness to make the ultimate sacrifice with the cold indifference of a country in peacetime that does not want him and seemingly has no place for him.\n\nThe actors are uniformly impressive and really make their characters come alive.  Dana Andrews is especially outstanding together with two young actors making their debut, Harold Russell and Cathy O\'Donnell, as Homer and Wilma.  Personally, I loved Homer and Wilma\'s story the best among those of all the characters,and the resolution is a simple, sensitively shot scene that lifts the whole film to a new point of happiness, gratitude and release.  Both Cathy O\'Donnell and Teresa Wright are lovely, gifted actresses with a slightly understated style, that is perfectly suited to the film\'s restrained but powerful tenor.  This is demonstrated especially well in the tense scene where Wilma tries to talk to Homer in the shed, and in the scene where Peggy confides her heartache to her parents.\n\nOne feature that adds significantly to the film\'s quality is Hugo Friedhofer\'s score.  The music is remarkably fresh and undated, has a strong, classic sound, and is poignant without being too romantic or sentimental (a flaw often found in other 1940s film scores).\n\nThe producer, Samuel Goldwyn, reportedly said of this film: "I don\'t care if it doesn\'t make a nickel...I just want every man, woman and child in America to see it".  Although I\'m not American (I am Australian) I found this film, with its universal human themes and its portrayal of post-war readjustment, speaks to anyone who shares in this heritage of WWII.  Tell others about this film--it is breathtaking, beautiful and brave.  See it and remember.\n\n\n\n\n', u'0.471232', u'In 2004, I wrote the following statements on an IMDb message board when a user wondered if The Best Years of Our Lives was a forgotten movie: \n\n***** To me watching this movie is like opening up a time capsule. I think in many ways "The Best Years of Our Lives" is probably one of the more fascinating character studies and it holds up extremely well as a look at life in the US in the mid-1940s after WWII. I believe "Coming Home" and "The Deer Hunter", both released in 1978, were the most recent films that were closest in capturing the numerous issues of military men returning from war that were brought up in "The Best Years of Our Lives".\n\nWhat really impressed me was watching the movie in its entirety when I was in college around 1980-81 and many if not all of the college students applauded at the end of the movie.\n\nThis movie still packs a wallop and I\'m very happy to read in other posts other users feeling of a movie that will definitely stand the test of time. *****\n\nI\'m very happy to see the movie ranked near the top 100 movies on IMDb and AFI. Also, though it was in competition with what eventually became a Christmas classic, It\'s a Wonderful Life, arguably, The Best Years of Our Lives\' Oscar wins, including Best Picture, were very well-deserved. \n\nI\'ve just seen the film again in 2005 and after almost 60 years, The Best Years of Our Lives is still a powerful, beautifully acted and well-crafted motion picture.', u'0.774996', u'\nMy parents were of that generation, and the movie was cathartic for returning veterans and their families and friends; it\'s small wonder that it eclipsed <i>It\'s A Wonderful Life</i>, which arguably is a better picture. But at the time, the movie had some shocking elements to it. In fact, my mother (roughly the character Peggy\'s age then) saw it against her parents\' wishes.\n\nBack in 1946, it was a jaw-dropper to have a character in a movie utter the word "divorce" or to aver an intent to break up a marriage -- such ideas just weren\'t voiced in films then. To modern audiences, they come across as melodramatic, but I\'m told they elcited genuine gasps from audiences then.\n\nEven more astonishing was William Wyler\'s decision to cast real-life amputee Harold Russell in the key role of a returning Navy veteran. Until <i>The Battle of Britain</i>, in which an actual, disfigured RAF veteran made a cameo appearance, directors didn\'t make those sorts of courageous gestures. The intimate yet innocent scene in which Homer Parrish (Russell) demonstrates his helplessness to his fianc\xe9 Wilma Cameron (Cathy O\'Donnell) is beautiful, heartbreaking and uplifting; later, during the wedding scene, Russell stumbled over a line in saying the vows, and Wyler left the humanizing mistake in, God bless him for it.\n', u'-0.0538851', u"\nI saw the movie again recently. I always love it. It's touching, has great music, scope and complexity. The film is alive in its human details. But what especially stood out to me this time was how amazing Dana Andrew's performance is. His wife has cheated on him, he's suffering post-war trauma, and can't find a job--but he's still charming and funny. Even though his opinion of himself is pretty low, he keeps going ahead. I love how self-denigrating the character is, how he suspects he's pretty worthless, while his parents, friends and Peggy (but not his wife) see him as extraordinary. And Andrews does it all while being understated and real. Yeah, Dana!\n", u'0.500525', u'\nI watch this movie every time it plays on TV.  A simply brilliant film. Three men return home from war and try to return to civilian life with great difficulty.  All three led opposite lives during the war (Executive Banker became an army corporal, a soda jerk became an Air Force Captain and the High School Football hero loses both his arms in battle)and now each must reconstruct his life and connect with a new reality.  The homes they return to, with grown children and independent, working women along with a depressed economy, only add to the strife.  It\'s the scenes just off camera and the unspoken dialog which resonates the most loudly, however.  The awkward intimacy of Frederich March and Myrna Loy and his struggle to return to his place as leader (both at home and at work) are heartbreaking.\n\n\nDana Andrews is riveting as the handsome, decorated Captain who struggles to keep his life together without the uniform.\n\nThe film is filled with honest characters and each is portrayed by a gifted actor.\n\nThis film, however, took on a whole other level after seeing, "Saving Private Ryan."  The reality and magnitude of what these men lived through for love and country......and obviously it didn\'t end on the battlefield.\n\n\nThis is an essential for any collection.\n\n', u'0.419176', u"One of the great things about The Best Years of Our Lives that even though it dates itself rather firmly in the post World War II era, the issues it talks about are as real today as they were on V-E or V-J day of 1945. The problem of how to assimilate returning war veterans is as old as the written history of our planet.\n\nAnd while we don't often learn from history, we can be thankful that for once the United States of America did learn from what happened with its veterans after the previous World War. The GI Bill of Rights is mentioned in passing in The Best Years of Our Lives was possibly the greatest piece of social legislation from the last century. So many veterans did take advantage of it as do the veterans like Fredric March, Dana Andrews, and Harold Russell who you see here.\n\nAll three of those actors played archetypal veterans, characters that every corner of the USA could identify with. They all meet on an army transport plane flying to the home town of all of them, Boone City, Iowa.\n\nWar is a great leveler of class and distinction. Bank employee March, soda jerk Andrews, and high school football star Russell probably would never meet in real life even in a small town like Boone City. But they do meet and war forges indestructible bonds that can never be broken.\n\nMarch is the oldest, a man with two children and Hollywood's perfect wife Myrna Loy. He settles in the first and the best. He has some wonderful scenes, getting cockeyed drunk on his return and later with a little bit of liquor in him, tells the bank officials at a banquet off in no uncertain terms.\n\nI also love his scene where another returning veteran, a sharecropper wants to get a bank loan for his own piece of land. Watch March's expressions as he listens to the man's pitch for money. You can feel him read the man's soul. It's what got him his Second Best Actor Oscar for this film.\n\nHarold Russell was a real veteran who lost both his hands during service in the Pacific. He got a special recognition Oscar for his performance. Because of that it was probably unfair to nominate him in the Supporting Actor category which he also won in. His performance, especially his scenes with Cathy O'Donnell as his sweetheart who loves him with or without his hands, is beyond anything that could be described as acting.\n\nDana Andrews is the only officer of the three, a bombardier in the Army Air Corps. Of the group of them, maybe he should have stayed in. He also comes from the poorest background of the group and he was an officer and a gentleman in that uniform. That uniform and those monthly allotment checks are what got Virginia Mayo interested enough to marry him. The problem is that he's considerably less in her eyes as a civilian.\n\nWhile Mayo is fooling around with Steve Cochran, Andrews has the great good fortune to have March's daughter Teresa Wright take an interest in him. They're the main story of the film, Andrews adjustment to civilian life and adjusting to the fact he married the wrong woman. Not all veteran's problems were solved with GI Bill.\n\nMyrna Loy gets little recognition for The Best Years of Our Lives. My guess is that it's because her role as wife was too much like the stereotypical wife roles she had patented over at MGM. Still as wife to March and mother to Wright she really is the glue that holds that family together.\n\nThe Best Years of Our Lives won for Best Picture for Sam Goldwyn, Best Director for William Wyler and a few others besides the two acting Oscars it got. It was a critical and popular success, possibly the best film Sam Goldwyn ever produced. It remains to this day an endearing and enduring classic and will be so for centuries. It's almost three hours in length, but never once will your interest wane.\n\nThe best tribute this film received came from Frank Capra who had a film of his own in the Oscar sweepstakes that year in several categories. In his memoirs he said that he was disappointed to be skunked at the Oscars that year, but that his friend and colleague William Wyler had created such a masterpiece he deserved every award he could get for it.\n\nBy the way, the film Capra had hopes for was It's A Wonderful Life. The Beat Years of Our Lives can't get better praise than that.", u'0.239125', u'\nVery glad to see that this excellent film gets such high marks from the users of IMDB.  The Best Years of Their Lives remains the finest cinematic statement about veterans returning from war that I have come across. Easily the finest performance by the often overlooked Frederick March.  In fact the entire cast shines, including music legend Hoagy Carmichael who treats us all with a subtle version of his classic Lazy River.   I would recommend this excellent film to anyone who loves movies.  ', u'0.788577', u'This American masterpiece came as near perfection as popular art contrives to be, from its beautifully equivocal and suggestive title to the magnificent performance elicited by William Wyler from the nonprofessional amputee Harold Russell\x85 \n\nThe film epitomized both the dream and the reality of the postwar world\x85 This intimate engagement with the psychological facts of American life gave it an almost universal audience\x85 But, unlike contemporary and preceding "message" pictures, it was not a preachment\x85 It showed Americans as they are, presented their problems as they themselves see them, and provided only such solutions\x97partial, temporary, personal\x97as they themselves would accept\x85 The picture\'s values are the values of the people in it\x85\n\nWilliam Wyler, an outstanding director, triple winner of the best picture Oscar, adds an air of distinction to melodrama, epic and Westerns... With his distinguishing visual style and his taste for solemn material, he gained a reputation as a meticulous, serious artist... Wyler\'s most adept use of deep-focus reveals the real commitment to emotional content...\n\nThe film tells the story of three men coming home from war to a small middle-American community, and find it variously difficult to pick up where they left off... The three heroes are: a middle-aged sergeant (Fredric March), magnificent as the devoted family man who succeeds in breaking the ice with his family; an incisive Air Force captain (Dana Andrews) returning to an unfaithful wife; and a tormented sailor (Harold Russell) who has lost both hands in service, replaced by hooks in real life...\n\nWinner of 7 Academy Awards including Best Picture, "The Best Years of Our Lives" is eloquent and compassionate, a deeply personal motion picture with touching wordless homecoming scenes: \n\n- The first words of the sergeant\'s loving wife when he arrives home unexpectedly: "I look terrible! It isn\'t fair of you to burst in on us like this."\n\n- The involuntarily sob of the sailor\'s mother when she first sees her son\'s mechanical hands... She blurts out: "It\'s nothing!"\n\nWith her dry-martini voice, Myrna Loy combines charmingly her wifely qualities with motherly ones; Teresa Wright is lovely as the sergeant\'s nice daughter who falls in love with the pilot; Virginia Mayo is harsh as the disloyal flashy blonde wife whose first loves are money and high life; and Cathy O\'Donnell is wonderful and sensitive as the sailor\'s fianc\xe9e...\n\nThe situations and even some of the characters seem a little obvious, but this is a superb example of high-quality film-making in the forties, with smiles and tears cunningly spaced and a film which says what is needed on a vital subject...', u'0.326178', u"\nThis is a home-coming tale of three WWII veterans, returning to the same small town.  One was a bank clerk who rose through the military ranks (Fredric March, who got the Best Actor Oscar for this, well-deserved) with an understanding wife (Myrna Loy, excellent) and daughter (Teresa Wright).  One has lost his hands (Harold Russell, real-life veteran, putting in a touching performance) and struggles to cope with this and with his relationship with his girlfriend (Cathy O'Donnell).  The other was a soda jerk but has flown bomber planes throughout the conflict (Dana Andrews, in one of his best roles) and is now heading back to his pin-up wife (Virginia Mayo, a small role but an interesting one).\n\nWe follow them on their respective journeys, often meeting up in Butch's bar (run by Hoagy Carmichael, who gets the chance to play piano, etc.) and often finding their paths cross.  The film comes in at around 3 hours, but it is time well spent.  'The Best Years' is not only perceptive and clever, with some great scenes, but also is innovative in some of its cinematography, thanks to the great Gregg Toland, master of the deep focus.", u'0.43432', u'\nSometimes, but very rarely, a movie tells a story so well that it almost becomes difficult. This movie tells several stories so well simultaneously that it was the first few times a movie I could not watch to completion. It was too real....and the characters SO STRONG that watching it became a personal struggle. Seeing these three men and their families deal with their hardships, one in particular, often hit me too hard. Now, I have watched in its entirety without interruption several times, and I realize what I always suspected.  This movie is a masterpiece. The writing, the acting, the blending of several stories without being even the least bit choppy, everything about this movie is exceptional. Seven Academy Awards? No wonder, it certainly must have deserved them.\n', u'-0.0348712', u"Thirty years prior to THE DEER HUNTER came this movie, an excellent meditation on the effects of war inflicted on the American family as seen from both the war heroes and their wives. A truly ironic title, THE BEST YEARS OF OUR LIVES is anything but since those times have vanished into still images and all that is left is an uncertain future for those involved.\n\nTruly an ensemble cast despite the top-billing of Myrna Loy, THE BEST YEARS OF OUR LIVES focuses more on the stories of the men. Al Stephenson (Fredric March) comes back to a household that has irrevocably changed as his sons have grown although he finds support from his doting wife Milly (Myrna Loy). Fred Derry, upon returning, cannot find a decent job despite being a war veteran and is trapped in a marriage that he does not want to Marie, a happy-go-lucky girl who wants more out of life and who increasingly comes to hate him. Homer Parrish, on the other hand, has greater problems due to his loss of hands at war and feels the entire world -- including the girl he loves and her family -- thinks he is a freak of nature.\n\nAt almost three hours of length, the film never seems long and drawn out. There is so much emotions happening even in small moments that the plot breezes by; nothing seems wasted or placed on screen due to a lack of editing. Not a performance rings false, though the standouts are those of Dana Andrews as Fred Derry, Harold Russell as Homer Parrish and Virginia Mayo as Marie Derry. Even then every character has his or her moment on film, and the time was right to talk about all the pain and suffering that until then had not been seen in American films (including the ones made around World War One, which did not dabble in such topics). While there is never any overt violence, it's all there, in the haunted expressions of the three male leads' faces, in the lot where the planes now reside, ready to be turned into junk (and therefore, forgetfulness), in the cynicism of the store owners who couldn't be bothered to employ these shell-shocked men who had seen battle or even worse, to goad them into wondering what was it all worth for. This is the film in which COMING HOME and BORN ON THE FOURTH OF JULY are indebted to. At a time when America fled from war films, to come up with this when the end of the Second World War was still fresh was a necessity in order to make a more honest film-making.", u'-0.149255', u"Blue ribbon banners, stars and stripes forever, decorated generals, and unconditional surrender from the enemies which required tons and tons of radiation, this was the summon substance of the United States victory in World War II!! The celebration on Times Square as well as everywhere else in the United States suggests a national zenith!!! America is on top right!! one thing, one agonizing and painstakingly perverse thing..The period of adjustment!!..The actual celebration ended when the bottle of champagne was finished..Now everyone needs to get on with their lives...only one problem though...they have to get new lives...the old lives are gone forever...Polite and pleasant smiles had a fragile facade with a longevity of ice cubes in boiling water!! Everyone of the characters in the movie is paraded by primal doubts, and unable to masquerade a pretense about how nothing was seriously wrong, for the simple reason that it was not true!!! Once sergeants, and generals, and their wives, and daughters, and sons and virtually all other Americans touched by World War II, were exposed to disabilities, nightmares and recriminations of World War II and what it really accomplished as well as negated, nobody was the same!! For now, social and moral issues had a self serving interest...Frederick March and Myrna Loy had to start over!! Dana Andrews realized that he should never have been married to Virginia Mayo in the first place!!! Theresa Wright has become painfully aware of the fact that she is constructively selfish!! Las but not least, the character, Homer, is about to get married and he thinks that everyone around him is as devastated by his injury as he is, basically in the sense that they are unable or unwilling to cope!!\n\nThe reason this film is so fabulous is because a happy ending was attained the hard way, once everybody recognized the new beginning of the new United States and the new world overall, tragedy from WWII was recognized, and things that were emotionally torn asunder were taken in stride, and dealt with accordingly!! Frederick March and Myrna Loy need to go back to chapter one in their marriage, Homer has apprised his new bride as to what it takes to be married to him (i.e. half the times, she will feel like a nurse) and Thresa Wright's involvement with Dana Andrews means that her entrance into adulthood has resulted in partial responsibility for breaking up a marriage...This is tantamount to learning how to drive a car to get your driver's license at the Indianapolis 500...The characters in the movie are the typical post WWII Americans in that they are stalemated by the rude awakening of coercive changes to their lives...Happiness no longer is afforded the luxury of the adjective cop-aesthetic...it is now about formidable conditions, and good winning out over evil by way of the less ugly choice!!...World War II did not just happen!! It will henceforth dominate the social patterns of American living!!!\n\nThe aggregate catastrophe of World War II has mirrored most Americans' feelings of personal human inadequacy as well!!I loved this film and so did AFI, probably for the reason that it brought out issues that were at one time unjustifiably taboo!!..Bottom line, see this movie!! Nightmares about combat, dilemmas about marital unhappiness and/or readjustment, coping with your life when stricken-ed by a disability and just basically acting human are portrayed constantly in movies and television today, HOWEVER!! this is 1946!! Very new to Americans then....REMEMBER THAT!! Director William Wyler has illustrated how Americans feel about the aftermath of WWII in the days when the movie industry has left him with one hand tied behind his back!!! Take that into account and you will probably realize just how sensational this movie really was!!", u'0.105206', u'The Best Years of Our Lives (1946)\n\nThe whole point of this film when it was released still makes perfect sense today, though I\'m sure it doesn\'t have the same impact it did in those first years after World War II ended. Returning servicemen, with all kinds of backgrounds before and during the war, hit a wall coming home: wives who no longer loved them, jobs that had dried up, a culture that was foreign to them and that found them, these men, to be foreign themselves.\n\nIt wasn\'t a crisis to take lightly. These were the guys who were drafted to fight the enemy, and in going overseas they lost some of the best years of their lives, if not their lives. The country knew its debt in the abstract, but it also knew it in sons and husbands who really did come home and who had to face it all. This movie was both a reckoning for the sake of national healing and a brilliant drama that would be beautifully pertinent and therefore successful. And what a success, then and now.\n\nThe consummate Hollywood director William Wyler shows in this fast, long movie just what a master he is at working the medium. With Gregg Toland at the camera, Wyler makes a highly fluid movie, visual and dramatic and weirdly highly efficient. With the three main plots interweaving and depending on each other, the drama (and melodrama) build but never beyond plausibility. Wyler knew his audience wouldn\'t put up with pandering or cheap mistakes. Casting Harold Russell as Homer, knowing the audience would hear about how Russell really was a soldier who lost both hands in the war, was a huge step toward creating both empathy and credibility. It even practices a key theme in the move--to go beyond your bounds to make a difference, to give these guys a break and help them assimilate.\n\nIt\'s interesting how singular this movie is, trying to show the truth in these kinds of situations. The other post-war films about army and navy men fall into two large and dominating categories--war films and film noir. And it is film noir that comes closest to getting at the problem of the G.I. not reintegrating well, making it a whole style, brooding and spilling over with violence. "The Best Years of Our Lives" has a highly controlled and even contrived plot structure, but it aims to be honest and representative. \n\nThat it\'s remarkable formally--the way it is shot and edited and acted, top to bottom--is not surprise, given the heights that Hollywood had reached by then, and given that Wyler is easily the slickest of them all, in the best sense. That the movie makes such beautiful sense and really works as a story, a moving and heartwarming story without undue sappiness, is a whole other kind of achievement. A terrific, rich, full-blooded, uncompromised movie.', u'0.269383', u'Best Years of Our Lives is a film that slipped under my radar for years--I had heard about it, but never had the opportunity to watch it. Thanks to TCM On Demand, I was able to watch it uncut and commercial free.\n\nWhat surprised me about this film was how quickly it was made after the war. The film frankly deals with the people who were wounded in the war, both physically and mentally. It manages neatly to encompass nearly all the varieties of war experience within three characters.\n\nWe have the Air Force officer, who was a veteran of the early European bombing campaign. Because of the horrific attrition rate amongst the crews of the bombers, the Air Force at that time had a reputation for cranking out officers who quickly rose through the ranks. Such was case with this fellow who went from a lowly soda jerk in civilian life to a Captain and bombardier of his B-17. He also suffers from PTSD, called "battle fatigue" at the time.\n\nWe have the Army non-com who served in the Pacific, and suffered through the horrors of that campaign. His story is opposite that of the Air Force fellow in that he goes from a prestigious job as a banker to a lowly grunt in the Army and rises to the rank of Sergeant. From the stripes on his sleeve it is clear that he is the highest level of Sergeant, yet he is still on the front line.\n\nFinally we have the Navy Seaman, who is part of the faceless support staff, commonly referred to as REMFs (Rear Echelon MFers)by the fellows on the line. Ironically, he suffers the worst physical wounds when working as a mechanic below decks on a Navy ship, his ship is struck, presumably by a kamikaze and is sunk with loss of 400 lives. He is pulled from the water but his badly burned hands are amputated and replaced with prosthetic hooks.\n\nBYOOL tells the story of how these three meet on a transport plane they have boarded for home, and how they readjust into civilian society.\n\nWhat impressed me most about this film is that despite the obvious issues that face the three protagonists, it never descends into melodrama. The Navy kid, played by an actual amputee, is placed into situations where we might feel sorry for him, yet the script never lets us feel that emotion. The Army sergeant is clearly an alcoholic, and the story points that out, but never dwells on it. The Air Force captain struggles with the loss of status when he is forced to return to the drug store he soda jerked in (now bought out by a large chain) and take a demeaning job to support his ungrateful and disloyal wife.\n\nThe script allows plenty of opportunities for all these characters to come to some dramatic climax regarding their plights, but it neatly avoids that. But for the overly dramatic score, the director has tread around exploiting the obvious.\n\nIn one scene that well represents the entire movie, the daughter of the Army sergeant (Frederic March) is having a discussion with her father and mother regarding the Air Force captain. Despite his marriage, they have fallen in love, and she is determined to break up the marriage which is obviously troubled. Now we\'ve seen thousands of scenes typical of this where the father blusters angrily and the daughter ends up running away to her room in tears, slamming the door and falling on the bed. Later, Mom shows up, consoles daughter and offers words of motherly wisdom, and everybody lives happily ever after.\n\nIn BYOOL, this scene plays out completely differently than the clich\xe9 I have described above. Sure the conversation gets heated, but all parties are reasonable, and there is a serious and timeless discussion of the nature of relationships that has some of the best dialog I have seen.\n\nUltimately, BYOOL is a highly satisfying film, with honest performances from the entire cast. Technically, it is well shot, the editing and cinematography frame, but never overshadow the gripping narrative. Despite the score, which is clich\xe9 and over-dramatic, I give this film the highest rating that it clearly deserves', u'-0.0967929', u"Best Years of Our Lives perfectly captures the era of my youth, and the feelings of that time. The cast was uniformly wonderful. This was possibly Dana Andrews best role of his career and he should also have been nominated for an Academy Award. There are so many wonderful scenes in this movie it is almost impossible to list them all. The cinematography is among the best of any film. This movie is a time capsule of what is was like in the 1940's. A must see movie for any true movie fan. Some critics have said this movie has aged. I disagree. The theme of human desires is timeless. And the obstacles faced by veterans returning from war will always be with us. This is just a great movie - one that can be watched over and over again.", u'0.327761'], u'tt0083987': [u'\n"The object of this massive tribute died as he had always lived, without wealth, without property, without official title or office.  Mahatma Gandhi was not the commander of armies, nor the ruler of vast lands.  He could not boast any scientific achievement or artistic gift.  Yet men, governments, dignitaries from all over the world, have joined hands today to pay homage to the little brown man in the loin cloth, who led his country to freedom."\n\nThis quote is from the funeral scene in the 1982 film "Gandhi".  Richard Attenborough directed this massive epic about the man that freed India. The film opens with Gandhi\'s assassination.  The next scene, his funeral, is one of the greatest scenes in cinematic history. Attenborough managed to recreate Gandhi\'s funeral on January 31st, 1981, the 33rd anniversary of the actual funeral.  It is estimated that nearly 400,000 people were on hand to be a part of the filming the recreation. This film was made before CGI (computer generated images), so the funeral scene is probably the last live action crowd of that magnitude that will ever be filmed.\n\n\nMahatma Gandhi\'s message of non-violent resistance is delivered in an interesting and enthralling body of art.  This film has made and will make millions of people aware of the little brown man that took on the British Empire and won.  "Gandhi" serves both as entertainment and an important historical record of one of the most important figures in history.\n\n\nBen Kingsley played Gandhi.  He was the perfect for the role.  He resembled the real Gandhi.  He was young enough to portray Gandhi as a young man. He is a British actor that nailed the British influenced Indian accent.   He is a wonderful actor that was patient and humble with such an important part. And he was a relatively unknown actor at the time, so the "big-time actor" persona did not get in the way of viewing the film.  He did win both the Academy Award and Golden Globe for best actor, for this role, which I agree he deserved.  He became Gandhi.\n\nThe cinematography was outstanding.  Attenborough filmed "Gandhi" on location in India.  The scenes of India are spectacular, and India is very much another character in the film.  This film is as much about India itself as it is about Gandhi.  Attenborough shows the audience the people of India from its countryside to the vast city of Calcutta.  It is suggested by Kingsley, on the DVD, that Attenborough had a difficult time with the elite class in India at the time of filming.  They were against the making of such a film by an Englishman.  Undeterred by their negative thinking, he persevered to enlist thousands of Indians to help make this film.  Every crowd scene, he used real Indians from the area. Attenborough also won both the Academy Award and Golden Globe for best direction.\n\nThis movie is a must see for everyone.  It should be required viewing in high schools, as part of History class.  The fight against prejudice will forever be relevant.  It is also a beautiful work of art.  This movie is not tainted by the embellishment of Hollywood (see "Pearl Harbor" for that). Of course, it would have been hard to screw up a movie about such a great man. 10/10\n', u'0.370221', u'\nAs soon as I finished watching Gandhi, I thought to myself "This movie had to have won Best Picture." I think it\'s one of the best epics of all time. It masterfully tells one of the most important stories of the 20th century, that of India\'s struggle to free itself, spearheaded by one of the most extraordinary men of all time, Mahatma Gandhi. I would be hard pressed to name anything lacking about it. Direction, cinematography, costumes, they\'re all great. And Ben Kingsley! Without a doubt his portrayal of Gandhi is one of the best performances of his career, if not THE best. Playing the pacifist Indian lawyer-turned-leader couldn\'t have been an easy task, and I don\'t think anyone could have pulled it off as well as he did. This movie deserves all the praise anyone gives it and more. Excellent.', u'0.526576', u'\nVery, VERY few films have had the distinct ability to move and inspire me to the point where the effect is almost life-altering. "Gandhi" - the unbelievable, first-rate biopic on the historical figure - is truly one of those films, no question whatsoever. An unsurprising sweep for the 1983 Academy Awards, this is without a doubt one of the last real "epic" motion pictures ever.\n\nChronicling the rich, unforgettable life of a one Mohandas K. "Mahatma" Gandhi - played to shocking perfection by the wonderful Sir Ben Kingsley - this is a film that I can say really, deeply affected me with its power, its scale, and of course, its timeless message of love and non-violence. As a matter of fact, ever since I first saw the film, and became much more aware of the back story, I can also say that Gandhi is now one of my biggest role models in life. I cannot fully express how much this great man\'s way of thinking - his words, his struggles, his accomplishments - has affected my own, for I am now a practicing pacifist. I am a firm believer in the value of non-violent protest, and have tried my best to apply that philosophy to most situations in my life. It has worked wonders for me, and has really changed how I view the world in terms of human nature and so forth. Like I said, VERY few films can do something like that to me.', u'0.12988', u"\n\nHere indeed is one of the great films of the 20th Century about one of the greatest men of the 20th Century. Ben Kingsley's interpretation of the Mahatma must go down in history as one of the most perfect cinema r\xf4les ever carried out. Throughout the long film you forget you are watching an actor playing the part of a great man in history: you are watching the real Gandhi. A gigantic performance indeed. Richard Attenborough's patient and perfect directing added all the superlatives possible to make a crowning achievement, transporting  biographic films into another dimension.\n\nIt is all there: from the most intimate and poignant portrait to the incredible crowd scenes, beautifully captured in the most painstaking photography. You do not just watch the scenes unfold \x96 you live them, you feel them, so captivating they are; and Ravi Shankar's music tugs at you, spellbinds you, forces you into sympathy, admiration and so many other feelings. \n\nEnthralling: how such a cinematographic work of art can reach such proportions is truly amazing; this film is nothing less than a miracle. During 1971 I travelled a good bit around India; I constantly had to apologise to energetic Indians who approached me on the subject of the British Raj. I had not even been born. But as a young and unappointed ambassador, I felt it my duty to bow my head in that country which is a microcosm of the whole planet. Thanks to this film, `Gandhi', Attenborough and Kingsley have said just about all there was to say.\n\n< For men may come and men may go, but Gandhi goes on forever >", u'0.606719', u'\nThinking back, I suppose I have now seen many (sometimes good) films that follow the same recipe: One man makes a difference.\n\nBut this film is an exception in so many ways:\n\n1) It was made in 1982, so it came before many of them.\n\n2) It has amazingly well-displayed historical significance.\n\n3) Great performances in a near-flawless, frank scrpit.\n\nThis film does not bother the viewer with an opening montage of scenes of the main character at various ages ("Dragon", I\'m looking at you). This is an amazing film that anyone of any religion, race, or nationality can and should appreciate. With its subtle relevance to today\'s situations in that part of the world, this is a history buff must-see.\n\nWatch this film and see great performances (an obvious oscar went to Ben Kingsly), excellent cinematography, and a wonderful inspiring story, whose essence soars well above the corny, do-gooder mentality of other pitiful efforts of "bio-pics".\n\n10/10', u'0.441735', u'\nThis is one that absolutely must go on everyone\'s "must see" list. One of the truly greatest movies ever made. For those who found it "boring" or "too long," you folks need to just stick to stuff like "Star Wars," "Terminator," "Spiderman," or perhaps reality TV would be more your cup of tea.\n\nFor those who like to actually see real human history come to life on the screen, "Gandhi" is a true masterpiece for all times. A excellent summary of one of the greatest and most interesting lives of the 20th. century!\n\nI find it odd that aside from a fine performance in "Shindler\'s List," that Ben Kingsley has really been a major disappointment as an actor following his role as "Gandhi." Perhaps like George C. Scott in "Patton," he was destined to play just one truly great role as an actor. And this was it!\n\nFor those who keep mentioning that Kingsley is "English," well, yes he is, but he is also "Anglo-Indian." His father is from India. In fact his father was born in the same small sea-coast town as Mahatma Gandhi! While filming the movie in the small towns of rural India, there were those older people who actually remembered seeing the original Gandhi who collapsed in shock when they saw Kingsley in his makeup. Hundreds became convinced that he actually was the Mahatma, returned! Also interesting is that Kingsley was born just after the asassination of Gandhi. I mean that\'s just a tad spooky, no....?', u'0.299304', u"\nPicture this. Gandhiji walks in a court, accused of influencing the people and starting a movement, the Non Cooperation movement, immediately after Gandhiji broke the fast he started to curb the movement which had assumed violence after Chauri Chora. We walks in alone, unescorted and as soon as he walks in there is an unexplainable silence in the court, and to everyone's surprise the Judge, stands up in respect of the accused ! Seeing him do this the barristers and rest also stand up. This scene though may seem insignificant on paper is one without which this entire movie would have been incomplete. To know why\x85\x85read on ! \n\nOn day of 2nd October they play this movie every year on DD National, Richard Attenborough's Gandhi. I never watched it whenever it was shown since 20 years of 2nd Octobers I had seen. The first few years because I couldn't understand and the next few because I felt that though it's a multiple Oscar winner, how could at the end of the day, a British person understand and do justice to an Indian icon ? After so many years I finally broke the ice and saw the movie in totality right from the first scene of Nathuram Godse, to Hey Ram, and I understood that Gandhi was as British, as much a part of Britain's history as he was of India's, in fact an outsider judged the person better than we ourselves could, hence without doubt this is a masterpiece, because it was always meant to be. \n\nRichard Attenborough like all directors worth their salt uses visual aid as a medium to replace conventional dialogue delivery at times. A picture is worth a thousand words and a scene without words is worth a million. Like the first scene I described and others. In one scene towards the end of the movie, Gandhiji starts a fast until death to stop the communal riots post independence and Nehru goes to meet him. A crowd had gathered near his residence and one of the person in the crowd shouted a suggestion, 'Why don't they kill Gandhi ?', Nehru furiously jumps into the crowd to search for this person and the camera moves in the crowd and for a briefest time and quite unmistakably you spot Nathuram Godse in the crowd. This made me think, 'hey this is what I call good cinema!'.\n\nSo what about the outsider theory ? Well you see if Rajkumar Santoshi, Yash Chopra, Raj Kapoor or Mani Ratnam had made this movie they would have fallen under the pressure and the unbearably weight of historical facts, Richard had that advantage. Someone quite ignorant about Indian culture was telling a story of an Indian to an audience even more ignorant. What I mean is that there are things which are skewed up, characters gone wrong and famous words mouthed by someone else. For example the writer has messed the character of the Patel Siblings. Vallabhbhai Patel was never an extrovert and never as polished as shown in the movie, but someone else was and it was his more Birtish, yet less famous elder brother Vithalbhai who in fact introduced Vallabh to Indian movement. Again it is a known fact that Vallabhai continued the Dandi march after Gandhi's arrest, the fact which is ignored. Once again the characters of Kriplani, Maulana Azad etc are all skewed. But at the end of it works, why, because Richard's view is focused. I would notice these mistakes because I am an Indian aware of this, a person in England may never find out and even if he does he would consider it as trivial because this is a story of Gandhi and not the Indian freedom struggle. People say that unnecessary importance is given to foreign characters in Gandhi's life like Margret, Rev. Charlie, Walker, Miraben, but I would say it is necessary because these people did influence Gandhi and made him an international personality which he is. \n\nBut before I end my take on this movie I must comment on the characterization. Starting with Ben Kinsley as Gandhi. To tell you the truth when I first saw him as Mohandas KG in the train I was shocked, he didn't look like Gandhi which I imagined, but as the movie goes ahead I changed my opinion. Ben worked because of multiple reasons. The first he is a British Gujarati, Gandhi was gujarati who did his law in England so both speak the same language, Partly British English with unmistakable Gujarati overtones. Second all other characterization of Gandhis in the history are shown as fragile creatures without clothes. Ben did carry some more body than others and which made Gandhi look more real , more alive. Also he had an infectious little smile which works because Gandhi in many was a jovial happy person who smiled a lot , a kind smile of calm which no one but Ben Kinsley brought out ! Of the other characters, Martin Sheen as Walker was impressive, so were Lord Erwin, Gen Dyer, Margrets, Nehru and Miraben's characters. Rohini Hattangidi as Kasturba does a remarkable job too, though she was shown a little more extroverted than Kasturba was , maybe. \n\nAs a whole to sum it up, this is one hell of a beautiful movie experience. If you missed it this 2nd October don't forget to tune into it the next.\n", u'0.0502692', u'\nIn her diary entry of Saturday, February 27, 1943, Anne Frank wrote in passing (translated from the Dutch):  "The freedom-loving Gandhi of India is holding his umpteenth fast."\n\nIt\'s a comment at once mildly comical and respectfully admiring, one I think the Mahatma would have appreciated with a twinkle and a laugh.  He and Miss Frank are linked with the Reverend Martin Luther King, Jr., as the civil rights spokesperson-giants of the 20th century.  And civil rights, and the reversal of the institutionalized violation of the same, are a large part of what the last century\'s politics were all about.  Movie viewers are apt to find in the diary remark a distillation of their experience of the Richard Attenborough film.  A recommendation is that it be followed by rentals of Saving Private Ryan and The Long Walk Home, which together convey the investment put into the respective causes the trio represented.\n\nAt the beginning of Gandhi we confront these words:  "No man\'s life can be encompassed in one telling.  There is no way to give each year its allotted weight, to include each event, each person who helped to shape a lifetime.  What can be done is to be faithful in spirit to the record, and to try to find one\'s way to the heart of the man...."\n\nJohn Briley\'s screenplay accomplishes that faithfulness, and one probably has to be a scholar of the subject to sort out what is his and what is Gandhi\'s.  Not that it really is of relevance, given what we learn from the movie about the value of eclecticism.  Looking out over the bay at Porbandar, Gandhi (Ben Kingsley) tells Walker (Martin Sheen):  "The temple where you were yesterday is of my family\'s sect, the Pranami.  It was Hindu of course, but the priests used to read from the Muslim Koran and the Hindu Gita, moving from one to the other as though it mattered not at all which book was read as long as God was worshipped."  In a preceding scene, similarly, confronted by young toughs on a South African street, Gandhi defends for his Christian friend Charlie (Ian Charleson) the New Testament intelligence of turning the other cheek.  A worried Charlie states, "I think perhaps the phrase was used metaphorically.  I don\'t think our Lord meant...," and is interrupted by a movie shot of the approaching menace.  Gandhi replies calmly, "I\'m not so certain.  I have thought about it a great deal.  I suspect he meant you must show courage--be willing to take a blow--several blows--to show you will not strike back--nor will you be turned aside....  And when you do that it calls upon something...that makes...hate for you diminish and...respect increase.  I think Christ grasped that and I...have seen it work."\n\nThe script is replete with these kinds of memorable words, and with others that reflect its subject\'s political acumen and strategical cleverness.\n\nKingsley is sublime in the lead role.  Saeed Jaffrey, Roshan Seth, and Alyque Padamsee do well as Gandhi\'s pro-independence collaborators.  Ditto, Athol Fugard ("Assuming we are in agreement?") and John Gielgud ("Salt?") as two of his adversaries.  Charleson, in his clerical collar, looks like he has walked in off the set of the preceding year\'s Academy Award winner, Chariots of Fire (where he played the Scottish sprinter-missionary, Eric Liddell).\n\nThis movie won eight Oscars, with Attenborough, Briley, and Kingsley all earning honors.  No other film biography I ever have seen works so well.  It will stand the test of time and inform multiple generations.  One doubts remakes will be necessary.', u'0.184531', u'The life of the legendary man from India (dominant Oscar-winner Ben Kingsley, who was a total unknown theatrical newcomer at the time) who gave up work as an attorney to defy British rule throughout the first half of the 20th Century before falling to an assassin\'s bullet in 1948. Long, opulent, breath-taking and completely memorable take on one of the most important historical figures the world has ever known. Oscar-winning director Richard Attenborough obviously studied David Lean\'s epic film-making masterpieces from the 1950s and 1960s as we have similarities galore with "The Bridge on the River Kwai" and much more importantly "Lawrence of Arabia". An all-star cast of very old-time Hollywood legends (John Gielgud, Trevor Howard, John Mills) and relative newcomers who were on the rise (Candice Bergen, Martin Sheen, Edward Fox, Nigel Hawthorne and a super quick glance of a very young Daniel Day-Lewis) blend in a desert landscape of cinematic brilliance. Make no mistake of it though, "Gandhi" works because of Kingsley as he weaves a colorful tapestry of cinematic performing ungodliness with a totally convincing take on his role and the complex subject matter. Running nearly 190 minutes, "Gandhi" still just uses flash-points to under-score the importance and significance of the major topics within. Those familiar with advanced world history will likely get more out of the film, but still a movie whose glitter continues to shine as bright as ever. 5 stars out of 5.', u'0.911907', u'There is a sanctimonious air to the films of Sir Richard Samuel Attenborough: the earnest desire that fair play is seen to be done\x85 Attenborough attempts to humanize his personage by exposing the widening gaps between India\'s two main religious communities, but he seemed to be quite forced to ignore some of the Indian characters in favor of Western ones, as some of the very important episodes of the film were seen through the eyes of two American reporters...\n\nAttenborough, a filmmaker who can rival David Lean for the big set piece without losing a sense of human scale, presents the political events with real dramatic impact...His big challenge was to give the film an epic quality\x85 Still, while Attenborough\'s endless seas of extras testify to his ability to order crowds, his fine motion picture was seen very believable and realistic, with enough insight either into its sublimely serene hero\'s mind or into the complex realities of Indian history and politics\x85\n\nBritish actor Ben Kingsley portrays the spiritual leader with deep simplicity... Kingsley\'s Mahatma is amazing, so beautiful in its honesty... Kingsley burns with a strong and purer flame, particularly in the way he ages across the five decades which the film depicts... His wetly blazing eyes as a young lawyer in South Africa, his black hair and immense energy, gives way to the bald small modest man, in shawl, loin cloth, steel-rimmed glasses, frequently thrown in jail by the British authorities...\n\nKingsley takes the qualities and details instructed by Attenborough: Gandhi\'s fiercely intelligent aura; Gandhi\'s rational and calm reaction to inflamed emotion; Gandhi\'s unshaken beliefs and principles; Gandhi\'s warm smile...\n\nA distinguished cast of characters surround Academy Award-Winning Ben Kingsley as Gandhi: Candice Bergen, the Life magazine American photographer whom Gandhi conveys with a sense of humor; John Gielgud, the Viceroy who decides to ignore the man in loin cloth; Edward Fox, the brutal English general who orders his troops to fire at the thickest part of the crowds; Trevor Howard, the Judge who behaves with great consideration, standing and nodding respectfully to Gandhi in the dock before taking his seat; Geraldine James, the adopted daughter, blinded by love for Ghandi; and Martin Sheen, the American reporter of the New York Times who makes Gandhi laugh: \'It would be uncivil for us to let you make the long trip for nothing.\'\n\n"Gandhi" has a rare combination of deep character penetration and enormous epic sweep with "Lawrence of Arabia." But while \'Lawrence of Arabia\' is about a solitary adventurer, \'Gandhi\' is a moving portrait of a character with a disarming humility, who spins cotton, walks the country roads, meditates in front of the ocean, or scoops salt from the beach... Throughout the picture, which takes place over a half century, one has a sense of a man discovering his own unique dimensions... Perhaps this is the secret of Attenborough\'s \'Gandhi,\' that at the bottom of all the tumultuous action is a remarkable protagonist, an incredible individual about whom one cares, and feels attract to...', u'0.757705', u'\n"Gandhi" is a movie that won the Best Picture Oscar in 1982. It is one of the best movies I have ever seen. Oscar-winner, Ben Kingsley is in his perfect role as Mohandas K. "Mahatma" Gandhi, who was originally an attorney or lawyer, and then he became an Indian political leader, who was into non-violent beliefs. Candice Bergen is very good, in her role, as Margaret Bourke-White, a Life magazine American photographer. Martin Sheen is also very good, in his supporting role, as Vince Walker, an American reporter of the New York Times. Richard Attenborough did an excellent job directing this film, and that\'s why he won the Best Director Oscar. I have this movie on DVD, and I strongly recommend it.\n\n10/10 stars.', u'0.761381', u'The film, Gandhi, is Richard Attenborough\'s tribute to Mohandas Karamchand Gandhi (1869-1948). Although it won eight Academy Awards, Including Best Director and Picture, the film has been criticized for a variety of reasons by people who did not realize that Gandhi himself was the greatness of the film. Ben Kingsley portrayed Gandhi to perfection. The Indian music was by the great Ravi Shankar.\n\nGandhi was an Indian lawyer, educated in England, who entered the political arena in South Africa to fight against the treatment of Indian immigrants, uniting both Hindus and Muslims in the cause. Everyone, even his enemies, were impressed by his willingness to suffer, even die, at the hands of those in power, rather than back down from a just cause. He won the victory by insisting that his followers use civil disobedience and eschew all violence, thereby depriving the authorities of a justification for violent suppression. Gandhi explained it: "When I despair, I remember that all through history, the way of truth and love has always won. There have been murderers and tyrants, and for a time they can seem invincible. But in the end they always fall. Think of it, always."\n\nHe returned to India after the victory to become that country\'s spiritual leader. He led the struggle for independence from Britain, still insisting on non-violent means. The goal of independence was achieved but the Hindus and Muslims did not unite as they had in South Africa. Instead, they caused India to be split into India, Pakistan and East Pakistan, which later separated from Pakistan as Bangladesh. Gandhi was assassinated by a Hindu fanatic.\n\nTwo decades later, his methods were used by Martin Luther King in the fight against segregation in the United States of America. Gandhi and King were both willing to die for a cause and they both did but even now, in the next century, there is still some hatred between Hindus and Muslims in Kashmir state and between blacks and whites in America. Where is the next Gandhi? Where is the next Martin Luther King? Such men are still needed all over the world.', u'-0.131701', u'\nFirst to understand Gandhi\'s principles you must read his autobiography. He has admitted in his book that he was having sex while his father was dying. He admitted this when he was  known as Mahatma (a great soul). Who can dare to admit such a thing. He vowed that he will never lie in his life. Is it possible for you and me not to lie in life? He took vow about his cloths and wore same cloths (he was half naked in those cloths) while he was in London in winter!!!  Just imagine a freedom fight against Britain without any kind of weapon or violence!!! And he was successful. He gave freedom to India without any army. In fact his principles should be followed in today\'s world. I must say this movie was not enough to describe his principle. He was more than movie GANDHI. No body can capture his principles in a movie. For me he is like GOD because of his principles.\n\nGANDHI: " My life is my message". " I have nothing new to teach this world, truth and non- violence are as old as hills".', u'-0.162575', u"\nSometimes to appreciate a power of a movie, you have to take away the iconic status and critical and commercial success that it enjoyed on it's initial release.\n\nAfter 20 years, I took in a screening of GANDHI which was shown as a tribute to Richard Attenborough at the NFT on September 17th 2003, followed by an interview with Ben Kingsley. Having caught glimpses of the film in the last two decades and remembering the Oscar ceremony in 1983 when it took home eight Oscars, confounding expectations that E.T should have won, I settled back and judged the film on it's own merit.\n\nIn all fairness, this is a better film in my opinion than E.T, which is more calculated in emotional requirement and was disjointed in my opinion compared to other Spielberg offerings like CE3K and RAIDERS. Although over three hours long, the film has many virtues and should be seen on the big screen in the correct ratio and indeed, it was pleasing (as Kingsley noted in the interview afterward) to see a very good print of the film, so that the artistic and technical nuances could be focused on more readily.\n\nStructured in similar vein to the grandaddy of all epics, LAWRENCE OF ARABIA, the film opens in 1948 with the shooting of Gandhi whilst out walking. After a spectacular funeral sequence, the film cuts back to the end of the 19th Century, where we meet a young lawyer, Mohandas. K. Gandhi (Kingsley) already under persecution in South Africa who is turfed off a train by racist guards and is prompted to burn the passes that all Indians are required to carry at an outdoor ceremony. Predictably, he is beaten and persecuted for his troubles, but with help from a local clergyman (the late Ian Charleston (CHARIOTS OF FIRE)) he manages to overcome oppression, initially from a local bigot (Daniel Day-Lewis in an early role) and begins to make waves amongst his community.\n\nAfter a spell in South Africa, Gandhi returns to India where he continues his mission to walk the land and spread the good faith.....\n\nBeing British, I found the issue of racism and oppression done with consideration and in a most unpatronising way without offence to anyone. I have never felt that the British Empire was a worldwide requirement and that the British Isles are a much more acceptable place for all peoples to be accepted. At a time when the issue of asylum seekers is more profound, it is an interesting film to view in the context of this.\n\nGANDHI has many strengths in its favour. As well as a towering performance, which deservedly one Ben Kingsley an Oscar as Best Actor, the screenplay flows with passion and the cinematography is carefully orchestrated to make the film have its own individual personality within every scene and frame. This is not just a British film, but a world film and, as the posters put it at the time. A WORLD EVENT.\n\nA film for all generations, races and decades.", u'0.538856', u'I watched this movie looking to find treatment of the less politically correct aspects of Gandhi\'s personality. But I found them nowhere.\n\nIn the 20 years that Gandhi lived in South Africa he held the black South Africans in the utmost contempt, regarding them as little better than India\'s untouchables.\n\nIn an open letter to the legislature of South Africa\'s Natal province, Gandhi wrote of how "the Indian is being dragged down to the position of the raw Kaffir" -- someone, he later stated, "whose occupation is hunting and whose sole ambition is to collect a number of cattle to buy a wife, and then pass his life in indolence and nakedness." \n\n"Kaffir" is a term of derision applied to blacks, with much the same intent as the "N" word in the United States.\n\n"We were then marched off to a prison intended for Kaffirs," Gandhi complained during one of his campaigns for the rights of Indians settled there. "We could understand not being classed with whites, but to be placed on the same level as the Natives seemed too much to put up with. Kaffirs are as a rule uncivilized -- the convicts even more so. They are troublesome, very dirty and live like animals."\n\nGandhi was also an enthusiastic supporter of India\'s caste system.\n\nHe compared white Afrikaners and upper-caste Aryan Indians, writing, "We believe as much in the purity of races as we think they do."\n\nAnother interesting fact about Gandhi was his relationship with the Italian fascist Benito Mussolini. They were mutual admirers in the 20s and 30s. Gandhi once reviewed, with favor, a black-shirt youth honor guard parade in Italy. Gandhi later soured on Il Duce when he invaded Ethiopia in the mid-30s.\n\nThere\'s also pretty good evidence that Gandhi had homosexual relations with the Jewish Hermann Kallenbach, "How completely you have taken possession of my body. This is slavery with a vengeance." This is ironic, for in the 1930s Gandhi and Jawaharlal Nehru attempted to remove all homoerotic ancient art from Hindu temples.\n\nKallenbach and Gandhi later had a disagreement over the creation of Israel.\n\nI don\'t really have a problem with Gandhi wanting to remove homoerotic depictions from Hindu temples, his views of blacks, his support for the caste system set up by Aryan invaders millennia ago, his enthusiasm for pre-1936 Mussolini, or his opposition to the founding of Israel. I don\'t have a problem with any of that. What I do have a problem with is the dishonesty of Richard Attenborough and most promoters of Gandhi. They\'re not promoting the actual man, but an image of the man created by liars. These facts have been known for a long time.\n\nThis movie is worthless as history, but it\'s decent as a suspense yarn.', u'-0.250745'], u'tt0058946': [u"\nPerhaps no other cinematic depiction of revolt against colonial rule is so detailed, vivid, and specific as the 1965 Battle of Algiers (La battaglia di Algeri, just reissued in a new print and having limited distribution in the US). It's a vivid and very specific recreation of the insurrection against the French in Algiers in the late Fifties that shows how the French systematically eradicated that insurrection. It's also a story repeated with variations in dozens of parts of the globe now, as then. But as I'm not the first to note, it's neither a partisan tract nor a user manual. It was therefore foolish of the Pentagon to watch it recently as if tips on how to control Iraqi `resistance'/'terrorism' were to be found in it, and it has been equally foolish of the Black Panthers or other revolutionaries to watch it seeking tactical information for their struggles. Those tactics did not succeed; but neither did the effort to quell the independence movement: the French won the battle but lost the war. A process that might have proceeded peacefully in a matter of months, takes years to happen. The film documents the sad foolishness of solving conflicts with violence, the maximum loss and suffering on both sides and the protraction of the inevitable outcome.\n\n\nThe insurrection The Battle of Algiers describes was effectively quelled through the leadership of the bold, methodical French Colonel Mathieu, who as we see succeeds in eliminating the organizational structure of the resistance, `triangle' by `triangle', using torture to ferret out names and locations of the autonomous `terrorists'/'partisans,' then killing the `head' of the `worm' their structure represents so it can't `regenerate.' Once this happens, after a merciless French campaign following a general strike, the sympathizers in the majority Algerian population are totally demoralized; but two years later a vigorous national independence movement `suddenly,' `spontaneously,' springs forth, and not long afterward France has to grant Algerian independence. It's at this point, rather than at the moment of Mathieu's momentary triumph, that the film ends.\n\n\nGillo Pontecorvo undertook his masterpiece after prodding from the resistance leader, Saadi Yacef, but he made a film equally sympathetic toward and critical of both sides. We see as much of the French dissection of the situation and repression of it (by the police chief, then Colonel Mathieu) as we see of the `terrorists'/'partisans' planning and execution of their actions. We see Colonel Mathieu as an appealing macho hero with moments of noble fair play, a shades-wearing, cigarette puffing veteran who moves around with clarity, honesty, and panache; he himself has a `partisan' background. The `terrorist'/'rebel' leaders are serious, intensely committed men of various types, from the sophisticated intellectual to the young firebrand. There are no `heroes' here; or, alternately, if you like, they're all `heroes.'\n\nMathieu appears before the press beside the captured `rebel'/'terrorist' leader - an unusual move in itself - and expresses his respect for the man's courage and conviction. The `rebel' leader in this scene is eloquent in defending `terrorist'/'rebellion' methods such as the use of baskets filled with explosives in public places. `Give us your bombs and we'll give you our baskets.' Mathieu for his part effectively explains to the journalists the necessity of torture to short circuit the `rebellion'/'terrorism'. After this explanation, the film, typically systematic at this point, begins showing a series of tortures of Algerians being carried out.\n\n\nThe first image we see in the film is the shattered face and body of the small, tortured Algerian man who's broken down and revealed where Ali `La Pointe,' the firebrand, the last remaining leader, is hiding. Then we see the `terrorist'/'terrorist' leader Ali and his closest supporters trapped like deer in their hideaway, their faces soft and beautiful. The splendid black and white photography works like William Klein's Fifties and Sixties images (he's one of the key visual commentators of that period stylistically) to powerfully capture the edgy soulfulness of the North African people and their gritty Casbah milieu. Much of the film's power comes from the way Pontecorvo was able to work, through Saadi Yacef, directly in the Casbah among the real people - as Fernando Meirelles worked in the favelas of Brazil recently with local boys to forge the astonishing City of God.\n\nThe voices, which are dubbed, as was the fixed Italian filmmaking style, work somewhat less effectively because of obvious disconnects between mouth and sound at times, but the French is so analytical and the Algerians' Arabic so exotic-sounding (even to a student of Arabic) that they work, and the insistent, exciting music composed by Pontecorvo himself in collaboration with Ennio Morricone is a powerful element in the film's relentless forward movement.\n\nThe fast rhythms of the editing are balanced by the stunning authenticity of the hundreds of Algerian extras who swarm across the screen: it's in the crowd scenes that The Battle of Algiers really sings. There are many superb sequences of street fighting, of people massing at checkpoints, of the French victims innocently assembled in public places; and like an exhilarating coda there is the scene of joyous victory as Algerians celebrate their independence in the last blurry moments. This is a film (again, like City of God) of almost intoxicating -- and nauseating -- violence, complexity, and fervor. Pontecorvo's accomplishment, though, is the way through showing the leaders analyzing and debating the action he freezes any impulse toward partisanship in its tracks. The evenhandedness of the coverage works a Brechtian `Alienation Effect' so you don't get caught up in rooting for one side or the other.\n\nThe sequence of three pretty Algerian women carrying out an operation is a particularly memorable one -- but only one among many. First they take off their burqas and cut their hair and doll themselves up French style and then they get past the checkpoint into the French quarter to leave handbags full of explosives in a bar, a dance club, and an airport lounge. Again close-ups of faces in the bar and the jive dancers with jaunty jabbing elbows in the club show a brilliant use of image and classic editing: first the innocent, vulnerable faces, then the explosions. Here our sympathies for the French victims are fully awakened. Another sequence of Algerians removing bodies from a building has all the power and sadness of Christ's Passion.\n\n\nThere's no point where as in a conventional thriller we feel excitement and sympathy for the perpetrator, because we see the cruelty of the perpetrator and the humanity of the victim every time. The Battle of Algiers is a final triumphant use of Italian cinematic neorealismo. The killing is observed neutrally, but with sadness, as part of a stupid game caused by ignorance and played out compulsively when a political settlement would have been infinitely better - a stupid game observed with astonishing zest.\n\n\nRevived thirty-five years later in a new 35-mm. print, its grainy beauty pristinely vivid, The Battle of Algiers remains a superbly made machine that plays out the addictive game of `terrorism,' repression, torture, revolt, and full-fledged insurrection as effectively now as when it was first issued. Like any classic, it's of its time and of all time. There's a lesson here, but it's not for partisans or colonialists: it's for all people.\n", u'-0.00499691', u'\n"Battle of Algiers" is simply one of the greatest films every made.  If film making can be about truth as well as fantasy, then a movie that includes a title card telling viewers that there is not one foot of documentary or newsreel footage in it must deserve viewing.\n\n"Battle of Algiers" contains scenes that seem so real, you suspect that they couldn\'t have been staged.  When three Algerian women come down from the Casbah to plant bombs in the French quarter of the city, you can almost cut the tension with a knife.  When the bombs go off, you think they must have been real bombs.  And when you see the devastation they leave in their wake, you cannot fail to be moved.  The massive rebellion in the streets at the end of the film also seems so real, you sit wondering how many extras must have been injured filming those scenes.\n\n"Battle of Algiers" combines brilliant photography, crisp direction, an intriguing plot and some very fine acting. Throw in a terrific music score, splendid editing, impressive special effects and the best example ever of docudrama style production and you have a masterpiece of film making.\n\nBut film making is not nearly as important as human life and no film in general release today says more about America\'s current involvement in the middle east and many other parts of the world than this picture about the French in Algeria, made more than three decades ago.\n\nEvery American should view this film, then think about our current occupation of Iraq.', u'-0.0993156', u'\nAn historian writing about the Algerian war against the French colonial authorities entitled his book "A Savage War of Peace". "The Battle of Algiers" provides many answers to that enigmatic title. It does not attempt to show us the entire war but centers on the city of Algiers. Even though you are told at the beginning that no documentary footage is used it is at times hard to believe as many of the images you see have a stark and often unsettling reality to them. Considering that this was a co production between Algeria and Italy the film is remarkable in that it does not turn itself a political tirade by taking sides. Instead the camera is a sort of neutral observer allowing us to witness events that spiraled from individual demonstrations to a full scale war of savage intensity. French officers who fought the Nazis a few years before degenerated into the mode of their former enemy while Algerians had no problems exploding bombs that would kill their own people. The camera shows no heros or villains but humanity in its darkest forms. This is a powerful film with superb direction and cinematography. It truly is one of a kind and once seen will never be forgotten.', u'0.100168', u"\nIn 1962 after more than 130 years of French colonial rule, Algeria became independent.  Gillo Pontecorvo's `Algiers' shows the decade leading to that liberation in a powerful story about Muslims asserting their rights through violence, hiding, and plotting in the Kasbah, a demiworld of narrow, winding, seemingly endless alleys that are the only protection the rebels have from the eyes of the French.  The re-release of the 1965 black and white film is a convincing story of a people who do not want to be occupied and will give their lives so their families can one day be free.\n\nThe story centers on a couple of Muslim leaders, the charismatic Col. of the French forces, and the bombings and shootouts that at one point averaged just over 4 per day. The film's sympathy is for the Muslims, but the Colonel has moments of reflection that could be sympathetic, especially with the revelation that he was a member of the resistance in WWII and may have suffered in a concentration camp. The director shows the influence of Italian neo-realists like Roberto Rossellini (`Paisan') by shooting in documentary style on location, using non-actors (except for the Colonel), and generally avoiding an agitprop angle.\n\nBut the film's sympathy in the end belongs to the occupied people.  When 3 rebel women change appearance to look French, infiltrate, and plant bombs, the irony obvious to American audiences in their current struggle is a tribute to the strength of the narration and characterization and the universal dislike of occupation and subjugation.\n\nThe torture of the Muslim prisoners is the most poignant relevance to the recent scandal in Iraq.  The Colonel's justification for the practice to gain life-saving information is classic `ends-justify-the-means' logic still being used by great nations. In fact, the Pentagon reportedly had seen this film during the first days of the second Iraq War; some say they learned nothing from the film, which is an unforgettable study of occupation and defeat.", u'0.0472527', u'\nI ask myself why we never see these kind of movies on TV, instead of airing again and again the same old lethal weapons, jurassic parks, and other similar stuff? This is real cinema, this is why it is considered a form of art!\n\nWith the metaphysical crudeness of black and white, the dramatical facts of the Algerian rebellion against the French are accounted. The movie has the realistic appearance of a chronicle. And there are tons of intellectual honesty, too. I mean that there are no white hats VS black hats. You can see terrorists troubled as they are about to leave a bomb in a cafe. Policemen who struggle to save an arabian child from being killed by outraged crowd. Most of all, I\nlike the frank words of Colonel Mathieu about the "bad methods" he\'s using during interrogations... Watch the movie and you will know.\n', u'-0.018228', u'\nI wish I could locate a videocassette of this film--subtitled, not dubbed. The first time I saw it, I was a little put off by what I thought was a pompous disclaimer that "not one foot" of documentary footage had been used. But, in light of the finished product, it\'s a remarkable statement. If a film has better captured the harsh and ugly realities that are an inevitable part of a true revolutionary movement, I never saw it. It is greatly to its credit that one never gets a sense of "good guys vs. bad guys" here--only of people trapped in a truly impossible set of circumstances, from which no escape is possible without confrontation and bloodshed. It was depressing to see this movie in Berkeley in the early 70s, and hear the audience cheer the "heroic" Algerian revolutionaries while booing the "villainous" French, in view of the great pains that had been taken to present a balanced viewpoint. This film is thrilling, heartbreaking, thought-provoking, and beautiful--sometimes by turns and sometimes all at once. If you haven\'t seen it and it show up anywhere in the vicinityh, drop everything and go--and pray that it\'s subtitled and not dubbed. (There are dubbed prints and, as is usually the case, dubbing pretty nearly wrecks it.) This is a masterpiece.\n', u'0.0295587', u'\nCapturing a historic incident/moment with extraordinary accuracy makes a film truly beautiful, painful, and masterful. With the tradition of Italian Neo Realism and French New Wave - i.e. shooting in location and casting nonprofessional actors, The Battle of Algiers harshly seals the ugly realities of both French Legion and Algerian Guerillas - i.e. indiscriminate bombs, tortures, and scapegoats. Ennio Morricone composed one of his early successful scores.', u'0.337938', u'\nJust when I thought I was starting to hate every movie in sight, I had the amazing priveledge to watch "the Battle Of Algiers" which is this amazing account of the oppression of the Algierian people by the French in the 1950\'s. \n\nWhen the movie starts, we see 4 people hiding from the French Army. Then all of a sudden, this amazingly haunting music starts, and we\'re told the story in flashback of how the Algierian people tried to revolt against the French Soldiers.\n\nFrom what I understand, the movie uses no documentary footage, which is amazing as some of the scenes in the movie must have taken a great deal of effort to produce., There are some pretty amazing crowd scenes and the explosion scenes are just breathtaking.\n\nAlso, I guess some of the actual revolutionaries are in the film as well. They are pretty hard to point out as  all of the acting here is amazing, very realistic.\n\nSo, looking for a war movie? Dammit, don\'t go for Private Ryan, go to Algiers.  \n\n  \n', u'0.220917', u"If one has not seen this film, one cannot begin to imagine Pontecorvo's extraordinary achievement. The acting is so natural and convincing that many viewers and even some critics assumed that the movie was a documentary. Only a master director could have taken this raw acting material and gotten such performances out of it. And despite his leftist viewpoint, Pontecorvo neither ridicules or demonizes the French, as does Michael Moore the Americans in his recent putative documentaries Bowling at Columbine and Farenheit 9-11 -\x96 though I do a disservice to Pontecorvo to compare his work to that of Moore.\n\nSee this movie now that it has been released on DVD in the United States and learn from the history it so brilliantly conveys.", u'0.214154', u"Battle of Algiers might well be the best historical film ever. It stands out as a splendid work of art, as an extremely accurate depiction of a specific time and place, as a political hymn to independence, and as a thought-provoking philosophical reflection on violence, and on the relationship between ends and means.\n\nIt depicts the crucial years 1956-1957 in the Algerian war of independence from French colonial rule: the leaders of the independentist FLN decide to make Algiers a battlefield through strikes and terrorism in order to shake colonialism and to unite Algerians. The French respond to this urban guerilla with a ruthless control of space, separating European and Arab (the 'casbah') parts of the city, and with a brutal hunt of the FLN leaders through the torture of lesser militants. The French paratroops under gen. Massu, col. Bigeard and cdt. Aussaresses (blended in the film into a synthetic and fictitious character, col. Mathieu) eventually 'win' the battle of Algiers, but they end up 'losing' Algeria, as their repression has only fueled nationalism. The film therefore ends with the vision of Algerian crowds demanding independence ('Istiql\xe2l') as they march through the streets of Algiers in 1960.\n\nWhile this is an accurate enough analysis of such a complex war (even though interestingly de Gaulle is absent from the film as it intends to show how independence was conquered, not handed from above by French authorities) it is also a metaphor, as the film works on many different levels.\n\nIt is a masterpiece of editing and cinematography. The combined use of space and music is stunning: when the french paratroops take possession of the Casbah, literally filling up the frame, gaining control of the streets, rooftops, hallways, courtyards, their superbly choreographed movements are underlined by a haunting theme by Morricone & director Pontecorvo. In these sequences he rivals not only Rossellini but Eisenstein.\n\nIt is also strongly influenced by the New Wave in its manner of filming faces of protagonists. Some of the most beautiful moments in the film (as the beginning in Ali's hiding hole, or the scenes before the explosions in the bars) consist of protagonists' faces, victims, perpetrators, bystanders, shot in close up, in a beautiful black and white, without comment or voice-over: their common humanity is shown as well as the determination, the inner flame of those fighting for independence.\n\nI would disagree with other reviewers saying the movie is is unbiased: the film was commissioned and encouraged by the new-born Algerian state, and Yacef Saadi, a leader in the war of independence appears in prominent role. While the violence of both sides is coolly examined, the film justifies that of the Algerians, if only by showing (in a slightly dishonest way) that it always responds to the violence of the French. This question of precedence (who started to be inhuman?), though in the end quite pointless, has long poisoned mutual understanding between French and Algerian memories of the war. Another bias, explained by the FLN financing and staging, is the almost complete absence in the film of the middle ground, those neither in the terrorist FLN or in the paratroops, desiring to live in peace. They have existed, in both sides, as the examples of writer Albert Camus and his friend Mouloud Ferraoun show. This is quite understandable as it might not fit in the epic text depicted in realistic manner by Pontecorvo. However, in the film, the Algerians that are not committed to war are shown to be gangsters and pimps: this is a minor flaw of the film and its only touch of propaganda.\n\nAll that said, the film is a stunning visual, historical and ethical masterpiece. Sadly and ironically, it capture a fiery desire for liberty at the very time (1965) a military coup by Boumediene overthrew Ben Bella in Algeria, repressing liberties for the decades to come. Most of all, it is one of the most potent depictions of and reflections on violence (in the twin and extreme forms of terrorism and torture) to be seen on screen.\n\nThe most powerful image of the film remains the vision of a FLN militant broken by torture and forced to confess the hiding place of his chief. His haunted look, exhausted stance, empty eyes, grotesquely dressed in a paratroops' uniform, stand as an indictment of colonialism.", u'-0.0110168', u"\nJust a few words for 'La battaglia di Algeri'. Watch it! It's astonishing, fast, dramatic, crude, real, touching, historically accurate. To everybody who wants to know more about Algerian civil war: buy it, find it..! \n", u'0.702222', u'In 1954, the National Liberation Front of Algiers shots many French policemen beginning a movement for the independence of their country; in return, the Chief of Police plants a bomb in the Arab quarter, killing many dwellers. The NLF sends three women with bombs to two bars and the Air France office in the European quarter, killing many people. The French government sends the military forces under the command of the abusive Colonel Mathieu (Jean Martin) that does not respect the human rights and uses torture to destroy the NLF command. In 1962, the Algerians finally achieve their aimed independence.\n\n"La Battaglia di Algeri" is a powerful and impressive masterpiece about the fight that happened in Algiers in the period between 1954 and 1962 between the Algerian resistance and the French military forces. A couple of months ago I saw "Mon Colonel", another magnificent movie about this dark period of the mankind history. In both movies, we see no difference between the methods used by French in Algerian, or the Nazis in World War II, or the South American\'s dictatorships in the 60\'s, 70\'s and 80\'s, or by the American in Iraq, of the Chinese in Tibet. "Liberty, Fraternity, Equality for us, but torture and abuse of the human rights for the others" should be the correct sentence applicable to most nations. Therefore the writing of Machiavelli in "The Prince" about the behavior of the "princes" along history could be updated to the disrespect of human rights by powerful nations against weakest ones in the name of their best interests. This movie is impressive because it seems to be a documentary, with grainy cinematography and non-professional actors, in a perfect contemporary Neorealism. I am not familiar with the work of director Gillo Pontecorvo, but I really believe that this movie is his masterpiece. My vote is ten.\n\nTitle (Brazil): "A Batalha de Argel" ("The Battle of Algiers")', u'-0.0594034', u"We all go to the movies because we love to be entertained and it's hard to argue that it's the greatest form of entertainment but when serious viewers talk about film in terms of being important you would have to expect this title to be instantly brought up. This film covers the years from 1954 to 1962 in Algeria when the Arab section of Algiers started an uprising to fight the French and gain their own independence. Ali La Pointe (Brahim Haggiag) is a petty thief and hustler and when he gets out of jail he teams up with El-hadi Jaffar (Saadi Yacef) and together they form the Algerian National Liberation Front (FLN) in which they start terrorist attacks.\n\n*****SPOILER ALERT***** French authorities bring in Col. Mathieu (Jean Martin) to head the anti-terrorist unit and he uses methods of torture to slowly eliminate the insurrectionists who hide behind walls in apartments in the Casbah. Eventually Col. Mathieu kills Ali and it seems that everything will go back to what they were but two years later the Arabs take to the streets in huge numbers which causes the U.N. to take notice and in 1962 Algeria finally gained it's independence.\n\nThis was made by Italian filmmaker Gillo Pontecorvo who shot this in the actual locations in Algeria and used mainly non-actors in his cast (Martin is the only professional) and the story is based on a book by Yacef who not only is a survivor of these true events but is cast in an important role. Pontecorvo has created a film that seems so real that he had to have a disclaimer put into the credits stating that no newsreel or documentary footage was used which is incredible because there are so many scenes in which it appears that real events were caught on film. The script does it's best to show both the positive and the negative of both sides of the French and the FLN but it does seem that Pontecorvo leans towards the side of the Arabs. This all takes place in a time when most American viewers were not aware of what terrorism was about and in 1965 it was probably easy to just point at the French and think they should just get out but now in our day and age audiences are a little more sophisticated to the world and it's politics. There are scenes that take place that we will probably never see done again because of the lack of safety especially the shots of the bombs exploding and the (so-called) actors scrambling for their lives. Another point in the film shows a French soldier bursting into an apartment to search it and accidentally stepping on a crying baby! There is no doubt that this is one of the most important films ever made not just because of the subject matter but in the skill that Pontecorvo applies to achieve his vision. In 1965 this may not have been perceived as a truly great film but now 40 years later it's looked at as one of the most important films ever made and one that is studied by military personnel and those in the Pentagon.", u'-0.11121', u'What everyone forgets nowadays is that the French contribution to counter insurgency warfare was " The ink spot strategy " which was very effective against the Viet Minh in the early stages of the French Indo-China conflict 1946-54 . The same strategy was used most effectively by the British in Malaya in the 1950s where it crushed a communist insurrection , though it was painfully ineffective when the Brits used it in Afghanistan 50 years later . We can all remember the hurtful comments about France being shouted from The White House during Dubya\'s era but didn\'t stop the irony - if not out and out hypocrisy - of the same politicians watching this film in order to pick up a few tips on counter insurgency warfare in Iraq and Afghanistan \n\nBefore tonight I saw this almost 20 years ago and have never forgotten it . What I remembered most was the very even handed dealt out to both sides . This doesn\'t mean it tries either side as light gray , more like very very dark gray which neither side should be proud of . Based on the grim realities of the time . The French are happy to carry out black ops against the rebellion by blowing up innocent Algerian citizens making out houses are used for bomb factories and brutally torturing interned suspects while the Algerian rebels ( FLN ) blow up innocent civilians at coffee bars and sports stadiums , their victims not being the French military but innocent men woman and children . There are moments that can only be described as surreal irony where for example an Algerian child is stopped from being beaten to death by a French gendarme \n\nThis is a political film that shows a neutral point of view . In this type of conflict nearly everyone is neutral . Both the French and FLN try and make a headway in to turning the neutral in to being on " Our side ". Watching it in 2012 however you must be aware of one thing: The FLN are Muslims but they don\'t want to make a liberated Algeria in to a theocratic Islamic state - they\'re ( Relatively secular ) nationalists fighting again French colonialism . They\'re offering the Algerian people freedom from France not freedom from freedom . There\'s a subtlety to the ideas being put forward by both sides . The French realise not everyone is a terrorist whilst the FLN realise not everything can be solved by violence - revolutions need the will of the people . I could spend all day discussing the complex views put forward but there\'s a word limit of 1000 words . Just watch it and understand it \n\nThere\'s some obvious flaws to the movie . One is that many of the deaths are a bit too bloodless . Another is that we never see what is happening outside of the Algerian capital though the war in the countryside is referred to . Perhaps the biggest complaint is that two years after the main action the story jumps forward where more violent demonstrations take place without the benefit of historical context but if you understand revolution it\'s because the occupying power hasn\'t provided any political gains to the wider Algerian population after temporarily beating the FLN . All insurrections are political in nature and if politicians can\'t bring a political carrot to the table after beating the insurrection to death with a stick then the violence will continue periodically and ultimately end in defeat . I do hope all politicians in charge of a NATO country realise this', u'-0.297772', u"\nA great movie. It's especially relevant today considering how obviously its subject is analogous to America's current difficulties occupying Iraq. I only wish more Americans would watch it now.\n\nThe movie's gritty, realistic feel is very good, bringing the whole conflict to life and making it feel more urgent and personal. It's hard to believe the film's claim that no real news footage was used; some of the later protests and city-wide survey shots look like could have come from contemporary news.\n\nAlso, this movie's hardly biased. Even though the rebels get more screen time by far, the counterrevolutionary forces and uninvolved civilian views are presented sympathetically.\n", u'0.031037'], u'tt0325980': [u'I am nearly fifty years old. A sober grown man. With children. Children with whom I have now sat through hundreds of movies. Many of which I have enjoyed. And I am not completely hardened in my sophistication. The opening music to The Lion King brought tears to my eyes when my little ones were but wee tots. But still, these are after all just children\'s movies. In another life, I would never have seen them. And, really, one can\'t take such movies too seriously, can one?\n\nAnd so, this summer, after the ritual badgering, I dutifully trudged into yet another Disney "adventure" movie. Named after that tired old ride in Anaheim I first went on in 1965. I mean really, how much can you expect?\n\nAnd then, it happened. The swirling intoxication. The stunned feeling. What? Who? How? Was this a movie? Or a religious experience? Perhaps more like an addictive experience...\n\nI cannot remember ever willingly paying to see any movie not starring a relative of mine more than twice, and I can count those movies on one hand. I have now seen "Pirates" four times. The only thing keeping me from seeing it again is the sense that this whole thing is just getting out of hand. I cannot get enough of it. It\'s like walking into a painting that you never want to come back out of. My children ask, with a note of concern in their voices, "Dad, you really like Pirates of the Caribbean a lot, don\'t you?"\n\nAnd that Depp fellow. My God. I never had any idea who he was, but his name sounded like something created for a pubescent cover-boy for magazines published to hook thirteen year-old girls on make-up and bad music. Wasn\'t Depp the name of some hair-goo product back in the 60s?\n\nI am a straight male. I have several good friends who are gay, but have never fantasized about any gender but the female. But now I understand how women can experience swooning crushes on male film stars. He is simply extraordinary. So sly, so seductive, so canny! I read an interview in which Depp said he went through a slight depression when he had to stop playing Captain Jack Sparrow. I can see why. His inventiveness and sheer pleasure in inhabiting the character come through in every frame. How can I admit to my children that I now troll through fan websites about a former teen heart-throb?\n\nI often don\'t even watch the Academy Awards, and I certainly never have any emotional investment in who wins.\n\nExcept for this year.\n\nGo Jack.\n\nAnd, in a time when many big-budget movies are little more than a hodge-podge of loosely- connected "money shots" this movie puts all the pieces together, with a sense of fun and light-heartedness in special effects that are simply dazzling. I find myself laughing with dizzy appreciation when Barbossa barks out, "You\'d best be believing in ghost stories, Miss Turner, you\'re in one!" and the grinning skeletons come into view, with Badelt\'s pounding score keeping time to the beat of their maniacal deck-swabbing. And then there\'s the scene of the pirate-ghouls slithering up from the darkened sea on the mooring cables of the Dauntless, like infernal cats stalking their prey.\n\nAnd now to the music. I can just hear the effete aesthetes dismissing this score, as Mr. Zimmerman anticipates with his winking "overproduced by" credit on the cover-liner. "Bombastic." "Overdone." "Absurdly Stupendous."\n\nWell, perhaps it is, for those who spend their lives evaluating such things. To me, it is absolutely transporting. I first listened to it while doing a work-out on a rowing machine and found that I tripled my usual distance. It was like mainlining some hazardous tachycardic amphetamine.\n\nOnce again, the children were wondering, "What\'s up with Daddy? Is he OK?"\n\nPerhaps I am just losing my grip, having an adolescent movie get to me this way. But when those final credits roll, and Captain Jack narrows his eyes and says, "Now, bring me that horizon. Drink up me hearties, yo ho" and the music swells ... it is difficult to put into words the effect it has.\n\nAt this point my children have to yank me forcibly from the theater, lest I persist in watching the credits to the bitter end, and bid good-bye to the little monkey once more, wiping tears of exultation from my eyes.\n\nThis is not just another "entry" in the summer blockbust sweepstakes. It is an exquisite work of fantasy and inventiveness, a true classic, on the order of "The Wizard of Oz." I do hope Depp\'s performance garners not just awards, but a place in the pantheon, something we old fogies -- and our gently fogeying children decades hence -- will show to our children and grandchildren like a revealed treasure. I cannot recall any movie having such an effect on me.', u'-0.143536', u"\nA damn good movie. One of the best of 2003 in my view.\n\nThis movie made me laugh, and it really pulled me in.\n\nAt first I was afraid this would be another bad Pirate movie. I went to see it anyway, as I've always loved the legends of pirates, and I love adventure. I saw it once. Then twice. Then Quadrupul. Then six times. And one more 7. And now I eagerly wait for the DVD in Australia.\n\nWhat i'm saying is I couldn't get enough of this movie. It was so well done.\n\nJohnny Depp was hilarious a Jack Sparrow, and acted like a true Pirate. His obsessive drinking antics, and his walk really brought out this chaqracter. Plus he made character we could all love and enjoy, that deserves an Oscar in my view.\n\nGeoffrey Rush played Barbosa the bad guy. Who turned out to be quite a good bad guy in my view. He showed real potential, and I loved the way how he manipulated people.\n\nKeira Knightley plays Elizabeth, the governor's daughter. Prisoner of the Pirates. She is quite momorable in this role, and is a great jump for her evergrowing popularity.\n\nOrlando Bloom plays Will Turner. A simple blacksmith, who is also a well trained swordsman. Who is in hot pursuit of saving Elizabeth from the Pirates.\n\nThe more memorable thing about this though is the curse. A well thought out curse. That can always lead to sequel or a prequel. You'll see what I mean when you watch it.\n\nThe story is based on these Pirates who happen to be cursed, and they want to rid the curse. To do that they need the blood of a pirate, not just any pirate but the son of Bill Turner- William Turner. Mistaken for Bill Turner's child the pirates Capture Elizabeth, and take her hostage, while William teams up with a Rogue pirate, Jack Sparrow, who is on a streak for revenge against Barbosa. While all at the same time are being chased by the british fleet.\n\nA great adventure. Well played swordfighting. Great laughs. Great music. And great story. Pirates are back in my good book.\n\n\n\n\n", u'0.188073', u"\nAlthough I had expectations ( from watching the trailers ) that this might be a good movie, I was still surprised that it's as good as it is. The story is actually more complex than I had expected, involving cursed pirates and their quest to rid themselves of the curse. I won't say more than that so as not to spoil it if you haven't seen it.\n\nThere aren't as many action scenes as I had thought there would be in a pirate movie, but the ones that are in the movie were very fun and enjoyable. After seeing it, I think it had the right balance of action and drama. There are also, of course, a lot of funny bits interspersed between the action and drama. Some really good special effects also add to the enjoyment of this movie.\n\nI wasn't much of a fan of Johnny Depp until I saw this movie. I think he deserved to win the Academy Award for best actor. It's largely because of his performance, IMO, that the movie was so good. Most of the supporting cast did well, mind you, just that Johnny Depp stood high above the rest. I did find Orlando Bloom's performance a bit wooden, but other than that the acting was good.\n\nBasically, it's a really fun movie and I'd give it about 8 out of 10\n", u'0.269221', u"Disney seemed to be going down the tubes lately, with Atlantis and Home on the Range, but this movie is a masterpiece. If it wasn't for this movie, Johnny Depp wouldn't be as famous as he is today. Every scene with him or Geoffery Rush is brilliant. The movie is very crisp and the shots of the islands are breathtaking. Definitely a movie worth picking up at Blockbuster or even better, buying ( I don't buy DVDs often but this was one of them). The characters are thought out very well and plot is excellent. The script is one of the main stars of the film itself, every line that seems to come out of Sparrow or Barbossa's mouth or any of the other cast is original. If you like action films you'll love this, if you like comedy you'll love this, actually, this movie is great for everyone (except small kids, who may get frightened by the skeleton scenes). 10/10", u'0.426041', u'You will always remember this as the movie that made Johnny Depp a superstar and almost got him an Oscar.The fact that he didn\'t win isn\'t a problem,since thanks to him this is the best pirate film ever made.\n\nThe opening concept is a clich\xe8:a beautiful woman(Keira Knightley)is kidnapped by a bunch of filthy pirates(led by Geoffrey Rush\'s Barbossa)and the man(Orlando Bloom)who\'s desperately in love with her decides to track them down.From now on,things get unexpected,as he asks another pirate for help.And it\'s no ordinary pirate:it\'s Captain Jack Sparrow(Johnny Depp),a lying,cheating,but charismatic scumbag,the hardest man on Earth to predict,not to mention quite unlucky and clumsy("You are,with no doubt,the worst pirate I\'ve ever heard of" "But you HAVE heard of me!").\n\nIt\'s got all the elements of a classic pirate movie,elements that would give this flick a 9/10.\n\nSo,why am I giving it a 10/10? The answer is simple:Captain Jack.From the moment he makes his entrance,justly included in the Empire Top 10 Entrances of all time,we know he\'s the reason people will keep watching the movie.He \'s Depp\'s best non-Tim Burton-character ever,and I can\'t wait \'til he returns.\n\nSee you next summer,Captain!', u'0.38129', u"This is a fantastic movie full action, adventure, humor and a hell of a lot more! The film is 2 hours and 40 minutes long, but that time flies by as you are transported into an awesome world of swashbuckling and sword fights.\n\nJohnny Depp's performance is one of his best ever as the slightly camp Captain Jack Sparrow. Even under his tangle of hair and blackened eyes, he will make you swoon and laugh both at the same time with his tonnes of witty lines and mannerisms. Orlando Bloom plays the love struck son of a pirate, Will Turner and play him he does! This roll highlights the diversity and skill shown by some of the greats. We will definitely see big things from him in years to come. In her second roll in big time flick, Kira Knightley plays kidnapped Govener's daughter, Elizabeth Swan. She is also another young, up and coming star with a bright future ahead of her.\n\nThe film may not be the most historically accurate pirate film of all times but all that is forgotten as you enjoy the brilliance of this marvelous movie. Did I also catch a subtle omage to the 1953 swashbuckler 'The Crimson Pirate' when Will and Jack walk underwater in an upturned rowing boat? Sneaky!\n\nThe only negative thing I have to say, and believe me I don't want to say it, is that fact we are never told the reason why the curse of the black pearl could only be broken by the blood of William Turner (Senior) and in turn by his son. Despite this plot flaw however, Pirates of the Caribbean is a magical journey that will drop the jaws of parents, children and grandparents alike. I'm definitely buying it when it come out on DVD!", u'0.492304', u'\n\n "Even I love Johnny Depp, and I\'m male," a previous reviewer declares, tongue in cheek. Well, I wouldn\'t go quite that far, but there\'s no doubt whatsoever that when I lost my heart to this film, Johnny Depp\'s outrageous Cap\'n Jack Sparrow had almost everything to do with it. I\ndon\'t normally review \'current\' films, so the very fact that I\'m writing this highlights an almost unprecedented event - after endless failures, Hollywood has finally rediscovered the spirit of the classic swashbuckler movie.\n\nWith hindsight, I think the one brilliant decision that was made at some point - given a modern production environment - was to *separate the roles* of hero and swashbuckler. You can then have your worthy Costner-type juvenile lead, as required, who has to Come To Terms with his Past (although his eventual fate is a trifle unexpected in conventional terms...) - *but* you can also have your essential and irrepressible swaggering rogue (of course, he totally steals the film from the moment he first appears, but *that\'s* no hardship!)\n\nThe moonlight special effects were overdone, in my opinion - not that they aren\'t believable, but that they would have been more effective if used more sparingly, for occasional flashes of nastiness rather than solid minutes of battle. However, that\'s a minor niggle. The stunts are energetic, highly satisfactory, *not* computerised, and on occasion even carried out by the stars :-)\n\nThe other saving grace of the production is its humour - not that there aren\'t a few over-arch knowing references, but on the whole it manages to send itself up without suspending disbelief in the process. Jack Sparrow\'s first arrival on the scene (with total aplomb aboard a\nsteadily-sinking boat) is a prime example, as indeed are the vast majority of subsequent scenes involving this character...\n\nThe basic Romance and Rescue structure is satisfactory enough, with the addition of the requisite Feisty Female for the 21st century (though I\nfelt the character would have been a little more historically plausible if she had been a little less liberated - she clearly possesses a\nstronger character than her young man, she doesn\'t have to strive to be his physical equal as well...) However, it is the pirates themselves who really make the film, simply by being a pack of unreconstructed and uninhibited villains (from the Jeffrey Farnol School of Historical Dialect) who are far larger than life and totally unselfconscious about it. To quote the opening words of the \'Guardian\' review: "we have been waiting [50 years] for a modern pirate film featuring someone who, in all seriousness, actually says the words, or perhaps the two-syllable single word: \'Ah-harrrrr!\'"\n\nJack Sparrow, as swashbuckler extraordinaire and consummate rogue (of course, totally honest in his own way... ahem) is the main attraction of the entire film. Not so much loopy as totally round the bend -\noutrageous and unpredictable (there is a running gag throughout the first part of the film where he is repeatedly described as "the worst pirate I\'ve ever seen", as in "the worst at it", only for the preposterous tactics in question to prove spectacularly successful).\n\nThis character saves the hero in more ways than one - without him, the film would be another "Mask of Zorro", a rather stodgy attempt to update an old favourite for modern-day sensibilities and compensate with more and flashier sword-fighting (swashbuckling is not *about* fighting! It comes into it, yes, but it\'s not the point.) But together, the pair work off one another beautifully - reliability and inspired lunacy, self-doubt and cocky flamboyance, dogged devotion and shameless self-interest. The only question is which, precisely, is the sidekick...\n\nThere are two beginnings to this film, neither of them bearing any relation to the wooden costume-drama-by-numbers prologue that actually opens the movie. The moment when events start to move (it could scarcely be less subtle) is signalled by the swell of the theme music for the first time at Sparrow\'s initial appearance. But for me the moment when the film really took off was in that instant during his first escape, when he seizes the rope and swings up, up, and out, in a\nclassic swashbuckler move from the past that brought it all flooding back... and my heart flew up after him into my throat, and remained enjoyably in that position until the end of the movie, when the audience began spontaneously to applaud.\n\nThe film is far from perfect - characters like Captain Norrington (*please* - \'Commodore\', like \'Prime Minister\', is a job description, not a form of address!) and the Governor are little more than pantomime stereotypes, with only frustrating hints of humanity to indicate that they do after all have potential denied them by the script. Annoying anachronisms slip in - "it\'s okay", "I was rooting for you" - most of the nautical jargon comes out with about as much sign of comprehension as a phonetic rendition of a foreign language, and Sparrow\'s one precious charge of powder gets soaked through often enough in the course of the plot to be utterly useless by the end. Both hero and heroine come across as wooden and thankless roles. Orlando Bloom may be costumed to look increasingly like Errol Flynn during the course of the film (was it my imagination, or does he spend it gradually cultivating a duplicate of that famous moustache?), but, alas, any resemblance ends there.\n\nBut then it doesn\'t really matter. It is Depp, not Bloom, who has inherited the mantle of Flynn and Fairbanks in this film. Jack Sparrow was the character who caught my imagination - and, since I\'m extremely impressionable, also had a distinctly peculiar effect on the way I\nstood and walked for several hours later. And there\'s not many films can say *that*..! \xff\n\n\n\n\n\n\n\n\n\n\n\n\n\n', u'-0.0350363', u"Despite being rife with technical blunders such as the longest full moon in history, Disney's first non-PG film is proving to be a financial boon while at the same time collecting reviews from critics that run from tepid to red hot. I am in complete agreement with Roger Ebert on one point: Somewhere in this 143 minute tour de force there lurks a very good ninety-minute film.\n\nOther than Johnny Depp, who fashioned his character's personality (and eye makeup?) after observations of his good friend Keith Richards of the Rolling Stones, the cast of 'Pirates' reads like a Who's Who of English film actors, including Orlando Bloom, Keira Knightley, Jack Davenport and Mackenzie Crook.\n\nWhen screenwriters Ted Elliot and Terry Rossio originally pitched the movie to the Disney executives in the early '90s, Disney rejected it. It makes one wonder just who is running the Disney empire. Universal Studios have been combining action/adventure movies with theme park rides for over two decades (E.T., Jurassic Park, Jaws, and Back to the Future to name a few) only in reverse order-first the film, then the ride. This combination has worked well for Universal, and it seems almost absurd that Disney has taken so long to pick up on the obvious.\n\nI liked three things in particular about this film. Just say Johnny Depp three times. His character Jack Sparrow redefines the term swashbuckler. Not since William Hurt's performance in Children of a Lesser God , and to a slightly lesser degree Kevin Costner's in JFK, has an actor so resoundingly stolen the show. If you do not like Johnny Depp, 'Pirates' is not for you. If you do like Mr. Depp (Edward Scissorhands, Ed Wood), you will enjoy 'Pirates'.\n\nThat is not to say that Orlando Bloom and Geoffrey Rush were less than fantastic. Rush made a delightful villain as Capt. Barbossa, and Orlando Bloom's performance brought charisma to a rather limiting role as Will Turner. Expect nothing but good things from this young actor in the future.\n\nLet us examine the plot. This will be a rather short paragraph, for sword fights do not a movie make. The opening scenes show a young Elizabeth Swann on a ship at sea. A young Will Turner floats up on a raft, unconscious, wearing a gold medallion round his neck. Elizabeth hides the medallion so that no one else will know that young Will is a pirate. Years later, the pirates come to Port Royal in quest of the gold piece and kidnap the governor's daughter Elizabeth (Kiera Knightly), now all grown up. The fact that she also has the medallion they are looking for is just one of those lucky things that will happen if you're a good pirate who eats well and stays fit. Captain Jack Sparrow shows up at about the same time and he and Will commandeer a ship from the Royal Navy to chase the pirates, save Elizabeth, and add some adventure to their otherwise bleak lives. Swordfight, swordfight, swordfight, and that's about it. Let us just say that Pirates of the Caribbean has all the plot of an amusement park ride and leave it at that.\n\nA few predictions may be in order, however. Look for an Oscar nomination for Depp's efforts. Look for nominations as well for sound, set design, makeup, and cinematography. As far as best picture? Next to Lord of the Rings (Return of the King)? Not likely.\n\nDirector Gore Verbinski, who used to play in a punk rock band and is best known for creating the Budweiser frogs, does an outstanding job keeping track of the myriad details required of a director, given his limited experience. True, 'Pirates' has countless errors in continuity, but those occur in any film of such scope. Mr. Verbinski has only four other films to his name: a short entitled The Ritual (1996), and then three very different but effectively made films, Mouse Hunt (1997), The Mexican (2001), and the very creepy thriller The Ring (2002). Again, it makes one wonder just who is at the helm of the USS Disney to put a $125 million movie in the hands of a neophyte. Well, it worked with Lord of the Rings and a very inexperienced Peter Jackson, and it worked here for Disney as well.\n\n'Pirates of the Caribbean' is a fun movie for most of the family. It may be rather scary for children ten and under and somewhat boring for many over twenty-five. I enjoyed it immensely for exactly what it was... an amusing ride.", u'0.09448', u'When the daughter of the governor of a Caribbean island, Elizabeth Swann (Keira Knightley), is proposed by Commodore Norrington (Jack Davenport), she faints, fells into the sea and is rescued and saved by the pirate Captain Jack Sparrow (Johnny Depp) but he is arrested and sentenced to death for piracy. Meanwhile, the town is attacked by the ship Black Pearl, commanded by the former first mate Barbossa (Geoffrey Rush), who leaded a mutiny against Captain Jack Sparrow years ago. Barbossa kidnaps Elizabeth, and the blacksmith Will Turner (Orlando Bloom), who loves her, releases Jack Sparrow and they steal the fastest vessel of the navy to follow the Black Pearl, Will trying to save Elizabeth, and Jack trying to retrieve his ship. Along their journey, many secrets are disclosed about the course of the Black Pearl and her crew.\n\nThe supernatural adventures of Captain Jack Sparrow, Elizabeth Swann, Will Turner and Barbossa are so spectacular that really deserves to be included among the best movies (Top 250) in IMDb. This film has action, humor, romance, mystery, special effects and is so delightful that the viewer does not feel the running time of 143 minutes. I saw this movie for the first time on 24 April 2004, and I have just watched again today (10 Feb 2007) enjoying the same way as in the first time. My vote is ten.\n\nTitle (Brazil): "Piratas do Caribe \x96 A Maldi\xe7\xe3o do P\xe9rola Negra" ("Pirates of the Caribbean: The Curse of the Black Pearl")', u'0.360838', u'\nThis is a movie to sit back and enjoy. Funny, fast-paced and with sterling performances from all of the cast, it\'s not to be missed for good, old-fashioned entertainment. I\'m not a huge fan of Depp, but here he excels. Knightly and Bloom make an engaging couple and I enjoyed the fact that the characters of Governor Swann and Norrington were taken in a different direction from that which might be expected by Hollywood. The former could have easily become the stereotypical "You\'ll marry who I say you\'ll marry, girl!", while Norrington could have been the standard English navy bully and nasty piece of work. Instead, both were engaging good guys and Norrington\'s graceful dealings with Will and Elizabeth brought a core of humanity to the movie.\n\n\nAnd to the previous reviewer who thought they\'d spotted a plot hole:\n\nS\n\nP\n\nO\n\nI\n\nL\n\nE\n\nR\n\n[quote]while there`s a serious plot hole at the end where it`s revealed that Jack Sparrow has been suffering from the curse all along so how did he manage to stay out of the moonlight without anyone noticing his skeletal state ? And how did he manage to get drunk on rum ?[/quote]\n\nActually, you just weren\'t watching the movie properly. Jack wasn\'t in a skeletal state all along. Shortly before the swordfight in the caves with Barbossa and being shown to be skeletal, Jack stole one of the cursed coins from the chest. When he was stabbed by Barbossa, he became skeletal because he was cursed from that moment on. This was made clear at the time when Jack\'s response to finding out he was suddenly skeletal was to declare, "That\'s interesting!", flip the stolen coin between his fingers and tell Barbossa, "I couldn\'t resist." Indicating that he was aware that it was his stealing the coin that had turned him skeletal once he was stabbed.\n\n\n', u'0.0409486', u'What lifts this film above typical Disney fluff is Johnny Depp\'s humorous performance as pirate Jack Sparrow, the eccentric, individualistic anti-hero, who confronts other pirates, and outwits a humorless, incompetent bureaucratic establishment. Sparrow looks more like Cher than Johnny Depp, and talks more like William F. Buckley than a pirate. Geoffrey Rush is a worthy foil as the main rival pirate, Barbossa, a character who vaguely resembles Margaret Hamilton in "The Wizard Of Oz".\n\nMost of the plot is silly. There\'s lots of fighting, shouting, and general mayhem, all accompanied by a frantic score. It\'s a cinematic slight of hand that conveys an illusion of substance. Still, it\'s an entertaining popcorn flick. \n\nI\'m glad I watched it. Depp\'s deft performance gives us a memorable character, one that is perhaps unique in cinema history.', u'0.183767', u'\n---Mild Spoilers---\n\nThis is my all time favorite after 30+ years of movie going.  I\'ve viewed it many times and was happy to see it surpass the $300 million mark!\n\nI just love the fact that everyone involved in this movie seemed to be h***-bent on entertaining us.  Not to make us cry, not to make us think deeply, not to manipulate our feelings.  Just good, old-fashioned entertainment with no profanity or nudity necessary.  I\'m glad such times are back.\n\nThe cast was simply fantastic and they generously let the fun they were clearly having rub off on us.  But they did not let this cause them to sacrifice one iota of dedication to their performances.  Jack Davenport, Orlando Bloom, Geoffrey Rush, and outrageously talented Johnny Depp just swept us away.  (I also can\'t neglect to mention Damian O\'Hare, who had the small role as Lt. Gilette.  Watch his facial expressions throughout the movie; he was just the perfect British prig, and I hope we see more of him in the future.)  Relative rookie Kiera Knightley:  not bad given her age; but she is much better in the scenes where she is angry than when she\'s Will-ting.\n\nI think that Davenport, Rush and Depp all delivered reasonably complex characters despite the superficial story line.  Norrington is ambitious but also has a strong compassionate streak.  Barbossa\'s integrity is his evilness, yet we can also see his weaknesses and humanity.  Sparrow is like that friend we all have who is a bad boy but would do anything for you in the end, along with the many other traits Depp built into this character. Depp, by far, is the one who jumped off the screen and grabbed you and pulled you into the show.  It\'s hard to say more, the guy is just astonishingly freakin\' talented.\n\nI think that there were some nice themes in this movie.  I especially liked the ending, given that Jack Sparrow spent a good deal of the movie in handcuffs, in jail, in the brig, walking the plank, stranded on an island, with guns pointed at him, on the gallows, etc.  Combine all of that with his confession to Elizabeth (on the Island) of what the Black Pearl really is. Did we get set up to love that ending or what?  I also like that the movie started and ended on the same song, and that Elizabeth at the beginning held the key to Jack\'s situation at the ending.\n\nThe scenes with Jack and Barbossa in them together were by far the best. It takes until about halfway through the movie until we get them face to face. Their exchange at the plank-walking was priceless, as was the "parle" on board the Pearl.  But that sword fight in the cave took all!  It\'s new and it\'s classic all at once and it just feels like what pirate-movie-making should be all about.\n\nSpeaking of pirates, I loved their scenes too, especially the "gents, take a\nwalk" scene.  I also loved the sly way that Mr. Cotton\'s parrot snuck in all of the pirate cliches that were just too cliche to work into the dialogue. Clever!\n\nEven if you don\'t like the story, just sit back and watch the scenery/great use of color and listen to the music.  Nothing was left to chance in putting together a great visual and audio experience for us, and there is something for everyone here.  I\'ve seen many fun, witty, adventure and other movies. But this one is just above all in my book because it is having fun and entertains you up and down in the process.  There are many reasons, I suppose, that people go to movies, but entertaining is really what they are for, and this film delivers in spades.\n\nIt is no wonder all of the main cast signed up for the sequel/prequel (whatever it is).  I, for one, can\'t wait!\n\n\n\n10/10\n\n\n\n\n\n\n\n\n\n\n\n\n\n', u'0.301689', u'Captain Jack Sparrow (Johnny Depp) is not y/our typical Errol Flynn type of machismo, swashbuckling pirate; nor does he play another Disney Captain Hook. He\'s more like Fagan in "Oliver." Capt. Sparrow\'s ever so fey. That\'s his charm.\n\nThough the pirates on the "Black Pearl" ship are dead & sometimes in their skeleton form they aren\'t scary enough for kids since this is a comedy.\n\nThe story line goes as follows: A governor\'s daughter is in charge of a young boy her own age who has been pulled out of the sea by her father\'s bourgeoisie crew. She notices his necklace is a pirate\'s & takes it from him to protect him from being hung to death.\n\nBut, the golden medallion is the last 1 of a pirate\'s treasure that has cursed the "Black Pearl" ship\'s crew. Without its return, with the blood of the boy on it, the skeletal crew remains dead, unable to feel any life in themselves; they are also not killable since they are already dead.\n\nCapt. Sparrow (Depp), though a bumbling comical pirate who\'s bent upon owning the "Black Pearl," the ship the cursed crew stole from him, plays a marvelously lovable & lucky pirate who is the super glue that holds together the loose ends of the movie. Depp gives his cutest performance I\'ve seen; he\'s now my favorite pirate! The script is clever; cinematography is fine; special effects are spot-on.', u'0.184054', u"When I first saw the film, I thought it was awesome- the graphics were great and no doubt, Jack Sparrow (Depp) and Will Turner (Bloom) were hot in their own ways. I was surprised that Disney would have scary skeletons in a movie, but it was a very good film indeed.\n\nThis movie starts off with a song about pirates, which, I think, is genius. Not subtle, not direct, just genius. The whole plot revolves around rescuing... and rescuing... and rescuing, again.\n\nThe second time I saw this film, I thought it was disgusting. What the heck, I thought to myself. It's so... so... unrealistic (which is really unlike me, because I adore fantasy- just not too far-fetched in the fantasy world, like Mary-sue or people popping out of no where to help others). Until I saw it for the third time. I loved it then. (And yes, to watch a film for 3 times and have 3 different opinions each time makes the following statement true- 'there is obviously something wrong with me.') The thing that made me love this movie SOOOO very much was- 'Freedom'. As Sparrow had said, being a pirate is like having freedom. I had a knot in my stomach when I heard this- I mean, oh my god, I hated being trapped in a boring routine everyday. Being a pirate meant adventures, risks, excitement. And that really attached me to the movie. Whenever I read books or watch TV shows or movies about high adventures or fantasy, I almost cry because I'm not the main character- it's not me who's having all the fun, and reading these books or shows or movies might be the closest thing I will ever be to having the adventure of a lifetime.\n\nWatch this movie. It will give you a knot in the stomach if you will just pay close attention and hope to feel like you are one in it.", u'-0.0131191', u"This movie is a must fo anyone's collection. It's clean, exciting and fun to watch. It gave me a whole new view on piracy. I mean every pirate in movies and plays before this either had a parrot, a peg-leg or an eye-patch. Pirates of the Caribbean doesn't have any of those stereotypes. Depp plays his role brilliantly, there is not a dull moment when he's on screen and Bloom portrayed the love-sick blacksmith perfectly as well. Knightley's role was a bit modern(strong, take-charge feminist), but that also added to the movie, she was great. I could go on about the actors, but there wouldn't be any more room, they were marvelous! This movie is mysterious, every single time I watch it, I can barely pull myself away from the screen! THis is without a doubt, the best movie I've seen yet.(A)", u'0.0755598']}